miRNAs have been widely investigated in terms of cell proliferation and differentiation. However, little is known about their effects on bird growth. Here we characterized the promoter of miR-206 in chicken and found that the preferable promoter was located in 1200 bp upstream of pri-miR-206. In this region, many key transcription factors, including MyoD, c-Myb, CEBPα/β, AP-4, RAP1, Brn2, GATA-1/2/3, E47, Sn, upstream stimulatory factor (USF) and CdxA, were predicted to bind and interact with miR-206 promoter. Overexpression of MyoD sharply increased miR-206 expression in both fibroblast and myoblast cells, and also the regulation in the myoblast cells was much stronger, indicating that miR-206 was regulated by MyoD combined with other muscle specific transcriptional factors. Aiming to further investigate the relationship between miR-206 mutation and transcriptional expression, total of 23 SNPs were identified in the two distinct bird lines by sequencing. Interestingly, the motif bound by MyoD was individually destroyed by G-to-C mutation located at 419 bp upstream of miR-206 precursor. Co-transfecting MyoD and miR-206 promoter in DF-1 cells, the luciferase activity of promoter containing homozygous GG types was significantly higher than CC ones (p < 0.05). Thus, this mutation caused low expression of miR-206. Consistently, eight variants including G-419C mutation exhibited a great effect on birthweight through maker-trait association analysis in F2 population (p < 0.05). Additionally, the regulation of miR-206 on embryo muscle mass mainly by increasing MyoG and muscle creatine kinase (MCK) expression (p < 0.05) with little change in MyoD, TMEM8C and myosin heavy chain (MHC). In conclusion, our findings provide a novel mutation destroying the promoter activity of miR-206 in birds and shed new light to understand the regulation mechanism of miR-206 on the embryonic muscle growth.
Phenoloxidases (POs) play key roles in various physiological functions in insects, e.g., cuticular sclerotization, wound healing, egg tanning, cuticle formation and melanotic encapsulaction of pathogens. Previously, we identified five POs, designated As-pro-PO I-V, from the mosquito Armigeres subalbatus and demonstrated that the functions of As-pro-PO I, II and III, were associated with filarial parasite melanization, blood feeding and cuticle formation, respectively. In the present study, we delineate the dual functions of As-pro-PO V. We found that the level of As-pro-PO V mRNA in mosquitoes was significantly increased after microfilaria challenge or blood feeding, and decreased to normal level after oviposition. Knockdown of As-pro-PO V by dsRNA resulted in significant decreases in the degree of microfilaria melanization, egg chronic melanization rates and egg hatching rates in Ar. subalbatus. Further transfection and electrophoretic mobility-shift assays verified the As-pro-PO V gene might regulated by both AP-1, a putative immune-related regulatory element and CdxA, a developmental regulatory element. The binding of AP-1 and CdxA motif with mosquito nuclear extracts was significantly enhanced after microfilaria challenge and blood-feeding in Ar. subalbatus, respectively. These results indicate that As-pro-PO V is a critical enzyme that is required for both an effective melanization immune response and egg chorion melanization in this mosquito.
Our recent genome-wide association study (GWAS) had discovered a new locus at 8p23 (rs2738048) associated with IgA nephropathy (IgAN) in Chinese Han patients, implicating the DEFA gene family within this locus as susceptibility genes. However, it is still unknown whether there are additional variations within these genes associated with the disease susceptibility. The aim of this study is to investigate the polymorphisms of DEFA genes in the susceptibility to IgAN and explore possible disease mechanisms. Sixteen tag single-nucleotide polymorphisms (tag SNPs) were selected for association study in 1,000 IgAN cases and 1,000 controls by using Sequenom MassArray system or TaqMan SNP genotyping assays. We found seven SNPs within DEFA genes that were significantly associated with IgAN, including rs2738048 discovered in our previous GWAS (p = 0.0007, OR = 0.77) and additional 6 SNPs (rs2615787, p = 0.0001, OR = 0.74; rs2738081, p = 0.0003, OR = 0.72; rs2738058, p = 0.0001, OR = 0.73; rs4288398, p = 0.0008, OR = 0.78; rs6984215, p = 0.002, OR = 0.63; rs12716641, p = 0.00002, OR = 0.71). Electrophoretic mobility shift assays and luciferase assays demonstrated that fragments containing rs2738048, rs2738081 and rs6984215 were transcription factor binding sites for CTF, SP1 and CdxA, respectively, and the allele status of rs2738048 and rs6984215 could significantly change the luciferase activity. These results suggest that polymorphisms within DEFA genes are involved in gene transcriptional regulation, and this may have some effect in mediating susceptibility to IgAN in southern Chinese.
This study examined the associations between vitamin D status, bone mineral content (BMC), areal bone mineral density (aBMD), and markers of calcium homeostasis in preschool-aged children. Children (n=488; age range: 1.8-6.0 y) were randomly recruited from Montreal. The distal forearm was scanned using a peripheral dual-energy X-ray absorptiometry scanner (Lunar PIXI; GE Healthcare, Fairfield, CT). A subset (n=81) had clinical dual-energy X-ray absorptiometry (cDXA) scans (Hologic 4500A Discovery Series) of lumbar spine (LS) 1-4, whole body, and ultradistal forearm. All were assessed for plasma 25-hydroxyvitamin D [25(OH)D] and parathyroid hormone concentrations (Liaison; Diasorin), ionized calcium (ABL80 FLEX; Radiometer Medical A/S), and dietary vitamin D and calcium intakes by survey. Age (p<0.001) and weight-for-age Z-score (p<0.001) were positively associated with BMC and aBMD in all regression models, whereas male sex contributed positively to forearm BMC and aBMD. Having a 25(OH)D concentration of >75 nmol/L positively associated with forearm and whole body BMC and aBMD (p<0.036). Sun index related to (p<0.029) cDXA forearm and LS 1-4 BMC and whole-body aBMD. Nutrient intakes did not relate to BMC or aBMD. In conclusion, higher vitamin D status is linked to higher BMC and aBMD of forearm and whole body in preschool-aged children.
Helicobacter pylori encoded CagA is presently the only known virulence factor that is injected into gastric epithelial cells where it destroys apical junctional complexes and induces dedifferentiation of gastric epithelial cells, leading to H. pylori-related gastric carcinogensis. However, little is known about the molecular mechanisms by which CagA mediates these changes. Caudal-related homeobox 2 (Cdx2) is an intestine-specific transcription factor highly expressed in multistage tissues of dysplasia and cancer. One specific target of Cdx2, Claudin-2, is involved in the regulation of tight junction (TJ) permeability. In this study, our findings showed that the activity of Cdx2 binding to Cdx binding sites of CdxA (GTTTATG) and CdxB (TTTTAGG) of probes corresponding to claudin-2 flanking region increased in AGS cells, infected with CagA positive wild-type strain of H. pylori, compared to CagA negative isogenic mutant-type strain. Moreover, Cdx2 upregulated claudin-2 expression at transcriptional level and translational level. In the meantime, we found that TJs of AGS cells, infected with CagA positive wild-type strain of H. pylori, compared to CagA negative isogenic mutant-type strain, were more severely destroyed, leading to wider cell gap, interference of contact, scattering and highly elevated migration of cells. Herein, this study is firstly demonstrated that H. pylori-encoded CagA disrupts TJs and induces invasiveness of AGS gastric carcinoma cells via Cdx2-dependent targeting of Claudin-2. This provides a new mechanism whereby CagA induced dedifferentiation of AGS cells, leading to malignant behavior of biology.
There are few large-scale studies on the utility of peripheral dual energy X-ray absorptiometry (pDXA) in children. As central dual energy X-ray absorptiometry (cDXA) equipment is not commonly available in the developing world, we assessed the correlation of bone mineral density (BMD) with cDXA and pDXA in children to determine the optimal Z-score thresholds of pDXA for predicting two predefined Z-score cutoffs (≤-1, ≤-2) of cDXA in 844 subjects (441 boys, 403 girls) aged 10-18 years. The BMD of antero-posterior lumbar spine (L1-L4), proximal femur and forearm was measured by cDXA, while the peripheral BMD of forearm and calcaneus was estimated using pDXA. The correlation was statistically significant at all sites (p<0.01). The coefficients ranged from 0.56 to 0.79 in boys and 0.17 to 0.32 in girls. A significant positive correlation was observed between BMD by pDXA and cDXA in Indian children, with a strong gender difference in both the extent of correlation and the ability of peripheral BMD to predict central BMD.
The high mobility group box 1 (HMGB1) protein is a multifunctional cytokine-like molecule that plays an important role in the pathogenesis of tumors. In this study, real-time polymerase chain reactions and Western blot assays indicated that HMGB1 transcriptional activity and protein level are increased in Tax+-T cells (TaxP). To clarify the mechanisms, a series of HMGB1 deletion reporter plasmids (pHLuc1 to pHLuc6) were transfected into Tax--T cells (TaxN, Jurkat) and Tax+-T cells (TaxP). We found that promoter activity in Tax+-T cells to be higher than that in Tax--T cells, indicating a significant increase in pHLuc6. Bay11-7082 (NF-κB inhibitor) treatment did not block the enhancing effect. Chromatin immunoprecipitation assays revealed that Tax was retained on a HMGB1 promoter fragment encompassing -1163 to -975. Bioinformatics analysis showed six characteristic cis-elements for CdxA, AP-1, AML-1a, USF, v-Myb, and C/EBP in the fragment in question. Mutation of cis- elements for C/EBP reduced significant HMGB1 promoter activity induced by Tax. These findings indicate that Tax enhances the expression of HMGB1 gene at the transcriptional level, possibly by interacting with C/EBP.
Interferon regulatory factor 2 (IRF-2) is a multi-functional transcription factor in the IRF family exhibiting both transcriptional activating and repressing activities. In this study, an IRF-2 gene (HcIRF-2) from Hyriopsis cumingii was identified and characterized. The cDNA sequence consisted of 2688 bp, encoding a 329 amino acid-protein. The amino acid sequence had a highly conserved N-terminal DBD structure, containing characteristic repeats of six tryptophan residues. The 5'-flanking region contained several transcription regulation elements such as AP1, CdxA, HSF, NIT2 and HNF-3b. Nine SNPs were obtained through direct sequencing of HcIRF-2 from resistant and susceptible stock. Only +2365T/C SNP was significantly associated with resistance/susceptibility of H. cumingii to Aeromonas hydrophila both in genotype (P = 0.021) and allele (P = 0.006) analysis. The SNPs +2248T/C and +2365T/C were in high linkage disequilibrium, and haplotype analysis revealed that haplotype TT frequency in the resistant group was significantly higher than in the susceptible group. The mortality in +2248CC genotype individuals was significantly higher than in CT and TT genotype individuals. These results indicated that haplotype TT and genotype +2248CT and +2248GT individuals were resistant to A. hydrophila, which could make them potential markers in selective breeding of H. cumingii.
Based on the cDNA sequence of GPX in Hyriopsis cumingii, the complete genomic DNA of GPX gene and it's 5'-flanking region were identified from H. cumingii using PCR and genome walking technique. The length of the complete genomic sequence was 6 708 bp including the 5'-flanking region, two exons, and one intron. Sequence analysis of the 992 bp 5'-flanking region revealed that it contained a core promoter element (TATA-box) and other transcription regulation elements such as AP1, C/EBP, and CdxA. The sequence lengths of the two exons were 273 bp and 991 bp, respectively, and the intron was 4 491 bp in length. Sixteen single nucleotide polymorphisms (SNPs) were detected in the GPX gene from resistant stock (RS) and susceptible stock (SS) of H. cumingii. These polymorphisms were analyzed with regard to resistance to Aeromonas hydrophila. Among them, three SNPs including A-99G, A-86C, and A-49C in GPX promoter and five SNPs including A2841T, C2847T, G3146C, A3150G, and G4645T in GPX introns were associated with resistance/susceptibility of H. cumingii to A. hydrophila, both in genotype and allele frequency. Linkage disequilibrium analysis revealed that A-86C, A-49C, C2847T, A3150G, G4645T, A2841T, and G3146C were in high linkage disequilibrium, and haplotype analysis revealed that the frequency of two major predominant haplotypes (ACTGT and TG) in the resistant group was significantly higher than that in the susceptible group. The results suggest that the polymorphic loci in the GPX gene could be potential genetic markers for future molecular selection of strains resistant to diseases.
Investigating intestinal physiology in vitro remains challenging due to the lack of an effective primary enterocyte culture system. Recently developed protocols for growing organoids containing crypts and villus from adult mouse intestinal epithelium in Matrigel present an attractive alternative to the classical techniques. However, these approaches require the use of sophisticated and expensive serum-free medium supplemented with epithelial growth factor (EGF), Wnt agonist (R-spondin 1), and bone morphogenetic protein inhibitor (Noggin) in high concentrations. Here we demonstrate that is possible to use an isolated chicken embryonic intestinal epithelium to create such an organoid culture. Structures formed in Matrigel matrix in the first two days following isolation survive and enlarge during ensuing weeks. They have the appearance of empty spheres and comprise cells expressing cytokeratin (an epithelial cell marker), villin (a marker of enterocytes), and Sox-9 (a transcription factor characteristic of progenitors and stem cells of intestinal crypts). With chicken embryonic tissue as a source of organoids, prostaglandin E2 is as effective as R-spondin 1 and Noggin in promoting sustained growth and survival of epithelial spheroids.
The production of therapeutic proteins from transgenic animals is one of the most important successes of animal biotechnology. Milk is presently the most mature system for production of therapeutic proteins from a transgenic animal. Specifically, β-casein is a major component of cow, goat and sheep milk, and its promoter has been used to regulate the expression of transgenic genes in the mammary gland of transgenic animals. Here, we cloned the porcine β-casein gene and analyzed the transcriptional activity of the promoter and intron 1 region of the porcine β-casein gene. Sequence inspection of the 5'-flanking region revealed potential DNA elements including SRY, CdxA, AML-a, GATA-3, GATA-1 and C/EBP β. In addition, the first intron of the porcine β-casein gene contained the transcriptional enhancers Oct-1, SRY, YY1, C/EBP β, and AP-1, as well as the retroviral TATA box. We estimated the transcriptional activity for the 5'-proximal region with or without intron 1 of the porcine β-casein gene in HC11 cells stimulated with lactogenic hormones. High transcriptional activity was obtained for the 5'-proximal region with intron 1 of the porcine β-casein gene. The β-casein gene containing the mutant TATA box (CATAAAA) was also cloned from another individual pig. Promoter activity of the luciferase vector containing the mutant TATA box was weaker than the same vector containing the normal TATA box. Taken together, these findings suggest that the transcription of porcine β-casein gene is regulated by lactogenic hormone via intron 1 and promoter containing a mutant TATA box (CATAAAA) has poor porcine β-casein gene activity.
To examine whether PARK16, which was recently identified as a protective locus for Parkinson disease (PD) in Asian, white, and South American populations, is also associated with PD in the genetically homogeneous Ashkenazi Jewish population.
Case-control study.
A medical center affiliated with a university. Subjects  Five single-nucleotide polymorphisms (SNPs) located between RAB7L1 and SLC41A1 were analyzed in 720 patients with PD and 642 controls, all of Ashkenazi Jewish origin.
Haplotypes were defined and risk estimates were determined for each SNP and haplotype. Bioinformatic analysis defined the putative promoter region of RAB7L1 and the transcription factor binding sites that are potentially affected by 2 of the tested SNPs.
All tested SNPs were significantly associated with PD (odds ratios = 0.64-0.76; P = .0002-.014). Two of them, rs1572931 and rs823144, were localized to the putative promoter region of RAB7L1 and their sequence variations altered the predicted transcription factor binding sites of CdxA, p300, GATA-1, Sp1, and c-Ets-1. Only 0.4% of patients were homozygous for the protective rs1572931 genotype (T/T), compared with 3.0% among controls (P = 5 × 10(-5)). This SNP was included in a haplotype that reduced the risk for PD by 10- to 12-fold (P = .002-.01) in all patients with PD and in a subgroup of patients who do not carry the Ashkenazi founder mutations in the GBA or LRRK2 genes.
Our data demonstrate that specific SNP variations and haplotypes in the PARK16 locus are associated with reduced risk for PD in Ashkenazim. Although it is possible that alterations in the putative promoter of RAB7L1 are associated with this effect, the role of other genes in this locus cannot be ruled out.
Cyclin-dependent kinase 6 (CDK6) is a key element of D-type cyclin holoenzymes. It is involved in the regulation of the G1-phase of the cell cycle and is considered to be an important candidate gene for selection of body measurement traits through marker-assisted selection. We cloned the promoter sequence of this gene in bovines and found it to share high similarity with that of the human CDK6 promoter. A 2271-bp sequence upstream of the start codon in the bovine CDK6 5'-flanking sequence is rich in GC; it lacks consensus TATA or CAAT box, but it contains several MZF1 binding sites. Other potential cis-regulatory elements were found in the 5'-flanking region, including CdxA, SRY, p300, GATA-1, and deltaE. Allele frequencies were also analyzed in various cattle breeds (Qinchuan, Qinchuan improvement steers, Nanyang, Jiaxian red, Xia'nan, Luxi, Simmental and Luxi crossbred steers, and Xuelong) and association with a selected single nucleotide polymorphism (SNP) was calculated. The T-1075C SNP in the promoter was found to be significantly associated with body length and heart girth. This SNP marker was found to be significantly associated with body length and the heart girth in 737 individuals. We conclude that this SNP of the CDK6 gene has potential as a genetic marker for important body traits in bovine reproduction and breeding.
Dual-energy X-ray absorptiometry (DXA) is the standard method to assess bone mineral density (BMD). The International Society for Clinical Densitometry recommends the measurement of BMD at lumbar spine, total hip and femoral neck, but in certain circumstances the 33% radius may be the recommended area to measure BMD. The aim of this study has been to analyze whether 33% radius should be considered the recommended area to assess BMD in prostate cancer patients.
This is a retrospective study where BMD was assessed by DXA at 33% radius, lumbar spine, total hip, and femoral neck (cDXA) in 141 prostate cancer patients. Twenty-eight patients were hormone naïve while 113 were subjected to androgen suppression (AS) during the mean period of 29 months. Osteoporosis was diagnosed when T-score was lower than -2.5 and osteopenia when it ranged between -1 and -2.5.
The osteoporosis rate was 29.8% at 33% radius, 23.4% at femoral neck, 19.9% at lumbar spine, and 12.8% at total hip. The overall osteoporosis rate at cDXA was 29.1%. Osteoporosis was detected in 52.2% at 33% radius and 36.2% at cDXA. Normal BMD was found in 17.7% at 33% radius and 34.8% at cDXA. The 33% radius was the only site where a significant increase in the osteoporosis rate was detected in patients subjected to AS compared to those hormone naïve (33 and 13.8%).
The 33% radius seems more sensible than the central skeleton areas to detect bone mass loss in patients with prostate cancer.
Alkaline phosphatases are ubiquitous enzymes involved in many important biological processes. Mammalian tissue-nonspecific alkaline phosphatase has long been thought to feature in embryonic development and bone formation. In this study, an alkaline phosphatase (ALP) gene from Paralichthys olivaceus was identified by rapid amplification of cDNA ends and genome-walking PCR. The ALP gene extends 10,141 bp and contains 11 exons and 10 introns. The open reading frame of the ALP transcript consists of 1,431 bp, which encodes 476 amino acids products named as POALP. An analysis of its secondary and tertiary structure revealed that the POALP was conserved in different species, but one disulfide linkage made it possible to adapt to low-temperature environment. The ALP activity was found to be first detectable in the embryo before hatching. The POALP was distributed ubiquitously in the body of P. olivaceus and was particularly high in the digestive tract. These findings suggest the potential role of POALP in nutrient absorption and transportation. During the pre-metamorphosis (F stage), ALP gene expression is 2.5-folds of that in the pro-metamorphosis (E stage); but in the post-metamorphosis (I stage), it was 1.8-folds of that of pro-metamorphosis. Exogenetic thyroxine (T4) and thiourea (TU) influenced the ALP gene expression significantly during the metamorphosis. Bioinformatics analysis showed that Japanese flounder ALP promoter region contained promoter sequence and putative recognition site for several transcriptional factors, including SREBP-1, SYR, and CdxA. In vitro promoter assays employing EGFP reporter system demonstrated that the promoter of ALP was active.
Prevotella bryantii B(1)4 is a member of the phylum Bacteroidetes and contributes to the degradation of hemicellulose in the rumen. The genome of P. bryantii harbors four genes predicted to encode glycoside hydrolase (GH) family 3 (GH3) enzymes. To evaluate whether these genes encode enzymes with redundant biological functions, each gene was cloned and expressed in Escherichia coli. Biochemical analysis of the recombinant proteins revealed that the enzymes exhibit different substrate specificities. One gene encoded a cellodextrinase (CdxA), and three genes encoded beta-xylosidase enzymes (Xyl3A, Xyl3B, and Xyl3C) with different specificities for either para-nitrophenyl (pNP)-linked substrates or substituted xylooligosaccharides. To identify the amino acid residues that contribute to catalysis and substrate specificity within this family of enzymes, the roles of conserved residues (R177, K214, H215, M251, and D286) in Xyl3B were probed by site-directed mutagenesis. Each mutation led to a severely decreased catalytic efficiency without a change in the overall structure of the mutant enzymes. Through amino acid sequence alignments, an amino acid residue (E115) that, when mutated to aspartic acid, resulted in a 14-fold decrease in the k(cat)/K(m) for pNP-beta-d-xylopyranoside (pNPX) with a concurrent 1.1-fold increase in the k(cat)/K(m) for pNP-beta-d-glucopyranoside (pNPG) was identified. Amino acid residue E115 may therefore contribute to the discrimination between beta-xylosides and beta-glucosides. Our results demonstrate that each of the four GH3 enzymes has evolved to perform a specific role in lignopolysaccharide hydrolysis and provide insight into the role of active-site residues in catalysis and substrate specificity for GH3 enzymes.
More than ten bradykinin-related peptides and their cDNAs have been identified from amphibians, but their genes are unknown. In present study, four cDNAs encoding one, two, four and six copies of bradykinin-related peptides were cloned from the frog (Odorrana grahami) skin cDNA library, respectively. Three bradykinin-related peptides (bradykinin, Thr6-bradykinin, Leu5Thr6-bradykinin) were deduced from these four cDNA sequences. Based on the cDNA sequence, the gene sequence encoding an amphibian bradykinin-related peptide from O. grahami was determined. It is composed of 7481 base pairs including two exons and two introns. The first exon codes signal peptide and the second exon codes acidic spacer peptide and Thr6-bradykinin. The promoter region of the bradykinin gene contains several putative recognition sites for nuclear factors, such as SRY, GATA-1, LYF-1, DeltaE, CDXA, NKX-2.5, MIF1 and S8. The current work may facilitate to understand the regulation and possible functions of amphibian skin bradykinin-related peptides.
Interferon regulatory factor 3 (IRF-3), an essential transcriptional regulator of the interferon genes, has been implicated in virus and double-stranded RNA mediated induction of IFN-α, IFN-β and RANTES, in virus-induced apoptosis and in tumor suppression. Promoter plays an important role in the regulation of gene expression, but the characterization of the human IRF-3 promoter has not been systematically analyzed in HEK 293 cells. To characterize the human IRF-3 promoter, we have isolated a genomic clone of the human IRF-3 gene promoter region containing 1,000 nucleotides of the 5'- flanking region. Transient transfection of 5'-deleted promoter-reporter constructs and luciferase assay illustrated the region -149/-93 relative to the transcription start site (TSS) is sufficient for full promoter activity. This region contains HSF, E2F, CdxA and c-Myb transcription factor binding sites. The E2F sites are highly conserved among IRF-3 promoter regions of mouse, rat and human. Therefore, it was suggested that this E2F site may be essential for basal promoter activity. Surprisingly, mutation of this E2F site increased the promoter activity by 2-fold. Furthermore, overexpression of E2F1 reduced the transcription activity by 80%. These results indicated that human IRF-3 gene core promoter was located within the region -149/-93 relative to the TSS. E2F1 transcription factor negatively regulates human IRF-3 gene promoter.
Endoderm organ primordia become specified between gastrulation and gut tube folding in Amniotes. Although the requirement for RA signaling for the development of a few individual endoderm organs has been established a systematic assessment of its activity along the entire antero-posterior axis has not been performed in this germ layer.
RA is synthesized from gastrulation to somitogenesis in the mesoderm that is close to the developing gut tube. In the branchial arch region specific levels of RA signaling control organ boundaries. The most anterior endoderm forming the thyroid gland is specified in the absence of RA signaling. Increasing RA in anterior branchial arches results in thyroid primordium repression and the induction of more posterior markers such as branchial arch Hox genes. Conversely reducing RA signaling shifts Hox genes posteriorly in endoderm. These results imply that RA acts as a caudalizing factor in a graded manner in pharyngeal endoderm. Posterior foregut and midgut organ primordia also require RA, but exposing endoderm to additional RA is not sufficient to expand these primordia anteriorly. We show that in chick, in contrast to non-Amniotes, RA signaling is not only necessary during gastrulation, but also throughout gut tube folding during somitogenesis. Our results show that the induction of CdxA, a midgut marker, and pancreas induction require direct RA signaling in endoderm. Moreover, communication between CdxA(+) cells is necessary to maintain CdxA expression, therefore synchronizing the cells of the midgut primordium. We further show that the RA pathway acts synergistically with FGF4 in endoderm patterning rather than mediating FGF4 activity.
Our work establishes that retinoic acid (RA) signaling coordinates the position of different endoderm organs along the antero-posterior axis in chick embryos and could serve as a basis for the differentiation of specific endodermal organs from ES cells.
Gene regulation during development is an important biological activity that leads to synthesis of biomolecules at specific locations and specific times. The single tropomyosin gene of Caenorhabditis elegans, tmy-1/lev-11, produces four isoforms of protein: two from the external promoter and two from the internal promoter. We investigated the internal promoter of tropomyosin to identify sequences that regulate expression of tmy-1 in the pharynx and intestine. By promoter deletion of tmy-1 reporters as well as by database analyses, a 100-bp fragment that contained binding sequences for a GATA factor, for a chicken CdxA homolog, and for a forkhead factor was identified. Both the forkhead and CdxA binding sequences contributed to pharyngeal and intestinal expression. In addition, the GATA site also influenced intestinal expression of tmy-1 reporter. We showed that ELT-2 and PHA-4 proteins interact directly with the GATA and forkhead binding sequences, respectively, in gel mobility shift assays. RNA interference knockdown of elt-2 diminished tmy-1::gfp expression in the intestine. In contrast to RNA interference knockdown of pha-4, expression of tmy-1::gfp in pha-4;smg-1 mutants was slightly weaker than that of the wild type. Ectopic expression of PHA-4 and ELT-2 by heat shock was sufficient to elicit widespread expression of tmy-1::lacZ reporter in embryos. We found no indication of a synergistic relation between ELT-2 and PHA-4. Based on our data, PHA-4 and CdxA function as general transcription factors for pharyngeal and intestinal regulation of tmy-1. We present models by which ELT-2, PHA-4, and CdxA orchestrate expression from the internal promoter of tmy-1.
Determination of the developmental fate in the small intestinal epithelium of the chicken embryo has not been fully analyzed up to the present. This study was carried out to analyze the determination time of the developmental fate of the small intestinal epithelium under the influence of other mesenchymes. The small intestinal epithelium reassociated and cultivated with the proventricular or gizzard mesenchyme or the dermis expressed chicken intestinal fatty acid binding protein, sucrase and CdxA as occurs during the normal development of the small intestinal epithelium. The presumptive intestinal endoderm taken from an earlier stage embryo and associated and cultivated with the proventricular or gizzard mesenchyme, showed gene expression patterns which were the same as those found in normal development. However, when the dermis was associated, the epithelium expressed sonic hedgehog, but never expressed intestinal epithelial- or stomach epithelial-markers. These results indicate that the determination of the developmental fate in the small intestinal epithelium and acquisition of autodifferentiation potency occur at the early stage of the gut development. Moreover the presumptive intestinal endoderm needs the supportive influence of the gut mesenchyme in order to differentiate fully into the intestinal epithelium.
Acyl-CoA synthetases (ACSs) play an essential role in fatty acid metabolism. ACS3 is an arachidonate-preferring enzyme expressed in a wide range of human tissues including brain, heart, placenta, prostate, skeletal muscle, testis and thymus. As an initial step to understanding the transcriptional regulation of the human ACS3 gene, we analyzed the genomic organization and transcription units of the human ACS3 gene. Sequence analysis of genomic clones demonstrates that the human ACS3 gene spans at least 80.6 kb and contains 17 exons. The human ACS3 gene was mapped between the sequence-tagged site markers D2S360 and WI-21901. Sequence inspection of the 5'-flanking region revealed potential DNA elements including CCAAT, AP-1, Oct-1, GATAs, SRY, CdxA, Nkx-2.5, c-Myb, HSF2, NF-AT, AP-2, NF-Y, and p300. A minimal promoter region required for the expression of the human ACS3 gene in melanoma G361 cells was determined.
We analyzed an extended core promoter regions covering [-70,+60] segment relative to the transcription start site of human promoters contained in the Eukaryotic Promoter Database. The analysis was made by using the Match program ver. 1.9 with an optimized setting and the TRANSFAC Professional database ver. 7.2. This analysis revealed that the most common transcription factor binding site in the examined collection of core promoters appears to be initiator (characterized by GEN_INI), which is expected. The other less obvious sites found were Spz1, E2F-1, ZF5, and C/EBP. The 'cap' site was also in this most common group. Over-representation of these sites relative to the non-promoter background data ranged from 0.3167 to 32.1645. These sites were characterized by being present in more than 60% of promoter sequences. Interestingly, the TATA-box has been found in only 11.63% of all examined promoters. The study is complemented by separate analyses of promoter groups having different GC content. These additional analyses revealed that the most common promoter elements found also include AP-2, CdxA, Pax-2, SRY, STAT1 and STAT5A. It was also observed that a number of promoter elements show strong preference either for the GC-rich or the GC-poor core promoters.
Mitotic checkpoint impairment is present in human lung cancers with chromosomal instability (CIN). Spindle-checkpoint genes have been reported to be mutated in several human cancers, but these mutations are infrequent. Recent reports suggest that the hBUBR1 gene may play an important role in mitotic checkpoint control and in mitotic checkpoint impairment in human cancers. We analyzed the expression of hBUBR1 in lung cancer cell lines using real time quantitative RT-PCR. The expression of BUBR1 was found to be up-regulated in all of these cell lines. In addition, we cloned and characterized the promotor region of hBUBR1 and determined its genomic structure, which includes 23 exons. The open reading frame (ORF) of the hBUBR1 gene comprises exons 1 through 23. There are GC-rich regions located at the flanking region and about 150 bp upstream from exon 1. The promoter region (424 bp upstream from exon 1) showed promoter activity and includes multiple transcription factor consensus binding motifs, including those for Sp1, Nkx-2, CdxA, SRY, MyoD, Ik-2, HNF-3b, Staf, Oct-1, Nkx-2, v-Myb, and AML 1a. Multiple pathways leading to activation of those binding factors may contribute to hBUBR1 gene transcription. Knowledge of the genomic structure and the promoter region of the hBUBR1 gene will facilitate investigation of its role in mitotic checkpoint control and tumor progression in human cancers.
Initiation of Hox genes requires interactions between numerous factors and signaling pathways in order to establish their precise domain boundaries in the developing nervous system. There are distinct differences in the expression and regulation of members of Hox genes within a complex suggesting that multiple competing mechanisms are used to initiate their expression domains in early embryogenesis. In this study, by analyzing the response of HoxB genes to both RA and FGF signaling in neural tissue during early chick embryogenesis (HH stages 7-15), we have defined two distinct groups of Hox genes based on their reciprocal sensitivity to RA or FGF during this developmental period. We found that the expression domain of 5' members from the HoxB complex (Hoxb6-Hoxb9) can be expanded anteriorly in the chick neural tube up to the level of the otic vesicle following FGF treatment and that these same genes are refractory to RA treatment at these stages. Furthermore, we showed that the chick caudal-related genes, cdxA and cdxB, are also responsive to FGF signaling in neural tissue and that their anterior expansion is also limited to the level of the otic vesicle. Using a dominant negative form of a Xenopus Cdx gene (XcadEnR) we found that the effect of FGF treatment on 5' HoxB genes is mediated in part through the activation and function of CDX activity. Conversely, the 3' HoxB genes (Hoxb1 and Hoxb3-Hoxb5) are sensitive to RA but not FGF treatments at these stages. We demonstrated by in ovo electroporation of a dominant negative retinoid receptor construct (dnRAR) that retinoid signaling is required to initiate expression. Elevating CDX activity by ectopic expression of an activated form of a Xenopus Cdx gene (XcadVP16) in the hindbrain ectopically activates and anteriorly expands Hoxb4 expression. In a similar manner, when ectopic expression of XcadVP16 is combined with FGF treatment, we found that Hoxb9 expression expands anteriorly into the hindbrain region. Our findings suggest a model whereby, over the window of early development we examined, all HoxB genes are actually competent to interpret an FGF signal via a CDX-dependent pathway. However, mechanisms that axially restrict the Cdx domains of expression, serve to prevent 3' genes from responding to FGF signaling in the hindbrain. FGF may have a dual role in both modulating the accessibility of the HoxB complex along the axis and in activating the expression of Cdx genes. The position of the shift in RA or FGF responsiveness of Hox genes may be time dependent. Hence, the specific Hox genes in each of these complementary groups may vary in later stages of development or other tissues. These results highlight the key role of Cdx genes in integrating the input of multiple signaling pathways, such as FGFs and RA, in controlling initiation of Hox expression during development and the importance of understanding regulatory events/mechanisms that modulate Cdx expression.
Mouse GLUT5 cDNA and a 7.7-kb genomic fragment have been isolated and characterized. The cDNA sequence suggests mouse GLUT5 is composed of 501 amino acids, and has 69-88% amino acid identity with human, rat, and rabbit GLUT5. Expression of mouse GLUT5 cRNA in Xenopus laevis oocytes showed that GLUT5 mediated fructose transport, with a K(t) of 13 mM. Northern blot studies detected GLUT5 mRNA expression in mouse small intestine, kidney, and testis, with transcript sizes of approximately 2.1, 2.1, and 2.8 kb, respectively. 5'Rapid Amplification of cDNA Ends (5'RACE) determined that the differences in transcript sizes occurred because GLUT5 possessed alternative transcriptional initiation sites in somatic and germ cells. In agreement with studies in rats and rabbits, mouse small intestinal GLUT5 mRNA expression levels were increased following exposure to a 65% fructose-enriched diet. In addition, developmental studies showed a significant increase in GLUT5 mRNA expression levels in adult mouse testis when compared to prepubertal mouse testis. To begin to identify the cis-acting domains responsible for GLUT5 expression characteristics, a 7.7-kb GLUT5 genomic fragment was isolated from a mouse lambda fix11 library and sequenced. The clone contained exons 1-4 and 5' flanking regions. Moreover, caudal homeobox gene (CdxA), upstream stimulatory factor (USF), and sex-determining region of Y (SRY) binding sites were identified in the 5' flanking region that may be responsible for GLUT5's expression characteristics: tissue distribution, sensitivity to dietary fructose in the small intestine, and developmental expression in the testis.
Na(+)/H(+) exchanger (NHE) isoforms NHE2 and NHE3, colocalized to the brush border membrane of the epithelial cells, exhibit differences in their pattern of tissue expression and regulation by various molecular signals. To investigate the mechanisms involved in regulation of NHE3 gene expression, the human NHE3 promoter region was cloned and characterized. Primer extension experiments located the transcription start site to a position 116 nucleotides upstream from the translation start codon. The 5'-flanking region lacked a CCAAT box but contained a TATA-like sequence. Nucleotide sequencing of the 5'-flanking region revealed the presence of a number of cis elements including Sp1, AP-2, MZF-1, CdxA, Cdx-2, steroid and nonsteroid hormone receptor half sites, and a phorbol 12-myristate 13-acetate-response element. Transient transfection experiments using C2/bbe cell line defined a maximal promoter activity in -95/+5 region. The regulatory response elements clustered within this region include a potential transcription factor IID (TF IID), a CACCC, two Sp1, and two AP-2 motifs. Deletion of a fragment containing the AP-2 and Sp1 motifs resulted in a drastic decrease in promoter activity. In gel mobility shift assays, an oligonucleotide spanning from -78 to -56 bp bound a recombinant AP-2, and the corresponding binding activity in nuclear extracts was supershifted with anti-AP2alpha antibody. Our studies suggest that the NHE3 expression is regulated by a combination of cis elements and their cognate transcription factors that include the AP-2 and Sp1 family members.
The human cDNA for cartilage intermediate layer protein (CILP) codes for a larger precursor protein that consists of CILP and a homologue to porcine Nucleotide pyrophosphohydrolase (NTPPHase) [Lorenzo et al. 1998a. J. Biol. Chem. 273, 23469-23475]. The human gene has now been isolated and characterized. Southern blot analysis indicated a single copy of the CILP gene in the human genome. The gene spans approximately 15.3 kbp of genomic DNA, and is organized in nine exons. The 5' flanking region contains a putative promoter region with a TATA-like box localized from -29 to -23 bp upstream of the transcription start site. Analysis of the putative promoter region revealed potentially cis-regulatory eukaryotic elements such as GATA-1, MyoD, MZF1, and CdxA. The protein coding region begins in exon 2 with the putative signal peptide. CILP is encoded from exon 3 to exon 9. In addition, exon 9 also codes for the entire NTPPHase homologue and contains the 3' untranslated region of the gene. All the introns follow the 'gt-ag' rule, except the last intron, intron 8, that belongs to the minor class of pre-mRNA introns that contain 'at-ac' at their 5' and 3' ends, respectively. The CILP gene was mapped to human chromosome 15q22.
The immunoglobulin enhancer-binding proteins, E12 and E47, encoded by the E2A gene belong to the basic helix-loop-helix (bHLH) family of regulatory proteins and act as transcriptional activators. In addition to their critical role in B-lymphocyte development, the E12 and E47 proteins have been implicated in the induction of myogenesis as heterodimeric partners of myogenic bHLH proteins, MyoD and myogenin. Here we demonstrate that the E2A proteins form heterodimers with the bHLH oncoprotein tal-1 in myeloid and erythroid cells and that these heterodimers specifically bind to the CANNTG DNA motif. Heterodimerization with tal-1 represses transactivation by E47 and could function to prevent the expression of immunoglobulin genes in cells other than B lymphocytes. DNA binding by E2A-tal-1 heterodimers in the M1 mouse myeloid cell line is abrogated upon terminal macrophage differentiation induced by the cytokine interleukin 6. The loss of E2A-tal-1 DNA binding is correlated with elevated expression of mRNA encoding the dominant negative HLH proteins, Id1 and particularly Id2. Moreover, recombinant Id proteins inhibit the E2A-tal-1-specific DNA binding activity from undifferentiated M1 cells. These results suggest that E2A-tal-1 heterodimers may play a role in preventing terminal differentiation in the myeloid lineage and provide a possible explanation for oncogenic transformation induced by ectopic tal-1 expression in acute T-cell lymphoblastic leukemias.
Meat quality traits are economically important traits of swine, and are controlled by multiple genes as complex quantitative traits. In the present study four genes, H-FABP (heart fatty acid-binding protein), MASTR (MEF2 activating motif and SAP domain containing transcriptional regulator), UCP3 (uncoupling protein 3) and MYOD1 (myogenic differentiation 1) were researched in Large White pigs. The polymorphisms H-FABP T/C of 5'UTR, MYOD1 g.257 A>C, UCP3 g.1406 G>A in exon 3 and MASTR c.187 C>T have been reported to be associated with meat quality traits in pigs. The aim of this study was to analyze the effect of single and multiple markers for single traits in Large White pigs. The single marker association analysis showed that the H-FABP and MASTR genes were associated with IMF (intramuscular fat content) (P < 0.05), and that the g.257 A>C of MYOD1 gene was most significantly related to muscle pH value (P < 0.01). The multiple markers for IMF were analyzed by combining the markers and quantitative trait modes into the linear regression. The results revealed that H-FABP and MASTR integrate gene networks for IMF. Thus, our study results suggested that H-FABP and MASTR polymorphisms could be used as genetic markers in the marker-assisted selection towards the improvement of IMF in Large White pigs.
We isolated a Xenopus homolog of Frzb, a newly described protein containing an amino-terminal Frizzled motif. It dorsalized Xenopus embryos and was expressed in the Spemann organizer during early gastrulation. Unlike Frizzled proteins, endogenous Frzb was soluble. Frzb was secretable and could act across cell boundaries. In several functional assays, Frzb antagonized Xwnt-8, a proposed ventralizing factor with an expression pattern complementary to that of Frzb. Furthermore, Frzb blocked induction of MyoD, an action reported recently for a dominant-negative Xwnt-8. Frzb coimmunoprecipitated with Wnt proteins, providing direct biochemical evidence for Frzb-Wnt interactions. These observations implicate Frzb in axial patterning and support the concept that Frzb binds and inactivates Xwnt-8 during gastrulation, preventing inappropriate ventral signaling in developing dorsal tissues.
Transcription factors containing a basic helix-loop-helix (bHLH) motif regulate the expression of tissue-specific genes in a number of mammalian and insect systems. DNA-binding activity of the bHLH proteins is dependent upon formation of homo- and/or heterodimers. Dominant negative HLH proteins (Id-related genes) also contain the HLH-dimerization domain but lack the DNA-binding basic domain. Consequently, Id proteins inhibit binding to DNA and transcriptional transactivation by heterodimerization with bHLH proteins. We report here the cDNA sequence of a novel human HLH gene (HGMW-approved symbol ID4) that lacks the basic domain. ID4 is differentially expressed in adult organs in four mRNA molecules, which are presumably a result of differential splicing and/or alternative usage of the polyadenylation sites. Transfection experiments indicated that enforced expression of Id-4H protein inhibits the trans-activation of the muscle creatine kinase E-box enhancer by MyoD. Finally, we localized the ID4 gene to the chromosome 6p21-p22 region.
The three ternary complex factors (TCFs), Net (ERP/ SAP-2), ELK-1 and SAP-1, are highly related ets oncogene family members that participate in the response of the cell to Ras and growth signals. Understanding the different roles of these factors will provide insights into how the signals result in coordinate regulation of the cell. We show that Net inhibits transcription under basal conditions, in which SAP-1a is inactive and ELK-1 stimulates. Repression is mediated by the NID, the Net Inhibitory Domain of about 50 amino acids, which autoregulates the Net protein and also inhibits when it is isolated in a heterologous fusion protein. Net is particularly sensitive to Ras activation. Ras activates Net through the C-domain, which is conserved between the three TCFs, and the NID is an efficient inhibitor of Ras activation. The NID, as well as more C-terminal sequences, inhibit DNA binding. Net is more refractory to DNA binding than the other TCFs, possibly due to the presence of multiple inhibitory elements. The NID may adopt a helix-loop-helix (HLH) structure, as evidenced by homology to other HLH motifs, structure predictions, model building and mutagenesis of critical residues. The sequence resemblance with myogenic factors suggested that Net may form complexes with the same partners. Indeed, we found that Net can interact in vivo with the basic HLH factor, E47. We propose that Net is regulated at the level of its latent DNA-binding activity by protein interactions and/or phosphorylation. Net may form complexes with HLH proteins as well as SRF on specific promotor sequences. The identification of the novel inhibitory domain provides a new inroad into exploring the different roles of the ternary complex factors in growth control and transformation.
I-mfa (inhibitor of the MyoD family a) is a transcription modulator that binds to MyoD family members and inhibits their transcriptional activities. It is highly expressed in the sclerotome and plays an important role in the patterning of the somite early in development. In this study, the polymorphisms of the bovine I-mfa gene were detected by polymerase chain reaction-single stranded conformational polymorphism (PCR-SSCP) and DNA pool sequencing methods in 541 individuals from three Chinese cattle breeds. The results showed that P3 locus had two novel complete linked single nucleotide polymorphisms (NC_007324.4:g.12284A>G and g.12331T>C), resulting in a missense mutation p.S(AGC)113G(GGC) and a synonymous mutation p.H(CAT)128H(CAC), respectively. P4 locus had a novel SNP (NC_007324.4: g.16432C>A), which resulted in a nonsense mutation p.C(TGC)241X(TGA). The statistical analyses indicated that the three SNPs, are associated with the phenotypic traits in Luxi (LX), Qinchuan (QC), and Jiaxian (JX) cattle population (P < 0.05 or P < 0.01). The mutant-type variants were superior for growth traits; the heterozygote diplotype was associated with higher growth traits compared to wild-type homozygote. Our results provide evidence that polymorphisms in the I-mfa gene are associated with growth traits and may be used for marker-assisted selection in beef cattle breeding program.
Accumulating evidence suggests that Sirtuin (Sirt)1 serves a significant role in proliferation and differentiation of myoblast cells; however the signaling mechanisms involved remain to be established. Myostatin (MSTN), a member of transforming growth factor‑β family, is an vital regulator of myoblast, fibroblast growth and differentiation. To determine if MSTN is involved in the regulation of myoblast cell proliferation by Sirt1, the present study administrated the Sirt1 activator resveratrol, inhibitor nicotinamide (NAM) and MSTN inhibitor SB431542 to C2C12 myoblast cells. It was demonstrated that the Sirt1 activator, resveratrol, repressed, whereas the Sirt1 inhibitor, NAM, enhanced C2C12 myoblast cells proliferation in a Sirt1‑dependent manner. SB431542 promoted the proliferation of C2C12 myoblast cells and reversed the inhibition effect of NAM on C2C12 myoblast cell proliferation. Additionally, resveratrol upregulated the mRNA expression of MyoD, but inhibited the expression of MSTN. Additionally, NAM significantly repressed the expression of MyoD and the phosphorylation of P107 (p‑P107), but enhanced the expression of MSTN and the protein expression of P107. SB431542 significantly mitigated the effect of NAM on the expression of MyoD, P107 and p‑P107. Taken together, these results indicated that Sirt1 promotes the proliferation of C2C12 myoblast cells via the MSTN signaling pathway.
Marek's disease (MD) is an infectious disease of chickens caused by MD virus (MDV), which is a herpesvirus that initiates tumor formation. Studies have indicated that microRNAs (miRNAs) are linked with the development of cancers or tumors. Previously, gga-miR-130a was discovered downregulated in MDV-infected tissues. Here, we aimed to explore the further function of gga-miR-130a in MD. The expression of gga-miR-130a in MDV-infected and uninfected spleens was detected by quantitative real-time PCR (qRT-PCR). Subsequently, proliferation and migration assays of MDV-transformed lymphoid cells (MSB1) were carried out by transfecting gga-miR-130a. The target genes of gga-miR-130a were predicted using TargetScan and miRDB and clustered through Gene Ontology analysis. The target genes were validated by western blot, qRT-PCR, and a dual luciferase reporter assay. Our results show that the expression of gga-miR-130a was reduced in MDV-infected spleens. Gga-miR-130a showed an inhibitory effect on MSB1 cell proliferation and migration. Two target genes, homeobox A3 (HOXA3) and MyoD family inhibitor domain containing (MDFIC), were predicted and clustered to cell proliferation. Results indicate that gga-miR-130a regulates HOXA3 and MDFIC at the protein level but not at the mRNA level. Moreover, the gga-miR-130a binding sites of two target genes have been confirmed. We conclude that gga-miR-130a can arrest MSB1 cell proliferation and migration, and target HOXA3 and MDFIC, which are both involved in the regulation of cell proliferation. Collectively, gga-miR-130a plays a critical role in the tumorigenesis associated with chicken MD.
Extracellular stimuli induce gene expression responses through intracellular signaling mediators. The p38 signaling pathway is a paradigm of the mitogen-activated protein kinase (MAPK) family that, although originally identified as stress-response mediator, contributes to establishing stem cell differentiation fates. p38α is central for induction of the differentiation fate of the skeletal muscle stem cells (satellite cells) through not fully characterized mechanisms.
To investigate the global gene transcription program regulated by p38α during satellite cell differentiation (myogenesis), and to specifically address whether this regulation occurs through direct action of p38α on gene promoters, we performed a combination of microarray gene expression and genome-wide binding analyses. For experimental robustness, two myogenic cellular systems with genetic and chemical loss of p38α function were used: (1) satellite cells derived from mice with muscle-specific deletion of p38α, and (2) the C2C12 murine myoblast cell line cultured in the absence or presence of the p38α/β inhibitor SB203580. Analyses were performed at cell proliferation and early differentiation stages.
We show that p38α binds to a large set of active promoters during the transition of myoblasts from proliferation to differentiation stages. p38α-bound promoters are enriched with binding motifs for several transcription factors, with Sp1, Tcf3/E47, Lef1, FoxO4, MyoD, and NFATc standing out in all experimental conditions. p38α association with chromatin correlates very well with high levels of transcription, in agreement with its classical function as an activator of myogenic differentiation. Interestingly, p38α also associates with genes repressed at the onset of differentiation, thus highlighting the relevance of p38-dependent chromatin regulation for transcriptional activation and repression during myogenesis.
These results uncover p38α association and function on chromatin at novel classes of target genes during skeletal muscle cell differentiation. This is consistent with this MAPK isoform being a transcriptional regulator.
Acute muscle injury and physiological stress from chronic muscle diseases and aging lead to impairment of skeletal muscle function. This raises the question of whether p53, a cellular stress sensor, regulates muscle tissue repair under stress conditions. By investigating muscle differentiation in the presence of genotoxic stress, we discovered that p53 binds directly to the myogenin promoter and represses transcription of myogenin, a member of the MyoD family of transcription factors that plays a critical role in driving terminal muscle differentiation. This reduction of myogenin protein is observed in G1-arrested cells and leads to decreased expression of late but not early differentiation markers. In response to acute genotoxic stress, p53-mediated repression of myogenin reduces post-mitotic nuclear abnormalities in terminally differentiated cells. This study reveals a mechanistic link previously unknown between p53 and muscle differentiation, and suggests new avenues for managing p53-mediated stress responses in chronic muscle diseases or during muscle aging.
Birth weight is an economically important trait in pig production because it directly impacts piglet growth and survival rate. In the present study, we performed a genome wide survey of candidate genes and pathways associated with individual birth weight (IBW) using the Illumina PorcineSNP60 BeadChip on 24 high (HEBV) and 24 low estimated breeding value (LEBV) animals. These animals were selected from a reference population of 522 individuals produced by three sires and six dam lines, which were crossbreds with multiple breeds. After quality-control, 43,257 SNPs (single nucleotide polymorphisms), including 42,243 autosomal SNPs and 1,014 SNPs on chromosome X, were used in the data analysis. A total of 27 differentially selected regions (DSRs), including 1 on Sus scrofa chromosome 1 (SSC1), 1 on SSC4, 2 on SSC5, 4 on SSC6, 2 on SSC7, 5 on SSC8, 3 on SSC9, 1 on SSC14, 3 on SSC18, and 5 on SSCX, were identified to show the genome wide separations between the HEBV and LEBV groups for IBW in piglets. A DSR with the most number of significant SNPs (including 7 top 0.1% and 31 top 5% SNPs) was located on SSC6, while another DSR with the largest genetic differences in F ST was found on SSC18. These regions harbor known functionally important genes involved in growth and development, such as TNFRSF9 (tumor necrosis factor receptor superfamily member 9), CA6 (carbonic anhydrase VI) and MDFIC (MyoD family inhibitor domain containing). A DSR rich in imprinting genes appeared on SSC9, which included PEG10 (paternally expressed 10), SGCE (sarcoglycan, epsilon), PPP1R9A (protein phosphatase 1, regulatory subunit 9A) and ASB4 (ankyrin repeat and SOCS box containing 4). More importantly, our present study provided evidence to support six quantitative trait loci (QTL) regions for pig birth weight, six QTL regions for average birth weight (ABW) and three QTL regions for litter birth weight (LBW) reported previously by other groups. Furthermore, gene ontology analysis with 183 genes harbored in these 27 DSRs suggested that protein, metal, ion and ATP binding, viral process and innate immune response present important pathways for deciphering their roles in fetal growth or development. Overall, our study provides useful information on candidate genes and pathways for regulating birth weight in piglets, thus improving our understanding of the genetic mechanisms involved in porcine embryonic or fetal development.
Rhabdomyosarcomas (RMSs) are the most frequent soft tissue sarcomas in children that share many features of developing skeletal muscle. We have discovered that a T-box family member, TBX2, is highly upregulated in tumor cells of both major RMS subtypes. TBX2 is a repressor that is often overexpressed in cancer cells and is thought to function in bypassing cell growth control, including repression of p14 and p21. The cell cycle regulator p21 is required for the terminal differentiation of skeletal muscle cells and is silenced in RMS cells. We have found that TBX2 interacts with the myogenic regulatory factors MyoD and myogenin and inhibits the activity of these factors. TBX2 is expressed in primary myoblasts and C2C12 cells, but is strongly downregulated upon differentiation. TBX2 recruits the histone deacetylase HDAC1 and is a potent inhibitor of the expression of muscle-specific genes and the cell cycle regulators, p21 and p14. TBX2 promotes the proliferation of RMS cells and either depletions of TBX2 or dominant negative TBX2 upregulate p21- and muscle-specific genes. Significantly, depletion or interference with TBX2 completely inhibits tumor growth in a xenograft assay, highlighting the oncogenic role of TBX2 in RMS cells. Thus, the data demonstrate that elevated expression of TBX2 contributes to the pathology of RMS cells by promoting proliferation and repressing differentiation-specific gene expression. These results show that deregulated TBX2 serves as an oncogene in RMS, suggesting that TBX2 may serve as a new diagnostic marker or therapeutic target for RMS tumors.
Ca(2+) signaling is essential for bone homeostasis and skeletal development. Here, we show that the transient receptor potential canonical 1 (TRPC1) channel and the inhibitor of MyoD family, I-mfa, function antagonistically in the regulation of osteoclastogenesis. I-mfa null mice have an osteopenic phenotype characterized by increased osteoclast numbers and surface, which are normalized in mice lacking both Trpc1 and I-mfa. In vitro differentiation of pre-osteoclasts derived from I-mfa-deficient mice leads to an increased number of mature osteoclasts and higher bone resorption per osteoclast. These parameters return to normal levels in osteoclasts derived from double mutant mice. Consistently, whole cell currents activated in response to the depletion of intracellular Ca(2+) stores are larger in pre-osteoclasts derived from I-mfa knock-out mice compared with currents in wild type mice and normalized in cells derived from double mutant mice, suggesting a cell-autonomous effect of I-mfa on TRPC1 in these cells. A new splice variant of TRPC1 (TRPC1ε) was identified in early pre-osteoclasts. Heterologous expression of TRPC1ε in HEK293 cells revealed that it is unique among all known TRPC1 isoforms in its ability to amplify the activity of the Ca(2+) release-activated Ca(2+) (CRAC) channel, mediating store-operated currents. TRPC1ε physically interacts with Orai1, the pore-forming subunit of the CRAC channel, and I-mfa is recruited to the TRPC1ε-Orai1 complex through TRPC1ε suppressing CRAC channel activity. We propose that the positive and negative modulation of the CRAC channel by TRPC1ε and I-mfa, respectively, fine-tunes the dynamic range of the CRAC channel regulating osteoclastogenesis.
PCAF (KAT2B) belongs to the GNAT family of lysine acetyltransferases (KAT) and specifically acetylates the histone H3K9 residue and several nonhistone proteins. PCAF is also a transcriptional coactivator. Due to the lack of a PCAF KAT-specific small molecule inhibitor, the exclusive role of the acetyltransferase activity of PCAF is not well understood. Here, we report that a natural compound of the hydroxybenzoquinone class, embelin, specifically inhibits H3Lys9 acetylation in mice and inhibits recombinant PCAF-mediated acetylation with near complete specificity in vitro. Furthermore, using embelin, we have identified the gene networks that are regulated by PCAF during muscle differentiation, further highlighting the broader regulatory functions of PCAF in muscle differentiation in addition to the regulation via MyoD acetylation.
Satellite cells are the resident stem cell population of adult skeletal muscle tissue that is responsible for growth and regeneration. The cells typically congregate near the tips of the muscle fibers and in close proximity to the neural muscular junction (NMJ). Ephrin-A5 is a chemotactic molecule that participates in the correct positioning and formation of the NMJ. The objective of the experiment was to examine the effects of ephrin-A5 signaling on bovine satellite cell (BSC) biology. Primary cultures of BSC demonstrate changes in velocity with time in culture that is unique to the Paired box protein 7 (Pax7):Myogenic factor 5 (Myf5) subpopulation. Treatment of the BSC with ephrin-A5 causes a reduction (P < 0.05) in velocity with a concomitant increase (P < 0.05) in directed migration. The chemoattractant properties of ephrin-A5 occur before myogenic differentiation 1 (MyoD) expression in the myogenic precursors and are abrogated after their differentiation to committed myoblasts. Ephrin-A5 induced migration appears to require components of the Ras homolog gene family member A (RhoA) and Rho-associated protein kinase (ROCK) signaling machinery. Supplementation of culture media with a chemical ROCK inhibitor suppressed (P < 0.05) ephrin-A5 initiated BSC migration. These results contrast with treatment of BSC with hepatocyte growth factor (HGF), a key modulator of myogenic and motogenic activity. Treatment of BSC with HGF had no effect on cell motility or migration immediately after culture establishment. Twenty-four hours after culture establishment, BSC demonstrated an increase (P < 0.05) in transwell migration toward HGF. These results document that temporal and spatial gradients of chemokines and growth factors participate in the localization of BSC within the niche.
The class IIa histone deacetylases (HDACs) act as transcriptional repressors by altering chromatin structure through histone deacetylation. This family of enzymes regulates muscle development and phenotype, through regulation of muscle-specific genes including myogenin and MyoD (MYOD1). More recently, class IIa HDACs have been implicated in regulation of genes involved in glucose metabolism. However, the effects of HDAC5 on glucose metabolism and insulin action have not been directly assessed. Knockdown of HDAC5 in human primary muscle cells increased glucose uptake and was associated with increased GLUT4 (SLC2A4) expression and promoter activity but was associated with reduced GLUT1 (SLC2A1) expression. There was no change in PGC-1α (PPARGC1A) expression. The effects of HDAC5 knockdown on glucose metabolism were not due to alterations in the initiation of differentiation, as knockdown of HDAC5 after the onset of differentiation also resulted in increased glucose uptake and insulin-stimulated glycogen synthesis. These data show that inhibition of HDAC5 enhances metabolism and insulin action in muscle cells. As these processes in muscle are dysregulated in metabolic disease, HDAC inhibition could be an effective therapeutic strategy to improve muscle metabolism in these diseases. Therefore, we also examined the effects of the pan HDAC inhibitor, Scriptaid, on muscle cell metabolism. In myotubes, Scriptaid increased histone 3 acetylation, GLUT4 expression, glucose uptake and both oxidative and non-oxidative metabolic flux. Together, these data suggest that HDAC5 regulates muscle glucose metabolism and insulin action and that HDAC inhibitors can be used to modulate these parameters in muscle cells.
Skeletal muscle differentiation is regulated by transcription factors, including members of the myogenic regulatory factor (MRF) family and many signaling pathways. The JAK1 and JAK2 pathways are known to each have different effects on myoblast proliferation and differentiation; however, the role of JAK3 in myoblast differentiation remains unclear. In this study, we investigated the effect of JAK3 inhibition on myogenic differentiation in the C2C12 mouse myoblast cell line. During myogenic differentiation, treatment with the JAK3 inhibitor WHIp154 significantly increased the number of MHC-positive multinucleated myotubes and the expressions of myosin heavy chain (MHC), myogenin (MGN), MyoD, and myogenic enhancer factor 2 (MEF2). Knockdown of the JAK3 gene using siJAK3 also significantly increased MHC, MGN and MyoD mRNA expressions as well as insulin-like growth factor-II (IGF-II) gene expression. During differentiation, JAK3 was initially activated and later decreased. Differentiation decreased STAT1, which was further decreased by WHIp154. In contrast, STAT3 gradually was elevated during differentiation, and was increased by JAK3 inhibition. Moreover, we found that up-regulation of AKT activity and down-regulation of ERK activity cooperated to accelerate myogenic differentiation. Taken together, these data indicate that JAK3 inhibition potently facilitates myoblast differentiation through antagonistic STAT1/STAT3 activities. Additionally, JAK3 inhibition induced precocious differentiation and played important roles for terminal differentiation, including fusion, which is involved with regulation of AKT and ERK pathways.
The present study evaluated endogenous activities and the role of BMP and transforming growth factor-β (TGF-β), representative members of the TGF-β family, during myotube differentiation in C2C12 cells. Smad phosphorylation at the C-terminal serines was monitored, since TGF-β family members signal via the phosphorylation of Smads in a ligand-dependent manner. Expression of phosphorylated Smad1/5/8, which is an indicator of BMP activity, was higher before differentiation, and rapidly decreased after differentiation stimulation. Differentiation-related changes were consistent with those in the expression of Ids, well-known BMP-responsive genes. Treatment with inhibitors of BMP type I receptors or noggin in C2C12 myoblasts down-regulated the expression of myogenic regulatory factors, such as Myf5 and MyoD, leading to impaired myotube formation. Addition of BMP-2 during the myoblast phase also inhibited myotube differentiation through the down-regulation of Myf5 and MyoD. In contrast to endogenous BMP activity, the phosphorylation of Smad2, a TGF-β-responsive Smad, was higher 8-16 days after differentiation stimulation. A-83-01, an inhibitor of TGF-β type I receptor, increased the expression of Myf5 and MyoD, and enhanced myotube formation. The present results reveal that endogenous activities of the TGF-β family are changed during myogenesis in a pathway-specific manner, and that the activities are required for myogenesis.
Differentiation often requires conversion of analogue signals to a stable binary output through positive feedback. Hedgehog (Hh) signalling promotes myogenesis in the vertebrate somite, in part by raising the activity of muscle regulatory factors (MRFs) of the Myod family above a threshold. Hh is known to enhance MRF expression. Here we show that Hh is also essential at a second step that increases Myod protein activity, permitting it to promote Myogenin expression. Hh acts by inducing expression of cdkn1c (p57(Kip2)) in slow muscle precursor cells, but neither Hh nor Cdkn1c is required for their cell cycle exit. Cdkn1c co-operates with Myod to drive differentiation of several early zebrafish muscle fibre types. Myod in turn up-regulates cdkn1c, thereby providing a positive feedback loop that switches myogenic cells to terminal differentiation.
Oncostatin M (OSM) is a cytokine of the interleukin-6 family and plays important roles during inflammation. However, its roles in myoblast differentiation and muscle regeneration remain unexplored. We show here that OSM potently inhibited myoblast differentiation mainly by activating the JAK1/STAT1/STAT3 pathway. OSM downregulated myocyte enhancer-binding factor 2A (MEF2A), upregulated the expression of Id1 and Id2, and inhibited the transcriptional activity of MyoD and MEF2. In addition, OSM also enhanced the expression of STAT3 and OSM receptor, which constituted a positive feedback loop to further amplify OSM-induced signaling. Moreover, we found that STAT1 physically associated with MEF2 and repressed its transcriptional activity, which could account for the OSM-mediated repression of MEF2. Although undetectable in normal muscles in vivo, OSM was rapidly induced on muscle injury and then promptly downregulated just before the majority of myoblasts differentiate. Prolonged expression of OSM in muscles compromised the regeneration process without affecting myoblast proliferation, suggesting that OSM functions to prevent proliferating myoblasts from premature differentiation during the early phase of muscle regeneration.
Firefly luciferase (Fluc) is an oxygenase extracted from Photinus pyralis with a molecular weight of 62 kDa (1). In the presence of adenosine triphosphate (ATP) and O2, Fluc oxidizes the heterocyclic substrate d-luciferin to oxyluciferin and emits light in the wavelength range of 400–620 nm (2). The active site of Fluc comprises two distinct domains, a large N-terminal domain (residue 4–436) and a small C-terminal domain (residue 440–544), which are separated by a wide cleft (1). Splitting Fluc into N- and C-terminal fragments destroys its enzymatic activity, resulting in a complete loss of bioluminescence. The enzymatic activity or bioluminescence can be restored if the N- and C-terminal fragments are in close proximity (3). This led to the development of a novel labeling strategy for imaging protein–protein interactions in vivo, the split reporter (4). In this method, reporters like Fluc are dissected into two fragments and fused to a pair of proteins (A and B) that strongly interact with each other. The enzymatic activity of Fluc can be restored via two split reporter approaches: a complementation strategy and a reconstitution strategy. In the complementation strategy, protein A is connected with the N-terminal fragment of Fluc, and protein B is connected with the C-terminal fragment of Fluc. Interaction between protein A and B recovers the enzymatic activity of Fluc by bringing the two fragments of Fluc closely together. In the reconstitution strategy, protein A is connected with the N-terminal of one-half of a protein splicing system such as DNA polymerase III (N-intein DnaE) followed by N-terminal fragment of Fluc. Protein B is linked to the C-terminal of the other half of the splicing system (C-intein DnaE) followed by the C-terminal fragment of Fluc. The interaction between protein A and B brings the N- and C-inteins together, resulting in the joining of N- and C-terminal fragments of Fluc by a peptide bond and a release of a fully reconstituted protein Fluc. Both split enzyme approaches allow for recovery of bioluminescence. MyoD is a myogenic regulatory protein that belongs to the basic helix-loop-helix (bHLH) family of transcription factors (5). MyoD activates myogenesis by binding directly to the control region of muscle-specific genes, and it converts fibroblasts into skeletal muscle. The helices in MyoD bind tightly with other HLH factors such as Id to form a heterodimer. Id, also known as an inhibitor of differentiation or inhibitor of DNA binding, lacks the basic domain for DNA binding and acts as dominant negative regulator in myogenesis or other cell proliferations (6). Id protein-firefly luciferase N-fragment & firefly luciferase C-fragment-MyoD protein (Id-NFluc & CFluc-MyoD) make up a pair of interacting proteins attached to the split Fluc fragments (7). Id-NFluc & CFluc-MyoD can be prepared with complementation strategy or reconstitution strategy, and are employed for in vivo imaging of the interaction between Id and MyoD via the produced bioluminescence.
Kaposi's sarcoma-associated herpes virus (KSHV)-encoded latency-associated nuclear antigen (LANA) protein has been reported to interact with glycogen synthase kinase 3beta (GSK-3beta) and to negatively regulate its activity, leading to stimulation of GSK-3beta-dependent beta-catenin degradation. We show here that the I-mfa domain proteins, HIC (human I-mfa domain-containing protein) and I-mfa (inhibitor of MyoD family a), interacted in vivo with LANA through their C-terminal I-mfa domains. This interaction affected the intracellular localization of HIC, inhibited the LANA-dependent transactivation of a beta-catenin-regulated reporter construct, and decreased the level of the LANA.GSK-3beta complex. These data reveal for the first time that I-mfa domain proteins interact with LANA and negatively regulate LANA-mediated activation of Wnt signaling-dependent transcription by inhibiting the formation of the LANA.GSK-3beta complex.
MyoD is a DNA-binding protein capable of specific interactions that involve the helix-loop-helix (HLH) domain. The HLH motif of MyoD can form oligomers with the HLH motif of Id1 (the inhibitor of DNA-binding proteins) that folds into a highly stable helical conformation stabilized by the self-association. The Id family consists of four related proteins that contain a highly conserved dimerization motif known as the HLH domain. In signaling pathways, Id proteins act as dominant negative antagonists of the basic helix-loop-helix (bHLH) family of transcription factors which play important roles in cellular development, proliferation, and differentiation. The mechanism of Id proteins is to antagonize bHLH proteins by binding as dominant negative HLH proteins to form high-affinity heterodimers with other bHLH proteins, thereby preventing them from binding to DNA and inhibiting transcription of differentiation-associated genes. The goal of this study is to design and synthesize peptide fragments of MyoD with high affinity for Id1 to interrupt the interactions among Id1, MyoD, and other bHLH DNA-binding proteins and to inhibit the proliferation of cancer cells. Affinity of each peptide for Id1 was determined by surface plasmon resonance (SPR) technology. The secondary structure of each peptide was studied by circular dichroism (CD) spectroscopy. Biological effects of each peptide in several cancer cells such as breast and colon cancer cells were analyzed. Results demonstrated that the peptide 3C (H-Tyr-Ile-Glu-Gly-Leu-Gln-Ala-Leu-Leu-Arg-Asp-Gln-NH(2)) not only showed high affinity for Id1 but also exhibited antiproliferative effects in HT-29 and MCF-7 cancer cells; the IC(50) value of 3C was determined as 25 microM in both cells. The percentage of sub-G1 in the cell cycle of the cancer cells treated with 5 microM of 3C was increased, indicating the induced apoptosis of cancer cells by 3C. Taken together, the peptide 3C is a promising lead compound for the development of antiproliferative agents.
Most growth factors stimulate myoblast proliferation and prevent differentiation, whereas insulin-like growth factors (IGFs) promote myoblast differentiation through the phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase (PI3K) pathway. Subtilisin-like proprotein convertases (SPCs) are involved in cell growth and differentiation via activation of pro-growth factors. However, the role of SPCs in myogenesis remains poorly understood. Here we show that PACE4, a member of the SPC family, plays a critical role in myogenic differentiation of C2C12 cells. PACE4 mRNA levels increased markedly during myogenesis, whereas the expression of other member of SPC family, furin and PC6, remained unchanged. The expression pattern of pro-IGF-II, which is processed extracellularly by SPCs, was similar to that of PACE4. The expression of shRNA targeting PACE4, but not furin, suppressed the expression of the muscle-specific myosin light chain (MLC). Interestingly, reduced expression of MLC was restored following treatment with recombinant mature IGF-II. Finally, we demonstrated that the PI3K inhibitor LY294002 blocked the induction of PACE4 mRNA, a result not observed when another myogenic differentiation inhibitor, SB203580 (p38 MAP kinase inhibitor), was employed, indicating the presence of a positive feedback loop regulating PACE4 expression. These results suggest that PACE4 plays an important role in myogenic differentiation through its association with the IGF-II pathway.
Porcine reproductive and respiratory syndrome (PRRS) virus is an RNA virus that replicates in the cytoplasm, but the viral nucleocapsid (N) protein localizes specifically in the nucleus and nucleolus of virus-infected cells. Nuclear localization of N is non-essential for PRRSV replication in cultured cells but has been shown to modulate the pathogenesis of virus in pigs, suggesting that N plays an accessory role in the nucleus during infection. We identified by yeast two-hybrid screening the inhibitor of MyoD family-a (I-mfa) domain-containing protein (HIC) as a cellular partner for PRRS virus (PRRSV) N protein. This protein is a homolog of human HIC, a recently identified cellular transcription factor. The specific interaction of PRRSV N with HIC was confirmed in cells by mammalian two-hybrid assay and co-immunoprecipitation and in vitro by GST pull-down assay. HIC is a zinc-binding protein and confocal microscopy demonstrated co-localization of N with the HIC-p40 isomer in the nucleus and nucleolus, and in the cytoplasm with HIC-p32, which is the N-terminal truncation of HIC-p40. The porcine homolog of HIC is universally expressed in pig tissues including alveolar macrophages. The interaction of viral capsid with the cellular transcription factor implicates a possible regulation of host cell gene expression by the N protein during PRRSV infection.
The I-mfa domain proteins HIC (also known as MDFIC) and I-mfa (also known as MDFI) are candidate tumor suppressor genes that are involved in cellular and viral transcriptional regulation. Here, we show that HIC and I-mfa directly interact with human T-cell leukemia virus type-1 (HTLV-1) Tax protein in vitro. In addition, HIC and I-mfa repress Tax-dependent transactivation of an HTLV-1 long terminal repeat (LTR) reporter construct in COS-1, Jurkat and high-Tax-producing HTLV-1-infected T cells. HIC also interacts with Tax through its I-mfa domain in vivo and represses Tax-dependent transactivation of HTLV-1 LTR and NF-κB reporter constructs in an interaction-dependent manner. Furthermore, we show that HIC decreases the nuclear distribution and stimulates the proteasomal degradation of Tax. These data reveal that HIC specifically interacts with HTLV-1 Tax and negatively regulates Tax transactivational activity by altering its subcellular distribution and stability.
CD180, a related member of the Toll-like receptor family, is lost or underexpressed at the plasma membrane in circulating cells of various B-cell lymphomas except marginal zone lymphomas (MZL). In order to confirm its clinical relevance in routine analysis, we evaluated prospectively the expression of CD180 in 236 patients from 5 French University Hospital laboratories on behalf of the GEIL. Highly comparable results were obtained in all centers using the EuroFlow standardization protocol. We observed that CD180 median fluorescence (MdFI) was significantly higher in MZL and hairy cell leukaemia (HCL) compared to all other B-cell proliferations (P < 0.05). CD180 intensity could distinguish lymphomas with numerous villous lymphocytes from other MZL. ROC curve analysis identified a CD180 MdFI threshold for which the diagnosis of MZL could be assessed with 77% sensitivity and 92% specificity. This study showed that CD180 can be considered as a single positive robust marker of MZL and should be therefore included in flow cytometry panels for the diagnosis of mature B-cell neoplasms. Harmonization process is of great interest in order to evaluate new markers in multicentric studies and to set up decisional thresholds. © 2015 International Clinical Cytometry Society.
We determined the effect of p53 activation on de novo protein synthesis using quantitative proteomics (pulsed stable isotope labeling with amino acids in cell culture/pSILAC) in the colorectal cancer cell line SW480. This was combined with mRNA and noncoding RNA expression analyses by next generation sequencing (RNA-, miR-Seq). Furthermore, genome-wide DNA binding of p53 was analyzed by chromatin-immunoprecipitation (ChIP-Seq). Thereby, we identified differentially regulated proteins (542 up, 569 down), mRNAs (1258 up, 415 down), miRNAs (111 up, 95 down) and lncRNAs (270 up, 123 down). Changes in protein and mRNA expression levels showed a positive correlation (r = 0.50, p < 0.0001). In total, we detected 133 direct p53 target genes that were differentially expressed and displayed p53 occupancy in the vicinity of their promoter. More transcriptionally induced genes displayed occupied p53 binding sites (4.3% mRNAs, 7.2% miRNAs, 6.3% lncRNAs, 5.9% proteins) than repressed genes (2.4% mRNAs, 3.2% miRNAs, 0.8% lncRNAs, 1.9% proteins), suggesting indirect mechanisms of repression. Around 50% of the down-regulated proteins displayed seed-matching sequences of p53-induced miRNAs in the corresponding 3'-UTRs. Moreover, proteins repressed by p53 significantly overlapped with those previously shown to be repressed by miR-34a. We confirmed up-regulation of the novel direct p53 target genes LINC01021, MDFI, ST14 and miR-486 and showed that ectopic LINC01021 expression inhibits proliferation in SW480 cells. Furthermore, KLF12, HMGB1 and CIT mRNAs were confirmed as direct targets of the p53-induced miR-34a, miR-205 and miR-486-5p, respectively. In line with the loss of p53 function during tumor progression, elevated expression of KLF12, HMGB1 and CIT was detected in advanced stages of cancer. In conclusion, the integration of multiple omics methods allowed the comprehensive identification of direct and indirect effectors of p53 that provide new insights and leads into the mechanisms of p53-mediated tumor suppression.
Breast cancer is a highly heterogeneous disease that is clinically classified into several subtypes. Among these subtypes, basal-like breast cancer largely overlaps with triple-negative breast cancer (TNBC), and these two groups are generally studied together as a single entity. Differences in the molecular makeup of breast cancers can result in different treatment strategies and prognoses for patients with different breast cancer subtypes. Compared with other subtypes, basal-like and other ER+ breast cancer subtypes exhibit marked differences in etiologic factors, clinical characteristics and therapeutic potential. Anthracycline drugs are typically used as the first-line clinical treatment for basal-like breast cancer subtypes. However, certain patients develop drug resistance following chemotherapy, which can lead to disease relapse and death. Even among patients with basal-like breast cancer, there can be significant molecular differences, and it is difficult to identify specific drug resistance proteins in any given patient using conventional variance testing methods. Therefore, we designed a new method for identifying drug resistance genes. Subgroups, personalized biomarkers, and therapy targets were identified using cluster analysis of differentially expressed genes. We found that basal-like breast cancer could be further divided into at least four distinct subgroups, including two groups at risk for drug resistance and two groups characterized by sensitivity to pharmacotherapy. Based on functional differences among these subgroups, we identified nine biomarkers related to drug resistance: SYK, LCK, GAB2, PAWR, PPARG, MDFI, ZAP70, CIITA and ACTA1. Finally, based on the deviation scores of the examined pathways, 16 pathways were shown to exhibit varying degrees of abnormality in the various subgroups, indicating that patients with different subtypes of basal-like breast cancer can be characterized by differences in the functional status of these pathways. Therefore, these nine differentially expressed genes and their associated functional pathways should provide the basis for novel personalized clinical treatments of basal-like breast cancer.
DNA methylation is a potential tumor marker for several cancers, including colorectal cancer (CRC), because of its heritable and stable characteristics.
Using a high-resolution, genome-wide approach, we epigenotyped >450,000 CpG sites in tumor and adjacent non-tumor tissues from 23 microsatellite instability (MSI)/microsatellite stability (MSS) CRC cases. Using matrix-assisted laser desorption ionization-time of flight mass spectrometry, the methylation status of five frequently hypermethylated genes were confirmed in 75 independent CRC series and 353 CRC patients with available plasma.
Compared with non-tumor tissues, 13 MSI tumors had 34,836 (7 %) aberrant methylation sites, 87 % of which were hypermethylated. In contrast, only 9,806 (2 %) differentially methylated sites were identified in ten MSS cases (62 % hypermethylated). In both MSI and MSS, 228 promoter-associated CpG islands were hypermethylated, with AGBL4, ZNF625, MDFI, TWIST1, and FLI1 being most frequently hypermethylated. In an independent set of 35 MSI and 40 MSS cases, the methylation status of these five genes significantly differed between tumor and adjacent non-tumor tissues. Of 353 CRC patients, 230 (65.2 %), 232 (65.7 %), and 247 (70.0 %) had AGBL4, FLI1, and TWIST1 promoter hypermethylation in circulating cell-free DNA, respectively. In patients without metastasis, the sensitivity of any two or three hypermethylation markers was 52.8-57.8 and 27.9-38.9 %, respectively. The sensitivity of any two or three markers was significantly high in patients with stage IV disease (73.0 and 55.6 %, respectively). The prognostic value of these epimarkers was inconclusive.
DNA methylation patterns differed in CRC subtypes. The identified hypermethylation markers in CRC patients may have good sensitivity in different CRC stages.
The common genes responsible for the characteristics of primary cultured invasive phenotype hepatocellular carcinoma (HCC) cells were investigated. Primary cultured HCC cells from three patients were separated by Matrigel invasion into parent and invasive cells. Whole human genome oligo microarray was applied to detect the differentially expressed genes in invasive cells. A purchased HCC cell line (HA 22T/VGH) was studied for comparison. Forty genes were consistently up-regulated and 14 genes were consistently down-regulated among primary cultured invasive cells. Among these genes, only three up-regulated genes (CNN1, PLAT, SPARC) and one down-regulated tumor suppressor gene (MDFI) had same expressions in invasive cells originated from purchased cell line. For primary cultured invasive cells, differential expressions of several groups of common genes are known to have capacities to promote proliferation (CAV1, IL6, PLAT, RRAD, SRPX), remodeling of extracellular matrix (COL1A1, COL1A2, NID2, TNC, RELN, SPARC), migration (ACTG2, CAV1, CCL2, CCL26, CDC42EP3, CNN1, PHLDB2, PLAT, RRAD, SRPX), implantation (IL6), immune escape (CD70) and angiogenesis (CCL2, IL6, IL18, PLAT, SLIT3). Two genes related to signal transduction (AXL, RASL10B) and one related to metabolism (PTGS2) also showed consistent expressions. Differential expressions of these genes are capable for tumor invasiveness. In conclusion, the characteristics of invasive phenotype HCC cells are originated from differential expressions of several groups of genes rather than few target genes. This information may give us a new insight to design new stratagems in HCC treatment. Analysis of the results from a purchased cell line may have bias due to long-term repeated in vitro cultures.
Many QTLs for fatness traits have been mapped on pig chromosome 7q1.1-1.4 in various pig resource populations. Eight novel markers, including seven SNPs and one insertion or deletion within BTNL1, COL21A1, PPARD, GLP1R, MDFI, GNMT, ABCC10, and PLA2G7 genes, as well as two previously reported SNPs in SLC39A7 and HMGA1 genes, were genotyped in Large White and Meishan pig breeds. Except for two SNPs in HMGA1 and ABCC10 genes, allele frequencies of the other eight markers are highly significant different between Chinese indigenous Meishan breeds and Large White pig breeds. Eight polymorphic sites were then used for linkage and QTL mapping to refine the fatness QTL in a Large White × Meishan F(2) resource population. Five chromosome-wise significant QTLs were detected, of which the QTLs for leaf fat weight, backfat thickness at 6-7th rib and rump, and mean backfat thickness were narrowed to the interval between PPARD and GLP1R genes and the QTL for backfat thickness at thorax-waist between GNMT and PLA2G7 genes on SSC7p1.1-q1.4.
Pancreatic cancer (PanC) presents at late stage with high mortality. Effective early detection methods are needed. Aberrantly methylated genes are unexplored as markers for noninvasive detection by stool testing. The authors aimed to select discriminant methylated genes and to assess accuracy of these and mutant KRAS in stool to detect PanC.
Nine target genes were assayed by real-time methylation-specific polymerase chain reaction (MSP) in bisulfite-treated DNA from microdissected frozen specimens of 24 PanC cases and 30 normal colon controls. Archived stools from 58 PanC cases and 65 controls matched on sex, age, and smoking were analyzed. Target genes from fecal supernatants were enriched by hybrid capture, bisulfite-treated, and assayed by MSP. KRAS mutations were assayed using the QuARTS technique.
Areas under the receiver operating characteristics curves (AUCs) for tissue BMP3, NDRG4, EYA4, UCHL1, MDFI, Vimentin, CNTNAP2, SFRP2, and TFPI2 were 0.90, 0.79, 0.78, 0.78, 0.77, 0.77, 0.69, 0.67, and 0.66, respectively. The top 4 markers and mutant KRAS were evaluated in stool. BMP3 was the most discriminant methylation marker in stool. At 90% specificity, methylated BMP3 alone detected 51% of PanCs, mutant KRAS detected 50%, and combination detected 67%. AUCs for methylated BMP3, mutant KRAS, and combination in stool were 0.73, 0.75, and 0.85, respectively.
This study demonstrates that stool assay of a methylated gene marker can detect PanC. Among candidate methylated markers discriminant in tissue, BMP3 alone performed well in stool. Combining methylated BMP3 and mutant KRAS increased stool detection over either marker alone.
In this paper, three kinds of imidazole derivatives, 2-(4-methylphenyl)-4,5-di(2-furyl) imidazole (MDFI), 2-(4-nitrophenyl)-4,5-di(2-furyl) imidazole (NDFI), and 2-(4-tert-butylphenyl)-4,5-di(2-furyl) imidazole (t-BDFI) were synthesized. In an alkaline medium, the chemiluminescence (CL) reaction of imidazole derivatives with H(2)O(2) has been investigated. It was also found that MDFI/H(2)O(2) and t-BDFI/H(2)O(2) systems gave strong CL. When Co(2+) was added into the two CL systems, the CL intensity was remarkably enhanced. In the optimum conditions, the CL intensity is linearly related to the logarithm of concentration of Co(2+). The linear ranges are 5×10(-9)-2.5×10(-7) mol/L for MDFI/H(2)O(2) system and 5×10(-9)-2.5×10(-7) mol/L for t-BDFI/H(2)O(2) system, and the corresponding detection limits are 1.2×10(-9) mol/L and 1.1×10(-9) mol/L, respectively. The method was applied to the determination of Co(2+) in vitamin B(12) injection. Furthermore, the CL mechanism was also discussed.
Migraine is associated with an increased risk for cardiovascular disease (CVD). Both migraine and CVD are highly heritable. However, the genetic liability for CVD among migraineurs is unclear.
We performed a genome-wide association study for incident CVD events during 12 years of follow-up among 5,122 migraineurs participating in the population-based Women's Genome Health Study. Migraine was self-reported and CVD events were confirmed after medical records review. We calculated odds ratios (OR) and 95% confidence intervals (CI) and considered a genome-wide p-value <5×10(-8) as significant.
Among the 5,122 women with migraine 164 incident CVD events occurred during follow-up. No SNP was associated with major CVD, ischemic stroke, myocardial infarction, or CVD death at the genome-wide level; however, five SNPs showed association with p<5×10(-6). Among migraineurs with aura rs7698623 in MEPE (OR = 6.37; 95% CI 3.15-12.90; p = 2.7×10(-7)) and rs4975709 in IRX4 (OR = 5.06; 95% CI 2.66-9.62; p = 7.7×10(-7)) appeared to be associated with ischemic stroke, rs2143678 located close to MDF1 with major CVD (OR = 3.05; 95% CI 1.98-4.69; p = 4.3×10(-7)), and the intergenic rs1406961 with CVD death (OR = 12.33; 95% CI 4.62-32.87; p = 5.2×10(-7)). Further, rs1047964 in BACE1 appeared to be associated with CVD death among women with any migraine (OR = 4.67; 95% CI 2.53-8.62; p = 8.0×10(-7)).
Our results provide some suggestion for an association of five SNPs with CVD events among women with migraine; none of the results was genome-wide significant. Four associations appeared among migraineurs with aura, two of those with ischemic stroke. Although our population is among the largest with migraine and incident CVD information, these results must be treated with caution, given the limited number of CVD events among women with migraine and the low minor allele frequencies for three of the SNPs. Our results await independent replication and should be considered hypothesis generating for future research.
The I-mfa domain proteins I-mfa and HIC are considered to be candidate tumor suppressor genes and have been shown to be involved in transcriptional regulation. We show here that I-mfa and HIC specifically interact with SEI-1 through their C-terminal I-mfa domains in vivo. This interaction affects the intracellular localization of I-mfa and requires the region of SEI-1 between 30 and 90 amino acids, which includes its SERTA domain, and results in repression of its intrinsic transcriptional activity. I-mfa also decreases the levels of the SEI-1·DP-1 complex and endogenous Fbxw7 mRNA, the expression of which is coregulated by E2F·DP-1 and SEI-1 in an interaction-dependent manner in vitro. In addition, I-mfa also specifically interacts with other SERTA domain-containing proteins, including SEI-2, SEI-3, SERTAD3 and SERTAD4, through its I-mfa domain in vivo. This interaction also affects the intracellular localization of I-mfa and represses the intrinsic transcriptional activities of SEI-2 and SERTAD3, which are also involved in the E2F-dependent transcription. These data reveal for the first time that I-mfa domain proteins interact with SERTA domain proteins and negatively regulate their transcriptional activity. Because SEI-1, SEI-2 and SERTAD3, whose intrinsic transcriptional activities are repressed by I-mfa, are suggested to be oncogenes, I-mfa domain proteins may be involved in their oncogenic functions by negatively regulating their transcriptional activities.
The auxiliary spliceosomal protein SCNM1 contributes to recognition of nonconsensus splice donor sites. SCNM1 was first identified as a modifier of the severity of a sodium channelopathy in the mouse. The most severely affected strain, C57BL/6J, carries the variant allele SCNM1R187X, which is defective in splicing the mutated donor site in the Scn8a(medJ) transcript. To further probe the in vivo function of SCNM1, we constructed a floxed allele and generated a mouse with constitutive deletion of exons 3-5. The SCNM1Delta3-5 protein is produced and correctly localized to the nucleus, but is more functionally impaired than the C57BL/6J allele. Deficiency of SCNM1 did not significantly alter other brain transcripts. We characterized an ENU-induced allele of Scnm1 and evaluated the ability of wild-type SCNM1 to rescue lethal mutations of I-mfa and Brunol4. The phenotypes of the Scnm1Delta3-5 mutant confirm the role of this splice factor in processing the Scn8a(medJ) transcript and provide a new allele of greater severity for future studies.
Many genes undergo aberrant methylation in human cancers, and microarray platforms enable more comprehensive profiling of aberrant DNA methylation patterns.
1,010 of 87,922 probes on the 88 K promoter array (606 genes) had a higher signal (log(2) > 2) in the pancreatic cancer line, Panc-1 compared to the non-neoplastic pancreatic duct line, HPDE. Using this cut-off, bisulfite sequencing and/or MSP confirmed differential methylation of all 27 genes (66 probes) predicted to be methylated by the MCA array. More than 1/2 of the genes aberrantly hypermethylated in Panc-1 were not expressed in the pancreatic duct (HPDE) by expression array analysis. Using the 244 K CpG island array, 1,968 CpG islands were differentially methylated in MiaPaca2 compared to normal pancreas. The MCA method was more likely to identify hypermethylation within CpG islands than a cocktail of methylation sensitive restriction enzymes. DNA methylation profiles using 10 ng of DNA were highly correlated with those obtained using 5 ug of DNA (R2 = 0.98). Analysis of 57 pancreatic cancers and 34 normal pancreata using MSP identified MDFI, hsa-miR-9-1, ZNF415, CNTNAP2 and ELOVL4 as methylated in 96%, 89%, 86%, 82% and 68% of the cancers vs. 9%, 15%, 6%, 3% and 97% of normal pancreata, respectively.
We used methylated CpG island amplification (MCA) and Agilent promoter and CpG island microarrays to identify differential DNA methylation patterns in pancreatic cancer vs. normal pancreas. We examined MCA array reproducibility, compared it to methylation profiles obtained using a cocktail of methylation-sensitive restriction enzymes and examined gene expression of methylated genes.
Promoter and CpG island array analysis finds aberrant methylation of hundreds of promoters and CpG islands in pancreatic cancer cells.
A commercial chromogenic agar medium (DFI) was supplemented with glucose (mDFI) to enhance the specificity of Enterobacter sakazakii (E. sakazakii) detection. Escherichia vulneris (E. vulneris), a putative false-positive strain on the DFI medium, produces alpha-glucosidase. The enzyme alpha- glucosidase hydrolyzes a substrate, 5-bromo-4-chloro-3- indolyl-alpha,D-glucopyranoside (XalphaGlc), producing green colonies. E. sakazakii strains produced green colonies on both DFI and mDFI agar, whereas E. vulneris produced green colonies on DFI agar but small white colonies on mDFI agar. E. sakazakii and E. vulneris were also readily differentiated by colony color when the mixed culture of the two strains was plated on mDFI agar and incubated for 24 h at 37 degrees C. The results indicate that the selectivity of the commercial chromogenic agar medium could be improved by a simple supplementation with glucose.
The toxic hepatitis is the most common manifestation of acute liver disease in patient with alcohol. In these patients the discriminatory function index (DFI) > 32, has been associated with a mortality rate of up to 50%. MELD is a scale that has been recently validated as independent risk factors for death in patients who are candidates for liver transplantation.
To compare the usefulness in mortality score vs. MELD. Maddrey index of discrimination in patients with alcoholic hepatitis and analyze the factors in a cohort Mexican prognosis.
We evaluated the usefulness of MELD, compared with the index of discrimination Maddrey so retrospective in 67 hospitalized patients with alcoholic hepatitis in the Hospital Juárez in Mexico.
The c-statistic for mDFI was 0.69 (CI 0.56-0.82) and to MELD was 0.73 (CI 0.61-0.86), sensitivity and specificity of DFI > 32 in 7 days to predict mortality was 100 and 7.1% , Respectively, and to meld > 21 sensitivity was 96% and specificity of 9.5%. The presence of encephalopathy > grade 2 and creatinine > 1.5 mg/dL was independent predictors of mortality.
MELD > 21 calculated on admission, is equally useful for the mDFI for predicting mortality in patients with alcoholic hepatitis in the first week.
Wnt regulation of muscle development is thought to be mediated by the beta-catenin-TCF/LEF-dependent canonical pathway. Here we demonstrate that beta-catenin, not TCF/LEF, is required for muscle differentiation. We showed that beta-catenin interacts directly with MyoD, a basic helix-loop-helix transcription factor essential for muscle differentiation and enhances its binding to E box elements and transcriptional activity. MyoD-mediated transactivation is inhibited in muscle cells when beta-catenin is deficient or the interaction between MyoD and beta-catenin is disrupted. These results demonstrate that beta-catenin is necessary for MyoD function, identifying MyoD as an effector in the Wnt canonical pathway.
The bHLH transcription factor Hand1 is essential for placentation and cardiac morphogenesis in the developing embryo. Here we implicate Hand1 as a molecular switch that determines whether a trophoblast stem cell continues to proliferate or commits to differentiation. We identify a novel interaction of Hand1 with a protein that contains an I-mfa (inhibitor of myogenic factor) domain that anchors Hand1 in the nucleolus where it negatively regulates Hand1 activity. In the trophoblast stem-cell line Rcho-1, nucleolar sequestration of Hand1 accompanies sustained cell proliferation and renewal, whereas release of Hand1 into the nucleus leads to its activation, thus committing cells to a differentiated giant-cell fate. Site-specific phosphorylation is required for nucleolar release of Hand1, for its dimerization and biological function, and this is mediated by the non-canonical polo-like kinase Plk4 (Sak). Sak is co-expressed in Rcho-1 cells, localizes to the nucleolus during G2 and phosphorylates Hand1 as a requirement for trophoblast stem-cell commitment to a giant-cell fate. This study defines a novel cellular mechanism for regulating Hand1 that is a crucial step in the stem-cell differentiation pathway.
Positive transcription elongation factor b (P-TEFb) complexes, composed of cyclin-dependent kinase 9 (CDK9) and cyclin T1 or T2, are engaged by many cellular transcription regulators that activate or inhibit transcription from specific promoters. The related I-mfa (inhibitor of MyoD family a) and HIC (human I-mfa-domain-containing) proteins function in myogenic differentiation and embryonic development by participating in the Wnt signaling pathway. We report that I-mfa is a novel regulator of P-TEFb. Both HIC and I-mfa interact through their homologous I-mfa domains with cyclin T1 and T2 at two binding sites. One site is the regulatory histidine-rich domain that interacts with CDK9 substrates including RNA polymerase II. The second site contains a lysine and arginine-rich motif that is highly conserved between the two T cyclins. This site overlaps and includes the previously identified Tat/TAR recognition motif of cyclin T1 required for activation of human immunodeficiency virus type 1 (HIV-1) transcription. HIC and I-mfa can serve as substrates for P-TEFb. Their I-mfa domains also bind the activation domain of HIV-1 Tat and inhibit Tat- and P-TEFb-dependent transcription from the HIV-1 promoter. This transcriptional repression is cell-type specific and can operate via Tat and cyclin T1. Genomic and sequence comparisons indicate that the I-mf and HIC genes, as well as flanking genes, diverged from a duplicated chromosomal region. Our findings link I-mfa and HIC to viral replication, and suggest that P-TEFb is modulated in the Wnt signaling pathway.
We have previously shown that beta-catenin interacts with a transcription suppressor I-mfa and, through this interaction, canonical Wnt signaling could relieve I-mfa-mediated suppression of myogenic regulatory factors (MRFs). In this study, we found that, based on this interaction, I-mfa-mediated suppression of the Wnt transcription factor T-cell factor/lymphoid enhancing factor-1 (TCF/LEF-1) can also be relieved. Our work showed that knocking down endogenous I-mfa expression mimics canonical Wnt treatment by inducing myogenesis and increasing Wnt reporter gene activity, endogenous Wnt target gene expression and expression of MRFs in P19 cells. More importantly, these I-mfa small interfering RNA (siRNA)-induced effects could be blocked by a dominant-negative mutant of LEF-1, confirming the involvement of the TCF/LEF-1 pathway. In addition, we found that beta-catenin could compete with I-mfa for binding to LEF-1 and relieve the inhibitory effects of I-mfa in overexpression systems. Furthermore, canonical Wnt was able to reduce the levels of endogenous I-mfa associated with LEF-1, while increasing that of I-mfa associated with beta-catenin. All of the evidence supports a conclusion that I-mfa can suppress myogenesis by inhibiting TCF/LEF-1 and that canonical Wnt signaling may relieve the suppression through elevating beta-catenin levels, which in turn relieve I-mfa-mediated suppression.
The cdk inhibitor p57(kip2), encoded by the Cdkn1c gene, plays a critical role in mammalian development and in the differentiation of several tissues. Cdkn1c protein levels are carefully regulated via imprinting and other epigenetic mechanisms affecting both the promoter and distant regulatory elements, which restrict its expression to particular developmental phases or specific cell types. Inappropriate activation of these regulatory mechanisms leads to Cdkn1c silencing, causing growth disorders and cancer. We have previously reported that, in skeletal muscle cells, induction of Cdkn1c expression requires the binding of the bHLH myogenic factor MyoD to a long-distance regulatory element within the imprinting control region KvDMR1. Interestingly, MyoD binding to KvDMR1 is prevented in myogenic cell types refractory to the induction of Cdkn1c. In the present work, we took advantage of this model system to investigate the epigenetic determinants of the differential interaction of MyoD with KvDMR1. We show that treatment with the DNA demethylating agent 5-azacytidine restores the binding of MyoD to KvDMR1 in cells refractory to Cdkn1c induction. This, in turn, promotes the release of a repressive chromatin loop between KvDMR1 and Cdkn1c promoter and, thus, the upregulation of the gene. Analysis of the chromatin status of Cdkn1c promoter and KvDMR1 in two cell types showed that their differential responsiveness to the MyoD-dependent induction of the gene does not involve just their methylation status but, rather, the differential H3 lysine 9 dimethylation at KvDMR1. Finally, we report that the same histone modification also marks the KvDMR1 region of human cancer cells in which Cdkn1c is silenced. On the basis of these results, we suggest that the epigenetic status of KvDMR1 represents a critical determinant of the cell type-restricted expression of Cdkn1c and, possibly, of its aberrant silencing in some pathological conditions.
The purpose of this paper was to study the effect of transforming growth factor beta (TGFβ) signaling pathway on reloading-mediated restoration of disuse muscle loss induced by hind limb suspension in rats.
Rats were divided into 4 groups: control group (CON), HLS group (hind limb suspension for 2 weeks), HLS + R group (hind limb suspension for 2 weeks followed by 2 weeks of natural reloading), and HRS + E group (hind limb suspension for 2 weeks followed by 2 weeks of treadmill exercise). Body weight, and weight and protein concentration of gastrocnemius were determined. The expression of members of canonical and noncanonical TGFβ signaling pathways, including TGFβ1, myostatin (MSTN), phospho-smad2/3, phospho-mitogen-activated protein kinases (p38, JNK1/2, and extracellular signal-regulated kinase 1 [ERK1]/ERK2), as well as the corresponding downstream effectors of muscle mass-p21, Pax7, MyoD, and MyoG-was determined at protein or messenger RNA (mRNA) levels.
Reloading increased MyoD mRNA and restored the decreased gastrocnemius weight/body weight ratio, protein concentration of gastrocnemius, phospho-ERK2, Pax7 and the increased TGFβ1, MSTN, phospho-smad2/3, phospho-p38, phospho-JNK1/2, and p21 induced by hind limb suspension. Moreover, the effects of exercise reloading on the restoration of gastrocnemius weight/body weight ratio, TGFβ1, MSTN, phospho-smad2, phospho-p38, phospho-JNK2, Pax7, as well as the induction of MyoD mRNA were stronger than those of natural reloading.
Disuse muscle loss can be recovered by reloading in an intensity-dependent manner through canonical and noncanonical TGFβ signaling pathways. Pax7 and MyoD might be the effectors of TGFβ pathway in mediating the recovery effect of reloading.
Transfection with in vitro transcribed mRNAs is a safe and effective tool to convert somatic cells to any cell type of interest. One caveat of mRNA transfection is that mRNAs are recognized by multiple RNA-sensing toll like receptors (TLRs). These TLRs can both promote and inhibit cellular reprogramming. We demonstrated that mRNA transfection stimulated TLR3 and TLR7 and induced cytotoxicity and IFN-β expression in human and mouse fibroblasts. Furthermore, mRNA transfection induced paracrine inhibition of repeated mRNA transfection through type I IFNs. Modified mRNAs (mmRNAs) containing pseudouridine and 5-methycytosine reduced TLR stimulation, cytotoxicity and IFN-β expression in fibroblasts. Repeated liposomal transfection with MyoD mmRNAs significantly enhanced myogenic conversion of human and mouse fibroblasts compared with repeated transfection with MyoD mRNAs. Interestingly, electroporation of mRNAs and mmRNAs completely abrogated cytotoxicity and IFN-β expression and also abolished myogenic conversion of fibroblasts. At a low concentration, TLR7/8 agonist R848 enhanced MyoD mmRNA-driven conversion of human fibroblasts into skeletal muscle cells, whereas high concentrations of R848 inhibited myogenic conversion of fibroblasts. Our study suggests that deliberate control of TLR signaling is a key factor in the success of mRNA-driven cellular reprogramming.
The present study aimed to evaluate the effects of the flavonoid quercetin (3,3´,4´,5,7-pentahydroxyflavone) in a mice model of intense acute swimming-induced muscle pain, which resembles delayed onset muscle soreness. Quercetin intraperitoneal (i.p.) treatment dose-dependently reduced muscle mechanical hyperalgesia. Quercetin inhibited myeloperoxidase (MPO) and N-acetyl-β-D- glucosaminidase (NAG) activities, cytokine production, oxidative stress, cyclooxygenase-2 (COX-2) and gp91phox mRNA expression and muscle injury (creatinine kinase [CK] blood levels and myoblast determination protein [MyoD] mRNA expression) as well as inhibited NFκB activation and induced Nrf2 and HO-1 mRNA expression in the soleus muscle. Beyond inhibiting those peripheral effects, quercetin also inhibited spinal cord cytokine production, oxidative stress and glial cells activation (glial fibrillary acidic protein [GFAP] and ionized calcium-binding adapter molecule 1 [Iba-1] mRNA expression). Concluding, the present data demonstrate that quercetin is a potential molecule for the treatment of muscle pain conditions related to unaccustomed exercise.
Muscle regeneration is a coordinated process that involves proliferation and differentiation of muscle progenitor cells. Activation of MyoD is a key event in myogenic differentiation, which is regulated by p38 mitogen‑activated protein kinases (MAPK). In a screen of natural compounds for the enhancement of MyoD activity, dehydrocorydaline (DHC) from the Corydalis tuber was identified. Treatment of C2C12 myoblasts with DHC increased the expression levels of muscle‑specific proteins, including MyoD, myogenin and myosin heavy chain. In addition, C2C12 myoblasts exhibited enhanced multinucleated myotube formation without any cytotoxicity. Treatment with DHC elevated p38 MAPK activation and the interaction of MyoD with an E protein, which is likely to result in activation of MyoD and promotion of myoblast differentiation. Furthermore, defects in differentiation‑induced p38 MAPK activation and myoblast differentiation induced by depletion of the promyogenic receptor protein Cdo in C2C12 myoblasts were restored by DHC treatment. In conclusion, these results indicated that DHC stimulates p38 MAPK activation, which can enhance heterodimerization of MyoD and E proteins, thus resulting in MyoD activation and myoblast differentiation. These findings suggested that DHC may be considered a potential therapeutic compound for the improvement of muscle stem cell regenerative capacity in injured muscle.
Skeletal muscle is capable of robust self-repair following mild trauma, yet in cases of traumatic volumetric muscle loss (VML), where more than 20% of a muscle's mass is lost, this capacity is overwhelmed. Current autogenic whole muscle transfer techniques are imperfect, which has motivated the exploration of implantable scaffolding strategies. In this study, the use of an allogeneic decellularized skeletal muscle (DSM) scaffold with and without the addition of minced muscle (MM) autograft tissue was explored as a repair strategy using a lower-limb VLM injury model (n=8 / sample group). We found that the repair of VML injuries using DSM+MM scaffolds significantly increased recovery of peak contractile force (81±3% of normal contralateral muscle) when compared to unrepaired VML controls (62±4%). Similar significant improvements were measured for restoration of muscle mass (88±3%) in response to DSM+MM repair when compared to unrepaired VML controls (79±3%). Histological findings revealed a marked decrease in collagen dense repair tissue formation both at and away from the implant site for DSM+MM repaired muscles. The addition of MM to DSM significantly increased MyoD expression, when compared to isolated DSM treatment (21 fold increase) and unrepaired VML (37 fold) controls. These findings support the further exploration of both DSM and MM as promising strategies for the repair of VML injury.
Current therapeutic options for the pediatric cancer rhabdomyosarcoma (RMS) have not improved significantly, especially for metastatic RMS. In the present work, we performed a deep microRNA profiling of the three major human RMS subtypes, along with cell lines and normal muscle, to identify novel molecular circuits with therapeutic potential. The signature we determined could discriminate RMS from muscle, revealing a subset of muscle-enriched microRNA (myomiR), including miR-22 which was strongly underexpressed in tumors. miR-22 was physiologically induced during normal myogenic differentiation and was transcriptionally regulated by MyoD, confirming its identity as a myomiR. Once introduced into RMS cells, miR-22 decreased cell proliferation, anchorage-independent growth, invasiveness and promoted apoptosis. Moreover, restoring miR-22 expression blocked tumor growth and prevented tumor dissemination in vivo. Gene expression profiling analysis of miR-22-expressing cells suggested TACC1 and RAB5B as possible direct miR-22 targets. Accordingly, loss and gain of function experiments defined the biological relevance of these genes in RMS pathogenesis. Finally, we demonstrated the ability of miR-22 to intercept and overcome the intrinsic resistance to MEK inhibition based on ERBB3 upregulation. Overall our results identified a novel miR-22 regulatory network with critical therapeutic implications in RMS.
In previous studies, we have reported that phospholipase C (PLC)-β1 plays a crucial role in myogenic differentiation and we determined the importance of its catalytic activity for the initiation of this process. Here we define the effectors that take part to its signaling pathway. We show that the Inositol Polyphosphate Multikinase (IPMK) is able to promote myogenic differentiation since its overexpression determines the up-regulation of several myogenic markers. Moreover, we demonstrate that IPMK activates the same cyclin D3 promoter region targeted by PLC-β1 and that IPMK-induced promoter activation relies upon c-jun binding to the promoter, as we have shown previously for PLC-β1. Furthermore, our data shows that IPMK overexpression causes an increase in β-catenin translocation and accumulation to the nuclei of differentiating myoblasts resulting in higher MyoD activation. Finally, we describe that PLC-β1 overexpression determines too an increase in β-catenin translocation and that PLC-β1, IPMK and β-catenin are mediators of the same signaling pathway since their overexpression results in cyclin D3 and myosin heavy chain (MYH) induction.
Pompe disease (PD) is a lysosomal disorder caused by acid α-glucosidase (GAA) deficiency. Progressive muscular weakness is the major symptom of PD, and enzyme replacement therapy can improve the clinical outcome. However, to achieve a better clinical outcome, alternative therapeutic strategies are being investigated, including gene therapy and pharmacological chaperones. We previously used lentiviral vector-mediated GAA gene transfer in PD patient-specific induced pluripotent stem cells. Some therapeutic efficacy was observed, although glycogen accumulation was not normalized. Transcription factor EB is a master regulator of lysosomal biogenesis and autophagy that has recently been associated with muscular pathology, and is now a potential therapeutic target in PD model mice. Here, we differentiated skeletal muscle from PD patient-specific induced pluripotent stem cells by forced MyoD expression. Lentiviral vector-mediated GAA and transcription factor EB gene transfer independently improved GAA enzyme activity and reduced glycogen content in skeletal muscle derived from PD-induced pluripotent stem cells. Interestingly, GAA and transcription factor EB cooperatively improved skeletal muscle pathology, both biochemically and morphologically. Thus, our findings show that abnormal lysosomal biogenesis is associated with the muscular pathology of PD, and transcription factor EB gene transfer is effective as an add-on strategy to GAA gene transfer.
Master transcription factor MyoD can initiate the entire myogenic gene expression program which differentiates proliferating myoblasts into multinucleated myotubes. We previously demonstrated that histone methyltransferase KMT1A associates with and inhibits MyoD in proliferating myoblasts, and must be removed to allow differentiation to proceed. It is known that pro-myogenic signaling pathways such as PI3K/AKT and p38α MAPK play critical roles in enforcing associations between MyoD and transcriptional activators, while removing repressors. However, the mechanism which displaces KMT1A from MyoD, and the signals responsible, remain unknown.
To investigate the role of p38α on MyoD-mediated differentiation, we utilized C2C12 myoblast cells as an in vitro model. p38α activity was either augmented via overexpression of a constitutively active upstream kinase or blocked via lentiviral delivery of a specific p38α shRNA or treatment with p38α/β inhibitor SB203580. Overexpression of KMT1A in these cells via lentiviral delivery was also used as a system wherein terminal differentiation is impeded by high levels of KMT1A.
The association of KMT1A and MyoD persisted, and differentiation was blocked in C2C12 myoblasts specifically after pharmacologic or genetic blockade of p38α. Conversely, forced activation of p38α was sufficient to activate MyoD and overcome the differentiation blockade in KMT1A-overexpressing C2C12 cells. Consistent with this finding, KMT1A phosphorylation during C2C12 differentiation correlated strongly with the activation of p38α. This phosphorylation was prevented by the inhibition of p38α. Biochemical studies further revealed that KMT1A can be a direct substrate for p38α. Importantly, chromatin immunoprecipitation (ChIP) studies show that the removal of KMT1A-mediated transcription repressive histone tri-methylation (H3K9me3) from the promoter of the Myogenin gene, a critical regulator of muscle differentiation, is dependent on p38α activity in C2C12 cells. Elevated p38α activity was also sufficient to remove this repressive H3K9me3 mark. Moreover, ChIP studies from C2C12 cells show that p38α activity is necessary and sufficient to establish active H3K9 acetylation on the Myogenin promoter.
Activation of p38α displaces KMT1A from MyoD to initiate myogenic gene expression upon induction of myoblasts differentiation.
A ready source of autologous myogenic cells is of vital importance for drug screening and functional genetic studies in Duchenne Muscular Dystrophy (DMD), a rare disease caused by a variety of dystrophin gene mutations. As stem cells (SCs) can be easily and non-invasively obtained from urine specimens, we set out to determine whether they could be myogenic-induced and useful in DMD research. To this end, we isolated stem cells from the urine of two healthy donors and one patient with DMD, and performed surface-marker characterization, myogenic differentiation (MyoD), and then transfection with antisense oligoribonucletoides to test for exon skipping and protein restoration. We demonstrated that native urine-derived stem cells express the full-length dystrophin transcript, and that the dystrophin mutation was retained in DMD patient cells, although the dystrophin protein was detected solely in control cells following myogenic transformation according to the phenotype. Notably, we also showed that treatment with antisense oligoribonucleotide against dystrophin exon 44 induced skipping in both native and MyoD-transformed urine-derived stem cells in DMD, with a therapeutic transcript-reframing effect, as well as visible protein restoration in the latter. Hence MyoD-transformed cells may be a good myogenic model for studying dystrophin gene expression, and native urine stem cells could be used to study the dystrophin transcript, and both diagnostic procedures and splicing modulation therapies in both patients and controls, without invasive and costly collection methods. New, bankable bioproducts from urine stem cells, useful for pre-screening studies and therapeutic applications alike, are also foreseeable following further, more in-depth characterisation.
Muscle satellite cells can proliferate and differentiate into myocytes; this biological function has important implications for muscle development, aging, repair, and wasting diseases. Established analytical methods, including western blotting, PCR, and immunohistochemistry, has been used to characterize the stages of satellite cells growth and development but there is currently a lack of methods to simultaneously monitor cell proliferation and identify changes in cell properties (i.e., expression of myogenic regulatory factors) for each individual cell during the progression to become myocytes. Image-based flow cytometry has the capability to simultaneously obtain morphometric data, monitor cell division, and detect expression of multiple proteins of interest. In this article we demonstrate the use of image-based flow cytometry and cell-trace dye to monitor satellite cells proliferation and to identify different stages of satellite cell differentiation.
Replication-independent incorporation of variant histone H3.3 has a profound impact on chromatin function and numerous cellular processes, including the differentiation of muscle cells. The histone chaperone HIRA and H3.3 have essential roles in MyoD regulation during myoblast differentiation. However, the precise mechanism that determines the onset of H3.3 deposition in response to differentiation signals is unclear. Here we show that HIRA is phosphorylated by Akt kinase, an important signaling modulator in muscle cells. By generating a phosphospecific antibody, we found that a significant amount of HIRA was phosphorylated in myoblasts. The phosphorylation level of HIRA and the occupancy of phosphorylated protein on muscle genes gradually decreased during cellular differentiation. Remarkably, the forced expression of the phosphomimic form of HIRA resulted in reduced H3.3 deposition and suppressed the activation of muscle genes in myotubes. Our data show that HIRA phosphorylation limits the expression of myogenic genes, while the dephosphorylation of HIRA is required for proficient H3.3 deposition and gene activation, demonstrating that the phosphorylation switch is exploited to modulate HIRA/H3.3-mediated muscle gene regulation during myogenesis.
In Duchenne muscular dystrophy (DMD) and other muscle wasting disorders, cell therapies are a promising route for promoting muscle regeneration by supplying a functional copy of the missing dystrophin gene and contributing new muscle fibers. The clinical application of cell-based therapies is resource intensive, and it will therefore be necessary to address key limitations that reduce cell engraftment into muscle tissue. A pressing issue is poor donor cell survival following transplantation, which in preclinical studies limits the ability to effectively test the impact of cell-based therapy on whole muscle function. We, therefore, sought to improve engraftment and the functional impact of in vivo myogenically converted dermal fibroblasts (dFbs) using a prosurvival cocktail (PSC) that includes heat shock followed by treatment with insulin-like growth factor-1, a caspase inhibitor, a Bcl-XL peptide, a KATP channel opener, basic fibroblast growth factor, Matrigel, and cyclosporine A. Advantages of dFbs include compatibility with the autologous setting, ease of isolation, and greater proliferative potential than DMD satellite cells. dFbs expressed tamoxifen-inducible MyoD and carried a mini-dystrophin gene driven by a muscle-specific promoter. After transplantation into muscles of mdx mice, a 70% reduction in donor cells was observed by day 5, and a 94% reduction by day 28. However, treatment with PSC gave a nearly three-fold increase in donor cells in early engraftment, and greatly increased the number of donor-contributed muscle fibers and total engrafted area in transplanted muscles. Furthermore, dystrophic muscles that received dFbs with PSC displayed reduced injury with eccentric contractions and an increase in maximum isometric force. Thus, enhancing survival of myogenic cells increases engraftment and improves structure and function of dystrophic muscle.
The excretory-secretory products (ESPs) released by the muscle-larvae (ML) stage of Trichinella spiralis have been suggested to be involved in nurse cell formation. However, the molecular mechanisms by which ML-ESPs modulate nurse cell formation remain unclear. Macrophages exert either beneficial or deleterious effects on tissue repair, depending on their activation/polarization state. They are crucial for skeletal muscle repair, notably, via their actions on myogenic precursor cells. However, these interactions during T. spiralis infection have not been characterized. In the present study, the ability of conditioned medium (CM) from J774A.1 macrophages treated with ML-ESPs to influence the differentiation of murine myoblasts, and the mechanisms of this influence, were investigated in vitro. The results showed that the expression of Myogenic Regulatory Factors (MRFs) MyoD and myogenin, myosin heavy chain (MyHC), and the p21 cyclin-dependent kinase inhibitor were reduced in CM treated cells compared to their expression in the control group. These findings indicated that CM inhibited myoblast differentiation. Conversely, CM promoted myoblast proliferation and increased cyclin D1 levels. Taken together, results of our study suggested that CM can indirectly influence myoblast differentiation and proliferation, which provides a new method for the elucidation of the complex mechanisms involved in cell-parasite and cell-cell interactions during T. spiralis infection.
Although muscle injuries tend to heal uneventfully in most cases, incomplete functional recovery commonly occurs as a result of scar tissue formation at the site of injury, even after treatment with muscle-derived stem cells (MDSCs).
The transplantation of MDSCs in the presence of a transforming growth factor β1 (TGF-β1) antagonist (losartan) would result in decreased scar tissue formation and enhance muscle regeneration after contusion injuries in a mouse model.
Controlled laboratory study.
An animal model of muscle contusion was developed using the tibialis anterior muscle in 48 healthy mice at 8 to 10 weeks of age. After sustaining muscle contusion injuries, the mice were divided into 4 groups: (1) saline injection group (control group; n = 15), (2) MDSC transplantation group (MDSC group; n = 15), (3) MDSC transplantation plus oral losartan group (MDSC/losartan group; n = 15), and (4) healthy uninjured group (healthy group; n = 3). Losartan was administrated systemically beginning 3 days after injury and continued until the designated endpoint (1, 2, or 4 weeks after injury). MDSCs were transplanted 4 days after injury. Muscle regeneration and fibrotic scar formation were evaluated by histology, and the expression of follistatin, MyoD, Smad7, and Smad2/3 were analyzed by immunohistochemistry and reverse transcription polymerase chain reaction analysis. Functional recovery was measured via electrical stimulation of the peroneal nerve.
When compared with MDSC transplantation alone, MDSC/losartan treatment resulted in significantly decreased scar formation, an increase in the number of regenerating myofibers, and improved functional recovery after muscle contusions. In support of these findings, the expression levels of Smad7 and MyoD were significantly increased in the group treated with both MDSCs and losartan.
When compared with MDSCs alone, the simultaneous treatment of muscle contusions with MDSCs and losartan significantly reduced scar formation, increased the number of regenerating myofibers, and improved the functional recovery of muscle; these effects were caused, at least in part, by the losartan-mediated upregulation of Smad7 and MyoD. Increased levels of Smad7 and MyoD together reduced the deposition of scar tissue (via the inhibition of TGF-β1 by Smad7) and committed the transplanted MDSCs toward a myogenic lineage (via Smad7-regulated MyoD expression).
The study findings contribute to the development of biological treatments to accelerate and improve the quality of muscle healing after injury.
Sarcopenic obesity, age-related muscle loss, which is compensated by an increase in fat mass, impairs quality of life in elderly people. Although the increase in intramuscular fat is associated with decreased insulin sensitivity and increased metabolic risk factors, the origin of diabetes-associated intramuscular fat has not been elucidated. Here, we investigated intramuscular fat deposition using a muscle injury model in type 2 diabetic mice.
Male 8-week-old C57BL/6 and 8-week-old and 26-week-old KKAy underwent intramuscular injection of cardiotoxin (Ctx) (100 μL/10 μM) into the tibialis anterior (TA) muscles. After 2 weeks, the muscles were removed and evaluated.
KKAy exhibited impaired muscle regeneration and ectopic fat deposition. Such impairment was more marked in older KKAy. These changes were also observed in another diabetic mouse model, db/db and diet-induced obese mice but not in streptozocin-induced diabetic mice. Deposited fat was platelet-derived growth factor (PDGF) receptor alpha positive and its cytoskeleton was stained with Masson's trichrome, indicating it to be of fibro-adipocyte progenitor cell origin. Expression of a myogenic marker, myoD, was lower and that of PDGF receptor alpha and CCAAT/enhancer binding protein (CEBP) alpha was higher in Ctx-injured TA of KKAy compared with that of C57BL/6. Peroxisome proliferator-activated receptor γ (PPARγ) was highly expressed in fat-forming lesions in older KKAy. Treatment with all-trans retinoic acid prevented the formation of intramuscular fat; however, treatment with GW9662, a PPARγ antagonist, increased the fibrotic change in muscle.
Diabetic mice showed impaired muscle regeneration with fat deposition, suggesting that diabetes may enhance sarcopenic obesity through a mechanism involving anomalous fibro-adipocyte progenitor cell differentiation.
The extraocular muscles (EOMs) comprise a group of highly specialized skeletal muscles controlling eye movements. Although a number of unique features of EOMs including their sparing in Duchenne muscular dystrophy have drawn a continuous interest, knowledge about these hard to reach muscles is still limited. The goal of this chapter is to provide detailed methods for the isolation and histological analysis of mouse EOMs. We first introduce in brief the basic anatomy and established nomenclature of the extraocular primary and accessory muscles. We then provide a detailed description with step-by-step images of our procedure for isolating (and subsequently cryosectioning) EOMs while preserving the integrity of their original structural organization. Next, we present several useful histological protocols frequently used by us, including: (1) a method for highlighting the general organization of periocular tissue, using the MyoD(Cre) × R26(mTmG) reporter mouse that elegantly distinguishes muscle (MyoD(Cre)-driven GFP(+)) from the non-myogenic constituents (Tomato(+)); (2) analysis by H&E staining, allowing for example, detection of the pathological features of the dystrophin-null phenotype in affected limb and diaphragm muscles that are absent in EOMs; (3) detection of the myogenic progenitors (i.e., satellite cells) in their native position underneath the myofiber basal lamina using Pax7/laminin double immunostaining. The EOM tissue harvesting procedure described here can also be adapted for isolating and studying satellite cells and other cell types. Overall, the methods described in this chapter should provide investigators the necessary tools for entering the EOM research field and contribute to a better understanding of this highly specialized muscle group and its complex micro-anatomy.
Adult skeletal muscle is maintained and repaired by resident stem cells called satellite cells, located between the plasmalemma of a muscle fiber, and the surrounding basal lamina. When needed, satellite cells are activated to form proliferative myoblasts, that then differentiate and fuse to existing muscle fibers, or fuse together to form replacement myofibers. In parallel, a proportion of satellite cells self-renew, to maintain the stem cell pool. To date, Pax7 is the marker of choice for identifying quiescent satellite cells. Co-immunostaining of skeletal muscle with Pax7 and laminin allows both identification of satellite cells, and the myofiber that they are associated with. Furthermore, satellite cells can be followed through the early stages of the myogenic program by co-immunostaining with myogenic regulatory factors such as MyoD. To test genetically modified mice for satellite cell expression, co-immunostaining can be performed for Pax7 and reporter genes such as eGFP. Here, we describe a method for identification of satellite cells in skeletal muscle sections, including muscle isolation, cryosectioning and co-immunostaining for Pax7 and laminin.
Dioxins (e.g. 2,3,7,8-tetrachlorodibenzo-p-dioxin; TCDD) cause cleft palate at a high rate. A post-fusional split may contribute to the pathogenesis, and tissue fragility may be a concern. The objective of this study was to investigate the effects of TCDD on the palatal epithelium, bone and muscle, which contribute to tissue integrity. ICR mice (10-12 weeks old) were used. TCDD was administered on E12.5 at 40 mg/kg. Immunohistochemical staining for AhR, ER-α, laminin, collagen IV, osteopontin, Runx2, MyoD, and desmin were performed. Furthermore, western blot analysis for osteopontin, Runx2, MyoD, and desmin were performed to evaluate protein expression in the palatal tissue. Immunohistologically, there was little difference in the collagen IV and laminin localization in the palatal epithelium between control versus TCDD-treated mice. Runx2 and osteopontin immunoreactivity decreased in the TCDD-treated palatal bone, and MyoD and desmin decreased in the TCDD-treated palatal muscle. AhR and ER-α immunoreactivity were localized to the normal palatal bone, but ER-α was diminished in the TCDD-treated palate. On western blot analysis, Runx2, MyoD, and desmin were all downregulated in the TCDD-treated palate. TCDD may suppress palatal osteogenesis and myogenesis via AhR, and cause cleft palates via a post-fusional split mechanism, in addition to a failure of palatal fusion.
Aryl hydrocarbon receptor (AhR) nuclear translocator (Arnt) gene has been isolated and characterized from a mouse genomic DNA library. The gene is about 60 kilobases long and split into 22 exons. An unusual exon/intron junctional sequence was found in the 11th intron of the gene that begins with GC at its 5'-end. The exon/intron arrangement of mArnt gene differs greatly from those of the other members of the same basic-helix-loop-helix/PAS family. The gene is TATA-less and has several transcription start sites. The promoter region of the mArnt gene is GC-rich and contains a number of putative regulatory DNA sequences such as two GC-boxes, a cAMP-responsive element, E-box, AP-1 site, and CAAT-box. Deletion experiments revealed that all these DNA elements made substantial contributions to a high level of expression of the gene, except for the cAMP-responsive element. Of all, two GC-boxes displayed the most dominant enhancing effects. It was demonstrated that there exist specific factors binding to these DNA elements in the nuclear extracts of HeLa cells. Among them, Sp1 and Sp3, and CAAT-box binding factor-A were identified to bind the GC-boxes and CAAT-box, respectively. Expression of MyoD in HeLa cells stimulated the Arnt promoter activity by binding to the E-box.
The AH-receptor is a ligand-activated transcription factor that regulates a number of biological responses to planar aromatic hydrocarbons. Interest in this receptor is related to its role in the toxic action of a variety of environmental chemicals, the simplicity and elegance of the murine genetics that led to its characterization and the distinctive mechanism by which this receptor activates gene expression. Recent cloning experiments have demonstrated that the AH-receptor is structurally related to the Per, ARNT and Sim proteins. Members of this newly described gene family are characterized by two N-terminal domains, the most characteristic of which is a motif referred to as a PAS domain. In the AH-receptor, this domain harbours sequences involved in the formation of a hydrophobic pocket that bind receptor agonists. Adjacent to the PAS domain in the AH-receptor, ARNT and Sim proteins is a basic/helix-loop-helix (bHLH) domain that appears to mediate heterodimerization and sequence specific DNA binding properties. The observation that the bHLH domain is present in the AH-receptor and the ARNT protein, a factor required for proper AH-receptor function, suggests that these proteins are heterodimeric partners that activate gene expression in a manner similar to Myc/Max and MyoD/E2A. The objectives of this review are to describe recent experimental results in this field and to use this information to develop a molecular model of AH-receptor mediated signal transduction.
A cDNA encoding the murine Ah receptor (Ahb-1 allele for aromatic hydrocarbon responsiveness) has been isolated and characterized. Analysis of the deduced protein sequence revealed a region with similarity to the basic region/helix-loop-helix (BR/HLH) motif found in many transcription factors that undergo dimerization for function. In addition to the BR/HLH domain, the N-terminal domain of the Ah receptor has extensive sequence similarity to the human ARNT (aryl hydrocarbon receptor nuclear translocator) protein and two regulatory proteins of Drosophila, Sim and Per. Photoaffinity labeling and peptide mapping studies indicate that the Ah receptor binds agonist at a domain that lies within this conserved N-terminal domain. The Ah receptor appears to be a ligand-activated transcription factor with a helix-loop-helix motif similar to those found in a variety of DNA-binding proteins, including Myc and MyoD.
The protein chaperone heat shock protein 90 (Hsp90) is a major regulator of different transcription factors such as MyoD, a basic helix loop helix (bHLH) protein, and the bHLH-Per-aryl hydrocarbon nuclear translocator (ARNT)-Sim (PAS) factors Sim and aryl hydrocarbon receptor (Ahr). The transcription factor hypoxia-inducible factor-1alpha (HIF-1alpha), involved in the response to hypoxia, also belongs to the bHLH-PAS family. This work was aimed to investigate the putative role of Hsp90 in HIF-1 activation by hypoxia. Using a EGFP-HIF-1alpha fusion protein, co-immunoprecipitation experiments evidenced that the chimeric protein expressed in COS-7 cells interacts with Hsp90 in normoxia but not in hypoxia. We also demonstrated that Hsp90 interacts with the bHLH-PAS domain of HIF-1alpha. Moreover, Hsp90 is not co-translocated with HIF-1alpha into the nucleus. At last, we showed that Hsp90 activity is essential for HIF-1 activation in hypoxia since it is inhibited in the presence of geldanamycin. These results indicate that Hsp90 is a major regulator in HIF-1alpha activation.
Polymorphisms in the promoter region are likely to impact KISS1 gene transcription and reproductive traits. In this study, Guanzhong (GZ, n=350) and Boer (BE, n=196) goats were used to detect polymorphism in the promoter of the goat KISS1 gene by DNA sequencing. In the GZ goats, the g.1384G>A mutation was identified in the promoter of the goat KISS1 gene. Guanzhong goats were in Hardy-Weinberg disequilibrium at g.1384G>A locus (P<0.05). The 1384A allele was predicted to eliminate methylation, AHR-arnt heterodimers and AHR-related factors (AHRR) and myoblast determining factors (MYOD) transcription factor-binding sites. Statistical results indicated that the g.1384G>A SNP was associated with litter size in the GZ goats (P<0.05). Luciferase assay analysis suggested that the 1384A allele increased luciferase activity when compared to the 1384G allele. The RT-qPCR assay also demonstrated that the 1384A allele had greater amounts of KISS1 mRNA than the 1384G allele in homozygous individuals. Functional analysis suggested that this g.1384G>A SNP may be an important genetic regulator of KISS1 gene expression with effects on downstream processes that are modulated by KISS1 gene because of the changes of methylation and transcription factor-binding sites. Therefore, the current study provides evidence in goats for genetic markers that might be used in breeding programs.
Doxorubicin (Dox, Adriamicin), a potent broad spectrum anthracycline anticancer drug, selectively inhibits muscle specific gene expression in cardiac cells in vivo and prevents terminal differentiation of skeletal muscle cells in vitro. By inducing the expression of the helix-loop-helix (HLH) transcriptional inhibitor ld2, Dox represses the myogenic function of the MyoD family of muscle regulatory factors (MRFs). In many cell types, terminal differentiation is coupled to an irreversible exit from the cell cycle and MyoD plays a critical role in the permanent cell cycle arrest of differentiating myocytes by upregulating the cyclin dependent kinase inhibitor (cdki) p21. Here, we correlate Dox effects on cell cycle with changes of E2F/DP complexes and activity in differentiating C2C12 myocytes. In Dox-treated quiescent myoblasts, which fail to differentiate into myotubes under permissive culture conditions, serum re-stimulation induces cyclin/cdk re-association on the E2F/DP complexes and this correlates with an evident increase in E2F/DP driven transcription and re-entry of myoblasts into the cell cycle. Despite Dox ability to activate the DNA-damage dependent p53/p21 pathway, when induced in the absence of MyoD or other MRFs, p21 fails to maintain the postmitotic state in Dox-treated myocytes induced to differentiate. Thus, uncoupling p21 induction and MyoD activity results in a serum-reversible cell cycle arrest, indicating that MRF specific activation of cdki(s) is required for permanent cell cycle arrest in differentiating muscle cells.
Duchenne muscular dystrophy (DMD) is a progressive and fatal muscle degenerating disease caused by a dystrophin deficiency. Effective suppression of the primary pathology observed in DMD is critical for treatment. Patient-derived human induced pluripotent stem cells (hiPSCs) are a promising tool for drug discovery. Here, we report an in vitro evaluation system for a DMD therapy using hiPSCs that recapitulate the primary pathology and can be used for DMD drug screening. Skeletal myotubes generated from hiPSCs are intact, which allows them to be used to model the initial pathology of DMD in vitro. Induced control and DMD myotubes were morphologically and physiologically comparable. However, electric stimulation of these myotubes for in vitro contraction caused pronounced calcium ion (Ca(2+)) influx only in DMD myocytes. Restoration of dystrophin by the exon-skipping technique suppressed this Ca(2+) overflow and reduced the secretion of creatine kinase (CK) in DMD myotubes. These results suggest that the early pathogenesis of DMD can be effectively modelled in skeletal myotubes induced from patient-derived iPSCs, thereby enabling the development and evaluation of novel drugs.
Patient-derived induced pluripotent stem cells (iPSCs) have opened the door to recreating pathological conditions in vitro using differentiation into diseased cells corresponding to each target tissue. Yet for muscular diseases, a method for reproducible and efficient myogenic differentiation from human iPSCs is required for in vitro modeling. Here, we introduce a myogenic differentiation protocol mediated by inducible transcription factor expression that reproducibly and efficiently drives human iPSCs into myocytes. Delivering a tetracycline-inducible, myogenic differentiation 1 (MYOD1) piggyBac (PB) vector to human iPSCs enables the derivation of iPSCs that undergo uniform myogenic differentiation in a short period of time. This differentiation protocol yields a homogenous skeletal muscle cell population, reproducibly reaching efficiencies as high as 70-90 %. MYOD1-induced myocytes demonstrate characteristics of mature myocytes such as cell fusion and cell twitching in response to electric stimulation within 14 days of differentiation. This differentiation protocol can be applied widely in various types of patient-derived human iPSCs and has great prospects in disease modeling particularly with inherited diseases that require studies of early pathogenesis and drug screening.
Overexpression of SIRT1 is frequently observed in various types of cancers, suggesting its potential role in malignancies. However, the molecular basis of how SIRT1 is elevated in cancer is less understood. Here we show that cancer-related SIRT1 overexpression is due to evasion of Sirt1 mRNA from repression by a group of Sirt1-targeting microRNAs (miRNAs) that might be robustly silenced in cancer. Our comprehensive library-based screening and subsequent miRNA gene profiling revealed a housekeeping gene-like broad expression pattern and strong CpG island-association of the Sirt1-targeting miRNA genes. This suggests aberrant CpG DNA methylation as the mechanistic background for malignant SIRT1 elevation. Our work also provides an example where epigenetic mechanisms cause the group-wide regulation of miRNAs sharing a common key target.
The ZHTc6-MyoD embryonic stem cell line expresses the myogenic transcriptional factor MyoD under the control of a tetracycline-inducible promoter. Following induction, most of the ZHTc6-MyoD cells differentiate to myotubes. However, a small fraction does not differentiate, instead forming colonies that retain the potential for myocyte differentiation. In our current study, we found that parathyroid hormone type 1 receptor (PTH1R) expression in colony-forming cells at 13 days after differentiation was higher than that in the undifferentiated ZHTc6-MyoD cells. We also found that PTH1R expression was required for myocyte differentiation, and that parathyroid hormone accelerated the differentiation. Our analysis of human and mouse skeletal muscle tissues showed that most cells expressing PTH1R also expressed Pax7 and CD34, which are biomarkers of satellite cells. Furthermore, we found that parathyroid hormone treatment significantly improved muscle weakness in dystrophin-deficient mdx mice. This is the first report indicating that PTH1R and PTH accelerate myocyte differentiation.
3-Methylcholanthrene (3MC) induces tumor formation at the site of injection in the hind leg of mice within 110 days. Recent reports reveal that the transformation of normal muscle cells to atypical cells is one of the causes for tumor formation, however the molecular mechanism behind this process is not well understood. Here, we show in an in vitro study that 3MC induces fragmentation of multinucleate myotubes into viable mononucleates. These mononucleates form colonies when they are seeded into soft agar, indicative of cellular transformation. Immunoblot analysis reveals that phosphorylation of myosin regulatory light chain (RLC20) is 5.6±0.5 fold reduced in 3MC treated myotubes in comparison to vehicle treated myotubes during the fragmentation of myotubes. In contrast, levels of myogenic factors such as MyoD, Myogenin and cell cycle regulators such as Cyclin D, Cyclin E1 remain unchanged as assessed by real-time PCR array and reverse transcriptase PCR analysis, respectively. Interestingly, addition of the myosin light chain kinase inhibitor, ML-7, enhances the fragmentation, whereas phosphatase inhibitor perturbs the 3MC induced fragmentation of myotubes. These results suggest that decrease in RLC20 phosphorylation may be associated with the fragmentation step of dedifferentiation.
The establishment of human induced pluripotent stem cells (hiPSCs) has enabled the production of in vitro, patient-specific cell models of human disease. In vitro recreation of disease pathology from patient-derived hiPSCs depends on efficient differentiation protocols producing relevant adult cell types. However, myogenic differentiation of hiPSCs has faced obstacles, namely, low efficiency and/or poor reproducibility. Here, we report the rapid, efficient, and reproducible differentiation of hiPSCs into mature myocytes. We demonstrated that inducible expression of myogenic differentiation1 (MYOD1) in immature hiPSCs for at least 5 days drives cells along the myogenic lineage, with efficiencies reaching 70-90%. Myogenic differentiation driven by MYOD1 occurred even in immature, almost completely undifferentiated hiPSCs, without mesodermal transition. Myocytes induced in this manner reach maturity within 2 weeks of differentiation as assessed by marker gene expression and functional properties, including in vitro and in vivo cell fusion and twitching in response to electrical stimulation. Miyoshi Myopathy (MM) is a congenital distal myopathy caused by defective muscle membrane repair due to mutations in DYSFERLIN. Using our induced differentiation technique, we successfully recreated the pathological condition of MM in vitro, demonstrating defective membrane repair in hiPSC-derived myotubes from an MM patient and phenotypic rescue by expression of full-length DYSFERLIN (DYSF). These findings not only facilitate the pathological investigation of MM, but could potentially be applied in modeling of other human muscular diseases by using patient-derived hiPSCs.
Genetic modification is critically enabling for studies addressing specification and maintenance of cell fate; however, methods for engineering modifications are inefficient. We demonstrate a rapid and efficient recombination system in which an inducible, floxed cre allele replaces itself with an incoming transgene. We target this inducible cassette exchange (ICE) allele to the (HPRT) locus and demonstrate recombination in murine embryonic stem cells (ESCs) and primary cells from derivative ICE mice. Using lentivectors, we demonstrate recombination at a randomly integrated ICE locus in human ESCs. To illustrate the utility of this system, we insert the myogenic regulator, Myf5, into the ICE locus in each platform. This enables efficient directed differentiation of mouse and human ESCs into skeletal muscle and conditional myogenic transdetermination of primary cells cultured in vitro. This versatile tool is thus well suited to gain-of-function studies probing gene function in the specification and reprogramming of cell fate.
Duchenne muscular dystrophy (DMD) is an incurable genetic disease with early mortality. Multipotent mesenchymal stromal cells (MSCs) are of interest because of their ability to differentiate to form myogenic cells in situ. In the present study, methods were developed to expand cultures of MSCs and to promote the myogenic differentiation of these cells, which were then used in a new approach for the treatment of DMD. MSC cultures enriched in CD271(+) cells grew better than CD271-depleted cultures. The transduction of CD271(+) MSCs with MyoD caused myogenic differentiation in vitro and the formation of myotubes expressing late myogenic markers. CD271(+) MSCs in the myogenic cell lineage transplanted into dog leukocyte antigen (DLA)-identical dogs formed clusters of muscle-like tissue. Intra-arterial injection of the CD271(+) MSCs resulted in engraftment at the site of the cardiotoxin (CTX)-injured muscle. Dogs affected by X-linked muscular dystrophy in Japan (CXMD(J)) treated with an intramuscular injection of CD271(+) MSCs similarly developed muscle-like tissue within 8-12 weeks in the absence of immunosuppression. In the newly formed tissues, developmental myosin heavy chain (dMyHC) and dystrophin were upregulated. These findings demonstrate that a cell transplantation strategy using CD271(+) MSCs may offer a promising treatment approach for patients with DMD.
Despite having distinct expression patterns and phenotypes in mutant mice, the myogenic regulatory factors Myf5 and MyoD have been considered to be functionally equivalent. Here, we report that these factors have a different response to DNA damage, due to the presence in MyoD and absence in Myf5 of a consensus site for Abl-mediated tyrosine phosphorylation that inhibits MyoD activity in response to DNA damage. Genotoxins failed to repress skeletal myogenesis in MyoD-null embryos; reintroduction of wild-type MyoD, but not mutant Abl phosphorylation-resistant MyoD, restored the DNA-damage-dependent inhibition of muscle differentiation. Conversely, introduction of the Abl-responsive phosphorylation motif converts Myf5 into a DNA-damage-sensitive transcription factor. Gene-dosage-dependent reduction of Abl kinase activity in MyoD-expressing cells attenuated the DNA-damage-dependent inhibition of myogenesis. The presence of a DNA-damage-responsive phosphorylation motif in vertebrate, but not in invertebrate MyoD suggests an evolved response to environmental stress, originated from basic helix-loop-helix gene duplication in vertebrate myogenesis.
We have previously reported that the level of MyoD expression correlates with the level of apoptosis that occurs in a subpopulation of skeletal myoblasts induced to differentiate by serum withdrawal. Herein we document that MyoD expression contributes to the level of apoptosis in myoblasts and fibroblasts in response to a variety of apoptotic stimuli. Specifically, re-expression of MyoD in skeletal myoblasts rendered defective for both differentiation and apoptosis by the expression of oncogenic Ras restores their ability to undergo both differentiation and apoptosis in response to serum withdrawal. Further, using a fibroblast cell line expressing an estrogen receptor:MyoD fusion protein, we have determined that addition of estrogen sensitizes these fibroblasts to apoptosis induced by serum withdrawal, or by treatment with etoposide or thapsigargin. RNAi mediated silencing of MyoD in either 23A2 or C2C12 myoblasts renders these cells resistant to apoptosis induced by serum withdrawal, or by treatment with etoposide or thapsigargin. Finally, MyoD mediated regulation of the apoptotic response to these various stimuli, in both myoblasts and fibroblasts, correlates with the level of induction of the pro-apoptotic Bcl2 family member PUMA.
Prolonged limb immobilization, which is often the outcome of injury and illness, results in the atrophy of skeletal muscles. The basis of muscle atrophy needs to be better understood in order to allow development of effective countermeasures. The present study focused on determining whether skeletal muscle stem cells, satellite cells, are directly affected by long-term immobilization as well as on investigating the potential of pharmacological and physiological avenues to counterbalance atrophy-induced muscle deterioration. We used external fixation (EF), as a clinically relevant model, to gain insights into the relationships between muscle degenerative and regenerative conditions to the myogenic properties and abundance of bona fide satellite cells. Rats were treated with tetracycline (Tet) through the EF period, or exercise trained on a treadmill for 2 weeks after the cessation of the atrophic stimulus. EF induced muscle mass loss; declined expression of the muscle specific regulatory factors (MRFs) Myf5, MyoD, myogenin, and also of satellite cell numbers and myogenic differentiation aptitude. Tet enhanced the expression of MRFs, but did not prevent the decline of the satellite cell pool. After exercise running, however, muscle mass, satellite cell numbers (enumerated through the entire length of myofibers), and myogenic differentiation aptitude (determined by the lineal identity of clonal cultures of satellite cells) were re-gained to levels prior to EF. Together, our results point to Tet and exercise running as promising and relevant approaches for enhancing muscle recovery after atrophy.
Loss of skeletal muscle profoundly affects the health and well-being of patients, and there currently is no way to replace lost muscle. We believe that a key step in the development of a prosthesis for reconstruction of dysfunctional muscular tissue is the ability to reconstitute the in vivo-like 3-dimensional (3D) organization of skeletal muscle in vitro with isolated satellite cells. In our present proof of principle studies, we have successfully constructed a multilayered culture of skeletal muscle cells, derived from neonatal satellite cells, that are distributed in a 3D pattern of organization that mimics many of the features of intact tissue. These multilayered cultures are composed of elongated multinucleated myotubes that are MyoD positive. Histological studies indicate that the multiple layers of myotubes can be distinguished. Expression of muscle-specific markers such as myosin heavy chain, dystrophin, integrin alpha-7, alpha-enolase, and beta-enolase was detected using real-time reverse transcriptase polymerase chain reaction at levels near adult values. Physiological measurements of the engineered skeletal muscle showed that they tetanize and display physiologic force length behavior, although developed force per cross-sectional area was below that of native rat skeletal muscle.
In myogenic C(2)C(12) cells, 5 mM creatine increased the incorporation of labeled [(35)S]methionine into sarcoplasmic (+20%, P < 0.05) and myofibrillar proteins (+50%, P < 0.01). Creatine also promoted the fusion of myoblasts assessed by an increased number of nuclei incorporated within myotubes (+40%, P < 0.001). Expression of myosin heavy chain type II (+1,300%, P < 0.001), troponin T (+65%, P < 0.01), and titin (+40%, P < 0.05) was enhanced by creatine. Mannitol, taurine, and beta-alanine did not mimic the effect of creatine, ruling out an osmolarity-dependent mechanism. The addition of rapamycin, the inhibitor of mammalian target of rapamycin/70-kDa ribosomal S6 protein kinase (mTOR/p70(s6k)) pathway, and SB 202190, the inhibitor of p38, completely blocked differentiation in control cells, and creatine did not reverse this inhibition, suggesting that the mTOR/p70(s6k) and p38 pathways could be potentially involved in the effect induced by creatine on differentiation. Creatine upregulated phosphorylation of protein kinase B (Akt/PKB; +60%, P < 0.001), glycogen synthase kinase-3 (+70%, P < 0.001), and p70(s6k) (+50%, P < 0.001). Creatine also affected the phosphorylation state of p38 (-50% at 24 h and +70% at 96 h, P < 0.05) as well as the nuclear content of its downstream targets myocyte enhancer factor-2 (-55% at 48 h and +170% at 96 h, P < 0.05) and MyoD (+60%, P < 0.01). In conclusion, this study points out the involvement of the p38 and the Akt/PKB-p70(s6k) pathways in the enhanced differentiation induced by creatine in C(2)C(12) cells.
To determine if the proliferation of myogenic cells is equally important to recovery of contractile function after 2 different types of contraction-induced muscle injuries.
Randomized trial.
Muscle biology laboratory.
Adult male Sprague-Dawley rats.
Tibialis anterior muscles were injured by a single lengthening contraction with large strain (1R) or multiple lengthening contractions with small strain (MR). The hindlimbs of some animals in each group were irradiated before injury to prevent proliferation of myogenic cells during recovery.
Contractile tension was measured immediately after injury and 3, 7, 14, and 21 days after injury. Permeation to Evans blue dye was used to assay membrane damage. Centrally nucleated fibers and reverse transcriptase-polymerase chain reaction of myoD and myogenin were used as measures of myogenesis.
Inhibiting myogenesis prevented the recovery of contractile function after MR, but not after 1R. Both protocols caused Evans blue dye uptake immediately after injury, but Evans blue dye was only retained in fibers for several days after 1R. This suggests that membranes reseal after 1R, but not after MR.
The mechanisms that underlie recovery after injuries caused by repeated lengthening contractions and injuries caused by a single lengthening contraction are different. The differences may be important when planning targeted rehabilitation strategies for each type of injury.
Advanced gene therapy, tissue engineering and biopharmaceutical manufacturing require sophisticated and well-balanced multiregulated multigene interventions to reprogram desired mammalian cell phenotypes.
We have combined the streptogramin (PIP)- and tetracycline (TET)-responsive gene regulation systems for independent expression control of the differentiation determinants myoD and msx1 in C2C12-derived cells.
Different dual-regulated expression scenarios which induce either both, only one or none of the lineage control genes triggered differential differentiation and precise control of myogenic, osteogenic or adipogenic cell phenotypes.
Our findings substantiate the use of multiregulated multigene interventions in reprogramming cellular differentiation pathways in a desired manner.
We reported previously that transcription factor nuclear factor (NF)-kappaB is constitutively activated in human and murine squamous cell carcinomas (SCCs). The role of NF-kappaB in the cumulative changes in gene expression with transformation and progression of the murine SCC Pam 212 and after switching off NF-kappaB by a dominant negative inhibitor kappaB mutant (IkappaBalphaM) was explored by profiling with a 15,000-element cDNA micoarrray. Remarkably, NF-kappaB modulated the expression of >60% of the 308 genes differentially expressed between normal keratinocytes and metastatic SCCs. NF-kappaB directly or indirectly modulated expression of programs of genes functionally linked to proliferation, apoptosis, adhesion, and angiogenesis. Among these, changes in expression of cyclin D1, inhibitor of apoptosis-1, mutant Trp53, and beta-catenin detected with modulation of NF-kappaB by microarray were confirmed by Western and Northern blot. NF-kappaB DNA binding motifs were detected in the promoter of approximately 63% of genes showing increased expression and 33% of the genes showing decreased expression. The ACTACAG motif implicated in the NF-kappaB-dependent down-regulation of mRNA expression of MyoD and Sox9 was detected in the coding portion of about 15% of genes showing increased or decreased expression. Inactivation of NF-kappaB inhibited malignant phenotypic features including proliferation, cell survival, migration, angiogenesis, and tumorigenesis. These results provide evidence that NF-kappaB is an important modulator of gene expression programs that contribute to the malignant phenotype of SCC.
Lentiviral vectors offer well-recognized advantages as a gene delivery system both for the analysis of gene function and as a vehicle for gene therapy. In the present study optimized HIV-1-based vector systems that display efficient doxycycline (Dox)-dependent transgene expression in vitro and in vivo have been developed through the modification of factors that contribute to basal activity levels. Dissection of HIV-1 vectors harboring a tTA-dependent transgene expression cassette revealed several mechanisms that account for Dox-independent transgene expression, including those mediated by an internal CMV promoter, as well as a potential contribution from fusion proteins generated by translational readthrough. A precipitous reduction in basal activity levels was accomplished by separating the transactivator and the transgene cassettes into a binary vector system and by relocating the inducible promoter to the U3 region of the LTR. In addition, substituting the VP16 portion of tTA with the human p65 transactivating domain improved Dox-dependent transgene expression in a number of cell types. Optimizing HIV-1-based vectors culminated in a "toolbox" of vectors suitable for transgene delivery in vitro and in vivo, as conveyed by our ability to control the Dox-dependent differentiation of embryonic fibroblasts into muscle cells in vitro and transgene expression in rat brains.
Cell-substratum interactions trigger key signaling pathways that modulate growth control and tissue-specific gene expression. We have previously shown that abolishing adhesive interactions by suspension culture results in G(0) arrest of myoblasts. We report that blocking intracellular transmission of adhesion-dependent signals in adherent cells mimics the absence of adhesive contacts. We investigated the effects of pharmacological inhibitors of acto-myosin contractility on growth and differentiation of C2C12 myogenic cells. ML7 (5-iodonaphthalene-1-sulfonyl homopiperazine) and BDM (2,3, butanedione monoxime) are specific inhibitors of myosin light chain kinase, and myosin heavy chain ATPase, respectively. ML7 and BDM affected cell shape by reducing focal adhesions and stress fibers. Both inhibitors rapidly blocked DNA synthesis in a dose-dependent, reversible fashion. Furthermore, both ML7 and BDM suppressed expression of MyoD and myogenin, induced p27(kip1) but not p21(cip1), and inhibited differentiation. Thus, as with suspension-arrest, inhibition of acto-myosin contractility in adherent cells led to arrest uncoupled from differentiation. Over-expression of inhibitors of the small GTPase RhoA (dominant negative RhoA and C3 transferase) mimicked the effects of myosin inhibitors. By contrast, wild-type RhoA induced arrest, maintained MyoD and activated myogenin and p21 expression. The Rho effector kinase ROCK did not appear to mediate Rho's effects on MyoD. Thus, ROCK and MLCK play different roles in the myogenic program. Signals regulated by MLCK are critical, since inhibition of MLCK suppressed MyoD expression but inhibition of ROCK did not. Inhibition of contractility suppressed MyoD but did not reduce actin polymer levels. However, actin depolymerization with latrunculin B inhibited MyoD expression. Taken together, our observations indicate that actin polymer status and contractility regulate MyoD expression. We suggest that in myoblasts, the Rho pathway and regulation of acto-myosin contractility may define a control point for conditional uncoupling of differentiation and the cell cycle.
Several studies have already demonstrated that micro- and milli-calpains (CAPN 1-CAPN 2), calcium-dependent intracellular cysteine-proteases are involved in many biological phenomenon including muscle growth and development. More particularly, recent studies have demonstrated that milli-calpain is implicated in myoblast fusion. Moreover, in primary muscle cells, these proteases do not appear simultaneously throughout muscle cell differentiation. Because micro- and milli-calpains do not have the same intracellular localization, it appears likely that these two calcium-dependent proteases have different biological roles during muscle cell differentiation. The goal of this study is to determine the role of micro-calpain. We therefore, have developed a muscle cell line in which micro-calpain is over-expressed, using the inducible Tet Regulated Expression System. The outcome is observed by following the behavior of different proteins, considered to be potential substrates of the protease. The present study shows important decreases in the expression level of ezrin (68%), vimentin (64%) and caveolin 3 (76%) whereas many other cytoskeletal proteins remain remarkably stable. Concerning the myogenic transcription factors, only the level of myogenin decreased (59%) after the over-expression of micro-calpain. Ultra structural studies have shown that the myofibrils formed near the cell periphery are normally oriented, lying along the longitudinal axis. This regularity is lost progressively towards the cell center where the cytoskeleton presented an increasing disorganization. All these results indicate that micro-calpain is involved in regulation pathway of myogenesis via at least its action on ezrin, vimentin, caveolin 3 and myogenin, a muscle transcription factor.
Skeletal muscle contractile activity has been implicated in many aspects of muscle cell differentiation and maturation. Much of the research in this area has depended upon costly and labor-intensive cultures of isolated primary muscle cells because widely available immortalized muscle cell lines often do not display a high level of either spontaneous or stimulated contractile activity. We sought to develop conditionally-immortalized skeletal muscle cell lines that would provide a source of myofibers that exhibit robust spontaneous contractile activity similar to primary muscle cultures. Using a tetracycline-regulated retroviral vector expressing a temperature-sensitive T-antigen to infect primary myoblasts, we isolated individual clonal muscle precursor cell lines that have characteristics of activated satellite cells during growth and rapidly differentiate into mature myotubes with spontaneous contractile activity after culture in non-transformation-permissive conditions. Comparison of these cell lines (known as rat myoblast-like tetracycline (RMT) cell lines) to primary cell cultures revealed that they share a wide variety of morphological, physiological, and biochemical characteristics. Most importantly, the time-course and extent of activity-dependent gene regulation observed in primary cell culture for all genes tested, including subunits of the nicotinic acetylcholine receptor (nAChR), muscle specific kinase (MuSK), and myogenin, is reproduced in RMT lines. These immortalized cell lines are a useful alternative to primary cultures for studying muscle differentiation and molecular and physiological aspects of electrical activity in muscle fibers.
Nutrition plays a key role in the maintenance of muscle and bone mass, and dietary protein deficiency has in particular been associated with catabolism of both muscle and bone tissue. One mechanism thought to link protein deficiency with loss of muscle mass is deficiency in specific amino acids that play a role in muscle metabolism. The aim of this study was to test the hypothesis that the essential amino acid tryptophan, and its metabolite kynurenine, might directly affect muscle metabolism in the setting of protein deficiency.
Adult mice (12 mo) were fed a normal diet (18% protein), as well as diets with low protein (8%) supplemented with increasing concentrations (50, 100, and 200 uM) of kynurenine (Kyn) or with tryptophan (Trp; 1.5 mM) for 8 weeks. Myoprogenitor cells were also treated with Trp and Kyn in vitro to determine their effects on cell proliferation and expression of myogenic differentiation markers.
All mice on the low-protein diets weighed less than the group fed normal protein (18%). Lean mass measured by dual-energy X-ray absorptiometry was lowest in mice on the high Kyn diet, whereas percent lean mass was highest in mice receiving Trp supplementation and percent body fat was lowest in mice receiving Trp. Enzyme-linked immunosorbent assays showed significant increases in skeletal muscle insulin-like growth factor-1, leptin, and the myostatin antagonist follistatin with Trp supplementation. mRNA microarray and gene pathway analysis performed on muscle samples demonstrate that mTor/eif4/p70s6k pathway molecules are significantly up-regulated in muscles from mice on Kyn and Trp supplementation. In vitro, neither amino acid affected proliferation of myoprogenitors, but Trp increased the expression of the myogenic markers MyoD, myogenin, and myosin heavy chain.
These findings suggest that dietary amino acids can directly affect molecular signaling in skeletal muscle, further indicating that dietary manipulation with specific amino acids could potentially attenuate muscle loss with dietary protein deficiency.
Brown fat or brown adipose tissue (BAT), found in newborn mammals as small depots localized in the interscapular region, plays a prominent role in regulating thermogenesis perinatally. The physiological importance of functional BAT has been recently reasserted in human adults. Because myoblasts and adipoblasts emerge from a common mesodermal precursor, we investigated developmental determination and the reciprocal relationship between muscle and adipocyte commitment. Here we show that a mutant mouse defective for both Igf2 and Myod genes exhibits massive BAT hypertrophy compared with wild-type and single-mutant newborns. The increased adipocyte proliferation in BAT of double-mutant newborns was associated with overexpression of the brown fat-specific marker Ucp1. More strikingly, expression of the master key gene Prdm16 involved in the switch between myogenic and brown adipogenic lineages was drastically enhanced. We further demonstrate that concomitant Myod and Igf2 inactivation accelerates differentiation of a brown preadipocyte cell line and induces lipid accumulation and increased Ucp1 and Prdm16 expression. This in vitro approach brings additional support for the implication of both Myod and Igf2 in BAT development. These results provide the first in vivo evidence that a myogenic regulator together with a growth factor act simultaneously but through independent pathways to repress Prdm16, which opens potential therapeutic perspectives for human metabolic disorders.
Gene promoters are enriched in guanine clusters that potentially fold into quadruplex structures. Such quadruplexes were implicated in the regulation of gene expression, plausibly by interacting with transcription factors. We showed previously that homodimers of the myogenic transcription factor MyoD bound in vitro most tightly bimolecular quadruplexes of promoter sequences of muscle-specific genes. By contrast, MyoD-E47 heterodimers formed tighter complexes with d(CANNTG) E-box motifs that govern muscle gene expression. Here, we show that DNA quadruplexes enhance in vivo MyoD and E-box-driven expression of a firefly luciferase (FL) reporter gene. HEK293 cells were transfected with FL expressing p4RTK-FL vector alone or together with MyoD expressing pEMSV-MyoD plasmid, with quadruplexes of alpha7 integrin or sarcomeric mitochondrial creatine kinase (sMtCK) muscle gene promoters or with a combination thereof. Whereas MyoD elevated by approximately 10-fold the levels of FL mRNA and protein, the DNA quadruplexes by themselves did not affect FL expression. However, together with MyoD, quadruplex DNA increased by approximately 35-fold the amounts of FL mRNA and protein. Without affecting its expression, DNA quadruplexes bound MyoD in the cells. Based on these results, we propose models for the regulation of muscle gene transcription by direct interaction of MyoD with promoter quadruplex structures.
Four myogenic regulatory factors (MRFs); MyoD, Myf-5, MRF4 and Myogenin direct muscle tissue differentiation. Heterodimers of MRFs with E-proteins activate muscle-specific gene expression by binding to E-box motifs d(CANNTG) in their promoters or enhancers. We showed previously that in contrast to the favored binding of E-box by MyoD-E47 heterodimers, homodimeric MyoD associated preferentially with quadruplex structures of regulatory sequences of muscle-specific genes. To inquire whether other MRFs shared the DNA binding preferences of MyoD, the DNA affinities of hetero- and homo-dimeric MyoD, MRF4 and Myogenin were compared. Similarly to MyoD, heterodimers with E47 of MRF4 or Myogenin bound E-box more tightly than quadruplex DNA. However, unlike homodimeric MyoD or MRF4, Myogenin homodimers associated weakly and nonpreferentially with quadruplex DNA. By reciprocally switching basic regions between MyoD and Myogenin we demonstrated dominance of MyoD in determining the quadruplex DNA-binding affinity. Thus, Myogenin with an implanted MyoD basic region bound quadruplex DNA nearly as tightly as MyoD. However, a grafted Myogenin basic region did not diminish the high affinity of homodimeric MyoD for quadruplex DNA. We speculate that the dissimilar interaction of MyoD and Myogenin with tetrahelical domains in muscle gene promoters may differently regulate their myogenic activities.
Muscle differentiation and expression of muscle-specific proteins are initiated by the binding of heterodimers of the transcription factor MyoD with E2A proteins to E-box motif d(CANNTG) in promoters or enhancers of muscle-specific genes. MyoD homodimers, however, form tighter complexes with tetraplex structures of guanine-rich regulatory sequences of some muscle genes. In this work, we identified elements in MyoD that bind E-box or tetraplex structures of promoter sequences of the muscle-specific genes alpha7 integrin and sarcomeric Mitochondrial Creatine Kinase (sMtCK). Deletions of large domains of the 315 amino acids long recombinant MyoD indicated that the binding site for both E-box and tetraplex DNA is its basic region KRKTTNADRRKAATMRERRR that encompasses the three underlined clusters of basic residues designated R(1), R(2) and R(3). Deletion of a single or pairs of R triads or R111C substitution completely abolished the E-box-binding capacity of MyoD. By contrast, the MyoD deletion mutants Delta102-114, DeltaR(3), DeltaR(1)R(3) or DeltaR(2)R(3) maintained comparable tetraplex DNA-binding capacity as reflected by the similar dissociation constants of their protein-DNA complexes. Only deletion of all three basic clusters abolished the binding of tetraplex DNA. Implications of the binding of E-box and tetraplex DNA by non-identical MyoD elements are considered.
Muscle formation and vascular assembly during embryonic development are usually considered separately. In this paper, we investigate the relationship between the vasculature and muscles during limb bud development. We show that endothelial cells are detected in limb regions before muscle cells and can organize themselves in space in the absence of muscles. In chick limbs, endothelial cells are detected in the future zones of muscle cleavage, delineating the cleavage pattern of muscle masses. We therefore perturbed vascular assembly in chick limbs by overexpressing VEGFA and demonstrated that ectopic blood vessels inhibit muscle formation, while promoting connective tissue. Conversely, local inhibition of vessel formation using a soluble form of VEGFR1 leads to muscle fusion. The endogenous location of endothelial cells in the future muscle cleavage zones and the inverse correlation between blood vessels and muscle suggests that vessels are involved in the muscle splitting process. We also identify the secreted factor PDGFB (expressed in endothelial cells) as a putative molecular candidate mediating the muscle-inhibiting and connective tissue-promoting functions of blood vessels. Finally, we propose that PDGFB promotes the production of extracellular matrix and attracts connective tissue cells to the future splitting site, allowing separation of the muscle masses during the splitting process.
Myogenic transcription is activated by the binding of heterodimers of the basic helix-loop-helix proteins MyoD and E12 or E47 to a consensus E-box sequence, d(CANNTG), in promoter or enhancer regions of muscle-specific genes. Homodimers of MyoD bind E-box less tightly and are less efficient activators of transcription. Recent results from our laboratory (Yafe, A., Etzioni, S., Weisman-Shomer, P., and Fry, M. (2005) Nucleic Acids Res. 33, 2887-2900) indicate that regulatory sequences of several muscle-specific genes contain a disproportionate high content of guanine clusters that readily form hairpin and parallel-stranded unimolecular and bimolecular tetraplex structures. Here we have shown that homodimers of full-length recombinant MyoD formed complexes with bimolecular tetraplex structures of muscle-specific regulatory sequences but not with their double-stranded, hairpin, or unimolecular tetraplex forms. Preferential binding of homodimeric MyoD to bimolecular tetraplex DNA structures over E-box DNA was reflected by the 18.7-39.9-fold lower dissociation constants, Kd, of the MyoD-tetraplex DNA complexes. Conversely, MyoD-E47 heterodimers formed tighter complexes with E-box as indicated by their 6.8-19.0-fold lower Kd relative to complexes with bimolecular tetraplex DNA structures. Similarly, homodimers of the 60-amino acid basic helix-loop-helix domain of MyoD bound E-box more efficiently and tetraplex DNA less efficiently than homodimers of full-length MyoD. It might be that the favored binding of MyoD homodimers to tetraplex DNA structures lowers their ability to activate muscle-specific gene transcription, whereas the formation of MyoD-E47 heterodimers and their preferential binding to E-box DNA enhance transcription.
Clustered guanine residues in DNA readily generate hairpin or a variety of tetrahelical structures. The myogenic determination protein MyoD was reported to bind to a tetrahelical structure of guanine-rich enhancer sequence of muscle creatine kinase (MCK) more tightly than to its target E-box motif [K. Walsh and A. Gualberto (1992) J. Biol. Chem., 267, 13714-13718], suggesting that tetraplex structures of regulatory sequences of muscle-specific genes could contribute to transcriptional regulation. In the current study we show that promoter or enhancer sequences of various muscle-specific genes display a disproportionately high incidence of guanine clusters. The sequences derived from the guanine-rich promoter or enhancer regions of three muscle-specific genes, human sarcomeric mitochondrial creatine kinase (sMtCK), mouse MCK and alpha7 integrin formed diverse secondary structures. The sMtCK sequence folded into a hairpin structure; the alpha7 integrin oligonucleotide generated a unimolecular tetraplex; and sequences from all three genes associated to generate bimolecular tetraplexes. Furthermore, two neighboring non-contiguous guanine-rich tracts in the alpha7 integrin promoter region also paired to form a tetraplex structure. We also show that homodimeric MyoD bound bimolecular tetraplex structures of muscle-specific regulatory sequences more efficiently than its target E-box motif. These results are consistent with a role of tetrahelical structures of DNA in the regulation of muscle-specific gene expression.
Forced expression of the bHLH myogenic factors, Myf5 and MyoD, in various mammalian cell lines induces the full program of myogenic differentiation. However, this property has not been extensively explored in vivo. We have taken advantage of the chick model to investigate the effect of electroporation of the mouse Myf5 and MyoD genes in the embryonic neural tube. We found that misexpression of either mouse Myf5 or MyoD in the chick neural tube leads to ectopic skeletal muscle differentiation, assayed by the expression of the myosin heavy chains in the neural tube and neural crest derivatives. We also showed that the endogenous neuronal differentiation program is inhibited under the influence of either ectopic mouse Myf5 or MyoD. We used this new system to analyse, in vivo, the transcriptional regulation between the myogenic factors. We found that MyoD and Myogenin expression can be activated by ectopic mouse Myf5 or MyoD, while Myf5 expression cannot be activated either by mouse MyoD or by itself. We also analysed the transcriptional regulation between the myogenic factors and the different genes involved in myogenesis, such as Mef2c, Pax3, Paraxis, Six1, Mox1, Mox2 and FgfR4. We established the existence of an unexpected regulatory loop between MyoD and FgfR4. The consequences for myogenesis are discussed.
The function of the stress-responsive N-myc downstream-regulated gene 2 (NDRG2) in the control of myoblast growth, and the amino acids contributing to its function, are not well characterized. Here, we investigated the effect of increased NDRG2 levels on the proliferation, differentiation and apoptosis in skeletal muscle cells under basal and stress conditions. NDRG2 overexpression increased C2C12 myoblast proliferation and the expression of positive cell cycle regulators, cdk2, cyclin B and cyclin D, and phosphorylation of Rb, while the serine/threonine-deficient NDRG2, 3A-NDRG2, had less effect. The onset of differentiation was enhanced by NDRG2 as determined through the myogenic regulatory factor expression profiles and myocyte fusion index. However, the overall level of differentiation in myotubes was not different. While NDRG2 up-regulated caspase 3/7 activities during differentiation, no increase in apoptosis was measured by TUNEL assay or through cleavage of caspase 3 and PARP proteins. During H2O2 treatment to induce oxidative stress, NDRG2 helped protect against the loss of proliferation and ER stress as measured by GRP78 expression with 3A-NDRG2 displaying less protection. NDRG2 also attenuated apoptosis by reducing cleavage of PARP and caspase 3 and expression of pro-apoptotic Bax while enhancing the pro-survival Bcl-2 and Bcl-xL levels. In contrast, Mcl-1 was not altered, and NDRG2 did not protect against palmitate-induced lipotoxicity. Our findings show that NDRG2 overexpression increases myoblast proliferation and caspase 3/7 activities without increasing overall differentiation. Furthermore, NDRG2 attenuates H2O2-induced oxidative stress and specific serine and threonine amino acid residues appear to contribute to its function in muscle cells.
Glucocorticoids cause secondary osteoporosis and myopathy, characterized by type II muscle fiber atrophy. We examined whether a new vitamin D3 analogue, eldecalcitol, could inhibit glucocorticoid-induced osteopenia or myopathy in rats, and also determined the effects of prednisolone (PSL) and/or eldecalcitol on muscle-related gene expression. Six-month-old female Wistar rats were randomized into four groups: PSL group (10 mg/kg PSL); E group (0.05 µg/kg eldecalcitol); PSL + E group; and control group. PSL, eldecalcitol, and vehicles were administered daily for 2 or 4 weeks. Right calf muscle strength, muscle fatigue, cross-sectional areas (CSAs) of left tibialis anterior muscle fibers, and bone mineral density (BMD) were measured following administration. Pax7, MyoD, and myogenin mRNA levels in gastrocnemius muscles were also determined. Muscle strength was significantly higher in the PSL + E group than in the PSL group (p < 0.05) after 4 weeks, but not after 2 weeks. No significant difference in muscle fatigue was seen between groups at 2 or 4 weeks. CSAs of type II muscle fibers were significantly larger in the E group and the PSL + E group than in the PSL group at 4 weeks (p = 0.0093, p = 0.0443, respectively). Eldecalcitol treatment for 4 weeks maintained the same BMD as the PSL + E group. After 2 weeks, but not 4 weeks, eldecalcitol treatment significantly increased Pax7 and myogenin mRNA expression in gastrocnemius muscle, and PSL also stimulated myogenin expression. Eldecalcitol appears to increase muscle volume and to protect against femur BMD loss in PSL-administered rats, and it may also stimulate myoblast differentiation into early myotubes.
Corticosteroids cause muscle atrophy by acting on proteasomal and lysosomal systems and by affecting pathways related to muscular trophysm, such as the IGF-1/PI-3k/Akt/mTOR. Omega-3 fatty acid (n-3) has been used beneficially to attenuate muscle atrophy linked to sepsis and cachexia; however, its effect on dexamethasone-induced muscle atrophy has not been evaluated. Objectives. We evaluated whether n-3 supplementation could mitigate the development of dexamethasone-induced muscle atrophy. Methods. Two groups of Wistar rats were orally supplemented with n-3 or vehicle solution for 40 days. In the last 10 days, dexamethasone, or saline solution, was administrated establishing four groups: control, dexamethasone, n-3, and dexamethasone + n-3. The cross-sectional areas of muscle fibers, gene expression (MyoD, Myogenin, MuRF-1, and Atrogin-1), and protein expression (Akt, GSK3β, FOXO3a, and mTOR) were assessed. Results. Dexamethasone induced a significant loss in body and muscle weight, atrophy in type 2B fibers, and decreased expression of P-Akt, P-GSK3β, and P-FOXO3a. N-3 supplementation did not attenuate the negative effects of dexamethasone on skeletal muscle; instead, it caused atrophy in type 1, 2A, reduced the expression of Myogenin, and increased the expression of Atrogin-1. Conclusion. Food supplements containing n-3 are usually healthful, but they may potentiate some of the side effects of glucocorticoids.
Myostatin (MSTN) is primarily expressed in muscle and plays an important role in muscle and fat development in pigs. However, there is little information about the regulation of pig MSTN. In order to elucidate whether pig MSTN could be regulated by muscle- and fat-related factors, the porcine MSTN promoter was amplified and cloned into pGL3-basic vector, and transfected into cells to analyze the transcriptional activity of promoter with muscle- and fat-related factors through dual-luciferase reporter assays. 5'-deletion expression showed that there was a negative-regulatory region located between nucleotides -1519 and -1236 bp, and there were some positive-regulatory regions located between -1236 and -568 bp. The longest fragment (1.7 kb) was cotransfected with muscle-related transcription factor myogenic differentiation 1 (MyoD), resulting in promoter transcriptional activity upregulation. The fragment was treated by the adipogenic agents (DIM) including dexamethasone, insulin, and isobutyl-1-methylxanthine (IBMX). We found that MSTN promoter transcriptional activity can be regulated by IBMX, but not by DIM. CCAAT/enhancer binding protein (C/EBP) α and C/EBPβ, two proteins which are induced by DIM during adipogenesis were cotransfected with the 1.7-kb fragment, respectively, resulting in promoter transcriptional activity downregulation. Treating the fragment with rosiglitazone which induce the expression of peroxisome proliferator-activated receptor γ (PPARγ), resulting in promoter transcriptional activity upregulation. Cotransfection experiments confirmed this result. Taken together, we showed that porcine MSTN could be upregulated by IBMX, MyoD, and PPARγ but downregulated by C/EBPα and C/EBPβ.
The purpose of this review is to discuss novel insight into mechanisms of glucocorticoid-regulated muscle wasting, in particular the role of transcription factors and nuclear cofactors. In addition, novel strategies that may become useful in the treatment or prevention of glucocorticoid-induced muscle wasting are reviewed.
Studies suggest that glucocorticoid-induced upregulation of the transcription factors Forkhead box O 1 and CCAAT/enhancer-binding protein beta and downregulation of MyoD and myogenin are involved in glucocorticoid-induced muscle wasting. In addition, glucocorticoid-induced hyperacetylation caused by increased expression of the nuclear cofactor p300 and its histone acetyl transferase activity and decreased expression and activity of histone deacetylases plays an important role in glucocorticoid-induced muscle proteolysis and wasting. Other mechanisms may also be involved in glucocorticoid-induced muscle wasting, including insulin resistance and store-operated calcium entry. Novel potential strategies to prevent or treat glucocorticoid-induced muscle wasting include the use of small molecule histone deacetylase activators, dissociated glucocorticoid receptor agonists, and 11beta-hydroxysteroid dehydrogenase type 1 inhibitors.
An increased understanding of molecular mechanisms regulating glucocorticoid-induced muscle wasting will help develop new strategies to prevent and treat this debilitating condition.
Long-term corticosteroid therapy causes myopathy and can inhibit regeneration of skeletal muscle. Therefore, we hypothesized that corticosteroid exposure reduces satellite cell activity in skeletal myofibers. Male Swiss-Webster mice were injected daily for 8 weeks with prednisolone (GC) or vehicle (control). Single myofibers were isolated from the gastrocnemius, centrifuged to mechanically activate satellite cells, and maintained in culture for 48 h. Both constitutive nitric oxide synthase (NOS) isoforms were reduced in muscle by GC treatment (nNOS: -30%, eNOS: -34%). Fewer myogenic (myoD+) cells emanated from GC myofibers compared to control (-61%, P < 0.05). Supplementation of culture media with the nitric oxide donor, diethylenetriamine NONOate (DETA-NO; 5-50 microM), caused a dose-dependent increase in the number of myoD+ cells arising from both control and GC myofibers (P < 0.05), and 10 and 50 microM DETA-NO eliminated the GC-induced deficit in myogenic cells (P > 0.05). Therefore, supplementation of GC myofibers with DETA-NO restores satellite cell activity to control levels. Nitric oxide production could be an important therapeutic target for the prevention of corticosteroid myopathy.
Glucocorticoid-induced gene-1 (Gig1) was identified in a yeast one-hybrid screen for factors that interact with the MyoD core enhancer. The Gig1 gene encodes a novel C2H2 zinc finger protein that shares a high degree of sequence similarity with two known DNA binding proteins in humans, Glut4 enhancer factor and papillomavirus binding factor (PBF). The mouse ortholog of PBF was also isolated in the screen. The DNA binding domain of Gig1, which contains TCF-E-tail CR1 and CR2 motifs shown to mediate promoter specificity of TCF-E-tail isoforms, was mapped to a C-terminal domain that is highly conserved in Glut4 enhancer factor and PBF. In mouse embryos, in situ hybridization revealed a restricted pattern of expression of Gig1 that overlaps with MyoD expression. A nuclear-localized lacZ knockin null allele of Gig1 was produced to study Gig1 expression with greater resolution and to assess Gig1 functions. X-gal staining of Gig1(nlacZ) heterozygous embryos revealed Gig1 expression in myotomal myocytes, skeletal muscle precursors in the limb, and in nascent muscle fibers of the body wall, head and neck, and limbs through E14.5 (latest stage examined). Gig1 was also expressed in a subset of Scleraxis-positive tendon precursors/rudiments of the limbs, but not in the earliest tendon precursors of the somite (syndetome) defined by Scleraxis expression. Additional regions of Gig1 expression included the apical ectodermal ridge, neural tube roof plate and floor plate, apparent motor neurons in the ventral neural tube, otic vesicles, notochord, and several other tissues representing all three germ layers. Gig1 expression was particularly well represented in epithelial tissues and in a number of cells/tissues of neural crest origin. Expression of both the endogenous MyoD gene and a reporter gene driven by MyoD regulatory elements was similar in wild-type and homozygous null Gig1(nlacZ) embryos, and mutant mice were viable and fertile, indicating that the functions of Gig1 are redundant with other factors.
Skeletal muscle homoeostasis is maintained by a variety of cytoprotective mechanisms. Since ablation of the TauT (taurine transporter) gene results in susceptibility to exercise-induced muscle weakness in vivo, it has been suggested that TauT is essential for skeletal muscle function. However, the regulatory mechanisms of TauT expression remain to be elucidated. In the present study, we demonstrated that TauT was up-regulated during myogenesis in C2C12 cells. Treatment with bFGF (basic fibroblast growth factor), which inhibited muscle differentiation, abrogated myogenic induction of TauT. The promoter activities of TauT were up-regulated during muscle differentiation in C2C12 cells. Database analyses identified an MEF2 (myocyte enhancer binding factor 2) consensus sequence at -844 in the rat TauT gene. Truncation of the promoter region containing the MEF2 site significantly reduced the promoter activity, demonstrating the functional importance of the MEF2 site. Electrophoretic mobility-shift assays confirmed that MEF2 bound to the MEF2 consensus sequence and that DNA-protein complex levels were increased during differentiation. Promoter analyses using mutated promoter-reporter plasmids demonstrated that this site was functional. Importantly, transfection with a MyoD expression vector markedly enhanced TauT promoter activity in the (non-myogenic) 10T1/2 cells. Moreover, co-transfection with an MEF2 expression vector augmented MyoD-induced TauT promoter activity, suggesting that MEF2 is required for full activation of TauT expression. Finally, we examined the effects of taurine on myotube atrophy to clarify the biological significance of the up-regulation of TauT, and demonstrated that taurine attenuated muscle atrophy induced by dexamethasone. TauT expression is regulated under the control of the myogenic programme, and we propose that this is the mechanism for taurine-mediated resistance to muscle atrophy.
Muscle formation and postnatal growth is under the control of the muscle regulatory factors (MRF) gene family, consisting of four genes: MyoD1, myogenin, myf-5, and myf-6. Muscle mass is also known to be affected by specific drugs, like glucocorticoids. Glucocorticoids have also been characterized as muscle atrophying agents. However, glucocorticoids are also the only drugs reported to have a beneficial effect on the treatment of muscle degenerative disorders. Since muscle mass relates to gender, this may be partially caused by gender. The aim of this study is to investigate gender-related basal and dexamethasone-induced expression of the MRF genes. Gender-specific MRF mRNA levels were investigated in anterior tibial muscles of the rat. Myogenin, myf-5, and myf-6 mRNA level was significantly higher in female rats than in male rats. Since muscle mass is usually higher in males, we conclude that the development of gender-related differences in muscle mass is not primarily under the control of the mRNA levels of the MRF genes. Male rats treated with dexamethasone for 14 days (1 mg per kg body weight) showed increased levels of MyoD1, myogenin and myf-5 compared to control male rats. Female rats treated with dexamethasone showed decreased expression of myf-6 compared to control female rats. These results suggest that dexamethasone increase satellite cell-specific MRF activity in male muscle tissue, which is suggested to be associated with muscle hypertrophy, while maintenance of muscle tissue is affected in female muscle tissue. Therefore, we conclude that both basal and dexamethasone-induced MRF gene mRNA levels are regulated gender-specific.
The manner in which growth factors acting at the cell surface regulate activity of myogenic basic-helix-loop-helix proteins in the nucleus and thus control the fate of committed skeletal myoblasts remains poorly understood. In this study, we report that immunoreactive Gs protein alpha-subunits (Gs alpha) localize to nuclei of proliferating C2C12 myoblasts but not to nuclei of differentiated postmitotic C2C12 myotubes. To explore the biological significance of this observation, we placed a cDNA encoding Gs alpha in an expression vector under the control of a steroid-inducible promoter and isolated colonies of stably transfected C2C12 myoblasts. Dexamethasone-induced expression of activated Gs alpha markedly delayed differentiation in comparison with uninduced stably transfected cells, which differentiated normally in mitogen-depleted media. Northern blot analysis showed that impaired differentiation was associated with delayed up-regulation of MyoD and myogenin and delayed down-regulation of Id, a dominant negative inhibitor of differentiation. Similar impairment of differentiation could not be reproduced in wild-type C2C12 cells by increasing intracellular cAMP either with forskolin or treatment with a cell-permeable cAMP analog. However, treatment of myoblasts with cholera toxin markedly inhibited myogenic differentiation. Taken together, these findings suggest a novel role for Gs alpha in modulating myogenic differentiation.
DD3 cells are a myoblast line generated by stable transfection of C3H10T1/2 fibroblasts with the bovine myf5 cDNA (bmyf) fused to the dexamethasone-inducible MMTV promoter. After treating proliferating cells with dexamethasone, bmyf transcripts were induced approximately fivefold within 1.5-2.5 h. Induction of bmyf was followed 4 h later by a similar increase in myogenin transcripts which was dependent on protein synthesis. The elevated level of myogenin transcripts in dividing cells was comparable to that observed in DD3 myoblasts after differentiation. The 4-h lag before the myogenin response suggested involvement of an intermediate factor. However, one possible factor, myocyte-specific enhancer binding factor (MEF-2) (a known enhancer of myogenin promoter activity) was neither detectable nor inducible by dexamethasone in proliferating cells. myoD transcripts were barely detectable and uninducible in proliferating cells but strongly upregulated during differentiation. There was also a transient twofold increase in mrf4 transcripts by dexamethasone treatment in dividing cells, while no changes were detected in the levels of Id, E12, or TnC messages. The mouse myf5 gene was silent and uninducible in DD3 cells under proliferating and differentiating conditions. We conclude that ectopic expression of MMTV-bmyf led to activation of three of the endogenous myogenic factor genes of which only myogenin showed a rapid and sustained response to dexamethasone-mediated induction of bmyf in dividing cells.
Tissue engineered skeletal muscle has potential for application as a graft source for repairing soft tissue injuries, a model for testing pharmaceuticals, and a biomechanical actuator system for soft robots. However, engineered muscle to date has not produced forces comparable to native muscle, limiting its potential for repair and for use as an in vitro model for pharmaceutical testing. In this study, we examined the trophic effects of dexamethasone (DEX), a glucocorticoid that stimulates myoblast differentiation and fusion into myotubes, on our tissue engineered three-dimensional skeletal muscle units (SMUs). Using our established SMU fabrication protocol, muscle isolates were cultured with three experimental DEX concentrations (5, 10, and 25 nM) and compared to untreated controls. Following seeding onto a laminin-coated Sylgard substrate, the administration of DEX was initiated on day 0 or day 6 in growth medium or on day 9 after the switch to differentiation medium and was sustained until the completion of SMU fabrication. During this process, total cell proliferation was measured with a BrdU assay, and myogenesis and structural advancement of muscle cells were observed through immunostaining for MyoD, myogenin, desmin, and α-actinin. After SMU formation, isometric tetanic force production was measured to quantify function. The histological and functional assessment of the SMU showed that the administration of 10 nM DEX beginning on either day 0 or day 6 yielded optimal SMUs. These optimized SMUs exhibited formation of advanced sarcomeric structure and significant increases in myotube diameter and myotube fusion index, compared with untreated controls. Additionally, the optimized SMUs matured functionally, as indicated by a fivefold rise in force production. In conclusion, we have demonstrated that the addition of DEX to our process of engineering skeletal muscle tissue improves myogenesis, advances muscle structure, and increases force production in the resulting SMUs.
The high regenerative capacity of adult skeletal muscle relies on a self-renewing depot of adult stem cells, termed muscle satellite cells (MSCs). Androgens, known mediators of overall body composition and specifically skeletal muscle mass, have been shown to regulate MSCs. The possible overlapping function of androgen regulation of muscle growth and MSC activation has not been carefully investigated with regards to muscle regeneration.Therefore, the aim of this study was to examine coinciding androgen-mediated genetic changes in an in vitro MSC model and clinically relevant in vivo models. A gene signature was established via microarray analysis for androgen-mediated MSC engagement and highlighted several markers including follistatin (FST), IGF-1, C-X-C chemokine receptor 4 (CXCR4), hepatocyte growth factor (HGF) and glucocorticoid receptor (GR). In an in vivo muscle atrophy model, androgen re-supplementation significantly increased muscle size and expression of IGF-1, FST, and HGF, while significantly decreasing expression of GR. Biphasic gene expression profiles over the 7-day re-supplementation period identified temporal androgen regulation of molecular targets involved in satellite cell engagement into myogenesis. In a muscle injury model, removal of androgens resulted in delayed muscle recovery and regeneration. Modifications in the androgen signaling gene signature, along with reduced Pax7 and MyoD expression, suggested that limited MSC activation and increased inflammation contributed to the delayed regeneration. However, enhanced MSC activation in the androgen-deplete mouse injury model was driven by an androgen receptor (AR) agonist. These results provide novel in vitro and in vivo evidence describing molecular targets of androgen signaling, while also increasing support for translational use of AR agonists in skeletal muscle recovery and regeneration.
Skeletal muscle atrophy results from various conditions including high levels of glucocorticoids, and β-hydroxy β-methylbutyrate (HMB; a metabolite of leucine) is a potent therapeutical supplement used to treat various muscle disorders. Recent studies have demonstrated that HMB inhibits dexamethasone-induced atrophy in cultured myotubes, but its effect on dexamethasone-induced muscle atrophy has not been determined in vivo. In the present study, we investigated the effect of HMB on dexamethasone-induced muscle atrophy in rats. Treatment with dexamethasone weakened grip strengths and increased muscle damage as determined by increased serum creatine kinase levels and by histological analysis. Dexamethasone treatment also reduced both soleus and gastrocnemius muscle masses. However, HMB supplementation significantly prevented reductions in grip strengths, reduced muscle damage, and prevented muscle mass and protein concentration decrease in soleus muscle. Biochemical analysis demonstrated that dexamethasone markedly increased levels of MuRF1 protein, which causes the ubiquitination and degradation of MyHC. Indeed, dexamethasone treatment decreased MyHC protein expression and increased the ubiquitinated-MyHC to MyHC ratio. However, HMB supplementation caused the down-regulations of MuRF1 protein and of ubiquitinated-MyHC. Furthermore, additional experiments provided evidence that HMB supplementation inhibited the nuclear translocation of FOXO1 induced by dexamethasone, and showed increased MyoD expression in the nuclear fractions of soleus muscles. These findings suggest that HMB supplementation attenuates dexamethasone-induced muscle wasting by regulating FOXO1 transcription factor and subsequent MuRF1 expression. Accordingly, our results suggest that HMB supplementation could be used to prevent steroid myopathy.
Glucocorticoids production is increased in many pathological conditions that are associated with muscle loss, but their role in causing muscle wasting is not fully understood. We have demonstrated a new mechanism of glucocorticoid-induced muscle atrophy: Dexamethasone (Dex) suppresses satellite cell function contributing to the development of muscle atrophy. Specifically, we found that Dex decreases satellite cell proliferation and differentiation in vitro and in vivo. The mechanism involved Dex-induced upregulation of myostatin and suppression of Akirin1, a promyogenic gene. When myostatin was inhibited in Dex-treated mice, Akirin1 expression increased as did satellite cell activity, muscle regeneration and muscle growth. In addition, silencing myostatin in myoblasts or satellite cells prevented Dex from suppressing Akirin1 expression and cellular proliferation and differentiation. Finally, overexpression of Akirin1 in myoblasts increased their expression of MyoD and myogenin and improved cellular proliferation and differentiation, theses improvements were no longer suppressed by Dex. We conclude that glucocorticoids stimulate myostatin which inhibits Akirin1 expression and the reparative functions of satellite cells. These responses attribute to muscle atrophy. Thus, inhibition of myostatin or increasing Akirin1 expression could lead to therapeutic strategies for improving satellite cell activation and enhancing muscle growth in diseases associated with increased glucocorticoid production.
Annexin A1 (ANXA1, lipocortin-1) is a glucocorticoid-regulated 37-kDa protein, so called since its main property is to bind (i.e. to annex) to cellular membranes in a Ca(2+)-dependent manner. Although ANXA1 has predominantly been studied in the context of immune responses and cancer, the protein can affect a larger variety of biological phenomena, including cell proliferation and migration. Our previous results show that endogenous ANXA1 positively modulates myoblast cell differentiation by promoting migration of satellite cells and, consequently, skeletal muscle differentiation. In this work, we have evaluated the hypothesis that ANXA1 is able to exert effects on myoblast cell migration acting through formyl peptide receptors (FPRs) following changes in its subcellular localization as in other cell types and tissues. The analysis of the subcellular localization of ANXA1 in C2C12 myoblasts during myogenic differentiation showed an interesting increase of extracellular ANXA1 starting from the initial phases of skeletal muscle cell differentiation. The investigation of intracellular Ca(2+) perturbation following exogenous administration of the ANXA1 N-terminal derived peptide Ac2-26 established the engagement of the FPRs which expression in C2C12 cells was assessed by qualitative PCR. Wound healing assay experiments showed that Ac2-26 peptide is able to increase migration of C2C12 skeletal muscle cells and to induce cell surface translocation and secretion of ANXA1. Our results suggest a role for ANXA1 as a highly versatile component in the signaling chains triggered by the proper calcium perturbation that takes place during active migration and differentiation or membrane repair since the protein is strongly redistributed onto the plasma membranes after an rapid increase of intracellular levels of Ca(2+). These properties indicate that ANXA1 may be involved in a novel repair mechanism for skeletal muscle and may have therapeutic implications with respect to the development of ANXA1 mimetics.
Glucocorticoids (GCs) are involved in the muscle wasting caused by trauma, inactivity, and stress. In the present study, three experiments were conducted to investigate the effect of GCs on the expression of genes related to muscle development in chickens. Broilers at 7 or 35 days of age were subjected to dexamethasone (DEX) treatment (2 mg/kg body mass (BM)) for 3 or 7 days. The expression levels of genes such as IGF1, IGF1 receptor, MSTN, WW domain containing E3 ubiquitin (UB) protein ligase 1, myogenic determining factor, and myogenic factor 5 were measured. The results showed that BM gain was significantly suppressed by DEX treatment. The plasma level of insulin was increased (P<0.05) by DEX treatment at feeding, whereas IGF1 was decreased (P<0.05). The expression of genes in the IGF1, myostatin, and UB-proteasome (UBP) pathways were altered by DEX treatment in age- and exposure time-related ways. These results suggest that GCs suppress IGF1 and upregulate myostatin and/or activated myostatin and the UBP pathway, which might be the source of the effect of GCs on muscle development.
We investigated the expression of hepatocyte growth factor (HGF), which has mitogenic and anti-fibrotic activities, in muscle tissue of polymyositis/dermatomyositis (PM/DM) patients, as well as its functional roles in cultured myoblasts. Immunohistochemistry in muscle from PM/DM patients revealed that HGF was expressed predominantly on infiltrating mononuclear cells and that muscle cells expressed the receptor c-met. Cultured myoblasts produced HGF; which was increased by IL-1alpha but suppressed by TGF-beta and dexamethasone. Exogenous HGF induced myoblast proliferation and reduced procollagen type I production. Furthermore, HGF enhanced the gene expression of muscle regulatory factors MyoD and Myf5, while suppressing expression of fibrosis-related genes, connective tissue growth factor and alpha-smooth muscle actin. Although dexamethasone showed contrasting effects to HGF on the expression of these genes, co-treatment with HGF ameliorated the effects of dexamethasone. Taking the beneficial roles of HGF into consideration, administration of HGF might contribute to muscle regeneration in PM/DM especially under corticosteroid treatment.
Myogenesis is a process whereby myoblasts differentiate and fuse into multinucleated myotubes, the precursors of myofibers. Various signals and factors modulate this process, and glucocorticoids (GCs) are important regulators of skeletal muscle metabolism. We show that glucocorticoid-induced leucine zipper (GILZ), a GC-induced gene, and the newly identified isoform long GILZ (L-GILZ) are expressed in skeletal muscle tissue and in C2C12 myoblasts where GILZ/L-GILZ maximum expression occurs during the first few days in differentiation medium. Moreover, we observed that GC treatment of myoblasts, which increased GILZ/L-GILZ expression, resulted in reduced myotube formation, whereas GILZ and L-GILZ silencing dampened GC effects. Inhibition of differentiation caused by GILZ/L-GILZ overexpression correlated with inhibition of MyoD function and reduced expression of myogenin. Notably, results indicate that GILZ and L-GILZ bind and regulate MyoD/HDAC1 transcriptional activity, thus mediating the anti-myogenic effect of GCs.
Skeletal muscle protein loss, known as atrophy, occurs during inactivity, disease, and aging. Atrophy may be the result of increased catabolic factors, e.g. glucocorticoids, or reduced influence of anabolic factors, e.g. insulin. The purpose of this study was to investigate atrophy, signaling mechanisms, and apoptosis in a rat model of restraint stress in 40 adult male Wistar rats. Due to the anxiolytic effects of Sutherlandia frutescens, we also determined if any of the molecular events in gastrocnemius muscle would be affected by daily treatment with S. frutescens. Rats were randomly assigned to four experimental groups: control placebo (CP); control Sutherlandia (CS) treatment; Restraint Placebo (RP) and Restraint Sutherlandia (RS) treatment. Restraint resulted in a significant increase in myostatin which was significantly reduced with Sutherlandia treatment. In addition, MyoD expression was significantly attenuated in RP and this effect was also counteracted by Sutherlandia treatment. Restraint also resulted in a significant attenuation of the PI3-Kinase/Akt signaling pathway and increased apoptosis which was reversed with Sutherlandia treatment. This study demonstrates for the first time that psychological stress elevates markers of muscle atrophy and apoptosis, whilst a herbal remedy, Sutherlandia, inhibits apoptosis, and signaling pathways associated with muscle atrophy.
Myogenesis is conducted by transcription factors including MyoD and myogenin. Myogenin is known to be polyubiquitinated by SCF (Skp1/Cullin 1/F-box protein) followed by proteasomal degradation, though the participating F-box protein is remaining unidentified. In this study, we found that myogenin in differentiated myoblasts is destabilized by muscle atrophy-inducing dexamethasone and that MAFbx (muscle atrophy F-box protein) is increased in atrophying myotubes. MAFbx overexpression resulted in MG132-sensitive reduction of myogenin. Myogenin had a MAFbx-recognition motif and interacted with MAFbx. MAFbx activated polyubiquitination of myogenin. The results of this study suggest that MAFbx functions as an F-box protein for ubiquitination of myogenin.
Mechanical ventilation is known to induce ventilator-induced diaphragm dysfunction. Patients submitted to mechanical ventilation often receive massive doses of corticosteroids that may cause further deterioration of diaphragm function.
To examine whether the combination of 24 hours of controlled mechanical ventilation with corticosteroid administration would exacerbate ventilator-induced diaphragm dysfunction.
Rats were randomly assigned to a group submitted to 24 hours of controlled mechanical ventilation receiving an intramuscular injection of saline or 80 mg/kg methylprednisolone, a group submitted to 24 hours of spontaneous breathing receiving saline, or methylprednisolone and a control group.
The diaphragm force-frequency curve was shifted downward in the mechanical ventilation group, but this deleterious effect was prevented when corticosteroids were administered. Diaphragm cross-sectional area of type I fibers was similarly decreased in both mechanical ventilation groups while atrophy of type IIx/b fibers was attenuated after corticosteroid administration. The mechanical ventilation-induced reduction in diaphragm MyoD and myogenin protein expression was attenuated after corticosteroids. Plasma cytokine levels were unchanged while diaphragm lipid hydroperoxides were similarly increased in both mechanical ventilation groups. Diaphragmatic calpain activity was significantly increased in the mechanical ventilation group, but calpain activation was abated with corticosteroid administration. Inverse correlations were found between calpain activity and diaphragm force.
A single high dose of methylprednisolone combined with controlled mechanical ventilation protected diaphragm function from the deleterious effects of controlled mechanical ventilation. Inhibition of the calpain system is most likely the mechanism by which corticosteroids induce this protective effect.
Accelerated protein degradation via the ubiquitin-proteasome pathway is the principal cause of skeletal muscle wasting associated with common human disease states and pharmacological treatment with glucocorticoids. Although many protein regulatory factors essential for muscle development and regeneration are degraded via the ubiquitin system, little is known about the mechanisms and regulation of this pathway that promote wasting muscle. Here, we demonstrate that, in differentiated myotubes, glucocorticoid, via the glucocorticoid receptor, selectively induces a decrease in protein abundance of MyoD, a master switch for muscle development and regeneration, but not that of its negative regulator Id1. This decrease in MyoD protein results from accelerated degradation after glucocorticoid exposure. Using MyoD and Id1 mutants deficient in either N terminus-dependent or internal lysine-dependent ubiquitination, we further show that these ubiquitination pathways of MyoD degradation are regulated differently from those of Id1 degradation. Specifically, glucocorticoid activates the N-terminal ubiquitination pathway in MyoD degradation in myotubes, without concomitant effects on Id1 degradation. This effect of glucocorticoid on MyoD and Id1 protein degradation is associated with the distinct cellular compartments in which their degradation occurs. Taken together, these results support a key role for the N terminus-dependent ubiquitination pathway in the physiology of muscle protein degradation.
UCP3 (uncoupling protein-3) is a mitochondrial membrane transporter expressed preferentially in skeletal muscle. UCP3 lowers mitochondrial membrane potential and protects muscle cells against an overload of fatty acids, and it probably reduces excessive production of reactive oxygen species. Accordingly, ucp3 gene transcription is highly sensitive to fatty acid-dependent stimulation and also to other unrelated stress signals. In this study, glucocorticoids are identified as major inducers of ucp3 gene transcription in muscle. Glucocorticoids activate the transcription of the ucp3 gene through a glucocorticoid receptor-binding site in the promoter region. Glucocorticoids are capable of inducing ucp3 gene transcription independently from the myogenic regulatory factor MyoD, in contrast with the transcriptional activation of the ucp3 gene through other nuclear hormone receptors. An interplay of regulatory factors modulates positively (p300) or negatively (histone deacetylases) the action of glucocorticoids on ucp3 gene transcription via histone acetylation or deacetylation processes, respectively. Among them, SIRT1 acts as a major repressor of ucp3 gene expression in response to glucocorticoids. The action of SIRT1 requires its deacetylase activity and results in histone deacetylation in the ucp3 promoter. Moreover, it involves a specific impairment of association of p300 with the glucocorticoid receptor. Agents activating SIRT1, such as resveratrol, repress ucp3 gene expression. The control of SIRT1 activity via the metabolic redox status of the cell points to a novel regulatory pathway of ucp3 gene transcription in response to metabolic and stress signaling in muscle cells.
Viral oncoproteins that inactivate the retinoblastoma tumor suppressor protein (pRb) family both block skeletal muscle differentiation and promote cell cycle progression. To clarify the dependence of terminal differentiation on the presence of the different pRb-related proteins, we have studied myogenesis using isogenic primary fibroblasts derived from mouse embryos individually deficient for pRb, p107, or p130. When ectopically expressed in fibroblasts lacking pRb, MyoD induces an aberrant skeletal muscle differentiation program characterized by normal expression of early differentiation markers such as myogenin and p21, but attenuated expression of late differentiation markers such as myosin heavy chain (MHC). Similar defects in MHC expression were not observed in cells lacking either p107 or p130, indicating that the defect is specific to the loss of pRb. In contrast to wild-type, p107-deficient, or p130-deficient differentiated myocytes that are permanently withdrawn from the cell cycle, differentiated myocytes lacking pRb accumulate in S and G2 phases and express extremely high levels of cyclins A and B, cyclin-dependent kinase (Cdk2), and Cdc2, but fail to readily proceed to mitosis. Administration of caffeine, an agent that removes inhibitory phosphorylations on inactive Cdc2/cyclin B complexes, specifically induced mitotic catastrophe in pRb-deficient myocytes, consistent with the observation that the majority of pRb-deficient myocytes arrest in S and G2. Together, these findings indicate that pRb is required for the expression of late skeletal muscle differentiation markers and for the inhibition of DNA synthesis, but that a pRb-independent mechanism restricts entry of differentiated myocytes into mitosis.
PCAF is a histone acetyltransferase that associates with p300/CBP and competes with E1A for access to them. While exogenous expression of PCAF potentiates both MyoD-directed transcription and myogenic differentiation, PCAF inactivation by anti-PCAF antibody microinjection prevents differentiation. MyoD interacts directly with both p300/CBP and PCAF, forming a multimeric protein complex on the promoter elements. Viral transforming factors that interfere with muscle differentiation disrupt this complex without affecting the MyoD-DNA interaction, indicating functional significance of the complex formation. Exogenous expression of PCAF or p300 promotes p21 expression and terminal cell-cycle arrest. Both of these activities are dependent on the histone acetyltransferase activity of PCAF, but not on that of p300. These results indicate that recruitment of histone acetyltransferase activity of PCAF by MyoD, through p300/CBP, is crucial for activation of the myogenic program.
Brown adipocytes and myocytes develop from a common adipomyocyte precursor. PPARalpha is a nuclear receptor important for lipid and glucose metabolism. It has been suggested that in brown adipose tissue, PPARalpha represses the expression of muscle-associated genes, in this way potentially acting to determine cell fate in brown adipocytes. To further understand the possible role of PPARalpha in these processes, we measured expression of muscle-associated genes in brown adipose tissue and brown adipocytes from PPARalpha-ablated mice, including structural genes (Mylpf, Tpm2, Myl3 and MyHC), regulatory genes (myogenin, Myf5 and MyoD) and a myomir (miR-206). However, in our hands, the expression of these genes was not influenced by the presence or absence of PPARalpha, nor by the PPARalpha activator Wy-14,643. Similarly, the expression of genes common for mature brown adipocyte and myocytes (Tbx15, Meox2) were not affected. However, the brown adipocyte-specific regulatory genes Zic1, Lhx8 and Prdm16 were affected by PPARalpha. Thus, it would not seem that PPARalpha represses muscle-associated genes, but PPARalpha may still play a role in the regulation of the bifurcation of the adipomyocyte precursor into a brown adipocyte or myocyte phenotype.
Cachexia is a debilitating syndrome characterized by body weight loss, muscle wasting, and anemia. Muscle wasting results from an altered balance between protein synthesis and degradation rates. Reactive oxygen species are indicated as crucial players in the onset of muscle protein hypercatabolism by upregulating elements of the ubiquitin-proteasome pathway. The present study has been aimed at evaluating comparatively the involvement of oxidative stress in the pathogenesis of skeletal muscle wasting in two different experimental models: rats rendered hyperglycemic by treatment with streptozotocin and rats bearing the Yoshida AH-130 ascites hepatoma. For this purpose, both tumor bearers and diabetic animals have been treated with dehydroepiandrosterone (DHEA), a multifunctional steroid endowed with multitargeted antioxidant properties. We show that diabetic rats and AH-130 rats share several features, hypoinsulinemia, occurrence of oxidative stress, and positive response to DHEA administration, although the extent of the effects of DHEA largely differs between diabetic animals and tumor-bearing rats. The hypercatabolism, evaluated in terms of proteasome activity and expression of atrogin-1 and MuRF1, is activated in AH-130 rats, whereas it is lacking in streptozotocin-treated rats. Moreover, we demonstrate that the role of oxidative stress can interfere with muscle wasting through different mechanisms, not necessarily involving NF-kappaB activation. In conclusion, the present results show that, although skeletal muscle wasting occurs in both diabetic rats and tumor-host rats, the underlying mechanisms are different. Moreover, despite oxidative stress being detectable in both experimental models, its contribution to muscle wasting is not comparable.
SREBP-1 are ubiquitously expressed transcription factors, strongly expressed in lipogenic tissues where they regulate several metabolic processes like fatty acid synthesis. In skeletal muscle, SREBP-1 proteins regulate the expression of hundreds of genes, and we previously showed that their overexpression induced muscle atrophy together with a combined lack of expression of myogenic regulatory factors. Here we present evidences that SREBP-1 regulate muscle protein synthesis through the downregulation of the expression of MYOD1, MYOG and MEF2C factors. In myotubes overexpressing SREBP-1, restoring the expression of myogenic factors prevented atrophy and rescued protein synthesis, without affecting SREBP-1 action on atrogenes and proteolysis. Our results point out the roles of MRFs in the maintenance of the protein content and cell size in adult muscle fibre, and contribute to decipher the mechanisms by which SREBP-1 regulate muscle mass.
Interleukin-11 (IL-11) is a pleiotropic cytokine that supports various types of hematopoietic cell growth and is involved in bone resorption. We report here the involvement of recombinant human IL-11 (rHuIL-11) in osteoblast differentiation in mouse mesenchymal progenitor cells, C3H10T1/2. rHuIL-11 alone increased alkaline phosphatase (ALP) activity and upregulated expression levels of osteocalcin (OC), bone sialo protein (BSP), and parathyroid hormone receptor (PTHR) mRNA. rHuIL-11 had no effect on expression of type II collagen, peroxisome proliferator-activated receptor-gamma2 (PPAR-gamma2), adipocyte fatty acid-binding protein P2 (aP2), and myogenic MyoD protein (MyoD). Recombinant human bone morphogenetic protein (rHuBMP)-2 increased ALP activity and mRNA expression of these genes except for MyoD. The expression patterns of ALP activity and osteoblast-specific or chondrocyte-specific genes suggest that rHuIL-11 may be involved in early differentiation of osteoblasts at a step earlier than that which is affected by rHuBMP-2. In support of this hypothesis, combined treatment with rHuIL-11 and rHuBMP-2 synergistically increased ALP activity and mRNA expression of OC and type II collagen, rHuIL-11 also abrogated the increased levels of PPAR-gamma2, aP2 mRNA caused by rHuBMP-2. Our results suggest that rHuIL-11 alone and in combination with rHuBMP-2 can induce osteoblastic differentiation of progenitor cells and plays an important role in osteogenesis.
Coumaric acid (CA) is a phenolic acid of the hydroxycinnamic acid family, and it has many biological functions such as anti-oxidant, anti-inflammatory, antidiabetic, anti-ulcer, anti-platelet, anti-cancer activities, etc. In the present study, we planned to analyse the potential molecular function of CA on skeletal muscle and preadipocytes differentiation using PCR and Western blot techniques. First, we analysed the impact of CA on C2C12 skeletal muscle differentiation. It revealed that CA treatment inhibited horse serum-induced skeletal muscle differentiation as evidenced by the decreased expression of early myogenic differentiation markers such as Myogenin and myoD via the AMP activated protein kinase- alpha AMPK-α mediated pathway. Furthermore, the level of lipid accumulation and changes in genes and protein expressions that are associated with lipogenesis and lipolysis were analyzed in 3T3-L1 cells. The Oil Red O staining evidenced that CA treatment inhibited lipid accumulation at the concentration of 0.1 and 0.2 mM. Furthermore, coumaric acid treatment decreased the expression of main transcriptional factors such as CCAAT/enhancer binding protein-alpha (C/EBP-α) and peroxisome proliferator-activated receptor gamma-2 (PPAR-γ2). Subsequently, CA treatment decreased the expression of sterol regulatory element binding protein-1 (SREBP-1), fatty acid synthase (FAS), acetyl CoA carboxylase (ACC) and adiponectin. Finally, we identified conformational changes induced by CA in PPAR-γ2 using computational biology tools. It revealed that CA might downregulate the PPAR-γ2 expression by directly binding with amino acids of PPAR-γ2 by hydrogen at 3.26 distance and hydrophobic interactions at 3.90 contact distances. These data indicated that CA suppressed skeletal muscle and preadipocytes differentiation through downregulation of the main transcriptional factors and their downstream targets.
Tissue engineering (TE) strategies aim at imitating the natural process of regeneration by using bioresorbable scaffolds that support cellular attachment, migration, proliferation, and differentiation. Based on the idea of combining a fully degradable polymer [poly(ɛ-caprolactone)] with a thermoresponsive polymer (polyethylene glycol methacrylate), a scaffold was developed, which liquefies below 20°C and solidifies at 37°C. In this study, this scaffold was evaluated for its ability to support C2C12 cells and human adipose-derived stem cells (ASCs) to generate an expandable three-dimensional (3D) construct for soft or bone TE. As a first step, biomaterial seeding was optimized and cellular attachment, survival, distribution, and persistence within the 3D material were characterized. C2C12 cells were differentiated toward the osteogenic as well as myogenic lineage, while ASCs were cultured in control, adipogenic, or osteogenic differentiation media. Differentiation was examined using quantitative real-time PCR for the expression of osteogenic, myogenic, and adipogenic markers and by enzyme activity and immunoassays. Both cell types attached and were found evenly distributed within the material. C2C12 cells and ASCs demonstrated the potential to differentiate in all tested lineages under 2D conditions. Under 3D osteogenic conditions for C2C12 cells, only osteocalcin expression (fold induction: 16.3±0.2) and alkaline phosphatase (ALP) activity (p<0.001) were increased compared with the control C2C12 cells. Three-dimensional osteogenic differentiation of ASC was limited and donor dependent. Only one donor showed an increase in the osteogenic markers osteocalcin (p=0.027) and osteopontin (p=0.038). In contrast, differentiation toward the myogenic or adipogenic lineage showed expression of specific markers in 3D, at least at the level of the 2D culture. In 3D culture, strong induction of myogenin (p<0.001) as well as myoD (p<0.001) was found in C2C12 cells. The adipogenic differentiation of one donor showed greater expression of peroxisome proliferative-activated receptor gamma (PPARγ) (p=0.004), fatty acid binding protein 4 (FABP4) (p=0.008), and adiponectin (p=0.045) in 3D compared with 2D culture. Leptin levels in the supernatant of the ASC cultures were elevated in the 3D cultures in both donors at day 14 and 21. In conclusion, the thermoresponsive scaffold was found suitable for 3D in vitro differentiation toward soft tissue.
The present experiment was carried out to evaluate the effect of coculturing on myogenic and adipogenic marker gene expressions with the use of C2C12 and 3 T3-L1 preadipocyte cells under the coculture system. C2C12 and 3 T3-L1 cells were cocultured using transwell inserts with a 0.4-μm porous membrane to separate C2C12 and 3 T3-L1 cells. Each cell type was grown independently on the transwell plates. Following cell differentiation, inserts containing 3 T3-L1 cells were transferred to C2C12 plates, and inserts containing C2C12 cells were transferred to 3 T3-L1 plates. After coculture of the C2C12 and 3 T3-L1 cells for 48 and 72 h, the cells in the lower well were harvested for analysis, and this process was carried out for both cells. Myogenic markers such as myogenin, MyoD, Myf5, PAX3, and PAX7 mRNA expressions were analyzed in the cocultured C2C12 cells. Adipogenic markers such as fatty acid-binding protein 4 (FABP4), peroxisome proliferator-activating receptor (PPARγ), CCAAT/enhancer-binding protein (CEBPA), adiponectin, lipoprotein lipase, and fatty acid synthase mRNA expressions were analyzed in the cocultured 3 T3-L1 cells. Myogenic and adipogenic marker gene mRNA expressions were significantly altered in the cocultured C2C12 and 3 T3-L1 cells when compared with the monocultured C2C12 and 3 T3-L1 cells.
Ucp3 is an integral protein of the inner mitochondrial membrane with a role in lipid metabolism preventing deleterious effects of fatty acids in states of high lipid oxidation. Ucp3 is expressed in brown adipose tissue and skeletal muscle and controlled by a transcription factor complex including PPARalpha, MyoD and the histone acetyltransferase p300. Several studies have demonstrated interaction of these factors with chicken ovalbumin upstream promoter transcription factor II (Coup-TFII). This nuclear receptor is involved in organogenesis and other developmental processes including skeletal muscle development, but also co-regulates a number of metabolic genes. In this study we in silico analyzed the upstream region of Ucp3 of the Djungarian hamster Phodopus sungorus and identified several putative response elements for Coup-TFII. We therefore investigated whether Coup-TFII is a further player in the transcriptional control of the Ucp3 gene in rodents.
By quantitative PCR we demonstrated a positive correlation of Coup-TFII and Ucp3 mRNA expression in skeletal muscle and brown adipose tissue in response to food deprivation and cold exposure, respectively. In reporter gene assays Coup-TFII enhanced transactivation of the Ucp3 promoter conveyed by MyoD, PPARalpha, RXRalpha and/or p300. Using deletions and mutated constructs, we identified a Coup-TFII enhancer element 816-840 bp upstream of the transcriptional start site. Binding of Coup-TFII to this upstream enhancer was confirmed in electrophoretic mobility shift and supershift assays.
Transcriptional regulation of the Coup-TFII gene in response to starvation and cold exposure seems to be the regulatory mechanism of Ucp3 mRNA expression in brown adipose and skeletal muscle tissue determining the final appropriate rate of transcript synthesis. These findings add a crucial component to the complex transcriptional machinery controlling expression of Ucp3. Given the substantial evidence for a function of Ucp3 in lipid metabolism, Coup-TFII may not only be a negative regulator of glucose responsive genes but also transactivate genes involved in lipid metabolism.
Coping with reduced energy sources entails drastic morphological and functional changes in skeletal muscle, but the sequence of events required classification. We found that gastrocnemius muscle from food-deprived rats shows acute rises in peroxisome proliferator activated receptor (PPAR) gamma coactivator (PGC) -1alpha/PPAR delta nuclear protein and myosin heavy chain (MHC) Ib protein, while type I fibers accumulate and the muscle tissue appears redder. AMP levels, phosphorylation of both AMP-activated protein kinase (AMPK) and its downstream target acetyl coenzyme A carboxylase (ACC) are induced within 6 h. Rapidly increased MyoD mRNA levels are followed by an increase in uncoupling protein (UCP) 3 (UCP3) transcription. Increased serum fatty acid levels coincide with increases in mitochondrial UCP3 protein levels and fatty acid oxidation. Accompanying this is a decrease in AMPK phosphorylation, reversible upon nicotinic acid treatment, indicating that fatty acids may modulate this kinase's activity after the metabolic challenges posed by food deprivation.
The transcription factors myogenin and MyoD have been suggested to be involved in maintaining slow and fast muscle-fiber phenotypes, respectively, in rodents. Whether this is also the case in human muscle is unknown. To test this, 4 wk of chronic, low-frequency electrical stimulation training of the tibialis anterior muscle of paraplegic subjects were used to evoke a fast-to-slow transformation in muscle phenotype. It was hypothesized that this would result from an upregulation of myogenin and a downregulation of MyoD. The training evoked the expected mRNA increase for slow fiber-specific markers myosin heavy chain I and 3-hydroxyacyl-CoA dehydrogenase A, whereas an mRNA decrease was seen for fast fiber-specific markers myosin heavy chain IIx and glycerol phosphate dehydrogenase. Although the slow fiber-specific markers citrate synthase and muscle fatty acid binding protein did not display a significant increase in mRNA, they did tend to increase. As hypothesized, myogenin mRNA was upregulated. However, contrary to the hypothesis, MyoD mRNA also increased, although later than myogenin. The mRNA levels of the other myogenic regulatory factor family members, myogenic factor 5 and myogenic regulatory factor 4, and the myocyte enhancer factor (MEF) family members, MEF-2A and MEF-2C, did not change. The results indicate that myogenin is indeed involved in the regulation of the slow oxidative phenotype in human skeletal muscle fibers, whereas MyoD appears to have a more complex regulatory function.
The transcription of the human UCP3 (uncoupling protein-3) gene in skeletal muscle is tightly regulated by metabolic signals related to fatty acid availability. However, changes in thyroid status also modulate UCP3 gene expression, albeit by unknown mechanisms. We created transgenic mice bearing the entire human UCP3 gene to investigate the effect of thyroid hormones on human UCP3 gene expression. Treatment of human UCP3 transgenic mice with thyroid hormones induced the expression of the human gene in skeletal muscle. In addition, transient transfection experiments demonstrate that thyroid hormones activate the transcription of the human UCP3 gene promoter when MyoD and the TR (thyroid hormone receptor) were co-transfected. The action of thyroid hormones on UCP3 gene transcription is mediated by the binding of the TR to a proximal region in the UCP3 gene promoter that contains a direct repeat structure. An intact DNA sequence of this site is required for thyroid hormone responsiveness and TR binding. Chromatin immunoprecipitation assays revealed that the TR binds this element in vivo. The murine Ucp3 gene promoter was also dependent on MyoD and responsive to thyroid hormone in transient transfection assays. However, it was much less sensitive to thyroid hormone than the human UCP3 promoter. In summary, UCP3 gene transcription is activated by thyroid hormone treatment in vivo, and this activation is mediated by a TRE (thyroid hormone response element) in the proximal promoter region. Such regulation suggests a link between UCP3 gene expression and the effects of thyroid hormone on mitochondrial function in skeletal muscle.
This study determined whether estradiol (E2) or the phytoestrogens genistein and daidzein regulate expression of growth-related and lipogenic genes in rainbow trout. Juvenile fish (5 mon, 65.8±1.8 g) received intraperitoneal injections of E2, genistein, or daidzein (5 μg/g body weight) or a higher dose of genistein (50 μg/g body weight). Liver and white muscle were harvested 24h post-injection. In liver, expression of vitellogenin (vtg) and estrogen receptor alpha (era1) increased in all treatments and reflected treatment estrogenicity (E2>genistein (50 μg/g)>genistein (5 μg/g)=daidzein (5 μg/g)). Estradiol and genistein (50 μg/g) reduced components of the growth hormone (GH)/insulin-like growth factor (IGF) axis in liver, including increased expression of IGF binding protein-2b1 (igfbp2b1) and reduced igfbp5b1. In liver E2 and genistein (50 μg/g) affected expression of components of the transforming growth factor beta signaling mechanism, reduced expression of ppar and rxr transcription factors, and increased expression of fatty acid synthesis genes srebp1, acly, fas, scd1, and gpat and lipid binding proteins fabp3 and lpl. In muscle E2 and genistein (50 μg/g) increased era1 and erb1 expression and decreased erb2 expression. Other genes responded to phytoestrogens in a manner that suggested regulation by estrogen receptor-independent mechanisms, including increased ghr2, igfbp2a, igfbp4, and igfbp5b1. Expression of muscle regulatory factors pax7 and myod was increased by E2 and genistein. These data indicate that genistein and daidzein affect expression of genes in rainbow trout that regulate physiological mechanisms central to growth and nutrient retention.
p204, an interferon-inducible p200 family protein, inhibits rRNA synthesis in fibroblasts by blocking the binding of the upstream binding factor transcription factor to DNA. Here we report that among 10 adult mouse tissues tested, the level of p204 was highest in heart and skeletal muscles. In cultured C2C12 skeletal muscle myoblasts, p204 was nucleoplasmic and its level was low. During myoblast fusion this level strongly increased, p204 became phosphorylated, and the bulk of p204 appeared in the cytoplasm of the myotubes. Leptomycin B, an inhibitor of nuclear export that blocked myoblast fusion, inhibited the nuclear export signal-dependent translocation of p204 to the cytoplasm. The increase in the p204 level during myoblast fusion was a consequence of MyoD transcription factor binding to several MyoD-specific sequences in the gene encoding p204, followed by transcription. Overexpression of p204 (in C2C12 myoblasts carrying an inducible p204 expression plasmid) accelerated the fusion of myoblasts to myotubes in differentiation medium and induced the fusion even in growth medium. The level of p204 in mouse heart muscle strongly increased during differentiation; it was barely detectable in 10. 5-day-old embryos, reached the peak level in 16.5-day-old embryos, and remained high thereafter. p204 is the second p200 family protein (after p202a) found to be involved in muscle differentiation. (p202a was formerly designated p202. The new designation is due to the identification of a highly similar protein-p202b [H. Wang, G. Chatterjee, J. J. Meyer, C. J. Liu, N. A. Manjunath, P. Bray-Ward, and P. Lengyel, Genomics 60:281-294, 1999].) These results reveal that p204 and p202a function in both muscle differentiation and interferon action.
In Duchenne muscle dystrophy (DMD) and in the mdx mouse model of DMD, a lack of dystrophin leads to myonecrosis and cardiorespiratory failure. Several lines of evidence suggest a detrimental role of the inflammatory process in the dystrophic process. Previously, we demonstrated that short-term therapy with eicosapentaenoic acid (EPA), at early stages of disease, ameliorated dystrophy progression in the mdx mouse. In the present study, we evaluated the effects of a long-term therapy with omega-3 later in dystrophy progression. Three-month-old mdx mice received omega-3 (300 mg/kg) or vehicle by gavage for 5 months. The quadriceps and diaphragm muscles were removed and processed for histopathology and Western blot. Long-term therapy with omega-3 increased the regulatory protein MyoD and muscle regeneration and reduced markers of inflammation (TNF-α and NF-kB) in both muscles studied. The present study supports the long-term use of omega-3 at later stages of dystrophy as a promising option to be investigated in DMD clinical trials.
Soldiers lose muscle and bone density during sustained operations. We investigated the impact of β-hydroxy-β-methylbutyrate (HMB) on bone properties, muscle mass, and markers of skeletal muscle regeneration under simulated military sustained operations.
Male mice were divided into four groups (10/group): (1) ALT = ad libitum + trained (1h/d for 3 d/wk); (2) ALTH = ALT + HMB (0.5 g/kg BW/d); (3) C = caloric restricted (-30%) + trained (6h/d, 6d/wk); and (4) CH = C + HMB. Assessments included bone mineral density/content by dual-energy X-ray absorptiometry, muscle wet weight (quadriceps) and expression of selected genes regulating muscle mass and protein turnover. Analysis of variances were used with significance set at p < 0.05.
Bone mineral content increased in the ALT group (+16%) and decreased in the C group (-32%). Quadriceps muscle mass was lower in C (-27%) and CH (-19%) compared to ALT and ALTH. Myogenin mRNA expression was higher in C than ALT, ALTH and CH. Protein kinase B (Akt) mRNA expression was higher in both C and CH than ALT and ALTH. Mammalian target of rapamycin expression was higher in CH than ALT and ALTH. Muscle RING-finger protein-1 expression was higher in both C and CH than ALT and ALTH.
HMB intake improved bone properties and attenuated the depression of protein synthesis during a simulated sustained military operation.
Loss of myonuclei by apoptosis is thought to contribute to sarcopenia. We have previously shown, that the leucine metabolite, β-hydroxy-β-methylbutyrate (HMB) suppresses apoptotic signaling and the apoptotic index (the ratio of apoptotic positive to apoptotic negative myonuclei) during muscle disuse and during reloading periods after disuse in aged rats. However, it was not clear if the apoptotic signaling indexes were due only to preservation of myonuclei or if perhaps the total myogenic pool increased as a result of HMB-mediated satellite cell proliferation as this would have also reduced the apoptotic index. In this study, we tested the hypothesis that HMB would augment myogenic cells (satellite cells) proliferation during muscle recovery (growth) after a period of disuse in senescent animals. The hindlimb muscles of 34 month old Fisher 344 × Brown Norway rats were unloaded for 14 days by hindlimb suspension (HLS), and then reloaded for 14 days. The rats received either Ca-HMB (340 mg/kg body weight; n = 16), or the vehicle (n = 10) by gavage throughout the experimental period. HMB prevented the functional decline in maximal plantar flexion isometric force production during the reloading period, but not during HLS. HMB-treatment enhanced the proliferation of muscle stem cells as shown by a greater percentage of satellite cells that had proliferated (more BrdU positive, Pax-7 positive, and more Pax7/Ki67 positive nuclei) and as a result, more differentiated stem cells were present (more MyoD/myogenin positive myonuclei), relative to total myonuclei, in reloaded plantaris muscles as compared to reloaded muscles from vehicle-treated animals. Furthermore HMB increased the nuclear protein abundance of proliferation markers, inhibitor of differentiation-2 and cyclin A, as compared to vehicle treatment in reloaded muscles. Although HMB increased phosphorylated Akt during reloading, other mTOR related proteins were not altered by HMB treatment. These data show that HMB improved the proliferation of muscle stem cells in fast twitch plantaris muscles. Enhanced satellite cell proliferation leading to increased differentiated myonuclei should increase the transcriptional potential to support muscle hypertrophic changes and functional changes in sarcopenic muscles, and this could partly explain the reduced apoptotic index in HMB treated muscles. Indeed, muscle mass and fiber cross-sectional area were significantly greater in plantaris muscles from HMB-treated animal muscles after reloading as compared to vehicle-treated animals.
Chronic inflammation induces skeletal muscle wasting and cachexia. In arthritic rats, fenofibrate, a peroxisome proliferator-activated receptor α (PPARα (PPARA)) agonist, reduces wasting of gastrocnemius, a predominantly glycolytic muscle, by decreasing atrogenes and myostatin. Considering that fenofibrate increases fatty acid oxidation, the aim of this study was to elucidate whether fenofibrate is able to prevent the effect of arthritis on serum adipokines and on soleus, a type I muscle in which oxidative metabolism is the dominant source of energy. Arthritis was induced by injection of Freund's adjuvant. Four days after the injection, control and arthritic rats were gavaged daily with fenofibrate (300 mg/kg bw) or vehicle over 12 days. Arthritis decreased serum leptin, adiponectin, and insulin (P<0.01) but not resistin levels. In arthritic rats, fenofibrate administration increased serum concentrations of leptin and adiponectin. Arthritis decreased soleus weight, cross-sectional area, fiber size, and its Ppar α mRNA expression. In arthritic rats, fenofibrate increased soleus weight, fiber size, and Ppar α expression and prevented the increase in Murf1 mRNA. Fenofibrate decreased myostatin, whereas it increased MyoD (Myod1) and myogenin expressions in the soleus of control and arthritic rats. These data suggest that in oxidative muscle, fenofibrate treatment is able to prevent arthritis-induced muscle wasting by decreasing Murf1 and myostatin expression and also by increasing the myogenic regulatory factors, MyoD and myogenin. Taking into account the beneficial action of adiponectin on muscle wasting and the correlation between adiponectin and soleus mass, part of the anticachectic action of fenofibrate may be mediated through stimulation of adiponectin secretion.
Suboptimal fetal environments due to inadequate maternal nutrition, obesity, inflammation or gestational diabetes expose the fetus to humoral cues that alter metabolism and growth parameters leading to metabolic disturbances later in life. The fetal stage is crucial for the development of skeletal muscle, a tissue playing an important role in metabolism. Maternal obesity induces inflammation in the fetus causing modifications in the development of fetal skeletal muscle. Changes in the normal course of myogenesis may arise through several mechanisms: changes in WNT/β-catenin signaling pathway, decreased AMPK activity evoked by TNF-α, increased activity of NF-κB in response to inflammation, which leads to a decrease in myogenic factor MyoD, and increased expression of TGF β1. Modification in fetal development associated with maternal obesity is attributed to epigenetic changes. Polyunsaturated fatty acids supplied in the diet did affect the development of insulin-sensitive tissues during both the fetal and postnatal period. The specific phenotype of skeletal muscle fibers may play a role in the development of obesity, i.e. fiber phenotype I (slow, oxidative) may protect against obesity and insulin resistance. Exploring the mechanisms of direct impact of maternal obesity on the development of tissues in the offspring may help to reduce the occurrence of metabolic diseases in later life.
The developmental potential of skeletal muscle stem cells (satellite cells) remains controversial. The authors investigated satellite cell developmental potential in single fiber and clonal cultures derived from MyoD(iCre/+);R26R(EYFP/+) muscle, in which essentially all satellite cells are permanently labeled. Approximately 60% of the clones derived from cells that co-purified with muscle fibers spontaneously underwent adipogenic differentiation. These adipocytes stained with Oil-Red-O and expressed the terminal differentiation markers, adipsin and fatty acid binding protein 4, but did not express EYFP and were therefore not of satellite cell origin. Satellite cells mutant for either MyoD or Myf-5 also maintained myogenic programming in culture and did not adopt an adipogenic fate. Incorporation of additional wash steps prior to muscle fiber plating virtually eliminated the non-myogenic cells but did not reduce the number of adherent Pax7+ satellite cells. More than half of the adipocytes observed in cultures from Tie2-Cre mice were recombined, further demonstrating a non-satellite cell origin. Under adipogenesis-inducing conditions, satellite cells accumulated cytoplasmic lipid but maintained myogenic protein expression and did not fully execute the adipogenic differentiation program, distinguishing them from adipocytes observed in muscle fiber cultures. The authors conclude that skeletal muscle satellite cells are committed to myogenesis and do not spontaneously adopt an adipogenic fate.
Induced pluripotent stem (iPS) cells are reprogrammed from somatic cells through ectopic expression of stem cell-specific transcription factors, including Oct4, Nanog, Sox2, Lin28, Klf4, and c-Myc. Although iPS cells are similar to embryonic stem (ES) cells in their pluripotency, their inherited defects, such as insertion mutagenesis, employment of oncogenes, and low efficiency, associated with the reprogramming procedure have hindered their clinical application. A study has shown that valproic acid (VPA) treatment can significantly enhance the reprogramming efficiency and avoid the usage of oncogenes. To understand how VPA can enhance pluripotency, we stably transfected an Oct4 promoter driven luciferase reporter (Oct4-1.9k-Luc) into P19 embryonic carcinoma (EC) cells and C2C12 myoblasts and examined their response to VPA. We found that VPA could both activate Oct4 promoter and rescue its inhibition by retinoic acid (RA). In C2C12 myoblasts, VPA treatment also enhanced endogenous Oct4 expression but repressed that of MyoD. Furthermore, both RARalpha over-expression and mutation of a proximal hormone response element (HRE) blocked the activation effect of VPA on Oct4 promoter, implying that VPA may exert its activation effect through factors targeting this HRE. Taken together, these observations identify a molecular mechanism by which VPA directly regulate Oct4 expression to ensure the acquirement and maintenance of pluripotency.
Muscle repair following injury is preceded by a rapid inflammatory response with myoblasts being exposed to high levels of prostaglandin D(2) (PGD(2)) from invading leukocytes. We demonstrate that PGD(2) strongly inhibits C2C12 myogenesis as measured by cell fusion, creatine kinase activity and MyoD, myogenin and alpha-actin expression. Inhibition of myogenesis required micromolar PGD(2) concentrations and was independent of the known PGD(2) receptors DP1 and DP2. Unlike its cyclopentenone derivative 15-deoxy-Delta(12,14)-PGJ(2) (15d-PGJ(2)), PGD(2) did not generate toxic mitochondrial superoxide indicating that the inhibition of myogenesis is not mediated by generation of high concentrations of PGD(2)-derived 15d-PGJ(2). Thus our observations provide evidence for a novel PGD(2) signalling mechanism during muscle repair exclusively mediated by high inflammatory associated PGD(2) concentrations. These findings indicate a complex interplay between myoblasts and inflammatory cells during the repair process and have implications for the use of non-steroidal anti-inflammatory drugs in the treatment of muscle injuries.
The antiproliferative and anti-inflammatory properties of conjugated linoleic acid (CLA) make it a potentially novel treatment in chronic inflammatory muscle wasting disease, particularly cancer cachexia. Human primary muscle cells were grown in coculture with MIA PaCa-2 pancreatic tumor cells and exposed to varying concentrations of c9,t11 and t10,c12 CLA. Expression of myogenic (Myf5, MyoD, myogenin, and myostatin) and inflammatory genes (CCL-2, COX-2, IL-8, and TNF-alpha) were measured by real-time PCR. The t10,c12 CLA isomer, but not the c9,t11 isomer, significantly decreased MIA PaCa-2 proliferation by between 15% and 19%. There was a marked decrease in muscle MyoD and myogenin expression (78% and 62%, respectively), but no change in either Myf5 or myostatin, in myotubes grown in coculture with MIA PaCa-2 cells. CLA had limited influence on these responses. A similar pattern of myogenic gene expression changes was observed in myotubes treated with TNF-alpha alone. Several-fold significant increases in CCL-2, COX-2, IL-8, and TNF-alpha expression in myotubes were observed with MIA PaCa-2 coculture. The c9,t11 CLA isomer significantly decreased basal expression of TNF-alpha in myotubes and could ameliorate its tumor-induced rise. The study provides insight into the anti-inflammatory and antiproliferative actions of CLA and its application as a therapeutic agent in inflammatory disease states.
Eicosapentaenoic acid (EPA) is an omega-3 polyunsaturated fatty acid that has anti-inflammatory and anticachectic actions. The aim of this work was to elucidate whether EPA administration is able to prevent an arthritis-induced decrease in body weight and muscle wasting in rats. Arthritis was induced by intradermal injection of Freund's adjuvant; 3 days later, nine rats received 1 g/kg EPA or coconut oil daily. All rats were killed 15 days after adjuvant injection. EPA administration decreased the external signs of arthritis and paw volume as well as liver TNF-alpha mRNA. EPA did not modify arthritis-induced decrease in food intake or body weight gain. However, EPA treatment prevented arthritis-induced increase in muscle TNF-alpha and atrogin-1, whereas it attenuated the decrease in gastrocnemius weight and the increase in MuRF1 mRNA. Arthritis not only decreased myogenic regulatory factors but also increased PCNA, MyoD, and myogenin mRNA in the gastrocnemius. Western blot analysis showed that changes in protein content followed the pattern seen with mRNA. In the control rats, EPA administration increased PCNA and MyoD mRNA and protein. In arthritic rats, EPA did not modify the stimulatory effect of arthritis on these myogenic regulatory factors. The results suggest that in experimental arthritis, in addition to its anti-inflammatory effect, EPA treatment attenuates muscle wasting by decreasing atrogin-1 and MuRF1 gene expression and increasing the transcription factors that regulate myogenesis.
MyoD is a myogenic regulatory factor with a critical role in skeletal muscle development and regeneration. As muscle regeneration comes with an inflammatory process, it has been proposed that the inflammatory cells can play an important role in the induction of muscle fibres regeneration. The aim of the present work was to verify if a cyclooxygenase inhibitory drug (ketoprofen) would alter the normal expression of MyoD in a regenerating rat soleus muscle after an over-load lesion. Using immunohistochemical techniques, the numbers of m-cadherin-positive cells, a selective marker of satellite cells, and MyoD-positive cells were evaluated in functionally overloaded rat soleus muscles 4 days after a gastrocnemius tendon cut. The same study was conducted either with four rats injected with ketoprofen (100 mg/kg b.w./day) or with four rats injected with saline solution. The data obtained showed a very large decrease in the number of MyoD positive/m-cadherin positive cells in the ketoprofen injected group compared to the control group. Although further studies are needed to elucidate the sequence of biochemical events that induce a reduction of MyoD expression due to ketoprofen, the results demonstrate that prostaglandin synthesis is required for the induction of MyoD expression and that ketoprofen can affect this expression, with possible adverse effects on muscle regeneration.
Skeletal muscle regeneration is a highly orchestrated process initiated by activation of adult muscle satellite cells. Upon muscle injury, the inflammatory process is always accompanied by muscle regeneration. Leukotriene B(4) is one of the essential inflammatory mediators. We isolated and cultured primary satellite cells. RT-PCR showed that myoblasts expressed mRNA for LTB(4) receptors BLT1 and BLT2, and LTB4 promoted myoblast proliferation and fusion. Quantitative real-time PCR and immunoblotting showed that LTB(4) treatment expedited the expression process of differentiation markers MyoD and M-cadherin. U-75302, a specific BLT1 inhibitor, but not LY2552833, a specific BLT2 inhibitor, blocked proliferation and differentiation of myoblasts induced by LTB(4), which implies the involvement of the BLT1 pathway. Overall, the data suggest that LTB(4) contributes to muscle regeneration by accelerating proliferation and differentiation of satellite cells.
Primary alveolar type of rhabdomyosarcoma (RMS) tumor tissue was collected from the tongue of a 17-year-old Japanese woman and used to successfully establish a rhabdomyosarcoma cell line, which has been designated NUTOS. The chromosomal distribution revealed that the NUTOS cell line was hyper-tetraploid with chromosomal translocation. The cells were grown in Dulbecco's modified eagle medium/F12 supplemented with 15% fetal bovine serum, 0.1% non-essential amino acids solution (NEAA), 50 microg of streptomycin, 50 U/mL of penicillin and 0.25 microg /mL of Fungizone. The NUTOS shapes included small spindles, large spindles and long, thick multinucleated cells. All three cell types were immunostained with anti-desmin antibody, which is a marker protein for middle sized myofilaments. Furthermore, immunocytochemical staining revealed that the cells were positively immunostained with anti-MyoD, myogenin, alpha-sarcomeric actin, myosin and troponin T. Mitotic figures were only observed in the small spindle cells. These cells were coadunated with each other at the lateral portion of the apex of the cells. Subsequently, these cells grew into large multinucleated cells. Autonomic contractions (approximately 20 times/min) were observed in both the large spindle cells and the large multinucleated cells. NUTOS cells incorporated serotonin from the serum in the growth medium. Histopathological observations of the NUTOS cell grafts in the subcutis of nude mice exhibited characteristics similar to those seen for the primary rhabdomyosarcoma of the tongue. Susceptibility tests for the anti-cancer drugs revealed that NUTOS cells were susceptive to cisplatin, paclitaxel, and docetaxel, but not to adriacin.
The antiretroviral protease inhibitors indinavir (IDV) and ritonavir (RTV) are used in highly active antiretroviral therapies (HAART). Side effects from long-term HAART therapy include loss of muscle mass. Myoblasts when cultured in media low in growth factors withdraw from the cell cycle, express muscle-specific differentiation inducers and proteins, and fuse to form myotubes. The neutral protease, calpain, is required for myotube formation and RTV decreased calpain activity in vitro. We found lower calpain activity, but not protein, in homogenates of RTV-treated L6 cells than in control cultures. Importantly, L6 and C2C12 myoblasts did not form myotubes when cultured with 10 or 20 microM IDV or RTV. Control and drug-related L6 myoblasts showed identical decreases in proliferating cell nuclear antigens expression indicating proliferation arrest. Similarly, muscle differentiation inducers MyoD and myogenin and their downstream target, myosin heavy chain, were expressed at similar levels in control and drug-treated cells. Thus, whereas muscle differentiation was unaffected by protease inhibitors, calpain activity was reduced and myotube formation prevented. We conclude that RTV and IDV reduced myotube formation by reducing calpain activity. Our data suggest that protease inhibitors included in HAART might be directly involved in muscle wasting by reducing muscle remodeling.
MyoD and Myf5 belong to the family of basic helix-loop-helix transcription factors that are key operators in skeletal muscle differentiation. MyoD and Myf5 genes are selectively activated during development in a time and region-specific manner and in response to different stimuli. However, molecules that specifically regulate the expression of these two genes and the pathways involved remain to be determined. We have recently shown that the serum response factor (SRF), a transcription factor involved in activation of both mitogenic response and muscle differentiation, is required for MyoD gene expression. We have investigated here whether SRF is also involved in the control of Myf5 gene expression, and the potential role of upstream regulators of SRF activity, the Rho family G-proteins including Rho, Rac, and CDC42, in the regulation of MyoD and Myf5. We show that inactivation of SRF does not alter Myf5 gene expression, whereas it causes a rapid extinction of MyoD gene expression. Furthermore, we show that RhoA, but not Rac or CDC42, is also required for the expression of MyoD. Indeed, blocking the activity of G-proteins using the general inhibitor lovastatin, or more specific antagonists of Rho proteins such as C3-transferase or dominant negative RhoA protein, resulted in a dramatic decrease of MyoD protein levels and promoter activity without any effects on Myf5 expression. We further show that RhoA-dependent transcriptional activation required functional SRF in C2 muscle cells. These data illustrate that MyoD and Myf5 are regulated by different upstream activation pathways in which MyoD expression is specifically modulated by a RhoA/SRF signaling cascade. In addition, our results establish the first link between RhoA protein activity and the expression of a key muscle regulator.
Our current understanding of muscle and adipose tissue development has been largely restricted to the study of murine myogenic and adipogenic cell lines, since attempts to establish these cell lines from other species have met with only limited success. Here we report that a spontaneously immortalized bovine embryonic fibroblast cell line (BEFS) undergoes differentiation into adipogenic or myogenic lineages when ectopically transduced with PPARgamma2 (an adipogenic lineage determinant) or MyoD (a myogenic lineage determinant) and grown in adipogenic and myogenic differentiation culture media (ADCM and MDCM, respectively). We also found that PPARgamma2-overexpressing BEFS cells (BEFS-PPARgamma2) grown in ADCM with or without the PPARgamma2 ligand, troglitazone, preferentially differentiate into adipogenic cells in the presence of ectopic MyoD expression. Ectopic expression of PPARgamma2 in the inducible MyoD-overepxressing BEFS cells (BEFS-TetOn-MyoD) completely suppresses myogenic differentiation and leads to a significant increase in adipogenic differentiation, suggesting that the adipogenic differentiation program might be dominant. Therefore, BEFS, BEFS-PPARgamma2, and BEFS-TetOn-MyoD would be a valuable biological model for understanding a fundamental principle underlying myogenic and adipogenic development, and for isolating various genetic and chemical factors that enable muscle and adipocyte differentiation.
Plasminogen activators urokinase-type plasminogen activator (uPA) and tissue-type plasminogen activator (tPA) are extracellular proteases involved in various tissue remodeling processes. A requirement for uPA activity in skeletal myogenesis was recently demonstrated in vitro. The role of plasminogen activators in skeletal muscle regeneration in vivo in wild-type, uPA-deficient, and tPA-deficient mice is investigated here. Wild-type and tPA-/- mice completely repaired experimentally damaged skeletal muscle. In contrast, uPA-/- mice had a severe regeneration defect, with decreased recruitment of blood-derived monocytes to the site of injury and with persistent myotube degeneration. In addition, uPA-deficient mice accumulated fibrin in the degenerating muscle fibers; however, the defibrinogenation of uPA-deficient mice resulted in a correction of the muscle regeneration defect. A similar severe regeneration deficit with persistent fibrin deposition was also reproducible in plasminogen-deficient mice after injury, suggesting that fibrinolysis by uPA-mediated plasminogen activation plays a fundamental role in skeletal muscle regeneration. In conclusion, the uPA-plasmin system is identified as a critical component of the mammalian skeletal muscle regeneration process, possibly because it prevents intramuscular fibrin accumulation and contributes to the adequate inflammatory response after injury. These studies demonstrate the requirement of an extracellular proteolytic cascade during muscle regeneration in vivo.
To identify transcriptional gene-networks involved in the early in vivo response of liver cells to radiation exposure and improve our understanding of the molecular processes responsible for tissue radiosensitivity.
Transcriptome variations of liver RNA samples were measured 3 hours post-irradiation using microarray technology. The results were confirmed and extended using real-time polymerase-chain-reaction (RT-PCR).
We identified quantitative changes in the expression of 126 genes, most of which were observed for the first time. We show that some modifications, such as the upregulation of the cyclin-dependent kinase inhibitor 1A (Cdkn1A) gene, persisted for at least two months after the initial exposure. Other genes regulated by the transformation-related protein 53 (Trp53/p53) such as Bcl2-associated X protein (Bax) or etoposide-induced-2.4 (Ei24/PIG8) were not upregulated. Grouping differentially expressed genes into functional categories revealed that the primary response of liver cells to radiation exposure was the enhancement of oxidoreductase activity and inhibition of cell proliferation, involving cell cycle progression and apoptosis-related genes.
The data provides evidence of gene expression modifications associated with the hepatic response to radiation exposure. One of the main differences observed with radiation-sensitive tissues such as the spleen was cell proliferation. The comparison of our data with transcriptome modifications in different biological models enabled the identification of networks of genes that might be co-regulated. Overall, our expression data revealed genes and cellular pathways that might help to improve our understanding of the molecular basis underlying tissue radiosensitivity and to identify possible targets for novel therapeutic strategies.
The proapoptotic Bcl-2 family member PUMA is a critical regulator of apoptosis. We have previously shown that PUMA plays a pivotal role in the apoptosis associated with skeletal myoblast differentiation and that a MyoD-dependent mechanism is responsible for the increased expression of PUMA in these cells. Herein, we report that the increased expression of PUMA under these conditions involves regulation at the level of translation. Specifically, we have found that the increase in PUMA protein levels occurs under conditions of decreased total protein synthesis, eIF2-alpha phosphorylation and hypophosphorylation of eIF4E-BP, suggesting that PUMA translation is proceeding via an alternative initiation mechanism. Polyribosome analysis of PUMA mRNA further corroborated this suggestion. A combination of in vitro and ex vivo (cellular) approaches has provided evidence suggesting that PUMA mRNA 5'UTR harbors an Internal Ribosome Entry Site (IRES) element. Using mono- and bi-cistronic reporter constructs, we have delineated an mRNA fragment that allows for cap-independent translation in vitro and ex vivo (in skeletal myoblasts) in response to culture in differentiation media (DM), or in response to treatment with the DNA-damaging agent, etoposide. This mRNA fragment also supports translation in HeLa and 293T cells. Thus, our data has revealed a novel IRES-mediated regulation of PUMA expression in several cell types and in response to several stimuli. These findings contribute to our understanding and potential manipulation of any developmental or therapeutic scenario involving PUMA.
Cell-cycle checkpoints help to protect the genomes of proliferating cells under genotoxic stress. In multicellular organisms, cell proliferation is often directed toward differentiation during development and throughout adult homeostasis. To prevent the formation of differentiated cells with genetic instability, we hypothesized that genotoxic stress may trigger a differentiation checkpoint. Here we show that exposure to genotoxic agents causes a reversible inhibition of myogenic differentiation. Muscle-specific gene expression is suppressed by DNA-damaging agents if applied prior to differentiation induction but not after the differentiation program is established. The myogenic determination factor, MyoD (encoded by Myod1), is a target of the differentiation checkpoint in myoblasts. The inhibition of MyoD by DNA damage requires a functional c-Abl tyrosine kinase (encoded by Abl1), but occurs in cells deficient for p53 (transformation-related protein 53, encoded by Trp53) or c-Jun (encoded by the oncogene Jun). These results support the idea that genotoxic stress can regulate differentiation, and identify a new biological function for DNA damage-activated signaling network.
Di-(2-ethylhexyl)phthalate (DEHP) is an endocrine-disrupting chemical (EDC), widely used as a plasticiser. Developmental exposure to EDCs could alter epigenetic programming and result in adult-onset disease. We investigated whether DEHP exposure during development affects glucose homoeostasis in the F1 offspring as a result of impaired insulin signal transduction in gastrocnemius muscle. Pregnant Wistar rats were administered DEHP (0, 1, 10 and 100 mg/kg per day) from embryonic days 9-21 orally. DEHP-exposed offspring exhibited elevated blood glucose, impaired serum insulin, glucose tolerance and insulin tolerance, along with reduced insulin receptor, glucose uptake and oxidation in the muscle at postnatal day 60. The levels of insulin signalling molecules and their phosphorylation were down-regulated in DEHP-exposed offspring. However, phosphorylated IRS1(Ser636/639), which impedes binding of downstream effectors and the negative regulator (PTEN) of PIP3, was increased in DEHP-exposed groups. Down-regulation of glucose transporter 4 (Glut4 (Slc2a4)) gene expression and increased GLUT4(Ser488) phosphorylation, which decreases its intrinsic activity and translocation towards the plasma membrane, were recorded. Chromatin immunoprecipitation assays detected decreased MYOD binding and increased histone deacetylase 2 interaction towards Glut4, indicative of the tight chromatin structure at the Glut4 promoter. Increased DNMTs and global DNA methylation levels were also observed. Furthermore, methylation of Glut4 at the MYOD-binding site was increased in DEHP-exposed groups. These findings indicate that, gestational DEHP exposure predisposes F1 offspring to glucometabolic dysfunction at adulthood by down-regulating the expression of critical genes involved in the insulin signalling pathway. Furthermore, DEHP-induced epigenetic alterations in Glut4 appear to play a significant role in disposition towards this metabolic abnormality.
The purpose of this study was to investigate the effects of di-(2-ethylhexyl) phthalate (DEHP) treatment on MyoD and myogenin expression and myotube formation in the murine C2C12 cells. Myogenic differentiation is principally regulated by activities of myogenic regulatory factors, such as MyoD and myogenin, leading the elongation and fusion of mononucleated myoblasts into multinucleated myotubes. In the present study, myogenic differentiation of C2C12 cells was induced by serum deprivation with medium containing vehicle or DEHP (10, 100, 1,000 μg/ml) for 5 days. Using 3-(4,5-dimethylthiazol-2-yl) 2,5-diphenyltetrazolium bromide (MTT) assay clearly demonstrated cell viability was not affected by DEHP at any given dose. At the dose of 1,000 μg/ml DEHP, the elongation of multinucleated myotubes, and the percent of nuclei incorporated into myosin heavy chain (MyHC)-stained myotubes were markedly reduced. In addition, immunoblotting revealed expression of muscle specific marker MyHC, as well as myogenic regulatory factors MyoD and myogenin, were reduced in DEHP-treated myotubes during myogenic differentiation. Taken together, the results showed that DEHP may impair myogenic differentiation through repression of myogenic regulatory factors, such as MyoD and myogenin, resulting in a reduction of MyHC expression. This in vitro study suggests that DEHP may be an environmental risk factor for myogenesis.
For reconstruction or repair of damaged tissues, an artificially regulated switch from proliferation to differentiation would be of great advantage. To achieve conditional myogenesis, we expressed MyoD in mouse C3H 10T1/2 fibroblastic cells, using a gene regulation system based on the synthetic steroid RU 486. By stable co-transfection of a plasmid construct with the RU 486 dependent activator and an integrating inducible MyoD construct, a cell clone, designated 10T-RM, was obtained in which MyoD expression was stringently controlled by RU 486. 12 h after addition of 10 nM RU 486 to 10T-RM cells, saturation levels of MyoD mRNA were observed and >/=2 days later, mRNA for embryonal myosin heavy chain (MyHC(emb)) was abundant and mononucleated cells fused into myotubes.
The leucine zipper transcription factors cAMP response element binding protein (CREB), cAMP response element modulatory protein (CREM) and activating transcription factor 1 (ATF1) bind to the cAMP response element (CRE) with the palindromic consensus sequence TGACGTCA. Their transcriptional activities are dependent on serine phosphorylation induced by various extracellular signals such as hormones, growth factors and neurotransmitters. Here we show that CREB is the predominant CRE-binding protein in Xenopus embryos and that it plays an essential role during early development. The importance of CREB for morphogenetic processes was assessed by injection of RNA encoding a dominant-negative form of CREB that is fused to a truncated progesterone receptor ligand binding domain. In this fusion protein, a dominant-negative function can be induced by application of the synthetic steroid RU486 at given developmental stages. The inhibition of CREB at blastula and early gastrula stages leads to severe posterior defects of the embryos reflected by strong spina bifida, whereas the inhibition of CREB at the beginning of neurulation resulted in stunted embryos with microcephaly. In these embryos, initial induction of neural and mesodermal tissues is not dependent on CREB function, as genes such as Otx2, Krox20, Shh and MyoD are still expressed in injected embryos. But the expression domains of Otx2 and MyoD were found to be distorted reflecting the abnormal development in both neural and somitic derivatives. In summary, our data show that CREB is essential during several developmental stages of Xenopus embryogenesis.
Testosterone is a key hormone regulating animal growth and development, which promotes skeletal muscle growth and inhibits fat deposition; however, the underlying mechanisms remain poorly defined. Because canonical Wingless and Int/β-catenin signaling promotes myogenesis, we hypothesized that testosterone regulates myogenesis through enhancing the β-catenin signaling pathway and the expression of its targeted genes. Muscle-derived stem cells were prepared from the skeletal muscle of fetal calf at day 180 of gestation and treated with or without trenbolone (10 nM), a synthetic analog of testosterone, in a myogenic medium. Trenbolone treatment increased the protein levels of MyoD and myosin heavy chain, as well as the androgen receptor content. The myogenic effect of trenbolone was blocked by cyproterone acetate, a specific inhibitor of androgen receptor, showing that the myogenic effect of trenbolone was mediated by the androgen receptor. Immunoprecipitation showed that androgen receptor and β-catenin formed a complex, which was increased by trenbolone treatment. Trenbolone activated adenosine monophosphate-activated protein kinase, which might phosphorylate β-catenin at Ser552, stabilizing β-catenin. Indeed, both cytoplasmic and nuclear β-catenin levels were increased after trenbolone treatment. As a result, β-catenin-mediated transcriptional activity was enhanced by trenbolone treatment. In conclusion, these data provide evidence that testosterone increases cellular β-catenin content which promotes the expression of β-catenin-targeted genes and myogenesis in the muscle-derived stem cells of cattle.
In order to study to what extent and at which stage serum response factor (SRF) is indispensable for myogenesis, we stably transfected C2 myogenic cells with, successively, a glucocorticoid receptor expression vector and a construct allowing for the expression of an SRF antisense RNA under the direction of the mouse mammary tumor virus long terminal repeat. In the clones obtained, SRF synthesis is reversibly down-regulated by induction of SRF antisense RNA expression by dexamethasone, whose effect is antagonized by the anti-hormone RU486. Two kinds of proliferation and differentiation patterns have been obtained in the resulting clones. Some clones with a high level of constitutive SRF antisense RNA expression are unable to differentiate into myotubes; their growth can be blocked by further induction of SRF antisense RNA expression by dexamethasone. Other clones are able to differentiate and are able to synthesize SRF, MyoD, myogenin, and myosin heavy chain at confluency. When SRF antisense RNA expression is induced in proliferating myoblasts by dexamethasone treatment, cell growth is blocked and cyclin A concentration drops. When SRF antisense RNA synthesis is induced in arrested confluent myoblasts cultured in a differentiation medium, cell fusion is blocked and synthesis of not only SRF but also MyoD, myogenin, and myosin heavy chain is inhibited. Our results show, therefore, that SRF synthesis is indispensable for both myoblast proliferation and myogenic differentiation.
Obesity is documented to be a state of chronic mild inflammation associated with increased macrophage infiltration into adipose tissue and liver and skeletal muscle. As a pleiotropic inflammatory mediator, macrophage migration inhibitory factor (MIF) is associated with metabolic disease, so MIF may signal molecular links between adipocytes and myocytes. MIF expression was modified during myoblast differentiation, but the role of MIF during this process is unclear. C2C12 cells were transfected with MIF to investigate their role during differentiation. MIF expression attenuated C2C12 differentiation. It did not change proliferation, but downregulated cyclin D1 and CDK4, causing cell accumulation in the G1 phase. p21 protein was increased significantly and MyoD, MyoG, and p21 mRNA also increased significantly in the C2C12 cells treated with ISO-1, suggesting that inhibition of MIF promotes differentiation. MIF inhibits the myoblast differentiation by affecting the cell cycle progression, but does not affect proliferation.
1. The Forkhead box O3 (FOXO3) transcription factor is a crucial regulator of cell fate that controls proliferation, apoptosis and differentiation. However, the role of FOXO3 regulation in duck myoblasts is not fully understood. 2. The aim of this study was to clone and determine the complete coding sequence (CDS) of the duck FOXO3 gene and to assess its function in myoblasts. 3. Primers specific for the predicted duck FOXO3 gene were designed using the public mallard duck reference sequence in GenBank. The CDS was cloned by RT-PCR and double digested to generate the expression vector pEGFP-N1-FOXO3. 4. Sequence analysis showed that the full-length FOXO3 CDS is 1467 bp, encoding 488 amino acids and is highly conserved across many bird species. Amino acid sequence analysis revealed a DNA-binding domain (aa 1-77). 5. Myoblast transfection with pEGFP-N1-FOXO3 showed that FOXO3 mRNA expression at 24 h was elevated in pEGFP-N1-FOXO3-transfected myoblasts compared to pEGFP-N1-transfected cells or controls. MRF4, MyoD, MyoG, Myf5 and PAX7 mRNA expression in the pEGFP-N1-FOXO3 group was lowest. However, myostatin (MSTN) and PAX3 mRNA expression did not differ. 6. These results suggest that FOXO3 plays a critical role in the proliferation and differentiation of duck myoblasts.
Peroxiredoxin6 (Prdx6) is one of the peroxiredoxin (Prdxs) family members that play an important role in maintaining cell homeostasis. Our previous studies demonstrated that Prdx6 was significantly associated with pig meat quality, especially meat tenderness. However, the transcriptional regulation of porcine Prdx6 remains unclear. In this study, we determined the transcription start site (TSS) of porcine Prdx6 gene by 5' rapid-amplification of cDNA ends (5' RACE). Several regulatory elements including CCAAT/enhancer-binding proteinβ (C/EBPβ), Myogenic Differentiation (MyoD), cAMP response element binding protein (CREB), stimulating protein1 (Sp1) and heat shock factor (HSF) binding sites were found by computational analyses together with luciferase reporter system. Overexpression and RNA interference experiments showed that C/EBPβ or CREB could up-regulate the expression of porcine Prdx6 gene at both mRNA and protein level. Electrophoretic mobility shift assays (EMSA) and chromatin immunoprecipitation assays (ChIP) confirmed that C/EBPβ and CREB could interact with Prdx6 promoter. Immuoprecipitation results also showed that C/EBPβ could interact with Prdx6 in vivo. Taken together, our findings identified C/EBPβ and CREB as the important regulators of porcine Prdx6 gene expression, and offered clues for further investigation of Prdx6 gene function.
MyoD and MyoG are transcription factors that have essential roles in myogenic lineage determination and muscle differentiation. The purpose of this study was to compare multiple amino acid sequences of myogenic regulatory proteins to infer evolutionary relationships among chordates. Protein sequences from Mus musculus (P10085 and P12979), human Homo sapiens (P15172 and P15173), bovine Bos taurus (Q7YS82 and Q7YS81), wild pig Sus scrofa (P49811 and P49812), quail Coturnix coturnix (P21572 and P34060), chicken Gallus gallus (P16075 and P17920), rat Rattus norvegicus (Q02346 and P20428), domestic water buffalo Bubalus bubalis (D2SP11 and A7L034), and sheep Ovis aries (Q90477 and D3YKV7) were searched from a non-redundant protein sequence database UniProtKB/Swiss-Prot, and subsequently analyzed using the Mega6.0 software. MyoD evolutionary analyses revealed the presence of three main clusters with all mammals branched in one cluster, members of the order Rodentia (mouse and rat) in a second branch linked to the first, and birds of the order Galliformes (chicken and quail) remaining isolated in a third. MyoG evolutionary analyses aligned sequences in two main clusters, all mammalian specimens grouped in different sub-branches, and birds clustered in a second branch. These analyses suggest that the evolution of MyoD and MyoG was driven by different pathways.
In skeletal muscle, muscle fiber types are defined by four adult myosin heavy chain (MyHC) isoforms. Four and a half LIM domain protein 3 (FHL3) regulates myoblasts differentiation and gene expression by acting as a transcriptional co-activator or co-repressor. However, how FHL3 regulates MyHC expression is currently not clear. In this study, we found that FHL3 down-regulated the expression of MyHC 1/slow and up-regulated the expression of MyHC 2a and MyHC 2b, whereas no significant effect was found on MyHC 2x expression. MyoD and phosphorylated cAMP response element binding protein (pCREB) played important roles in the regulation of MyHC 1/slow and MyHC 2a expression by FHL3, respectively. FHL3 could interact with MyoD, CREB and pCREB in vivo. pCREB had stronger interaction with the cyclic AMP-responsive elements (CRE) of the MyHC 2a promoter compared with CREB, and FHL3 significantly affected the binding capacity of pCREB to CRE. We established a model in which FHL3 promotes the expression of MyHC 2a through CREB-mediated transcription and inhibits the expression of MyHC 1/slow by inhibiting MyoD transcription activity during myogenesis. Our data support the notion that FHL3 plays important roles in the regulation of muscle fiber type composition.
The positive regulatory domain containing 16 (PRDM16) is commonly regarded as a "switch" controlling the transdifferentiation of myoblasts to brown adipocytes. The N-positive regulatory (PR) domain, which is highly homologous to SET domain, is a characteristic structure for the PRDM family. Many SET domain containing proteins and several PRDM members have been found to possess histone methyltransferase activity, yet the role of PRDM16 and its PR domain in the epigenetic regulation of myogenic and adipogenic genes during myoblasts/adipocytes transdifferentiation remains unexplored. In this study, we transfected C2C12 myoblasts to stably express PRDM16 and observed the repression of myogenic genes and activation of adipogenic genes at both proliferation and differentiation stages. Ectopic PRDM16-induced reprogramming of myogenic and adipogenic genes was associated with the hypermethylation on some CpG sites in the enhancer or promoter of MyoD and myogenin, but the methylation status of PPARγ promoter was not affected. C2C12 cells expressing truncated PRDM16 lacking PR domain (ΔPR-PRDM16) demonstrated attenuation of both adipogenic and myogenic potentials, indicated by PPARγ inactivation and decreased triglyceride deposition, as well as a downregulation of MyoD, MyHC and MCK genes, as compared with C2C12 cells expressing intact PRDM16. Furthermore, C2C12 cells expressing ΔPR-PRDM16 exhibited significant differences in histone modifications on the promoters of MyoD and PPARγ genes. Taken together, PRDM16-induced C2C12 transdifferentiation is associated with alterations in CpG methylation of myogenic factors, and PR domain affects both myogenesis and adipogenesis with modified histone methylation marks on MyoD and PPARγ promoters.
Myostatin (MSTN) is a secreted protein belonging to the transforming growth factor-β (TGF-β) family that is primarily expressed in skeletal muscle and also functions in adipocyte maturation. Studies have shown that MSTN can inhibit adipogenesis in muscle satellite cells (MSCs) but not in adipose-derived stem cells (ADSCs). However, the mechanism by which MSTN differently regulates adipogenesis in these two cell types remains unknown. Peroxisome proliferator-activated receptor-γ (PPARγ) and myogenic differentiation factor (MyoD) are two key transcription factors in fat and muscle cell development that influence adipogenesis. To investigate whether MSTN differentially regulates PPARγ and MyoD, we analyzed PPARγ and MyoD expression by assessing mRNA, protein and methylation levels in ADSCs and MSCs after treatment with 100 ng/mL MSTN for 0, 24, and 48 h. PPARγ mRNA levels were downregulated after 24 h and upregulated after 48 h of treatment in ADSCs, whereas in MSCs, PPARγ levels were downregulated at both time points. MyoD expression was significantly increased in ADSCs and decreased in MSCs. PPARγ and MyoD protein levels were upregulated in ADSCs and downregulated in MSCs. The CpG methylation levels of the PPARγ and MyoD promoters were decreased in ADSCs and increased in MSCs. Therefore, this study demonstrated that the different regulatory adipogenic roles of MSTN in ADSCs and MSCs act by differentially regulating PPARγ and MyoD expression.
Hyperplasia and hypertrophy are two distinct processes of skeletal muscle growth regulated by four myogenic regulatory factors (MRFs, contains MyoD, Myf5, Mrf4 and myogenin (MyoG)) and myostatin (MSTN). In this study, characterization of muscle morphology and satellite cells in juvenile (1-year-old) and adult (2-year-old) Megalobrama amblycephala was described. Compared with 1-year-old M. amblycephala, the diameter scope of epaxial, horizontal septum and hypaxial muscle fibers including red and white muscle in 2-year-old fish exhibited broader with dramatic reduction in frequency distribution of <20 μm diameter, nevertheless observable increase in frequency distribution of >50 μm diameter. Intermyofibrillar (IM) nuclei were also found except numerous subsarcolemmal (SS) nuclei in 2-year-old fish, whereas only SS nuclei were observed in 1-year-old fish. Immunofluorescence results showed that more satellite cells existed in red muscle than white muscle in 1-year-old fish, rather than 2-year-old fish. Moreover, we observed predominant increase in the mRNA levels of MyoD, Myf5, Mrf4, and MSTN during muscle development of fish in 2-year-old fish except MyoG.
Electrical stimulation is often used to prevent muscle atrophy and preserve contractile function, but its effects on the satellite cell population after nerve injury are not well understood. In this study we aimed to determine whether satellite cell differentiation is affected by electrical stimulation after nerve crush.
The sciatic nerves of Sprague-Dawley (SD) rats were crushed. Half of the injured rats received daily electrical stimulation of the gastrocnemius muscle, and the others did not. Tests for detecting paired box protein 7 (Pax7), myogenic differentiation antigen (MyoD), embryonic myosin heavy chain (eMyHC), and force production were performed 2, 4, and 6 weeks after injury.
More Pax7+/MyoD+ nuclei in stimulated muscles were observed than in non-stimulated muscles. eMyHC expression was elevated in stimulated muscles and correlated positively with enhanced force production.
Increased satellite cell differentiation is correlated with preserved muscle function in response to electrical stimulation after nerve injury.
The cysteine and glycine-rich protein 3 (CSRP3) plays an important role in the myofiber differentiation. Here, we identified five SNVs in all exon and intron regions of the CSRP3 gene using DNA sequencing, PCR-RFLP and forced-PCR-RFLP methods in 554 cattle. Four of the five SNVs were significantly associated with growth performance and carcass traits of the cattle. In addition, we evaluated haplotype frequency and linkage disequilibrium coefficient of five sequence variants. The result of haplotype analysis demonstrated 28 haplotypes present in Qinchuan and two haplotypes in Chinese Holstein. Only haplotypes 1 and 8 were being shared by two populations, haplotype 14 had the highest haplotype frequency in Qinchuan (17.4%) and haplotype 8 had the highest haplotype frequency in Chinese Holstein (94.4%). Statistical analyses of combined genotypes indicated that some combined genotypes were significantly or highly significantly associated with growth and carcass traits in the Qinchuan cattle population. qPCR analyses also showed that bovine CSRP3 gene was exclusively expressed in longissimus dorsi muscle and heart tissues. The data support the high potential of the CSRP3 as a marker gene for the improvement of growth performance and carcass traits in selection programs.
Tmod4 (Tropomodulin 4) is a member of Tmod family that plays important role in thin filament length regulation and myofibril assembly. We found that the expression levels of Tmod4 were higher in skeletal muscle and adipose tissues. However, the function and regulation of the Tmod4 gene in the myogenesis and adipogenesis remains unclear. In this study, we found that the expression of Tmod4 was decreased in myogenesis while increased in adipogenesis. Then, the transcriptional regulation analysis of Tmod4 promoter showed that Tmod4 could be regulated directly by myogenic factors and adipogenic factors. Furthermore, the roles of Tmod4 in the myogenesis and adipogenesis were confirmed by its over-expression in C2C12 cells and 3T3 cells, which suggested that Tmod4 could promote adipogenesis by up-regulating the adipogenic factors but moderately delay the myogenesis. These results indicated that the Tmod4 gene may play as a switch between myogenesis and adipogenesis, which resulted in the balanced development between skeletal muscle and adipose tissue. Therefore, the model for switch role of the Tmod4 in the balanced regulation between myogenesis and adipogenesis was proposed. It is showed that the expression of Tmod4 was activated in adipogenesis by adipogenic factors while inhibited in myogenesis by myogenic factors. Moreover, Tmod4 could promote adipogenesis by up-regulating the expression of adipogenic factors while moderately delaying the myogenesis. Our study provides an important basis for further understanding the regulation and function of porcine Tmod4 in muscle and fat development.
Nectin-like molecule-2 (Necl-2), a junction molecule, is exclusively expressed by spermatogenic cells. It mediates homophilic interaction between germ cells and heterophilic interaction between Sertoli and germ cells. Knockout studies have shown that loss of Necl-2 causes male infertility, suggesting Necl-2-based cell adhesion is crucial for spermatogenesis. Transforming growth factor-βs (TGF-βs) are crucial for regulating cell junction restructuring that are required for spermatogenesis. In the present study, we aim to investigate the mechanism on how TGF-β1 regulates Necl-2 expression to achieve timely junction restructuring in the seminiferous epithelium during spermatogenesis. We have demonstrated that TGF-β1 reduces Necl-2 mRNA and protein levels at both transcriptional and post-translational levels. Using inhibitor and clathrin shRNA, we have revealed that TGF-β1 induces Necl-2 protein degradation via clathrin-dependent endocytosis. Endocytosis assays further confirmed that TGF-β1 accelerates the internalization of Necl-2 protein to cytosol. Immunofluorescence staining also revealed that TGF-β1 effectively removes Necl-2 from cell-cell interface. In addition, TGF-β1 reduces Necl-2 mRNA via down-regulating Necl-2 promoter activity. Mutational studies coupled with knockdown experiments have shown that TGF-β1-induced Necl-2 repression requires activation of Smad proteins. EMSA and ChIP assays further confirmed that TGF-β1 promotes the binding of Smad proteins onto MyoD and CCAATa motifs in vitro and in vivo. Taken together, TGF-β1 is a potent cytokine that provides an effective mechanism in controlling Necl-2 expression in the testis via Smad-dependent gene repression and clathrin-mediated endocytosis.
Semaphorin4d (SEMA4D), also known as CD100, an oligodendrocyte secreted R-Ras GTPase-activating protein (GAP), affecting axonal growth is involved in a range of processes including cell adhesion, motility, angiogenesis, immune responses and tumour progression. However, its actual physiological mechanisms and its role in development remain unclear. This study has focused on the role of sema4d in the development and expression patterns in zebrafish embryos and the effect of its suppression on development using sema4d-specific antisense morpholino-oligonucleotides. In this study the knockdown of sema4d, expressed at all developmental stages, lead to defects in the hindbrain and trunk structure of zebrafish embryos. In addition, these phenotypes appeared to be associated with the abnormal expression of three hindbrain rhombomere boundary markers, wnt1, epha4a and foxb1.2, and two myogenic regulatory factors, myod and myog. Further, a notable increase of cell apoptosis appeared in the sema4d knockdown embryos, while no obvious reduction in cell proliferation was observed. Collectively, these data suggest that sema4d plays an important role in the development of the hindbrain and skeletal muscle.
Engineering a functional tendon with strong mechanical property remains an aim to be achieved for its eventual application. Both skeletal muscle and tendon are closely associated during their development and both can bear strong mechanical loading dynamically. This study explored the possibility of engineering stronger tendons with mouse skeletal muscle derived cells (MDCs) and with mouse tenocytes as a control. The results demonstrated that both MDCs and tenocytes shared the gene expression of growth differentiation factor-8 (GDF-8), collagens I, III, VI, scleraxis and tenomodulin, but with MyoD gene expression only in MDCs. Quantitatively, MDCs expressed higher levels of GDF-8, collagens III and VI (p < 0.05), whereas tenocytes expressed higher levels of collagen I, scleraxis and tenomodulin (p < 0.05). Interestingly, MDCs proliferated faster with more cells in S + G2/M phases than tenocytes (p < 0.05). After been seeded on polyglycolic acid (PGA) fibers, MDCs formed better quality engineered tendons with more mature collagen structure and thicker collagen fibrils as opposed to tenocyte engineered tendons. Biochemically, more collagen VI and decorin were produced in the former than in the later. Functionally, MDC engineered tendons exhibited stronger mechanical properties than tenocyte engineered tendons, including maximal load, stiffness, tensile strength and Young's modulus (p < 0.05). Furthermore, with the increase of implantation time, MDCs gradually lost their expression of myogenic molecules of MyoD and desmin and gained the expression of tenomodulin, a marker for tenocytes. Collectively, these results indicate that MDCs may serve as a desirable alternative cell source for engineering functional tendon tissue.
It has been suggested that mouse lbx1 is essential for directing hypaxial myogenic precursor cell migration. In zebrafish, the expression of lbx1a, lbx1b, and lbx2 has been observed in pectoral fin buds. It has also been shown that knocking down endogenous lbx2 in zebrafish embryos diminishes myoD expression in the pectoral fin bud. However, downstream lbxs signals remain largely unexplored. Here, we describe a previously unknown function of zebrafish lbx2 (lbx2) during convergent extension (CE) movements. The abrogation of the lbx2 function by two non-overlapping morpholino oligonucleotides (MOs) resulted in the defective convergence and extension movements in morphants during gastrulation. Our transplantation studies further demonstrated that the overexpression of lbx2 autonomously promotes CE movements. Expression of wnt5b is significantly reduced in lbx2 morphants. We have demonstrated that application of the wnt5b MO, a dominant-negative form of disheveled (Dvl) and a chemical inhibitor of Rho-associated kinase Y27632 in zebrafish embryos have effects reminiscent that are of the CE and hypaxial myogenesis defects observed in lbx2 morphants. Moreover, the CE and hypaxial mesoderm defects seen in lbx2 morphants can be rescued by co-injection with wnt5b or RhoA mRNA. However, this reduced level of active RhoA and hypaxial myogenesis defects in the embryos injected with the dominant-negative form of Dvl mRNA cannot be effectively restored by co-injection with lbx2 mRNA. Our results suggest that the key noncanonical Wnt signaling components Wnt5, Dvl, and RhoA are downstream effectors involved in the regulative roles of lbx2 in CE movement and hypaxial myogenesis during zebrafish embryogenesis.
The myogenic determination 1 (MyoD1) gene is a member of the MyoD gene family. It encodes for skeletal muscle-specific transcription factors containing highly conserved basic helix-loop-helix regions that perform important roles in the initiation, maintenance, and regulation of phenotypic traits. We investigated a new single nucleotide polymorphism (SNP) in the MyoD1 gene to evaluate whether this polymorphism affects meat quality traits in five Chinese indigenous cattle breeds, namely Qinchuan (QC), Xia-Nan (XN), Nan-yang (NY), Luxi (LX), and Jia-xian red (JXR). A C→G transversion at position 624 was detected in exon 1 of the MyoD1 gene; it causes an amino acid substitution ((624)serine/(624)cysteine). Least squares analysis showed that this SNP is not significantly associated with back fat thickness, eye muscle area, intramuscular fat, or marbling. The A/B allelic frequencies in the five breeds were 0.810/0.189, 0.779/0.220, 0.768/0.231, 0.820/0.180, and 0.801/0.198, respectively. Based on the χ(2) test, the genotype distributions of four cattle breeds (LX, NY, QC, and XN) did not agree with Hardy-Weinberg equilibrium (P < 0.05); one breed (JXR) did not deviate significantly from Hardy-Weinberg equilibrium (P > 0.05). The genotypic frequencies among all five cattle breeds showed moderate diversity (0.25 < polymorphism information content < 0.5). We concluded that the C624G SNP of the MyoD1 gene does not influence meat quality traits in indigenous Chinese cattle breeds; however, this SNP could be included in breed composition and population admixture analyses due to the marked differences in allelic frequencies among these five breeds.
In order to investigate the developmental differences between the duck breast muscle and leg muscle tissues during the embryonic stage to neonatal stages, as well as the expression profile of MyoD between the two muscle tissues, the morphologic characteristics in the two muscle tissues during duck embryo stages at E14, E18, E22, E27 and D7 were compared through the muscle paraffin sections. The coding domain sequence of duck MyoD gene was cloned, and then the expression of MyoD in duck leg muscle and breast muscle during embryo stage on E10, E14, E18, E22, E27 and D7 was detected using qRT-PCR method. Results showed that the developmental status of the duck breast muscle in embryonic phrases lag behind that of leg muscle. The CDS of duck MyoD gene consists of 894 nucleotides, and showed relatively high similarity with the gene of other species. The MyoD mRNA expressed in both kinds of muscle tissues and the expression profile had a similar trend, although the expression level of MyoD in the breast muscle was significantly higher than that in the leg muscle at each developmental stages (p<0.05). Results suggested that MyoD might have potential functions in controlling muscle fiber phenotype during the secondary myogenesis of muscle development. These fundamental works may provide some valuable clues for knowing the roles of MyoD in the myogenesis and the muscle fiber type differentiation in birds.
Mesenchymal stromal cells (MSC) have been thought to be attractive candidates for the treatment of Duchenne muscular dystrophy (DMD), but the rate of MSC myogenesis is very low. Thus MSC treatment for DMD is restricted. Myostatin (Mstn), a negative regulator of myogenesis, is known to be responsible for limiting skeletal muscle regeneration. We hypothesized that inhibition of Mstn by using anti-Mstn antibody (Ab) would ameliorate the myogenic differentiation of MSC in vitro and in vivo.
MSC were isolated from rat bone marrow. Induced rat MSC (rMSC) were treated with various concentrations of anti-Mstn Ab. The expression of myogenic differentiation antigen (MyoD), myogenin and myosin heavy chain-type alpha (MHC-alpha) were estimated by immunofluorescence analysis and reverse transcription-polymerase chain reaction (RT-PCR). Adipogenic differentiation of rMSC inhibited by anti-Mstn Ab was evaluated by Oil Red O staining. The expression of dystrophin was detected 16 weeks after anti-Mstn Ab injection and rMSC transplantation by immunofluorescence staining, RT-PCR and Western blot. Motor function, serum creatine kinase (CK) and histologic changes were also evaluated.
Five-azacytidine-mediated myogenic differentiation induced significant endogenous Mstn expression. Anti-Mstn Ab improved the expression of MyoD, myogenin and MHC-alpha and inhibited adipocyte formation. Sixteen weeks after transplantation, the inhibition of Mstn had improved motor function and muscle mass. In accordance with the increased motor function and muscle mass, dystrophin expression had increased. Furthermore, serum CK and centrally nucleated fiber (CNF) levels decreased slightly, suggesting specific pathologic features of the dystrophic muscle were partially restored.
Using anti-Mstn Ab, we found that inhibition of Mstn improved myogenic differentiation of rMSC in vitro and in vivo. A combination of Mstn blockade and MSC transplantation may provide a pharmacologic and cell-based strategy for the treatment of DMD.
To explore the in vitro differentiation of the rat mesenchymal stem cells (MSCs) into the skeletal muscle cells induced by the myoblast differentiation factor (MyoD) and 5-azacytidine.
The MSCs were taken from the rat bone marrow and the suspension of MSCs was made and cultured in the homeothermia incubator which contained 5% CO2 at 37 degrees C. The cells were observed under the inverted phase contrast microscope daily. The cells spreading all the bottom of the culture bottle were defined as one passage. The differentiation of the 3rd passage of MSCs was induced by the combination of 5-azacytidine, MyoD, transforming growth factor beta1, and the insulin-like growth factor 1. Nine days after the induction, the induced MSCs were collected, which were analyzed with the MTT chromatometry, the flow cytometry, and the immunohistochemistry.
The primarily cultured MSCs grew as a colony on the walls of the culture bottle; after the culture for 5-7 days, the cells were shaped like the fibroblasts, the big flat polygonal cells, the medium-sized polygonal cells, and the small triangle cells; after the culture for 12 days, the cells were found to be fused, spreading all over the bottle bottom, but MSCs were unchanged too much in shape. After the induction by 5-azacytidine, some of the cells died, and the cells grew slowly. However, after the culture for 7 days, the cells grew remarkably, the cell volume increased gradually in a form of ellipse, fusiform or irregularity. After the culture for 14 days, the proliferated fusiform cells began to increase in a great amount. After the culture for 18-22 days, the myotubes increased in number and volume, with the nucleus increased in number, and the newly-formed myotubes and the fusiform myoblst grew parallelly and separately. The immunohistochemistry for MSCs revealed that CD44 was positive in reaction, with the cytoplasm in a form of brown granules. And the nucleus had an obvious border, and CD34 was negative. The induced MSCs were found to be positive for desmin and specific myoglobulin of the skeletal muscle. The flow cytometry showed that most of the MSCs and the induced MSCs were in the stages of G0/G1, accounting for 79.4% and 62.9%, respectively; however, the cells in the stages of G2/S accounted for 20.6% and 36.1%. The growth curve was drawn based on MTT,which showed that MSCs were greater in the growth speed than the induced MSCs. The two kinds of cells did not reach the platform stage,having a tendency to continuously proliferate.
In vitro, the rat MSCs can be differentiated into the skeletal muscle cells with an induction by MyoD and 5-azacytidine, with a positive reaction for the desmin and the myoglobulin of the skeletal muscle. After the induction, the proliferation stage of MSCs can be increased, with a higher degree of the differentiation into the skeletal muscle.
The methylation status of Myf-3 was studied in 34 human primary breast carcinomas and 9 normal breast tissues. One third of the carcinomas contained hypermethylated Myf-3. All normal tissues contained unmethylated Myf-3. Myf-3 hypermethylation was more common in poorly differentiated grade 3 tumours than in better differentiated grade 1 and 2 tumours.
It is well known that spontaneously hypertensive rats (SHR) develop muscle pathologies with hypertension and heart failure, though the mechanism remains poorly understood. Woon et al. (2007) linked the circadian clock gene Bmal1 to hypertension and metabolic dysfunction in the SHR. Building on these findings, we compared the expression pattern of several core-clock genes in the gastrocnemius muscle of aged SHR (80 weeks; overt heart failure) compared to aged-matched control WKY strain. Heart failure was associated with marked effects on the expression of Bmal1, Clock and Rora in addition to several non-circadian genes important in regulating skeletal muscle phenotype including Mck, Ttn and Mef2c. We next performed circadian time-course collections at a young age (8 weeks; pre-hypertensive) and adult age (22 weeks; hypertensive) to determine if clock gene expression was disrupted in gastrocnemius, heart and liver tissues prior to or after the rats became hypertensive. We found that hypertensive/hypertrophic SHR showed a dampening of peak Bmal1 and Rev-erb expression in the liver, and the clock-controlled gene Pgc1α in the gastrocnemius. In addition, the core-clock gene Clock and the muscle-specific, clock-controlled gene Myod1, no longer maintained a circadian pattern of expression in gastrocnemius from the hypertensive SHR. These findings provide a framework to suggest a mechanism whereby chronic heart failure leads to skeletal muscle pathologies; prolonged dysregulation of the molecular clock in skeletal muscle results in altered Clock, Pgc1α and Myod1 expression which in turn leads to the mis-regulation of target genes important for mechanical and metabolic function of skeletal muscle.
In vertebrates, transcriptional control of skeletal muscle genes during differentiation is regulated by enhancers that direct the combinatorial binding and/or interaction of MEF2 and the bHLH MyoD family of myogenic factors. We have shown that Drosophila MEF2 plays a role similar to its vertebrate counterpart in the regulation of the Tropomyosin I gene in the development of Drosophila somatic muscles, however, unlike vertebrates, Drosophila MEF2 interacts with a muscle activator region that does not have binding sites for myogenic bHLH-like factors or any other known Drosophila transcription factors. We describe here the isolation and characterization of a component of the muscle activator region that we have named PDP1 (PAR domain protein 1). PDP1 is a novel transcription factor that is highly homologous to the PAR subfamily of mammalian bZIP transcription factors HLF, DBP and VBP/TEF. This is the first member of the PAR subfamily of bZIP transcription factors to be identified in Drosophila. We show that PDP1 is involved in regulating expression of the Tropomyosin I gene in somatic body-wall and pharyngeal muscles by binding to DNA sequences within the muscle activator that are required for activator function. Mutations that eliminate PDP1 binding eliminate muscle activator function and severely reduce expression of a muscle activator plus MEF2 mini-enhancer. These and previous results suggest that PDP1 may function as part of a larger protein/DNA complex that interacts with MEF2 to regulate transcription of Drosophila muscle genes. Furthermore, in addition to being expressed in the mesoderm that gives rise to the somatic muscles, PDP1 is also expressed in the mesodermal fat body, the developing midgut endoderm, the hindgut and Malpighian tubules, and the epidermis and central nervous system, suggesting that PDP1 is also involved in the terminal differentiation of these tissues.
Cellular retinoic acid binding protein 2 (CRABP2), a member of a family of specific carrier proteins for Vitamin A, belongs to a family of small cytosolic lipid binding proteins. Our previous study suggested that CRABP2 was involved in skeletal muscle development; however, the molecular function and regulatory mechanism of CRABP2 in myogenesis remained unclear. In this study, we found that the expression of the CRABP2 gene was upregulated during C2C12 differentiation. An over-expression assay revealed that CRABP2 promotes myogenic transformation by regulating the cell cycle during C2C12 differentiation. The region from -459 to -4 bp was identified as the core promoter and contains a TATA box, a GC box and binding sites for the transcription factors MyoD and Sp1. Over-expression, site-directed mutagenesis and EMSA assays indicated that the transcription factors MyoD and Sp1 regulate CRABP2 expression and promote myoblast differentiation in C2C12 cells.
The myocyte enhancer factor 2C (MEF2C) is a member of the MEF2 family of transcription factors, involved in skeletal muscle development. In this study we report the cDNA sequence and isolate the 5' upstream region of the mef2c gene from porcine genomic DNA using PCR-based GenomeWalker. The open reading frame of porcine mef2c cDNA covers 1,392 bases, encoding 464 amino acids, which show 94% identity with human MEF2C at the level of the primary protein structure. Annear the C terminus of mef2c, a 96-nt sequence appear to represent alternatively spliced transcripts was present in some cDNAs and absent in the other. No typical TATA, GC box or CAAT box binding site was found in porcine mef2c 5' upstream region, whereas some potential binding sites for MyoD (E-box), MEF2 and MBF1 were present in the proximal upstream region. Transfection of the mef2c 5' upstream region with EGFP into cos7 cells demonstrated that the region from -162 to +115 bp immediately 5' of the exon 1 was sufficient to direct strong EGFP protein expression. Co-transfection assays demonstrated that MBF1 bound the mef2c promoter and inhibited mef2c expression. These results may be useful for elucidating the regulation mechanisms of mef2c, which interacts with other factors to regulate target genes.
MYOG and MYF6 belong to the MyoD gene family. They code for the bHLH transcription factors playing a key role in later stages of myogenesis: differentiation and maturation of myotubes. Three SNPs in porcine MYF6 and two in porcine MYOG were analysed in order to establish associations with chosen carcass quality and growth rate traits in Polish Landrace, Polish Large White and line 990 sows. No statistically significant effect of SNP in the promoter region of the MYF6 gene on its expression measured on mRNA level was found. Associations between the genotype at the MYF6 locus and carcass quality traits appeared to be breed-dependent. The C allele in the case of SNP in the promoter region and GC haplotype in exon 1 were advantageous for right carcass side weight in Polish Landrace sows and disadvantageous for this trait in Polish Large White sows. These gene variants were also the most advantageous for loin and ham weight in sows of line 990. The mutation in exon 1 of the MYOG gene had no statistically significant association with carcass quality traits and the mutation in the 3'-flanking region had the breed-dependent effect as well. These results suggest that SNPs analysed in this study are not causative mutations, but can be considered as markers of some other, still unrevealed genetic polymorphism that influences the physiological processes and phenotypic traits considered in this study.
Tissue factor pathway Inhibitor-2 (TFPI-2) is associated with extracellular matrices and plays a major role in cell migration and tumor invasion. In this study, a 4.8-kb human TFPI-2 gene 5'-flanking region was isolated, cloned and sequenced. Promoter region analysis revealed a high GC-rich content without canonical TATA and CAAT boxes but three transcription initiation sites were identified. Moreover, several putative binding sites for transcription factors were identified (MyoD, LYF1, NF-Y, GATA, oct-1, AP-1, Sp1, NF1, NF-kappa B and egr-1). To characterize potential regulatory regions, TFPI-2/luciferase promoter constructs were then transfected in human choriocarcinoma JEG-3 cells. We first showed that the minimal TFPI-2 promoter is located between -166 and -111 from the translation start site. Luciferase activity consistently increased after stimulation of JEG-3 cells by phorbol 12-myristate 13-acetate indicating that NF1, NF-kappa B and egr-1/Sp1 binding sites are crucial in inducible TFPI-2 expression. Moreover, negative regulatory regions included AP-1 binding sites were identified. This study demonstrates that the TFPI-2 gene promoter exhibits typical features of a housekeeping gene.
The Maf family of the transcription factors plays a pivotal role in controlling development and cellular differentiation. To clarify the molecular mechanisms controlling mafB expression, a genomic clone of the mouse mafB gene was isolated and analyzed. RNase protection analysis determined the transcription initiation site at 389 bp upstream from the translation initiation site. The 3' end of the gene is located at 946 bp downstream from the termination codon. The gene lacks intron structure. Sequence analysis showed a TATA-like sequence (5'-GATAAAA-3') and an inverted CCAAT-box (5'-ATTGG-3') in the promoter region. Upstream of these sequences, there are several potential regulatory elements, including two GC-boxes (5'-GGGCGG-3'), and a palindromic sequence (5'-GTCAGCTGAC-3') which contains two Maf recognition elements (MARE, 5'-GCTGAC-3') and an E-box (5'-CAGCTG-3'). Transient transfection analysis with the 5'-flanking region of the mafB gene demonstrated that these elements are important for mafB gene expression. In addition, cotransfection analysis indicated that the MyoD activates the mouse mafB promoter and the gene is positively auto-regulated by its own product.
The MafB transcription factor plays a pivotal role in controlling the development and differentiation. The author reports the isolation and analysis of genomic clone of the mouse mafB gene. The gene lacks intron structure, at least, within its coding and 5'-untranslated sequences that are similar to the chicken mafB gene. RNA protection analysis determined one transcription initiation site of the gene at 389-bp upstream from the translation initiation site. Sequence analysis showed that the 5'-flanking region upstream to the ATG codon did not contain a conventional TATA box. A TATA-like sequence (5'-GATAAAA-3') and an inverted CCAAT-box (5'-ATTGG-3') were found to be located at nucleotide -31 and -86, referring to the transcription initiation site, respectively. Upstream to these sequences, there were several potential regulatory elements, including two GC-boxes (5'-GGGCGG-3': from -148 to -143; and from -123 to -118), and a palindromic sequence (5'-GTCAGCTGAC-3': from -164 to -155) which contained two halves-MARE (Maf recognition element), 5'-GCTGAC-3', and an E-box (5'-CAGCTG-3'). Promoter activity of the 5'-flanking region was analyzed by reporter transfection assay, which suggested that these segments were an important transcriptional activator. It was also suggested that MyoD transactivated the mouse mafB promoter and this gene was positively autoregulated by its product, MafB.
Uncoupling protein (UCP) 2 is a member of the uncoupling-protein family, and it appears to function as an uncoupler of oxidative phosphorylation. To identify cis-acting regulatory elements controlling this gene's expression, we cloned an approx. 6.2-kb region upstream from the translation-initiation site of the mouse UCP2 gene and analysed its transcription activity using chimaeric mouse UCP2 promoter-placental-alkaline-phosphatase (PLAP) reporter-gene constructs. Sequence analysis showed that the 5'-flanking region of the mouse UCP2 gene was not similar to those of mouse UCP1 or UCP3. For the mouse UCP2, the region near the transcription-initiation site lacked the typical TATA box, but was GC-rich, resulting in presence of several potential specificity protein 1 (Sp-1), activator protein (AP)-1 and AP-2 binding sites. The putative regulatory motifs for muscle-regulatory protein (MyoD), brown-fat regulatory element, CCAAT box, cAMP-response element and Y box were also found in the mouse UCP2 promoter region by computer-assisted analysis. From the results of Northern-blot analysis and transient expression assay, we found that the mouse UCP2 gene responded to the cAMP-dependent protein kinase alpha-catalytic subunit signal activation at the transcription level. Additionally, deletion analysis of the UCP2 promoter-PLAP constructs indicated that the minimal region exhibiting the promoter activity was located between nt -33 and +100, and that a strong enhancer was present within 601 bp of the 5'-promoter region. In particular, the region from nt -233 to -34 significantly induced PLAP activity in the cell lines derived from various tissues and in the primary culture cells of rat brown adipose tissue, suggesting that this region is most important for the ubiquitous expression of mouse UCP2 mRNA. Furthermore, it was shown that two silencer elements were involved in the mouse UCP2 gene; one was located between nt -2746 and -602, and the other was identified in intron 1. These regions deprived the enhancer of the ability to induce PLAP activity. This study shows a fundamental role for positive and negative cis-acting DNA elements in regulating the basal and cAMP-induced transcription activity of the mouse UCP2 gene.
Uncoupling protein 3 (UCP3), a member of the UCP family, mainly expressed in skeletal muscle could be responsible for thermogenesis in humans. Since little is known about its regulation, we studied the 5' flanking region of the human UCP3 (hUCP3) gene, which potentially contains the promoter sequences. We report the hUCP3 transcription initiation on a G located 764 nucleotides upstream the A contained in the first translated codon. Therefore, hUCP3 first exon has 669 bases of untranslated sequence. We also report the cloning and sequencing of seven kilobases from the gene 5' end and analyze the features of the potential proximal promoter. The MyoD family binding motif, called E-box, is the most abundant on this region. Other muscle-specific motives present in the potential proximal promoter include a MEF2 site as well as binding sequences for ubiquitous factors such as GC box and two CAAT boxes. Additionally, three putative peroxisome proliferator and one thyroid hormone response elements (PPRE and TRE, respectively) are found, which suggest a potential role for the peroxisome proliferator-activated receptor (PPAR) and thyroid hormone in human UCP3 gene expression. The description of the promoter region of the UCP3 gene will facilitate the elucidation of its transcriptional control.
The aim of our study was to isolate novel gene(s) involved in cell differentiation and embryonic liver development. Mouse cded/lior was identified from subtraction hybridization of embryonic liver cDNA libraries as well as an adult mouse liver genomic DNA library. The full open reading frame of cded/lior encodes a 131-amino acid protein with 71.88% overall similarity to the PH domain of rat PLC-gamma1. A gapped search with the C-terminal region of CDED/LIOR revealed a 36-41% similarity to several proteins related to signal transduction and cell replication, such as ORC1 and KSR. Northern blot analysis of adult mouse tissues shows a strong 2.6-kb transcript restricted to heart and skeletal muscle. RT-PCR utilizing cded/lior-specific primers demonstrates cded/lior mRNAs in heart, brain, and liver tissue throughout mid-embryonic mouse gestation. cded/lior maps to the distal end of mouse Chromosome (Chr) 2. Analysis of the genomic structure for cded/lior demonstrated a single exon gene that is not an alternatively spliced isoform of PLC-gamma1. Analysis of the cded/lior promoter region revealed a high GC-content, high ratio of CpG/GpC, multiple GC-boxes, the lack of a TATA box, CTF/NFI element, and two MyoD-MCK binding sites. These characteristics are also found in several genes important in the regulation of cell growth or DNA synthesis, such as transforming growth factor-beta1, c-Ha-ras, nerve growth factor, epidermal growth factor receptor, and DNA polymerase beta. These results suggest that cded/lior is a mesoderm/muscle-specific transcript that may be involved in the mesodermal inductive and regulatory interactions required for liver formation and embryonic development.
Myotonic dystrophy is the most common inherited adult neuromuscular disorder with a global frequency of 1/8000. The genetic defect is an expanding CTG trinucleotide repeat in the 3'-untranslated region of the myotonic dystrophy protein kinase gene. We present the in vitro characterization of cis regulatory elements controlling transcription of the myotonic dystrophy protein kinase gene in myoblasts and fibroblasts. The region 5' to the initiating ATG contains no consensus TATA or CCAAT box. We have mapped two transcriptional start sites by primer extension. Deletion constructs from this region fused to the bacterial chloramphenicol acetyltransferase reporter gene revealed only subtle muscle specific cis elements. The strongest promoter activity mapped to a 189-base pair fragment. This sequence contains a conserved GC box to which the transcription factor Sp1 binds. Reporter gene constructs containing a 2-kilobase pair first intron fragment of the myotonic dystrophy protein kinase gene enhances reporter activity up to 6-fold in the human rhabdomyosarcoma myoblast cell line TE32 but not in NIH 3T3 fibroblasts. Co-transfection of a MyoD expression vector with reporter constructs containing the first intron into 10 T1/2 fibroblasts resulted in a 10-20-fold enhancement of expression. Deletion analysis of four E-box elements within the first intron reveal that these elements contribute to enhancer activity similarly in TE32 myoblasts and 10 T1/2 fibroblasts. These data suggest that E-boxes within the myotonic dystrophy protein kinase first intron mediate interactions with upstream promoter elements to up-regulate transcription of this gene in myoblasts.
Glypicans are a member of a family of glycosylphosphatidylinositol anchored heparan sulfate proteoglycans that are expressed in cell and development specific patterns. Rat GPC1 cDNA probes were used to screen rat genomic libraries. Three overlapping genomic clones that contained the entire rat GPC1 gene were isolated. The rat GPC1 gene is approximately 15kb in length and consists of eight exons interrupted by introns of varying lengths. Two of the introns are quite short, with lengths of 41 and 43 base pairs. Each exon-intron splice junction exhibited the consensus splice site sequence. Exon 1 encodes the putative signal peptide and the serine residue of the first putative heparan sulfate attachment site. The last exon encodes the cluster of three potential COOH-terminal heparan sulfate attachment sites, the putative GPI anchor and polypeptide cleavage site, and the 3'-untranslated region including the polyadenylation signal. One of the genomic clones extended approximately 2.8 kb 5' of the exon 1 coding sequence, and is thus likely to contain sequences that regulate GPC1 gene expression. Sequence analysis of the 5'-flanking sequence revealed a lack of consensus TATA and CAAT boxes. A search for potential transcription factor binding sites revealed a number of such motifs, including Sp1 (GC box), NF-kappaB, and MyoD (E-box). This region of the rat GPC1 gene shows significant sequence homology to the 5'-flanking region of the human GPC3 gene. Functional promoter activity of the rat GPC1 sequence was demonstrated by its ability to drive the expression of a luciferase reporter gene in several cell types.
Muscle glycogen phosphorylase (MGP) transcript and protein levels increase during skeletal muscle development in tandem with the products of other muscle genes responsible for glucose and glycogen metabolism. Previous studies demonstrated that a 269 bp region 5' to exon 1 of MGP is sufficient for developmental regulation in the C2C12 myogenic cell line (Froman et al., 1994). This genomic region (-209 to +60) contains four consensus E box motifs, a CArG-like sequence, and a GC-rich domain. Native MGP transcripts were not detected in pluripotent CH310T1/2 fibroblasts, but low levels of MGP mRNA were measured in CH310T1/2 cells that were stably transfected with MyoD. Three of the E box motifs in the MGP proximal promoter interacted with C2C12 nuclear proteins. However, cotransfection of the MGP promoter with myogenic regulatory factors, including MyoD and myogenin, produced less than 2-fold activation compared with 20-fold activation of the desmin promoter. Mutational analyses of the MGP promoter demonstrated that increased expression in C2C12 myotubes did not require any of the E box motifs or the CArG-like element. A small region (-76 to -68) upstream of GC-rich domain (-64 to -51) significantly reduced promoter activities in both myoblasts and myotubes. The functional studies suggest that MGP is developmentally regulated during myogenesis by alternative pathways that utilize unidentified regulatory elements or ancillary factors.
BIN1 is a putative tumor suppressor that was identified through its interaction with the MYC oncoprotein. To begin to identify elements of BIN1 whose alteration may contribute to malignancy, we cloned and characterized the human BIN1 gene and promoter. Nineteen exons were identified in a region of >54 kilobases, six of which were alternately spliced in a cell type-specific manner. One alternately spliced exon encodes part of the MYC-binding domain, suggesting that splicing controls the MYC-binding capacity of BIN1 polypeptides. Four other alternately spliced exons encode amphiphysin-related sequences that were included in brain-specific BIN1 species, also termed amphiphysin isoforms or amphiphysin II. The 5'-flanking region of BIN1 is GC-rich and lacks a TATA box but directs transcriptional initiation from a single site. A approximately 0. 9-kilobase fragment from this region was sufficient for basal transcription and transactivation by MyoD, which may account for the high levels of BIN1 observed in skeletal muscle. This study lays the foundation for genetic and epigenetic investigations into the role of BIN1 in normal and neoplastic cell regulation.
Ryudocan, a ubiquitous heparan sulfate proteoglycan, is a member of the syndecan family of cell surface proteoglycans. The full-length cDNA encoding the murine ryudocan core protein has now been cloned and sequenced. The deduced primary structure of mouse ryudocan, including the three glycosaminoglycan attachment sites in the extracellular domain as well as the transmembrane and cytoplasmic regions, is highly similar to those of the rat, human, and chicken proteins. Northern analysis detected a 2.7-kb transcript in all mouse tissues examined, with the highest concentrations apparent in liver, kidney, and lung. The mouse ryudocan gene was shown to span approximately 19.7 kb of genomic DNA and to contain five exons, with an intron-exon organization identical to that of the human gene. The promoter region of the mouse gene contains various cis-acting elements, including a TATA-like box and a GC box as well as potential binding sites for the transcription factors NF-IL6, MyoD, GATA, C/EBP, AP-2, NF-kappaB, AP-1, and Sp1. Transient transfection experiments with a construct containing the 690 bp upstream of the transcription start site fused to a luciferase reporter gene showed functional promoter activity. Deletion analysis suggested that the proximal promoter region including the TATA-like box, the GC box, and other Sp1 binding sites was required for full transcriptional activity. These findings will be useful for the study of ryudocan gene regulation and the generation of mice with targeted disruption of the gene.
Mitogen-activated protein kinase (MAPK) or extracellular signal-regulated kinase are ubiquitous kinases conserved from fungi to mammals. Their activity is regulated by phosphorylation on both threonine and tyrosine, and they play a crucial role in the regulation of proliferation and differentiation. We report here the cloning of the murine p44 MAP kinase (extracellular signal-regulated kinase 1) gene, the determination of its intron/exon boundaries, and the characterization of its promoter. The gene spans approximately eight kilobases (kb) and can be divided into nine exons and eight introns, each coding region exon containing from one to three of the highly conserved protein kinase domains. Primer extension analysis reveals the existence of two major start sites of transcription located at -183 and -186 base pairs (bp) as well as four discrete start sites for transcription located at -178, -192, -273, and -292 bp of the initiation of translation. However, the start site region lacks TATA-like sequences but does contain initiator-like sequences proximal to the major start sites obtained by primer extension. 1 kb of the promoter region has been sequenced. It contains three putative TATA boxes far upstream of the main start sites region, one AP-1 box, one AP-2 box, one Malt box, one GAGA box, one half serum-responsive element, and putative binding sites for Sp1 (five), GC-rich binding factor (five), CTF-NF1 (one), Myb (one), p53 (two), Ets-1 (one), NF-IL6 (two), MyoD (two), Zeste (one), and hepatocyte nuclear factor-5 (one). To determine the sites critical for the function of the p44 MAPK promoter, we constructed a series of chimeric genes containing variable regions of the 5'-flanking sequence of p44 MAPK gene and the coding region for luciferase. Activity of the promoter, measured by its capacity to direct expression of a luciferase reporter gene, is strong, being comparable with the activity of the Rous sarcoma virus promoter. Progressive deletions of the approximately 1 kb (-1200/-78) promoter region allowed us to define a minimal region of 186 bp (-284/-78) that has maximal promoter activity. Within this context, deletion of the AP-2 binding site reduces by 30-40% the activity of the promoter. Further deletion of this minimal promoter that removes the major start sites (-167/-78) surprisingly preserves promoter activity. This result implicates a major role of this region that contains the Sp1 sites.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 400 WORDS)
rSkM2 is a tetrodotoxin-resistant rat skeletal muscle voltage-sensitive sodium channel that is expressed in immature and denervated skeletal muscle and in adult heart. We have isolated a 3.7-kb gene segment that contains the first exon, multiple transcription initiation sites, the core promoter (nt -102 to +1), GC-rich elements (Sp1 recognition sites), three overlapping C-rich motifs (important for muscle-specific expression of some muscle genes), and multiple CANNTG (E-box) motifs (MyoD binding sites). A deletion analysis of the 5' upstream 2.8-kb segment, driving the rSkM2 core promoter, has localized a muscle-restrictive enhancer element (MRSE) at least 2 kb upstream from the core promoter. The core promoter is silenced by an additional cis element (-645/-506). The positive and negative cis-elements together drive transcription of the chloramphenicol acetyltransferase (CAT) reporter gene from the core promoter at about the same level as does the core promoter alone in a skeletal muscle differentiation stage-specific manner. Gel-shift assays have identified sequence- and cell-type-specific proteins that bind to a 16-bp region (-44/-29) containing C-rich motifs. Muscle-specific complexes formed from muscle cell nuclear extracts and a 16-bp element (-44/-29) are competed by unlabeled -44/-29 oligonucleotide but not by several mutant oligonucleotides that implicate nucleotides -40 to -38 and -34 to -32 in the binding of a nuclear protein (designated SkM2 transcription factor 1, SkM2-TF1). We conclude that rSkM2 gene expression depends on the interactions of positive and negative transcriptional regulators with tissue- and developmental stage-specific core promoter elements.
Vitamin D deficiency and advanced glycation end products (AGEs) are suggested to be involved in the pathogenesis of osteoporosis and sarcopenia. However, the effects of vitamin D and AGEs on myogenesis and the interaction between muscle and bone remains still unclear. We previously showed that osteoglycin (OGN) is secreted from myoblasts and stimulates osteoblastic differentiation, suggesting that it plays important roles in the interaction between muscle and bone. The aim of this study is thus to examine the effects of vitamin D and AGEs on myoblastic differentiation of C2C12 cells and osteoblastic differentiation of osteoblastic MC3T3-E1 cells through OGN expression. 1α,25-dihydroxyvitamin D3 (1,25D) and eldecalcitol, an active vitamin D analog, induced the expression of MyoD, myogenin and OGN, and these effects were abolished by vitamin D receptor (VDR) suppression by siRNA in C2C12 cells. Moreover, conditioned medium from 1,25D-pretreated C2C12 cells stimulated the expression of type 1 collagen and alkaline phosphatase in MC3T3-E1 cells, compared to control medium from 1,25D-untreated C2C12 cells. In contrast, conditioned medium from VDR-suppressed and 1,25D-pretreated C2C12 cells showed no effects. AGE2 and AGE3 suppressed the expression of MyoD, myogenin and OGN in C2C12 cells. Moreover, 1,25D blunted the AGEs' effects. In conclusion, these findings showed for the first time that active vitamin D plays important roles in myogenesis and muscle-induced osteoblastogenesis through OGN expression. Active vitamin D treatment may rescue the AGEs-induced sarcopenia as well as - suppressed osteoblastic differentiation via OGN expression in myoblasts.
The regulation of gene expression by thyroid hormone (T3) involves binding of the hormone to nuclear receptors [thyroid hormone receptor (TR)] acting as T3-dependent transcription factors encoded by TRalpha (NR1A1) and TRbeta (NR1A2) genes. Several TRalpha variants have already been characterized, but only some of them display T3 binding activity. In this study, we have identified another transcript, TRalpha-DeltaE6, produced by alternative splicing with microexon 6b instead of exon 6. This splicing leads to the synthesis of a protein devoid of a hinge domain. The TRalpha-DeltaE6 transcript is detected in all mouse tissues tested. Although TRalpha-DeltaE6 did not bind DNA, its expression induced a TRalpha1 sequestration in the cytoplasm. Functional studies demonstrated that TRalpha-DeltaE6 inhibits the transcriptional activity of TRalpha1 and retinoic X receptor-alpha, but not of retinoic acid receptor-alpha. We also found that TRalpha-DeltaE6 efficiently decreased the ability of TRalpha to inhibit MyoD transcriptional activity during myoblast proliferation. Consequently, when overexpressed in myoblasts, it stimulated terminal differentiation. We suggest that this novel TRalpha variant may act as down regulator of overall T3 receptor activity, including its ability to repress MyoD transcriptional activity during myoblast proliferation.
Classical ligand-activated nuclear receptors (e.g. thyroid hormone receptor, retinoic acid receptor), orphan nuclear receptors (e.g. Rev-erbAalpha/beta), Mad/Max bHLH (basic helix loop helix)-LZ proteins, and oncoproteins, PLZF and LAZ3/BCL6, bind DNA and silence transcription by recruiting a repressor complex that contains N-CoR (nuclear receptor corepressor)/SMRT (silencing mediator of retinoic acid and thyroid hormone receptor), Sin3A/B, and HDAc-1/-2 proteins. The function of the corepressor, N-CoR, in the process of cellular differentiation and coupled phenotypic acquisition, has not been investigated. We examined the functional role of N-CoR in myogenesis (muscle differentiation), an ideal paradigm for the analysis of the determinative events that govern the cell's decision to divide or differentiate. We observed that the mRNA encoding N-CoR was suppressed as proliferating myoblasts exited the cell cycle, and formed morphologically and biochemically differentiated myotubes. Exogenous expression of N-CoR (but not RIP13) in myogenic cells ablated 1) myogenic differentiation, 2) the expression of the myoD gene family that encode the myogenic specific bHLH proteins, and 3) the crucial cell cycle regulator, p21Waf-1/Cip-1 mRNA. Furthermore, N-CoR expression efficiently inhibits the myoD-mediated myogenic conversion of pluripotential C3H10T1/2 cells. We demonstrate that MyoD-mediated transactivation and activity are repressed by N-CoR. The mechanism involves direct interactions between MyoD and N-CoR; moreover, the interaction was dependent on the amino-terminal repression domain (RD1) of N-CoR and the bHLH region of MyoD. Trichostatin A treatment significantly stimulated the activity of MyoD by approximately 10-fold and inhibited the ability of N-CoR to repress MyoD-mediated transactivation, consistent with the involvement of the corepressor and the recruitment of a histone deacteylase activity in the process. This work demonstrates that the corepressor N-CoR is a key regulator of MyoD activity and mammalian differentiation, and that N-CoR has a multifaceted role in myogenesis.
Syndecan-1 is an integral membrane proteoglycan involved in the interaction of cells with extracellular matrix proteins and growth factors. It is transiently expressed in several condensing mesenchymal tissues after epithelial induction. In this study we evaluated the expression of syndecan-1 during skeletal muscle differentiation. The expression of syndecan-1 as determined by Northern blot analyses and immunofluorescence microscopy is down-regulated during differentiation. The transcriptional activity of a syndecan-1 promoter construct is also down-regulated in differentiating muscle cells. The decrease in syndecan-1 gene expression is not dependent on the presence of E-boxes, binding sites for the MyoD family of transcription factors in the promoter region, or myogenin expression. Deletion of the region containing the E-boxes or treatment of differentiating cells with sodium butyrate, an inhibitor of myogenin expression, had no effect on syndecan-1 expression. Basic fibroblast growth factor and transforming growth factor type beta, which are inhibitors of myogenesis, had little effect on syndecan-1 expression. When added together, however, they induced syndecan-1 expression. Retinoic acid, an inducer of myogenesis, inhibited syndecan-1 expression and abolished the effect of the growth factors. These results indicate that syndecan-1 expression is down-regulated during myogenesis and that growth factors and retinoic acid modulate syndecan-1 expression by a mechanism that is independent of myogenin.
Two clonal rat rhabdomyosarcoma cell lines BA-Han-1B and BA-Han-1C with different capacities for myogenic differentiation have been examined for the expression of muscle regulatory basic helix-loop-helix (bHLH) proteins of the MyoD family. Whereas cells of the BA-Han-1C subpopulation constitutively expressed MyoD1 and could be induced to differentiate with retinoic acid (RA), BA-Han-1B cells did not express any of the myogenic control factors and appeared to be largely differentiation-defective. Upon induction with RA, BA-Han-1C cells expressed also myogenin, in contrast to BA-Han-1B cells which never activated any of the genes encoding muscle bHLH factors. The onset of myogenin transcription in BA-Han-1C cells required de novo protein synthesis and DNA replication suggesting that RA probably did not act directly on the myogenin gene. Although MyoD1 was expressed in proliferating BA-Han-1C myoblasts, muscle-specific reporter genes were not activated indicating that MyoD was biologically inactive. However, transfections with plasmid expressing additional MyoD1 protein resulted in the transactivation of muscle genes even in the absence of RA. mRNA encoding the negative regulatory HLH protein Id was expressed in proliferating BA-Han-1C cells and disappeared later after RA induction which suggested that it may be involved in the regulation of MyoD1 activity. The myogenic differentiation of malignant rhabdomyosarcoma cells strictly correlated with the activation of the myogenin gene. In fact, stable transfections of BA-Han-1C cells with myogenin expressing plasmids resulted in spontaneous differentiation. Together, our results suggest that the transformed and undifferentiated phenotype of BA-Han-1C rhabdomyosarcoma cells is associated with the inactivation of the myogenic factor MyoD1 as well as lack of myogenin expression. RA alleviates the inhibition of myogenic differentiation, probably by activating MyoD protein and myogenin gene transcription. BA-Han-1B cells did not respond to RA and the differentiated phenotype could not be restored by overexpression of MyoD1 or myogenin.
Using chicken embryos it is possible to test directly the effects of either growth factors or specific inhibitors of signaling pathways on gene expression and activation of signal transduction pathways. This technique allows the delivery of signaling molecules at precisely defined developmental stages for specific times. After this embryos can be harvested and gene expression examined, for example by in situ hybridization, or activation of signal transduction pathways observed with immunostaining. In this video heparin beads soaked in FGF18 or AG 1-X2 beads soaked in U0126, a MEK inhibitor, are grafted into the limb bud in ovo. This shows that FGF18 induces expression of MyoD and ERK phosphorylation and both endogenous and FGF18 induced MyoD expression is inhibited by U0126. Beads soaked in a retinoic acid antagonist can potentiate premature MyoD induction by FGF18. This approach can be used with a wide range of different growth factors and inhibitors and is easily adapted to other tissues in the developing embryo.
Foxc1a is a member of the forkhead transcription factors. It plays an essential role in zebrafish somitogenesis. However, little is known about the molecular mechanisms underlying its controlling somitogenesis. To uncover how foxc1a regulates zebrafish somitogenesis, we generated foxc1a knock-out zebrafish using TALEN (transcription activator-like effector nuclease) technology. The foxc1a null embryos exhibited defective somites at early development. Analyses on the expressions of the key genes that control processes of somitogenesis revealed that foxc1a controlled early somitogenesis by regulating the expression of myod1. In the somites of foxc1a knock-out embryos, expressions of fgf8a and deltaC were abolished, whereas the expression of aldh1a2 (responsible for providing retinoic acid signaling) was significantly increased. Once the increased retinoic acid level in the foxc1a null embryos was reduced by knocking down aldh1a2, the reduced expression of myod1 was partially rescued by resuming expressions of fgf8a and deltaC in the somites of the mutant embryos. Moreover, a chromatin immunoprecipitation assay on zebrafish embryos revealed that Foxc1a bound aldh1a2 promoter directly. On the other hand, neither knocking down fgf8a nor inhibiting Notch signaling affected the expression of aldh1a2, although knocking down fgf8a reduced expression of deltaC in the somites of zebrafish embryos at early somitogenesis and vice versa. Taken together, our results demonstrate that foxc1a plays an essential role in early somitogenesis by controlling Fgf and Notch signaling through restricting the expression of aldh1a2 in paraxial mesoderm directly.
During limb development Pax3 positive myoblasts delaminate from the hypaxial dermomyotome of limb level somites and migrate into the limb bud where they form the dorsal and ventral muscle masses. Only then do they begin to differentiate and express markers of myogenic commitment and determination such as Myf5 and MyoD. However the signals regulating this process remain poorly characterised. We show that FGF18, which is expressed in the distal mesenchyme of the limb bud, induces premature expression of both Myf5 and MyoD and that blocking FGF signalling also inhibits endogenous MyoD expression. This expression is mediated by ERK MAP kinase but not PI3K signalling. We also show that retinoic acid (RA) can inhibit the myogenic activity of FGF18 and that blocking RA signalling allows premature induction of MyoD by FGF18 at HH19. We propose a model where interactions between FGF18 in the distal limb and retinoic acid in the proximal limb regulate the timing of myogenic gene expression during limb bud development.
Retinoic acid (RA) signaling is important to normal development. However, the function of the different RA receptors (RARs)--RARα, RARβ, and RARγ--is as yet unclear. We have used wild-type and transgenic zebrafish to examine the role of RARγ. Treatment of zebrafish embryos with an RARγ-specific agonist reduced somite formation and axial length, which was associated with a loss of hoxb13a expression and less-clear alterations in hoxc11a or myoD expression. Treatment with the RARγ agonist also disrupted formation of tissues arising from cranial neural crest, including cranial bones and anterior neural ganglia. There was a loss of Sox 9-immunopositive neural crest stem/progenitor cells in the same anterior regions. Pectoral fin outgrowth was blocked by RARγ agonist treatment. However, there was no loss of Tbx-5-immunopositive lateral plate mesodermal stem/progenitor cells and the block was reversed by agonist washout or by cotreatment with an RARγ antagonist. Regeneration of the caudal fin was also blocked by RARγ agonist treatment, which was associated with a loss of canonical Wnt signaling. This regenerative response was restored by agonist washout or cotreatment with the RARγ antagonist. These findings suggest that RARγ plays an essential role in maintaining stem/progenitor cells during embryonic development and tissue regeneration when the receptor is in its nonligated state.
Although proper tongue development is relevant to other structures in the craniofacial region, the molecular details of muscle development in tongue remain poorly understood. Here, we report that pregnant mice treated with retinoic acid (+RA) produce embryos with tongue malformation and a cleft palate. Histological analyses revealed that at E14.5, the tongues of +RA fetuses failed to descend and flatten. Ultrastructural analysis showed that at perinatal stage E18.5, the myofilaments failed to form normal structures of sarcomeres, and arranged disorderly in the genioglossus. The proliferation and levels of myogenic determination markers (Myf5 and MyoD) and myosin in the genioglossus were profoundly reduced. Wnt5a and Camk2d expressions were down-regulated, while levels of Tbx1, Ror2, and PKCδ were up-regulated in the tongues of +RA fetuses. In mock- and Wnt5a-transfected C2C12 (Wnt5a-C2C12) cells, Wnt5a overexpression impaired proliferation, and maintained Myf5 at a relative high level after RA treatment. Furthermore, Wnt5a overexpression positively correlated with levels of Camk2d and Ror2 in C2C12 cells after RA exposure. These data support the hypothesis that the Wnt5a/CaMKII pathway is directly involved in RA-induced hypoplasia and disorder of tongue muscles.
Skeletal muscle stem cells represent an abundant source of autologous cells with potential for regenerative medicine that can be directed to differentiate into multiple lineages including osteoblasts and adipocytes. In the current study, we found that α7 integrin-positive human skeletal muscle stem cells (α7(+)hSMSCs) could differentiate into the odontoblast lineage under specific inductive conditions in response to bone morphogenetic protein-4 (BMP-4). Cell aggregates of FACS-harvested α7(+)hSMSCs were treated in suspension with retinoic acid followed by culture on a gelatin scaffold in the presence of BMP-4. Following this protocol, α7(+)hSMSCs were induced to down-regulate myogenic genes (MYOD and α7 integrin) and up-regulate odontogenic markers including dentin sialophosphoprotein, matrix metalloproteinase-20 (enamelysin), dentin sialoprotein, and alkaline phosphatase but not osteoblastic genes (osteopontin and osteocalcin). Following retinoic acid and gelatin scaffold/BMP-4 treatment, there was a coordinated switch in the integrin expression profile that paralleled odontoblastic differentiation where α1β1 integrin was strongly up-regulated with the attenuation of muscle-specific α7β1 integrin expression. Interestingly, using siRNA knockdown strategies revealed that the differentiation-related expression of the α1 integrin receptor positively regulates the expression of the odontoblastic markers dentin sialophosphoprotein and matrix metalloproteinase-20. These results strongly suggest that the differentiation of α7(+)hSMSCs along the odontogenic lineage is dependent on the concurrent expression of α1 integrin.
When buffalo embryonic stem (ES) cell-like cells that expressed surface markers SSEA-4, TRA-1-60, TRA-1-81, CD9 and CD90 and intracellular markers OCT4, SOX2 and FOXD3, as shown by immunofluorescence, and that expressed REX-1 and NUCLEOSTEMIN as confirmed by RT-PCR, were subjected to suspension culture in hanging drops in absence of LIF and buffalo foetal fibroblast feeder layer support, they differentiated to form three-dimensional embryoid bodies (EBs). Of 231 EBs examined on Day 3 of suspension culture, 141 (61.3 ± 3.09%) were of compact type, whereas 90 (38.4 ± 3.12%) were of cystic type. The cells obtained from EBs were found to express NF-68 and NESTIN (ectodermal lineage), BMP-4 and α-skeletal actin (mesodermal lineage), and α-fetoprotein, GATA-4 and HNF-4 (endodermal lineage). When these EBs were cultured on gelatin-coated dishes, they spontaneously differentiated to several cell types such as epithelial- and neuron-like cells. When EBs were cultured in the presence of 1 or 2% DMSO or 10(-8) M or 10(-7) M retinoic acid for 25 days, ES cells could be directed to form muscle cell-like cells, the identity of which was confirmed by expression of α-actinin by immunofluorescence and of MYF-5, MYOD and MYOGENIN genes by RT-PCR. MYOD was first detected on Day 10 in both treatment groups and on Day 15 in controls, whereas MYOGENIN was first detected on Day 10, Day 15 and Day 25 in the presence of retinoic acid, in the presence of DMSO and in controls, respectively. The present study demonstrates the ability of buffalo ES cell-like cells to undergo directed differentiation to cells of skeletal myogenic lineage.
Human embryonic stem cells (hESCs) are a potential source of material for cell therapy of muscle diseases. To date, it has proven difficult to generate skeletal muscle from hESCs in high yields and within a reasonable timeframe. Further, a hESC-derived Pax3/7-positive skeletal muscle progenitor population has not yet been described. Previous studies have shown that Pax3/7-positive progenitor cells can repopulate the satellite cell niche, indicating the importance of this population for therapy. We sought to optimize the differentiation of hESCs into skeletal muscle in order to characterize myogenesis at a molecular level and shorten the time course. We treated hESCs with retinoic acid (RA) and found an enhancement of skeletal myogenesis, and the expression of the myogenic regulatory factors (MRFs) MyoD and myogenin by day 25. Furthermore, we found that RA treatment expanded the muscle progenitor pool, which occurred as a distinct Pax3(+ve) population prior to MRF expression. Non-skeletal muscle tissue types were not significantly affected. Therefore, we have identified a differentiation pathway in hESCs that provides a skeletal muscle progenitor population which can undergo myogenesis more efficiently. We propose that RA could fit into a directed culture method for deriving skeletal muscle from hESCs.
Polycomb group (PcG) proteins exert essential functions in the most disparate biological processes. The contribution of PcG proteins to cell commitment and differentiation relates to their ability to repress transcription of developmental regulators in embryonic stem (ES) cells and in committed cell lineages, including skeletal muscle cells (SMC). PcG proteins are preferentially removed from transcribed regions, but the underlying mechanisms remain unclear. Here, PcG proteins are found to occupy and repress transcription from an intronic region containing the microRNA miR-214 in undifferentiated SMC. Differentiation coincides with PcG disengagement, recruitment of the developmental regulators MyoD and myogenin, and activation of miR-214 transcription. Once transcribed, miR-214 negatively feeds back on PcG by targeting the Ezh2 3'UTR, the catalytic subunit of the PRC2 complex. miR-214-mediated Ezh2 protein reduction accelerates SMC differentiation and promotes unscheduled transcription of developmental regulators in ES cells. Thus, miR-214 and Ezh2 establish a regulatory loop controlling PcG-dependent gene expression during differentiation.
Understanding stem cell differentiation is essential for the future design of cell therapies. While retinoic acid (RA) is the most potent small molecule enhancer of skeletal myogenesis in stem cells, the stage and mechanism of its function has not yet been elucidated. Further, the intersection of RA with other signalling pathways that stimulate or inhibit myogenesis (such as Wnt and BMP4, respectively) is unknown. Thus, the purpose of this study is to examine the molecular mechanisms by which RA enhances skeletal myogenesis and interacts with Wnt and BMP4 signalling during P19 or mouse embryonic stem (ES) cell differentiation.
Treatment of P19 or mouse ES cells with low levels of RA led to an enhancement of skeletal myogenesis by upregulating the expression of the mesodermal marker, Wnt3a, the skeletal muscle progenitor factors Pax3 and Meox1, and the myogenic regulatory factors (MRFs) MyoD and myogenin. By chromatin immunoprecipitation, RA receptors (RARs) bound directly to regulatory regions in the Wnt3a, Pax3, and Meox1 genes and RA activated a beta-catenin-responsive promoter in aggregated P19 cells. In the presence of a dominant negative beta-catenin/engrailed repressor fusion protein, RA could not bypass the inhibition of skeletal myogenesis nor upregulate Meox1 or MyoD. Thus, RA functions both upstream and downstream of Wnt signalling. In contrast, it functions downstream of BMP4, as it abrogates BMP4 inhibition of myogenesis and Meox1, Pax3, and MyoD expression. Furthermore, RA downregulated BMP4 expression and upregulated the BMP4 inhibitor, Tob1. Finally, RA inhibited cardiomyogenesis but not in the presence of BMP4.
RA can enhance skeletal myogenesis in stem cells at the muscle specification/progenitor stage by activating RARs bound directly to mesoderm and skeletal muscle progenitor genes, activating beta-catenin function and inhibiting bone morphogenetic protein (BMP) signalling. Thus, a signalling pathway can function at multiple levels to positively regulate a developmental program and can function by abrogating inhibitory pathways. Finally, since RA enhances skeletal muscle progenitor formation, it will be a valuable tool for designing future stem cell therapies.
Retinoic acid (RA) plays an essential role in the development of many embryonic tissues, including the developing tetrapod limb bud. At early stages of limb development, RA levels are highest proximally and regulate the migration of myoblasts into the limb. As the premyogenic progenitor cells migrate into the limb and accumulate in premuscle masses, they express Pax3 and Meox2. Myogenic differentiation is initiated by expression of Myf5 and MyoD, and both Pax3 and Meox2 are required for normal Myf5 expression. We show by loss of function using the inhibitor citral, that RA signalling within the limb bud is required to maintain Pax3 and Meox2 in the progenitor and Myf5 and MyoD in the differentiating myoblasts. Treatment with excess RA showed a differential effect: Meox2 and Pax3 showed localised down-regulation of expression in the limb. In contrast, there was a dramatic down-regulation of expression of MyoD, Myf5 and Meox1. The down-regulation of myogenic gene expression in response to inhibition of RA signalling, and differential response to application of excess RA, in the absence of changes to cell proliferation and apoptosis, indicate that myogenic specification and differentiation in the developing limb possess a complex sensitivity to RA concentrations.
P19 embryonic carcinoma cells resemble normal embryonic stem (ES) cells. They generate cardiac and skeletal myocytes in response to retinoic acid (RA) or oxytocin (OT). RA treatment followed by exposure to triiodothyronine (T3) and insulin induces ES cells differentiation into adipocytes and skeletomyocytes. On the other hand, OT (10(-7) M) was reported to inhibit 3T3 preadipocyte maturation. The present work was undertaken to determine whether P19 cells have an adipogenic potential that could be affected by OT. Cells were treated with RA (10(-6) M)/T3+insulin (adipogenic protocol) or 10(-7) M OT (cardiomyogenic protocol), and analyzed by polymerase chain reaction, immunotechniques, and cytochemistry. Oil-Red-O staining and expression of peroxisome proliferator-activated receptor-gamma (PPARgamma) and aP2 indicated the generation of adipocytes in cultures submitted to the adipogenic protocol. Contracting cells were also generated. Cells positive for sarcomeric actinin and negative for cardiac troponin inhibitor (cTpnI) indicated generation of skeletomyocytes, and cTpnI positive cells revealed generation of cardiomyocytes. Levels of cTpnI and of the skeletal marker MyoD were almost similar in both protocols, whereas no Oil-Red-O staining was associated with the cardiomyogenic protocol. Addition of 10(-7) M OT to the adipogenic protocol did not affect Oil-Red-O staining and PPARgamma expression. Interestingly, Oct3/4 pluripotency marker disappeared in the adipogenic protocol but remained expressed in the cardiomyogenic one. P19 cells thus have an adipogenic potential non affected by 10(-7) M OT. RA/T3+insulin combination generates a larger spectrum of mesodermal cell derivatives and is a more potent morphogenic treatment than OT. P19 cells could help investigating mechanisms of cell fate decision during development.
Retinoic acid (RA) has been shown to regulate muscle differentiation in vitro. Here, we have investigated the role of RA signalling during embryonic myogenesis in zebrafish. We have altered RA signalling from gastrulation stages onwards by either inhibiting endogenous RA synthesis using an inhibitor of retinaldehyde dehydrogenases (DEAB) or by addition of exogenous RA. DEAB reduces expression of the myogenic markers myoD and myogenin in somites, whereas RA induces increased expression of these genes and strongly induces premature myoD expression in the presomitic mesoderm (psm). The expression dynamics of myf5 in presomitic and somitic mesoderm suggest that RA promotes muscle differentiation, a role supported by the fact that RA activates expression of fast myosin, while DEAB represses it. We identify Fgf8 as a major relay factor in RA-mediated activation of myogenesis. We show that fgf8 expression in somites and anterior psm is regulated by RA, and find that in the absence of Fgf8 signalling in the acerebellar mutant RA fails to promote myoD expression. We propose that, in the developing embryo, localised synthesis of RA by Raldh2 in the anterior psm and in somites activates fgf8 expression which in turn induces the expression of myogenic genes and fast muscle differentiation.
The btg1 (B-cell translocation gene 1) gene coding sequence was isolated from a translocation break point in a case of B-cell chronic lymphocytic leukaemia. We have already shown that BTG1, considered as an antiproliferative protein, strongly stimulates myoblast differentiation. However, the mechanisms involved in this influence remained unknown. In cultured myoblasts, we found that BTG1 stimulates the transcriptional activity of nuclear receptors (T3 and all-trans retinoic acid receptors but not RXRalpha and PPARgamma), c-Jun and myogenic factors (CMD1, Myf5, myogenin). Immunoprecipitation experiments performed in cells or using in vitro-synthesized proteins and GST pull-down assays established that BTG1 directly interacts with T3 and all-trans retinoic acid receptors and with avian MyoD (CMD1). These interactions are mediated by the transactivation domain of each transcription factor and the A box and C-terminal part of BTG1. NCoR presence induces the ligand dependency of the interaction with nuclear receptors. Lastly, deletion of BTG1 interacting domains abrogates its ability to stimulate nuclear receptors and CMD1 activity, and its myogenic influence. In conclusion, BTG1 is a novel important coactivator involved in the regulation of myoblast differentiation. It not only stimulates the activity of myogenic factors, but also of nuclear receptors already known as positive myogenic regulators.
We evaluated the effects of fasting on the gene expression profile in rat gastrocnemius muscle using a combined cDNA array and RT-PCR approach. Of the 1176 distinct rat genes analyzed on the cDNA array, 114 were up-regulated more than twofold in response to fasting, including all 17 genes related to lipid metabolism present on the membranes and all 10 analyzed components of the proteasome machinery. Only 7 genes were down-regulated more than twofold. On the basis of our analysis of genes on the cDNA array plus the data from our RT-PCR assays, the metabolic adaptations shown by rat gastrocnemius muscle during fasting are reflected by i) increased transcription both of myosin heavy chain (MHC) Ib (associated with type I fibers) and of at least three factors involved in the shift toward type I fibers [p27kip1, muscle LIM protein (MLP), cystein rich protein-2], of which one (MLP) has been shown to enhance the activity of MyoD, which would explain the known increase in the expression of skeletal muscle uncoupling protein-3 (UCP3); ii) increased lipoprotein lipase (LPL) expression, known to trigger UCP3 transcription, which tends, together with the first point, to underline the suggested role of UCP3 in mitochondrial lipid handling (the variations under the first point and this one have not been observed in mice, indicating a species-specific regulation of these mechanisms); iii) reduced expression of the muscle-specific coenzyme Q (CoQ)7 gene, which is necessary for mitochondrial CoQ synthesis, together with an increased expression of mitochondrial adenylate kinase 3, which inactivates the resident key enzyme for CoQ synthesis, 3-hydroxy-3-methylglutaryl CoA reductase (HMGR), the mRNA level for which fell during fasting; and iv) increased transcription of components of the proteasomal pathways involved in protein degradation/turnover.
Limb skeletal muscle is derived from cells of the dermomyotome that detach and migrate into the limb buds to form separate dorsal and ventral myogenic precursor domains. Myogenic precursor cell migration is dependent on limb bud mesenchymal expression of hepatocyte growth factor/scatter factor (Hgf), which encodes a secreted ligand that signals to dermomyotome through the membrane receptor tyrosine kinase Met. Here, we find that correct patterning of Hgf expression in forelimb buds is dependent on retinoic acid (RA) synthesized by retinaldehyde dehydrogenase 2 (Raldh2) expressed proximally. Raldh2(-/-) forelimb buds lack RA and display an anteroproximal shift in expression of Hgf such that its normally separate dorsal and ventral expression domains are joined into a single anterior-proximal domain. Met and MyoD are expressed in this abnormal domain, indicating that myogenic cell migration and differentiation are occurring in the absence of RA, but in an abnormal location. An RA-reporter transgene revealed that RA signaling in the forelimb bud normally exists in a gradient across the proximodistal axis, but uniformly across the anteroposterior axis, with all proximal limb bud cells exhibiting activity. Expression of Bmp4, an inhibitor of Hgf expression, is increased and shifted anteroproximally in Raldh2(-/-) limb buds, thus encroaching into the normal expression domain of Hgf. Our studies suggest that RA signaling provides proximodistal information for limb buds that counterbalances Bmp signaling, which in turn helps mediate proximodistal and anteroposterior patterning of Hgf expression to correctly direct migration of Met-expressing myogenic precursor cells.
Retinoids (all trans and 9-cis retinoic acid) are pleiotropic regulators of cell fate, and have been shown to regulate the expression of helix loop helix transcription factors (e.g MyoD, myogenin and Myf-5) that control myogenic differentiation. The effects of retinoids are mediated through the ligand dependent retinoic acid receptors (RARs) and retinoid X receptors (RXRs). We have found that the messenger RNA transcripts encoding RAR are repressed during differentiation of C2C12 myoblasts while, conversely, RXR mRNA transcripts are induced in C2C12 myotubes. These results imply that RXRs, play a major regulatory role in differentiated muscle.
Myf5 is a member of the MyoD family, a set of four helix-loop-helix transcription factors that controls myogenic differentiation. The Myf5 gene has both in vivo and in vitro expression patterns consistent with an involvement in the first events of myogenesis, such as acquisition and/or maintenance of myogenic "determined" phenotype. To date, very little is known about the mechanism underlying the tight regulation of Myf5 expression. We report here that retinoic acid (RA) reduces the level of Myf5 message in both mouse C2 and rat L6 cell lines, probably at the transcriptional level, because Myf5 mRNA stability is not affected by RA. This repression is dose dependent, starting at 0.1 microM of all-trans RA, and is not abrogated by cycloheximide, suggesting a direct involvement of RA receptors in the control of Myf5 expression. Furthermore, we compared the efficiency of natural (all-trans RA and 9-cis RA) or synthetic (TTNPB) retinoids that differentially activate the two families of RA receptors, RA receptors and retinoid X-receptors (9-cis RA). As 9-cis RA is about 10 times more efficient than all-trans RA in repressing Myf5, whereas TTNPB, which preferentially activates RA receptors, is far less potent, our data provide evidence for an important role of ligand-bound retinoid X-receptors in the mediation of this inhibition.
There is increasing evidence that the biological activity of myostatin (MSTN), a negative regulator of muscle growth, is affected by training but also anabolic steroids. In this study, we analyzed the effects of the frequently abused anabolic steroid methandienone (Md) on the hypothalamic-pituitary-testicular axis and androgen-sensitive tissues in intact rats performing a treadmill training to simulate the situation of abusing athletes. The anabolic effects were correlated with the expression of members of the MSTN signaling cascade. Md treatment resulted in a significant stimulation of anabolic activity of the levator ani muscle, which was further increased by training, while prostate and seminal vesicle weights decreased in conformance with hormone concentrations of LH and testosterone. In gastrocnemius muscle, mRNA expression of genes of the MSTN signaling cascade (MSTN, Smad7 and MyoD) was reduced by training but not after Md treatment, in soleus muscle MSTN and its inhibitors, follistatin (FLST) and Smad-7 were only affected after training in combination with Md treatment. In summary, our data demonstrate that Md treatment of intact rats results in anabolic effects which are enhanced in combination with physical activity. Interestingly, the anabolic activity on the levator ani was increased in combination with training, although the levator ani muscle was not specifically stimulated by our training protocol. In the m. gastrocnemius and soleus, the anabolic effects correlate with changes in the expression patterns of genes involved in MSTN signaling. Our data provide evidence that the decrease in the weight of androgen-sensitive sexual glands, observed after Md treatment, is caused by a suppression of endogenous testosterone synthesis. These observations provide new insights into the molecular mechanisms of the interaction between anabolic steroids, training and MSTN signaling during skeletal muscle adaptation.
We recently reported increased leg lean mass and strength in men with chronic obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD) receiving 10 wk of testosterone (T) and leg resistance training (R) (Casaburi R, Bhasin S, Cosentino L, Porszasz J, Somfay A, Lewis M, Fournier M, Storer T. Am J Respir Crit Care Med 170: 870-878, 2004). The present study evaluates the role of muscle IGF and related factors as potential mechanisms for our findings, using quadriceps muscle biopsies from the same cohort. Patient groups were 1) weekly placebo (P) injections + no R; 2) P and R; 3) weekly injections of T + no R; and 4) T + R (TR). Muscle fibers were classified histochemically, and their cross-sectional areas (CSAs) and fiber density (number of fibers per unit area) were determined. Gene transcripts were determined by real-time PCR and protein expression by RIA. While no significant changes in fiber CSAs were noted across groups, increased trends were observed after 10 wk, and significant decrements in muscle fiber density were noted in all treated groups. A global increase in all myosin heavy chain (MyHC) mRNA isoforms was observed in TR patients. Muscle IGF-IEa and IGF-IEc mRNAs were significantly increased with TR group. Muscle IGF-I protein was increased in all intervention groups (greatest in TR). While TR IGF-II mRNA was increased, protein levels were unaltered. IGF binding protein-4 mRNA was increased with TR. Myogenin mRNA was increased in both T groups, while MyoD and myostatin were unchanged. Muscle atrophy F-box mRNA tended to increase with TR. Our data suggest that the combined interventions produced an enhanced local anabolic milieu driven in large part by the muscle IGF system, despite potentially negative biochemical influences present in COPD patients.
We hypothesized that suppression of endogenous testosterone blunts mRNA expression post strength training (ST). Twenty-two young men were randomized for treatment with the GnRH analogue goserelin (3.6 mg every 4 weeks) or placebo for a period of 12 weeks. The ST period of 8 weeks started at week 4. Strength test, blood sampling, muscle biopsies, and whole-body dual-energy X-ray absorptiometry (DXA) scan were performed at weeks 4 and 12. Muscle biopsies were taken during the final ST session (pre, post 4 h, and post 24 h). Resting serum testosterone decreased significantly (P < 0.01) in the goserelin group from 22.6 +/- 1.6 (mean +/- s.e.m.) to 2.0 +/- 0.1 nmol l(-1) (week 4), whereas it remained unchanged in the placebo group. An acute increase of serum testosterone was observed during the final ST session in the placebo group (P < 0.05), whereas a decreased response was observed in the goserelin group (P < 0.05). mRNA expression of IGF-IE(bc) and myogenin increased, while expression of myostatin decreased (P < 0.01); however, no differences were observed between the groups. Muscle strength and muscle mass showed a tendency to increase more in the placebo group than in the goserelin group (P = 0.05). In conclusion, despite blocked acute responses of testosterone and 10- to 20-fold lower resting levels in the goserelin group, ST resulted in a similar mRNA expression of myoD, myogenin, IGF-IE(abc), myostatin and androgen receptor as observed in the placebo group. Therefore, in the present study, the molecular events were the same, despite divergent muscle hypertrophy and strength gains.
Previous studies of Delta 4-androstene-3,17-dione (4-androstenedione) administration in men have not demonstrated sustained increments in testosterone levels, fat-free mass (FFM), and muscle strength, and failure to demonstrate androstenedione's androgenic/anabolic effects has stifled efforts to regulate its sales. To determine whether 4-androstenedione has androgenic/anabolic properties, we evaluated its association with androgen receptor (AR) and its effects on myogenesis in vitro. Additionally, we studied the effects of a high dose of 4-androstenedione on testosterone levels, FFM, and muscle strength in hypogonadal men. We determined the dissociation constant (K(d)) for 4-androstenedione using fluorescence anisotropy measurement of competitive displacement of fluorescent androgen from AR ligand-binding domain. AR nuclear translocation and myogenic activity of androstenedione were evaluated in mesenchymal, pluripotent C3H10T1/2 cells, in which androgens stimulate myogenesis through an AR pathway. We determined effects of a high dose of androstenedione (500 mg thrice daily) given for 12 wk on FFM, muscle strength, and hormone levels in nine healthy, hypogonadal men. 4-Androstenedione competitively displaced fluorescent androgen from AR ligand-binding domain with a lower affinity than dihydrotestosterone (K(d), 648 +/- 21 and 10 +/- 0.4 nm, respectively). In C3H10T1/2 cells, 4-androstenedione caused nuclear translocation of AR and stimulated myogenesis, as indicated by a dose-dependent increase in myosin heavy chain II+ myotube area and up-regulation of MyoD protein. Stimulatory effects of 4-androstenedione on myosin heavy chain II+ myotubes and myogenic determination factor expression were attenuated by bicalutamide, an AR antagonist. Administration of 1500 mg 4-androstenedione daily to hypogonadal men significantly increased serum androstenedione, total and free testosterone, estradiol, and estrone levels and suppressed SHBG and high-density lipoprotein cholesterol levels. 4-androstenedione administration was associated with significant gains in FFM (+1.7 +/- 0.5 kg; P = 0.012) and muscle strength in bench press (+4.3 +/- 3.1 kg; P = 0.006) and leg press exercises (+18.8 +/- 17.3 kg; P = 0.045). 4-androstenedione is an androgen that binds AR, induces AR nuclear translocation, and promotes myogenesis in vitro, with substantially lower potency than dihydrotestosterone. 4-androstenedione administration in high doses to hypogonadal men increases testosterone levels, FFM, and muscle strength, although at the dose tested, the anabolic effects in hypogonadal men are likely because of its conversion to testosterone.
Testosterone supplementation increases skeletal muscle mass and decreases fat mass; however, the underlying mechanisms are unknown. We hypothesized that testosterone regulates body composition by promoting the commitment of mesenchymal pluripotent cells into myogenic lineage and inhibiting their differentiation into adipogenic lineage. Mouse C3H 10T1/2 pluripotent cells were treated with testosterone (0-300 nM) or dihydrotestosterone (DHT, 0-30 nM) for 0-14 d, and myogenic conversion was evaluated by immunocytochemical staining for early (MyoD) and late (myosin heavy chain II; MHC) myogenic markers and by measurements of MyoD and MHC mRNA and protein. Adipogenic differentiation was assessed by adipocyte counting and by measurements of peroxisomal proliferator-activated receptor gamma 2 (PPAR gamma 2) mRNA and PPAR gamma 2 protein and CCAAT/enhancer binding protein alpha. The number of MyoD+ myogenic cells and MHC+ myotubes and MyoD and MHC mRNA and protein levels increased dose dependently in response to testosterone and DHT treatment. Both testosterone and DHT decreased the number of adipocytes and down-regulated the expression of PPAR gamma 2 mRNA and PPAR gamma 2 protein and CCAAT/enhancer binding protein alpha. Androgen receptor mRNA and protein levels were low at baseline but increased after testosterone or DHT treatment. The effects of testosterone and DHT on myogenesis and adipogenesis were blocked by bicalutamide. Therefore, testosterone and DHT regulate lineage determination in mesenchymal pluripotent cells by promoting their commitment to the myogenic lineage and inhibiting their differentiation into the adipogenic lineage through an androgen receptor-mediated pathway. The observation that differentiation of pluripotent cells is androgen dependent provides a unifying explanation for the reciprocal effects of androgens on muscle and fat mass in men.
Evidence has accumulated that suggests that insulin-like growth factors (IGFs) exert a positive influence on myoblast differentiation. We have undertaken to study the signalling events required for differentiation resulting from type-1 IGF receptor stimulation in C2 myoblasts, where autocrine production of IGF-II was abolished by means of antisense RNA. Exposure of the cells to IGFs leads to a rapid and sustained activation of phosphatidyl-inositol 3-kinase followed by the expression of Myod, myogenin and differentiation. The fungal metabolite, wortmannin, inhibits both PI 3-kinase and muscle differentiation with an IC 50 in the nanomolar range. IGFs are also known to cause a rapid activation of MAP kinase. However, the synthetic inhibitor of MEK, PD098059, which prevents MAP kinase activation, does not affect myoblast differentiation. These results provide evidence that PI 3-kinase, but not MAP kinase, is required for insulin-like growth factor receptor-dependent differentiation of muscle cells.
Skeletal muscle differentiation involves myoblast alignment, elongation, and fusion into multinucleate myotubes, together with the induction of regulatory and structural muscle-specific genes. Here we show that two phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase inhibitors, LY294002 and wortmannin, blocked an essential step in the differentiation of two skeletal muscle cell models. Both inhibitors abolished the capacity of L6E9 myoblasts to form myotubes, without affecting myoblast proliferation, elongation, or alignment. Myogenic events like the induction of myogenin and of glucose carrier GLUT4 were also blocked and myoblasts could not exit the cell cycle, as measured by the lack of mRNA induction of p21 cyclin-dependent kinase inhibitor. Overexpresssion of MyoD in 10T1/2 cells was not sufficient to bypass the myogenic differentiation blockade by LY294002. Upon serum withdrawal, 10T1/2-MyoD cells formed myotubes and showed increased levels of myogenin and p21. In contrast, LY294002-treated cells exhibited none of these myogenic characteristics and maintained high levels of Id, a negative regulator of myogenesis. These data indicate that whereas phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase is not indispensable for cell proliferation or in the initial events of myoblast differentiation, i.e. elongation and alignment, it appears to be essential for terminal differentiation of muscle cells.
The cyclin-dependent-kinase inhibitors p21 and p57 are highly expressed in skeletal muscle where they redundantly control cell cycle arrest during differentiation. We have previously shown that p57 is a target of the myogenic factor MyoD in cells lacking p21. Here we show that MyoD induces p57 at the transcriptional level through a mechanism different from that involved in p21 regulation, since it is E-box-independent and requires new synthesized protein(s). We have identified p73 family members as the factors that mediate the activation of p57 through a 165bp promoter region. The levels of p73 alpha, beta and delta isoforms increase during muscle differentiation both in MyoD-expressing fibroblasts and in spontaneously differentiating C2 myoblasts. Moreover, the expression of a p73 dominant negative mutant interferes with the induction of p57. Finally, each of the isoforms up-regulated by MyoD, even when over-expressed alone, is capable of inducing p57 in p21-lacking fibroblasts. In contrast, the same p73 isoforms, either induced by MyoD or exogenously over-expressed, are unable to activate the expression of p57 in p21-expressing fibroblasts. Our finding that a transfected p57 promoter-reporter construct, unlike the endogenous gene, is responsive to both MyoD and p73 even in these cells, suggests that a cis-acting mechanism, probably involving a repressive chromatin structure, prevents the induction of p57 in p21-expressing fibroblasts.
Myogenic regulatory factors of the MyoD family have the ability to reprogram differentiated cells toward a myogenic fate. In this study, we demonstrate that Six1 or Six4 are required for the reprogramming by MyoD of mouse embryonic fibroblasts (MEFs). Using microarray experiments, we found 761 genes under the control of both Six and MyoD. Using MyoD ChIPseq data and a genome-wide search for Six1/4 MEF3 binding sites, we found significant co-localization of binding sites for MyoD and Six proteins on over a thousand mouse genomic DNA regions. The combination of both datasets yielded 82 genes which are synergistically activated by Six and MyoD, with 96 associated MyoD+MEF3 putative cis-regulatory modules (CRMs). Fourteen out of 19 of the CRMs that we tested demonstrated in Luciferase assays a synergistic action also observed for their cognate gene. We searched putative binding sites on these CRMs using available databases and de novo search of conserved motifs and demonstrated that the Six/MyoD synergistic activation takes place in a feedforward way. It involves the recruitment of these two families of transcription factors to their targets, together with partner transcription factors, encoded by genes that are themselves activated by Six and MyoD, including Mef2, Pbx-Meis and EBF.
The Peg3 (Paternally Expressed Gene 3) imprinted domain is predicted to be regulated through a large number of evolutionarily conserved regions (ECRs) that are localized within its middle 200-kb region. In the current study, we characterized these potential cis-regulatory regions using phylogenetic and epigenetic approaches. According to the results, the majority of these ECRs are potential enhancers for the transcription of the Peg3 domain. Also, these potential enhancers can be divided into two groups based on their histone modification and DNA methylation patterns: ubiquitous and tissue-specific enhancers. Phylogenetic and bioinformatic analyses further revealed that several cis-regulatory motifs are frequently associated with the ECRs, such as the E box, PITX2, NF-κB and RFX1 motifs. A series of subsequent ChIP experiments demonstrated that the trans factor MYOD indeed binds to the E box of several ECRs, further suggesting that MYOD may play significant roles in the transcriptional control of the Peg3 domain. Overall, the current study identifies, for the first time, a set of cis-regulatory motifs and corresponding trans factors that may be critical for the transcriptional regulation of the Peg3 domain.
Emerging studies document the roles of long non-coding RNAs (LncRNAs) in regulating gene expression at chromatin level but relatively less is known how they regulate DNA methylation. Here we identify an lncRNA, Dum (developmental pluripotency-associated 2 (Dppa2) Upstream binding Muscle lncRNA) in skeletal myoblast cells. The expression of Dum is dynamically regulated during myogenesis in vitro and in vivo. It is also transcriptionally induced by MyoD binding upon myoblast differentiation. Functional analyses show that it promotes myoblast differentiation and damage-induced muscle regeneration. Mechanistically, Dum was found to silence its neighboring gene, Dppa2, in cis through recruiting Dnmt1, Dnmt3a and Dnmt3b. Furthermore, intrachromosomal looping between Dum locus and Dppa2 promoter is necessary for Dum/Dppa2 interaction. Collectively, we have identified a novel lncRNA that interacts with Dnmts to regulate myogenesis.
Wnt proteins are secreted cytokines and several Wnts are expressed in the developing somites and surrounding tissues. Without proper Wnt stimulation, the organization of the dermomyotome and myotome can become defective. These Wnt signals received by somitic cells can lead to activation of Pax3/Pax7 and myogenic regulatory factors (MRFs), especially Myf5 and MyoD. However, it is currently unknown whether Wnts activate Myf5 and MyoD through direct targeting of their cis-regulatory elements or via indirect pathways. To clarify this issue, in the present study, we tested the regulation of MyoD cis-regulatory elements by Wnt3a secreted from human embryonic kidney (HEK)-293T cells. We found that Wnt3a activated the MyoD proximal 6.0k promoter (P6P) only marginally, but highly enhanced the activity of the composite P6P plus distal enhancer (DE) reporter through canonical and non-canonical pathways. Further screening of the intervening fragments between the DE and the P6P identified a strong Wnt-response element (WRE) in the upstream -8 to -9k region (L fragment) that acted independently of the DE, but was dependent on the P6P. Deletion of a Pax3/Pax7-targeted site in the L fragment significantly reduced its response to Wnt3a, implying that Wnt3a activates the L fragment partially through Pax3/Pax7 action. Binding of β-catenin and Pax7 to their target sites in the DE and the L fragment respectively was also demonstrated by ChIP. These observations demonstrated the first time that Wnt3a can directly activate MyoD expression through targeting cis-elements in the DE and the L fragment.
An in silico screen for myogenic long noncoding RNAs (lncRNAs) revealed nine lncRNAs that are upregulated more than 10-fold in myotubes versus levels in myoblasts. One of these lncRNAs, MyoD upstream noncoding (MUNC, also known as DRR(eRNA)), is encoded 5 kb upstream of the transcription start site of MyoD, a myogenic transcription factor gene. MUNC is specifically expressed in skeletal muscle and exists as in unspliced and spliced isoforms, and its 5' end overlaps with the cis-acting distal regulatory region (DRR) of MyoD. Small interfering RNA (siRNA) of MUNC reduced myoblast differentiation and specifically reduced the association of MyoD to the DRR enhancer and myogenin promoter but not to another MyoD-dependent enhancer. Stable overexpression of MUNC from a heterologous promoter increased endogenous MyoD, Myogenin, and Myh3 (myosin heavy chain, [MHC] gene) mRNAs but not the cognate proteins, suggesting that MUNC can act in trans to promote gene expression but that this activity does not require an induction of MyoD protein. MUNC also stimulates the transcription of other genes that are not recognized as MyoD-inducible genes. Knockdown of MUNC in vivo impaired murine muscle regeneration, implicating MUNC in primary satellite cell differentiation in the animal. We also discovered a human MUNC that is induced during differentiation of myoblasts and whose knockdown decreases differentiation, suggesting an evolutionarily conserved role of MUNC lncRNA in myogenesis. Although MUNC overlaps with the DRR enhancer, our results suggest that MUNC is not a classic cis-acting enhancer RNA (e-RNA) acting exclusively by stimulating the neighboring MyoD gene but more like a promyogenic lncRNA that acts directly or indirectly on multiple promoters to increase myogenic gene expression.
The early 1980s revelation of cis-acting genomic elements, known as transcriptional enhancers, is still regarded as one of the fundamental discoveries in the genomic field. However, only with the emergence of genome-wide techniques has the genuine biological scope of enhancers begun to be fully uncovered. Massive scientific efforts of multiple laboratories rapidly advanced the overall perception that enhancers are typified by common epigenetic characteristics that distinguish their activating potential. Broadly, chromatin modifiers and transcriptional regulators lay down the essential foundations necessary for constituting enhancers in their activated form. Basing on genome-wide ChIP-sequencing of enhancer-related marks we identified myogenic enhancers before and after muscle differentiation and discovered that MyoD was bound to nearly a third of condition-specific enhancers. Experimental studies that tested the deposition patterns of enhancer-related epigenetic marks in MyoD-null myoblasts revealed the high dependency that a specific set of muscle enhancers have towards this transcriptional regulator. Re-expression of MyoD restored the deposition of enhancer-related marks at myotube-specific enhancers and partially at myoblasts-specific enhancers. Our proposed mechanistic model suggests that MyoD is involved in recruitment of methyltransferase Set7, acetyltransferase p300 and deposition of H3K4me1 and H3K27ac at myogenic enhancers. In addition, MyoD binding at enhancers is associated with PolII occupancy and with local noncoding transcription. Modulation of muscle enhancers is suggested to be coordinated via transcription factors docking, including c-Jun and Jdp2 that bind to muscle enhancers in a MyoD-dependent manner. We hypothesize that distinct transcription factors may act as placeholders and mediate the assembly of newly formed myogenic enhancers.
Haploinsufficiency or mutation of TBX1 is largely responsible for the etiology of physical malformations in individuals with velo-cardio-facial/DiGeorge syndrome (VCFS/DGS/22q11.2 deletion syndrome). TBX1 encodes a transcription factor protein that contains an evolutionarily conserved DNA binding domain termed the T-box that is shared with other family members. All T-box proteins, examined so far, bind to similar but not identical consensus DNA sequences, indicating that they have specific binding preferences. To identify the TBX1 specific consensus sequence, Systematic Evolution of Ligands by Exponential Enrichment (SELEX) was performed. In contrast to other TBX family members recognizing palindrome sequences, we found that TBX1 preferentially binds to a tandem repeat of 5'-AGGTGTGAAGGTGTGA-3'. We also identified a second consensus sequence comprised of a tandem repeat with a degenerated downstream site. We show that three known human disease-causing TBX1 missense mutations (F148Y, H194Q and G310S) do not alter nuclear localization, or disrupt binding to the tandem repeat consensus sequences, but they reduce transcriptional activity in cell culture reporter assays. To identify Tbx1-downstream genes, we performed an in silico genome wide analysis of potential cis-acting elements in DNA and found strong enrichment of genes required for developmental processes and transcriptional regulation. We found that TBX1 binds to 19 different loci in vitro, which may correspond to putative cis-acting binding sites. In situ hybridization coupled with luciferase gene reporter assays on three gene loci, Fgf8, Bmper, Otog-MyoD, show that these motifs are directly regulated by TBX1 in vitro. Collectively, the present studies establish new insights into molecular aspects of TBX1 binding to DNA. This work lays the groundwork for future in vivo studies, including chromatin immunoprecipitation followed by next generation sequencing (ChIP-Seq) to further elucidate the molecular pathogenesis of VCFS/DGS.
Uncoupling protein (UCP) 3 is a mitochondrial inner membrane protein implicated in lipid handling and metabolism of reactive oxygen species. Its transcription is mainly regulated by peroxisome proliferator-activated receptors (PPAR), a family of nuclear hormone receptors. Employing bandshift assays, RNA interference and reporter gene assays we examine an intronic region in the UCP3 gene harboring a cis-element essential for expression in brown adipocytes. We demonstrate binding of SP1 and SP3 to this element which is adjacent to a direct repeat 1 element mediating activation of UCP3 expression by PPARγ agonists. Transactivation mediated by these elements is interdependent and indispensable for UCP3 expression. Systematic deletion uncovered a third binding element, a putative NF1 site, in close proximity to the SP1/3 and PPARγ binding elements. Data mining demonstrated binding of MyoD and Myogenin to this third element in C2C12 cells, and, furthermore, revealed recruitment of p300. Taken together, this intronic region is the main enhancer driving UCP3 expression with SP1/3 and PPARγ as the core factors required for expression.
In higher organisms, gene regulation is controlled by the interplay of non-random combinations of multiple transcription factors (TFs). Although numerous attempts have been made to identify these combinations, important details, such as mutual positioning of the factors that have an important role in the TF interplay, are still missing. The goal of the present work is in silico mapping of some of such associating factors based on their mutual positioning, using computational screening. We have selected the process of myogenesis as a study case, and we focused on TF combinations involving master myogenic TF Myogenic differentiation (MyoD) with other factors situated at specific distances from it. The results of our work show that some muscle-specific factors occur together with MyoD within the range of ±100 bp in a large number of promoters. We confirm co-occurrence of the MyoD with muscle-specific factors as described in earlier studies. However, we have also found novel relationships of MyoD with other factors not specific for muscle. Additionally, we have observed that MyoD tends to associate with different factors in proximal and distal promoter areas. The major outcome of our study is establishing the genome-wide connection between biological interactions of TFs and close co-occurrence of their binding sites.
Identifying gene regulatory elements and their target genes in vertebrates remains a significant challenge. It is now recognized that transcriptional regulatory sequences are critical in orchestrating dynamic controls of tissue-specific gene expression during vertebrate development and in adult tissues, and that these elements can be positioned at great distances in relation to the promoters of the genes they control. While significant progress has been made in mapping DNA binding regions by combining chromatin immunoprecipitation and next generation sequencing, functional validation remains a limiting step in improving our ability to correlate in silico predictions with biological function. We recently developed a computational method that synergistically combines genome-wide gene-expression profiling, vertebrate genome comparisons, and transcription factor binding-site analysis to predict tissue-specific enhancers in the human genome. We applied this method to 270 genes highly expressed in skeletal muscle and predicted 190 putative cis-regulatory modules. Furthermore, we optimized Tol2 transgenic constructs in Xenopus laevis to interrogate 20 of these elements for their ability to function as skeletal muscle-specific transcriptional enhancers during embryonic development. We found 45% of these elements expressed only in the fast muscle fibers that are oriented in highly organized chevrons in the Xenopus laevis tadpole. Transcription factor binding site analysis identified >2 Mef2/MyoD sites within ~200 bp regions in 6 of the validated enhancers, and systematic mutagenesis of these sites revealed that they are critical for the enhancer function. The data described herein introduces a new reporter system suitable for interrogating tissue-specific cis-regulatory elements which allows monitoring of enhancer activity in real time, throughout early stages of embryonic development, in Xenopus.
Skeletal muscle development is orchestrated by the myogenic regulatory factor MyoD, whose activity is blocked in myoblasts by proteins preventing its nuclear translocation and/or binding to G/C-centered E-boxes in target genes. Recent evidence indicates that muscle gene expression is also regulated at the cis level by differential affinity for DNA between MyoD and other E-box binding proteins during myogenesis. MyoD binds to G/C-centered E-boxes, enriched in muscle differentiation genes, in myotubes but not in myoblasts. Here, we used cell-based and in vivo Drosophila, Xenopus laevis, and mouse models to show that ZEB1, a G/C-centered E-box binding transcriptional repressor, imposes a temporary stage-dependent inhibition of muscle gene expression and differentiation via CtBP-mediated transcriptional repression. We found that, contrary to MyoD, ZEB1 binds to G/C-centered E-boxes in muscle differentiation genes at the myoblast stage but not in myotubes. Its knockdown results in precocious expression of muscle differentiation genes and acceleration of myotube formation. Inhibition of muscle genes by ZEB1 occurs via transcriptional repression and involves recruitment of the CtBP corepressor. Lastly, we show that the pattern of gene expression associated with muscle differentiation is accelerated in ZEB1(-/-) mouse embryos. These results set ZEB1 as an important regulator of the temporal pattern of gene expression controlling muscle differentiation.
The bHLH transcription factor MyoD, the prototypical master regulator of differentiation, directs a complex program of gene expression during skeletal myogenesis. The up-regulation of the cdk inhibitor p57kip2 plays a critical role in coordinating differentiation and growth arrest during muscle development, as well as in other tissues. p57kip2 displays a highly specific expression pattern and is subject to a complex epigenetic control driving the imprinting of the paternal allele. However, the regulatory mechanisms governing its expression during development are still poorly understood. We have identified an unexpected mechanism by which MyoD regulates p57kip2 transcription in differentiating muscle cells. We show that the induction of p57kip2 requires MyoD binding to a long-distance element located within the imprinting control region KvDMR1 and the consequent release of a chromatin loop involving p57kip2 promoter. We also show that differentiation-dependent regulation of p57kip2, while involving a region implicated in the imprinting process, is distinct and hierarchically subordinated to the imprinting control. These findings highlight a novel mechanism, involving the modification of higher order chromatin structures, by which MyoD regulates gene expression. Our results also suggest that chromatin folding mediated by KvDMR1 could account for the highly restricted expression of p57kip2 during development and, possibly, for its aberrant silencing in some pathologies.
Myostatin (MSTN) is a negative regulator of skeletal muscle growth and development. There are two types of MSTNs in fish, but little is known about their gene regulation. Here, the 5' flanking fragments of 1029 bp from MSTN-1 and 643 bp from MSTN-2 were cloned, sequenced, and analyzed in Larimichthys crocea. Both fragments contained CAAT box and several putative cis-regulatory elements. However, putative TATA box, MyoD, MEF3, SP1, USF, and GH-CSE sites were identified only in the L. crocea MSTN-1 (lcMSTN-1) promoter. Transcriptional activities of four fragments (1013, 841, 514, and 261 bp) truncated from lcMSTN-1 upstream region and two fragments (643 and 296 bp) from lcMSTN-2 upstream region were examined in vitro, using transient transfection in CIK and L6 cells. In CIK cells, the promoter activity correlated positively with the length of truncated fragments in both MSTN-1 and 2. The lcMSTN-2 promoter showed a higher activity than lcMSTN-1 in the corresponding region, which was consistent with MSTN gene expression in vivo. In L6 cells, lcMSTN-2 upstream showed an extremely high luciferase activity. These data indicated that both cloned 5' flanking sequences contained functional promoters, and that transcription regulation of lcMSTN-1 and 2 promoters was significantly different between mammalian and fish cells.
We performed a genome-wide scan for muscle-specific cis-regulatory modules (CRMs) using three computational prediction programs. Based on the predictions, 339 candidate CRMs were tested in cell culture with NIH3T3 fibroblasts and C2C12 myoblasts for capacity to direct selective reporter gene expression to differentiated C2C12 myotubes. A subset of 19 CRMs validated as functional in the assay. The rate of predictive success reveals striking limitations of computational regulatory sequence analysis methods for CRM discovery. Motif-based methods performed no better than predictions based only on sequence conservation. Analysis of the properties of the functional sequences relative to inactive sequences identifies nucleotide sequence composition can be an important characteristic to incorporate in future methods for improved predictive specificity. Muscle-related TFBSs predicted within the functional sequences display greater sequence conservation than non-TFBS flanking regions. Comparison with recent MyoD and histone modification ChIP-Seq data supports the validity of the functional regions.
The myosin heavy chain gene, MYH(M743-2), is highly expressed in fast muscle fibers of torafugu embryos and larvae, suggesting its functional roles for embryonic and larval muscle development. However, the transcriptional regulatory mechanism involved in its expression remained unknown. Here, we analyzed the 2075bp 5'-flanking region of torafugu MYH(M743-2) to examine the spatial and temporal regulation by using transgenic and transient expression techniques in zebrafish embryos. Combining both transient and transgenic analyses, we demonstrated that the 2075bp 5'-flanking sequences was sufficient for its expression in skeletal, craniofacial and pectoral fin muscles. The immunohistochemical observation revealed that the zebrafish larvae from the stable transgenic line consistently expressed enhanced green fluorescent protein (EGFP) in fast muscle fibers. Promoter deletion analyses demonstrated that the minimum 468bp promoter region could direct MYH(M743-2) expression in zebrafish larvae. We discovered that the serum response factor (SRF)-like binding sites are required for promoting MYH(M743-2) expression and myoblast determining factor (MyoD) and myocyte enhancer factor-2 (MEF2) binding sites participate in the transcriptional control of MYH(M743-2) expression in fast skeletal muscles. We further discovered that MyoD binding sites, but not MEF2, participate in the transcriptional regulation of MYH(M743-2) expression in pectoral fin and craniofacial muscles. These results clearly demonstrated that multiple cis-elements in the 5'-flanking region of MYH(M743-2) function in the transcriptional control of its expression.
Skeletal muscle and kidney enriched inositol phosphatase (SKIP) was identified as a 5'-inositol phosphatase that hydrolyzes PI(3,4,5)P3 to PI(3,4)P2 that negatively regulates insulin-induced phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase signaling in skeletal muscle. In this study, we obtained a 1575-bp mRNA sequence of porcine SKIP that included the full coding region encoding a protein of 450 amino acids. With the use of comparative mapping, we mapped this gene to SSC12 q1.3, where many QTLs affect Backfat thickness at 10th rib, carcass yield, the number of muscle fibers, and ham weight traits. As a candidate gene for growth and carcass traits, a novel single nucleotide polymorphism in exon 12 (G>A) was detected by PCR-RFLP. The results showed that the GG genotype had higher skin percentage (SP), carcass length to first spondyle (CL1), carcass length to first rib (CL2), but lower intramuscular fat (IMF) as compared with genotype AG (P<0.05), and allele G seemed to be associated with an increase in the growth trait. Porcine SKIP was expressed abundantly in skeletal muscle tissue and was transcriptionally upregulated during skeletal muscle differentiation. Analysis of the porcine SKIP promoter sequence demonstrated that MyoD was involved in regulating SKIP mRNA expression in myotubes, partly via the cis-acting elements in SKIP promoter. In summary, we suggested that SKIP might play a role in the regulation of skeletal muscle development in pigs.
Diet-induced weight loss is affected by a wide range of factors, including genetic variation. Identifying functional polymorphisms will help to elucidate mechanisms that account for variation in dietary metabolism. Previously, we reported a strong association between a common single nucleotide polymorphism (SNP) rs2419621 (C>T) in the promoter of acyl-CoA synthetase long chain 5 (ACSL5), rapid weight loss in obese Caucasian females, and elevated ACSL5 mRNA levels in skeletal muscle biopsies. Here, we showed by electrophoretic mobility shift assay (EMSA) that the T allele creates a functional cis-regulatory E-box element (CANNTG) that is recognized by the myogenic regulatory factor MyoD. The T allele promoted MyoD-dependent activation of a 1089-base pair ACSL5 promoter fragment in nonmuscle CV1 cells. Differentiation of skeletal myoblasts significantly elevated expression of the ACSL5 promoter. The T allele sustained promoter activity 48 h after differentiation, whereas the C allele showed a significant decline. These results reveal a mechanism for elevated transcription of ACSL5 in skeletal muscle of carriers of the rs2419621(T) allele, associated with more rapid diet-induced weight loss. Natural selection favoring promoter polymorphisms that reduced expression of catabolic genes in skeletal muscle likely accounts for the resistance of obese individuals to dietary intervention.
In the current study, treatment of the rat osteogenic cell line ROB-C26 cells with fibroblast growth factor 8 (FGF8) stimulated alkaline phosphatase (ALP) activity, and also induced the expression of the Runx2 transcription factor, and increased the activity of a luciferase reporter gene containing the osteocalcin (OCN) promoter and six copies of the osteoblast specific cis-acting element 2 (OSE2) response element. In contrast, FGF8 treatment of the mouse myoblast cell line C2C12 inhibited the expression of desmin and the synthesis of myotubes. The expression of MyoD, Myogenin, Foxc2, and Hand1 was also decreased by FGF8. Transient expression of Foxc2 in C2C12 cells induced the expression of Hand1, and chromatin immunoprecipitation (ChIP) analysis indicated that Foxc2 binds to the promoter region of the Hand1 gene. These results indicated that Foxc2 is directly involved in the regulation of Hand1 expression. The results of the current study indicate that FGF8 regulates myoblast differentiation through the regulation of MyoD expression, and that this regulation is independent of Hand1 in cultured cells. Conversely, FGF8 supports bone development and cell differentiation though the induction of Runx2 expression.
Facioscapulohumeral muscular dystrophy (FSHD) is caused by an unusual deletion with neomorphic activity. This deletion derepresses genes in cis; however which candidate gene causes the FSHD phenotype, and through what mechanism, is unknown. We describe a novel genetic tool, inducible cassette exchange, enabling rapid generation of isogenetically modified cells with conditional and variable transgene expression. We compare the effects of expressing variable levels of each FSHD candidate gene on myoblasts. This screen identified only one gene with overt toxicity: DUX4 (double homeobox, chromosome 4), a protein with two homeodomains, each similar in sequence to Pax3 and Pax7. DUX4 expression recapitulates key features of the FSHD molecular phenotype, including repression of MyoD and its target genes, diminished myogenic differentiation, repression of glutathione redox pathway components, and sensitivity to oxidative stress. We further demonstrate competition between DUX4 and Pax3/Pax7: when either Pax3 or Pax7 is expressed at high levels, DUX4 is no longer toxic. We propose a hypothesis for FSHD in which DUX4 expression interferes with Pax7 in satellite cells, and inappropriately regulates Pax targets, including myogenic regulatory factors, during regeneration.
Myogenin is the dominant transcriptional regulator of embryonic and fetal muscle differentiation and during maturation is profoundly down-regulated. We show that a highly conserved 17-bp DNA cis-acting sequence element located upstream of the myogenin promoter (myogHCE) is essential for postnatal repression of myogenin in transgenic animals. We present multiple lines of evidence supporting the idea that repression is mediated by the Y-box protein MSY-3. Electroporation in vivo shows that myogHCE and MSY-3 are required for postnatal repression. We further show that, in the C2C12 cell culture system, ectopic MSY-3 can repress differentiation, while reduced MSY-3 promotes premature differentiation. MSY-3 binds myogHCE simultaneously with the homeodomain protein Pbx in postnatal innervated muscle. We therefore propose a model in which the myogHCE motif operates as a switch by specifying opposing functions; one that was shown previously is regulated by MyoD and Pbx and it specifies a chromatin opening, gene-activating function at the time myoblasts begin to differentiate; the other includes MYS-3 and Pbx, and it specifies a repression function that operates during and after postnatal muscle maturation in vivo and in myoblasts before they begin to differentiate.
Lactoferrin accelerates bone formation, but the precise cellular mechanism behind this is still unclear. We examined the effect of lactoferrin on the differentiation of pluripotent mesenchymal cells using a typical pluripotent mesenchymal cell line, C2C12. Cells were cultured in low-mitogen differentiation medium to induce cell differentiation, with or without the addition of lactoferrin. The cell lineage was determined by alkaline phosphatase (ALPase) activity, mRNA expression of cellular phenotype-specific markers using real-time polymerase chain reaction (PCR), and protein synthesis using Western blotting. The expression of low-density lipoprotein lipase receptor-related proteins (LRPs) 1 and 2, both lactoferrin receptors, was determined by reverse transcription-PCR. ALPase activity increased after the addition of lactoferrin. The mRNA expression of Runx2, osteocalcin, and Sox9 increased markedly as a result of lactoferrin treatment, whereas the expression of MyoD, desmin, and PPARgamma decreased significantly. Western blots showed that lactoferrin stimulation increased Runx2 and Sox9 proteins, whereas it decreased MyoD and PPARgamma synthesis. C2C12 cells expressed the LRP1 lactoferrin receptor. These results indicate that lactoferrin treatment converts the differentiation pathway of C2C12 cells into the osteoblastic and chondroblastic lineage.
De novo methylation of CpG islands within the promoters of eukaryotic genes is often associated with their transcriptional repression, yet the methylation of CpG islands located downstream of promoters does not block transcription. We investigated the kinetics of mRNA induction, demethylation, and remethylation of the p16 promoter and second-exon CpG islands in T24 cells after 5-aza-2'-deoxycytidine (5-Aza-CdR) treatment to explore the relationship between CpG island methylation and gene transcription. The rates of remethylation of both CpG islands were associated with time but not with the rate of cell division, and remethylation of the p16 exon 2 CpG island occurred at a higher rate than that of the p16 promoter. We also examined the relationship between the remethylation of coding sequence CpG islands and gene transcription. The kinetics of remethylation of the p16 exon 2, PAX-6 exon 5, c-ABL exon 11, and MYF-3 exon 3 loci were examined following 5-Aza-CdR treatment because these genes contain exonic CpG islands which are hypermethylated in T24 cells. Remethylation occurred most rapidly in the p16, PAX-6, and c-ABL genes, shown to be transcribed prior to drug treatment. These regions also exhibited higher levels of remethylation in single-cell clones and subclones derived from 5-Aza-CdR-treated T24 cells. Our data suggest that de novo methylation is not restricted to the S phase of the cell cycle and that transcription through CpG islands does not inhibit their remethylation.
5-Azacytidine (5-aza-CR) and 5-aza-2'-deoxycytidine (5-aza-CdR), analogs of cytidine modified in position 5, were originally developed as antitumor agents, and have been useful in the treatment of both childhood and adult leukemias. These agents are cytotoxic per se, but also induce differentiation in several experimental systems, most notably the induction of muscle, adipocytes, and chondrocytes in cultures of drug-treated mouse embryo fibroblasts. The mechanisms underlying this drug-induced differentiation have been difficult to unravel, a fact which limits the rational design of differentiation therapy as a modulator of cancer using these agents. Induction of new developmental pathways in cultured cells involves stable, heritable changes, presumably of an epigenetic nature. Our early studies demonstrated that changes in methylation of cytosine in DNA occurred concurrently with changes in developmental potential, and that the presence of 5-azacytosine in DNA interfered with the action of DNA methyltransferase. Since DNA methylation is believed to be involved at some level in the regulation of gene expression, the hypothesis was developed that changes in methylation allowed the expression of new genes whose activity initiated new pathways of differentiation. The characterization of this drug-induced system of differentiation has therefore opened the way to identifying genes directly involved in the initiation or modification of pathways of differentiation. The first of these was MyoD, a member of a family of myogenic determination genes. Expression of MyoD in myogenic cell lines has been correlated with loss of methylation at specific sites in the genome, but the critical events leading to expression of MyoD and muscle differentiation are poorly understood. Recent developments in understanding this mechanism are discussed.
The ability of the myogenic determination gene (MyoD1) to convert differentiating human keratinocytes (HaCaT cell-line) to the myogenic pathway and the effect of MyoD1 on the epidermal phenotype was studied in culture and in surface transplants on nude mice. MyoD1 transfection induced the synthesis of myosin, desmin, and vimentin without substantially altering the epidermal differentiation properties (morphology, keratin profile) in vitro nor epidermal morphogenesis (formation of a complex stratified squamous epithelium) in surface transplants, demonstrating the stability of the keratinocyte phenotype. 5-Aza-CdR treatment of these MyoD1-transfected cells had little effect on the cultured cells but a morphologically unstructured epithelium was formed with no indications of typical cell layers including cornification. Since prevention of epidermal strata in transplants was not accompanied by blocked epidermal differentiation markers (keratins K1 and K10, involucrin, and filaggrin), the dissociation of morphogenesis and expression of these markers argues for independently controlled processes. A subpopulation of less adhesive cells, isolated from the 5-aza-CdR treated MyoD1-transfectants, had lost most epithelial characteristics in culture (epidermal keratins, desmosomal proteins, and surface-glycoprotein Gp90) and had shifted to a mesenchymal/myogenic phenotype (fibroblastic morphology, transactivation of Myf3 and myogenin, expression of myosin, desmin, vimentin, and Gp130). Moreover, the cells had lost the ability to stratify and remained as a monolayer of flat elongated cells in transplants. These subsequent changes from a fully differentiated keratinocyte to a mesenchymal/myogenic phenotype strongly argue for a complex "transdifferentiation" process which occurred in the original monoclonal human epidermal HaCaT cells.
The present study evaluated low-level laser therapy (LLLT) effects on some physiological pathways that may lead to muscle damage or regeneration capacity in dystrophin-deficient muscle cells of mdx mice, the experimental model of Duchenne muscular dystrophy (DMD). Primary cultures of mdx skeletal muscle cells were irradiated only one time with laser and analyzed after 24 and 48 hours. The LLLT parameter used was 830 nm wavelengths at 5 J/cm² fluence. The following groups were set up: Ctrl (untreated C57BL/10 primary muscle cells), mdx (untreated mdx primary muscle cells), mdx LA 24 (mdx primary muscle cells - LLLT irradiated and analyzed after 24 h), and mdx LA 48 (mdx primary muscle cells - LLLT irradiated and analyzed after 48 h). The mdx LA 24 and mdx LA 48 groups showed significant increase in cell proliferation, higher diameter in muscle cells and decreased MyoD levels compared to the mdx group. The mdx LA 48 group showed significant increase in Myosin Heavy Chain levels compared to the untreated mdx and mdx LA 24 groups. The mdx LA 24 and mdx LA 48 groups showed significant increase in [Ca2+]i. The mdx group showed significant increase in H2O2 production and 4-HNE levels compared to the Ctrl group and LLLT treatment reduced this increase. GSH levels and GPx, GR and SOD activities increased in the mdx group. Laser treatment reduced the GSH levels and GR and SOD activities in dystrophic muscle cells. The mdx group showed significant increase in the TNF-α and NF-κB levels, which in turn was reduced by the LLLT treatment. Together, these results suggest that the laser treatment improved regenerative capacity and decreased inflammatory response and oxidative stress in dystrophic muscle cells, indicating that LLLT could be a helpful alternative therapy to be associated with other treatment for dystrophinopathies.
It is known that non-cachectic patients with chronic obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD) respond well to pulmonary rehabilitation, but whether cachectic COPD patients are capable of adaptive responses is both important and unknown. 10 cachectic and 19 non-cachectic COPD patients undertook high-intensity cycling training, at the same relative intensity, for 45 min x day(-1), 3 days x week(-1) for 10 weeks. Before and after rehabilitation vastus lateralis muscle biopsies were analysed morphologically and for the expression of muscle remodelling factors (insulin-like growth factor (IGF)-I, myogenic differentiation factor D (MyoD), tumour necrosis factor (TNF)-alpha, nuclear factor (NF)-kappaB and myostatin) and key components of ubiquitin-mediated proteolytic systems (muscle ring finger protein (MURF)-1 and Atrogin-1). Rehabilitation improved peak work-rate and the 6-min walk distance similarly in non-cachectic (18+/-3% and 42+/-13 m, respectively) and cachectic (16+/-2% and 53+/-16 m, respectively) patients, but quality of life only improved in non-cachectic COPD. Mean muscle fibre cross-sectional area increased in both groups, but significantly less in cachectic (7+/-2%) than in non-cachectic (11+/-2%) patients. Both groups equally decreased the proportion of type IIb fibres and increased muscle capillary/fibre ratio. IGF-I mRNA expression increased in both groups, but IGF-I protein levels increased more in non-cachectic COPD. MyoD was upregulated, whereas myostatin was downregulated at the mRNA and protein level only in non-cachectic patients. Whilst rehabilitation had no effect on TNF-alpha expression, it decreased the activation of the transcription factor NF-kappaB in both groups by the same amount. Atrogin-1 and MURF-1 expression were increased in cachectic COPD, but it was decreased in non-cachectic patients. Cachectic COPD patients partially retain the capacity for peripheral muscle remodelling in response to rehabilitation and are able to increase exercise capacity as much as those without cachexia, even if they exhibit both quantitative and qualitative differences in the type of muscle fibre remodelling in response to exercise training.
Skeletal muscle wasting commonly occurs in patients with chronic obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD) and has been associated with the presence of systemic inflammation. This study investigated whether rehabilitative exercise training decreases the levels of systemic or local muscle inflammation or reverses the abnormalities associated with muscle deconditioning.
Fifteen patients with COPD (mean (SE) forced expiratory volume in 1 s 36 (4)% predicted) undertook high-intensity exercise training 3 days/week for 10 weeks. Before and after the training programme the concentration of tumour necrosis factor alpha (TNFalpha), interleukin-6 (IL-6) and C-reactive protein (CRP) in plasma was determined by ELISA, and vastus lateralis mRNA expression of TNFalpha, IL-6, total insulin-like growth factor-I (IGF-I) and its isoform mechanogrowth factor (MGF) and myogenic differentiation factor D (MyoD) were assessed by real-time PCR. Protein levels of TNFalpha, IGF-I and MyoD were measured by Western blotting.
Rehabilitation improved peak exercise work rate by 10 (2%) (p = 0.004) and mean fibre cross-sectional area from 4061 (254) microm(2) to 4581 (241) microm(2) (p = 0.001). Plasma inflammatory mediators and vastus lateralis expression of TNFalpha and IL-6 were not significantly modified by training. In contrast, there was a significant increase in mRNA expression of IGF-I (by 67 (22)%; p = 0.044), MGF (by 67 (15)%; p = 0.002) and MyoD (by 116 (30)%; p = 0.001). The increase observed at the mRNA level was also seen at the protein level for IGF-I (by 72 (36)%; p = 0.046) and MyoD (by 67 (21)%; p = 0.012).
Pulmonary rehabilitation can induce peripheral muscle adaptations and modifications in factors regulating skeletal muscle hypertrophy and regeneration without decreasing the levels of systemic or local muscle inflammation.
The study evaluates the influence of monocytes/macrophages in the mechanisms of skeletal muscle injury using a mouse model and selective depletion of peripheral monocyte with systemic injections of liposomal clodronate (dichloromethylene bisphosphonate). This pharmacological treatment has been demonstrated to induce specific apoptotic death in monocytes and phagocytic macrophages. In the current studies, the liposomal clodronate injections resulted in a marked attenuation of the peak inflammatory response in the freeze-injured muscle in the first three days after injury. The effect was accompanied by a transient reduction (at day 1 or 3 postinjury) of the expression of several genes coding for inflammatory, as well as growth-related mediators, including TNF, monocyte chemoattractant protein (MCP)-1, thioredoxin, high-mobility group AT-hook 1, insulin-like growth factor-binding protein (IGFBP), and IGF-1. In contrast, the expression of major myogenic factors (i.e., MyoD and myogenin) directly involved in the activation/proliferation and differentiation of muscle precursor cells was not altered by the clodronate liposome treatment. The repair process in the injured muscle of clodronate liposome-treated mice was characterized by prolonged clearance of necrotic myofibers and a tendency for increased muscle fat accumulation at day 9 and 14 postinjury, respectively. In conclusion, a significant reduction of the initial monocyte/macrophage influx into the injured muscle is associated with not improved, but moderately impaired, repair processes after skeletal muscle injury.
T(3) regulates energy metabolism by stimulating metabolic rate and decreasing metabolic efficiency. The discovery of mitochondrial uncoupling protein 3 (UCP3), its homology to UCP1, and regulation by T(3) rendered it a possible molecular determinant of the action of T(3) on energy metabolism, but data are controversial. This controversy may in part be attributable to discrepancies observed between the regulation by T(3) of UCP3 expression in rats, humans, and mice. To clarify this issue, we studied 1) the induction kinetics of the UCP3 gene by T(3) in rat skeletal muscle, 2) the influence of fatty acids, and 3) the structure and regulation of the various UCP3 promoters by T(3). Within 8 h of single-dose T(3) administration, hypothyroid rats showed a rise in serum fatty acid levels concomitant with a rapid increase in UCP3 expression in gastrocnemius muscle, followed by inductions of peroxisome proliferator activated receptor delta (PPARdelta) (within 24 h) and PPAR target gene expression (after 24 h). This T(3)-induced early UCP3 expression depended on fatty acid-PPAR signaling because depleting serum fatty acid levels abolished its expression, restorable by administration of the PPARdelta agonist L165,041 (4-[3-(4-acetyl-3-hydroxy-2-propylphenoxy)propoxy]phenoxy]acetic acid). In transfected rat L6 myoblasts, only the rat UCP3 promoter positively responded to T(3) and L165,041 together in the presence of MyoD, thyroid hormone receptor beta1 (TRbeta1), PPARdelta, or PPARdelta plus the TR dimerization partner retinoid X receptor alpha. All promoters share a response element common to TR and PPAR (TRE 1), but the observed species differences may be attributable to different localizations of the MyoD response element, which in the rat maps to exon 1.
Although physical interactions with other receptors have been reported, heterodimeric complexes of T(3) nuclear receptors (TR) with retinoid X receptors (RXRs) are considered as major regulators of T(3) target gene expression. However, despite the potent T(3) influence in proliferating myoblasts, RXR isoforms are not expressed during proliferation, raising the question of the nature of the complex involved in TRalpha transcriptional activity. We have previously established that c-Jun induces TRalpha1 transcriptional activity in proliferating myoblasts not expressing RXR. This regulation is specific to the muscle lineage, suggesting the involvement of a muscle-specific factor. In this study, we found that MyoD expression in HeLa cells stimulates TRalpha1 activity, an influence potentiated by c-Jun coexpression. Similarly, in the absence of RXR, MyoD or c-Jun overexpression in myoblasts induces TRalpha1 transcriptional activity through a direct repeat 4 or an inverted palindrome 6 thyroid hormone response element. The highest rate of activity was recorded when c-Jun and MyoD were coexpressed. Using c-Jun-negative dominants, we established that MyoD influence on TRalpha1 activity needs c-Jun functionality. Furthermore, we demonstrated that TRalpha1 and MyoD physically interact in the hinge region of the receptor and the transactivation and basic helix loop helix domains of MyoD. RXR expression (spontaneously occurring at the onset of myoblast differentiation) in proliferating myoblasts abrogates these interactions. These data suggest that in the absence of RXR, TRalpha1 transcriptional activity in myoblasts is mediated through a complex including MyoD and c-Jun.
Mammals have two major isoforms of acetyl-CoA carboxyase (ACC). The 275 kDa beta-form (ACCbeta) is predominantly in heart and skeletal muscle while the 265 kDa alpha-form (ACCalpha) is the major isoform in lipogenic tissues such as liver and adipose tissue. ACCbeta is thought to control fatty acid oxidation by means of the ability of malonyl-CoA to inhibit carnitine palmitoyl-CoA transferase-1 (CPT-1), which is a rate-limiting enzyme of fatty acid oxidation in mitochondria. Previously, it was reported that MyoD and other muscle regulating factors (MRFs) up-regulate the expression of ACCbeta by interactions between these factors and several cis-elements of ACCbeta promoter. We described here that ACCbeta expression mediated by MRFs is regulated by retinoic acids. Endogenous expression of ACCbeta in differentiated H9C2 myotube was significantly increased by retinoic acid treatment. However, on transient transfection assay in H9C2 myoblast, ACCbeta promoter activity was suppressed by RXRalpha and more severely by RARalpha. These effects on ACCbeta expression in myoblasts and myotubes by RXRalpha and RARalpha seem to be mediated by their interactions with MRFs because no consensus sequence for RXRalpha and RARalpha has been found in ACCbeta promoter and retinoic acid receptors did not affect this promoter activities by itself. In transient transfection in NIH3T3 fibroblast, the activation of ACCbeta promoter by MyoD, main MRF in myoblast, was significantly suppressed by RARalpha and to a less extent by RXRalpha while the RXRalpha drastically augmented the activation by MRF4, major MRF in myotube. These results explained that retinoic acids differentially affected the action of MRFs according to their types and RXRalpha specially elevates the expression of muscle specific genes by stimulating the action of MRF4.
Rev-erbA alpha is an orphan steroid receptor that is expressed in skeletal muscle. Rev-erbA alpha binds to single/tandem copies of an AGGTCA motif, is transcribed on the noncoding strand of the c-erbA- alpha gene locus, and is postulated to modulate the thyroid hormone (T3) response. T3 induces terminal muscle differentiation and regulates fiber type composition via direct activation of the muscle-specific myoD gene family (e.g. myoD, myogenin). The myoD gene family can direct the fate of mesodermal cell lineages and activate muscle differentiation. Hence we investigated the expression and physiological role of Rev-erbA alpha during myogenesis. We observed abundant levels of Rev-erbA alpha mRNA in dividing C2C12 myoblasts, which were suppressed when the cells differentiated into postmitotic multinucleated myotubes. This decrease in Rev-erbA alpha mRNA correlated with the appearance of muscle-specific mRNAs (e.g. myogenin and alpha-actin). Constitutive overexpression of full length Rev-erbA alpha cDNA in the myogenic cells completely abolished differentiation, suppressed myoD mRNA levels, and abrogated the induction of myogenin mRNA. We then demonstrated that 1) GAL4-REV-erbA alpha chimeras that contain the 'AB' region and lack the 'E' region activated transcription of GAL4 response elements in the presence of 8-Br-cAMP and 2) the ligand-binding domain (LBD) contains an active transcriptional silencer. Overexpression of Rev-erbA alpha (delta AB) in myogenic cells had no impact on the ability of these cells to morphologically or biochemically differentiate. Furthermore, this orphan receptor 1) down-regulated thyroid hormone receptor (TR)/T3 mediated transcriptional activity from the myogenin promoter and thyroid hormone response element (TRE) an 2) disrupted TR homodimer and TR/retinoid X receptor (RXR) heterodimer formation on a number of TREs found in the myoD gene family. In conclusion, Rev-erbA alpha functions as a negative regulator of myogenesis by targeting the expression of the myoD gene family. The mechanism of action may involve inhibition of functional TR/RXR heterodimer formation on critical TREs and dominant trans-repression of gene expression.
COUP-TF II is an 'orphan steroid receptor' that binds a wide variety of AGGTCA repeats and represses thyroid hormone (T3) and retinoid dependent trans-activation; however, very little is known of its functional and/or developmental role during mammalian cell differentiation. T3 and retinoids have been demonstrated to promote terminal muscle differentiation via activation of the muscle specific myoD gene family (myoD, myogenin, myf-5 and MRF-4). The myoD gene family can direct the fate of mesodermal cell lineages, repress proliferation, activate differentiation and the contractile phenotype. Hence, we investigated the expression and functional role of COUP-TF II during muscle differentiation. Proliferating C2C12 myoblasts expressed COUP-TF II mRNA which was repressed when cells were induced to differentiate into post-mitotic multinucleated myotubes by serum withdrawal. Concomitant with the decrease of COUP-TF II mRNA was the appearance of muscle specific mRNAs (e.g. myogenin, alpha-actin). We show that Escherichia coli expressed full length and truncated COUP-TF II bound in a sequence specific manner to the T3 response elements (TREs) in the myoD and myogenin regulatory HLH genes [Olson (1992) Dev. Biol. 154, 261-272]; and the TRE in the skeletal alpha-actin contractile protein gene. COUP-TF II diminished the homodimeric binding of the thyroid hormone receptor and the heterodimeric binding of thyroid hormone and retinoid X receptor complexes to these TREs. Constitutive over-expression of COUP-TF II cDNA in mouse C2C12 myogenic cells suppressed the levels of myoD mRNA and blocked the induction of myogenin mRNA, whereas constitutive expression of anti-sense COUP-TF II cDNA significantly increased the steady state levels of myoD mRNA and hyper-induced myogenin mRNA. These studies demonstrate for the first time (i) that COUP-TF II, functions as a physiologically relevant antagonistic regulator of myogenesis via direct effects on the myoD gene family and (ii) direct evidence for the developmental role of COUP-TF II during mammalian cell differentiation.
Thyroid hormones are major determinants of skeletal muscle differentiation in vivo. Triiodo-L-thyronine treatment promotes terminal muscle differentiation and results in increased MyoD gene transcription in myogenic cell lines; furthermore myoD and fast myosin heavy chain gene expression are activated in rodent slow twitch muscle fibers (Molecular Endocrinology 6: 1185-1194, 1992; Development 118: 1137-1147, 1993). We have identified a T3 response element (TRE) in the mouse MyoD promoter between nucleotide positions -337 and -309 (5' CTGAGGTCAGTACAGGCTGGAGGAGTAGA 3'). This sequence conferred an appropriate T3 response to an enhancerless SV40 promoter. In vitro binding studies showed that the thyroid hormone receptor alpha (TR alpha) formed a heterodimeric complex, with either the retinoid X receptor alpha or gamma 1 isoforms (RXR alpha, RXR gamm), on the MyoD TRE that was specifically competed by other well characterised TREs and not by other response elements. Analyses of this heterodimer with a battery of steroid hormone response elements indicated that the complex was efficiently competed by a direct repeat of the AGGTCA motif separated by 4 nucleotides as predicted by the 3-4-5 rule. EMSA experiments demonstrated that the nuclear factor(s) present in muscle cells that bound to the myoD TRE were constitutively expressed during myogenesis; this complex was competed by the myosin heavy chain, DR-4 and PAL-0 TREs in a sequence specific fashion. Western blot analysis indicated that TR alpha 1 was constitutively expressed during C2C12 differentiation. Mutagenesis of the myoD TRE indicated that the sequence of the direct repeats (AGGTCA) and the 4 nucleotide gap were necessary for efficient binding to the TR alpha/RXR alpha heterodimeric complex. In conclusion our data suggest that the TRE in the helix loop helix gene, myoD, is a target for the direct heterodimeric binding of TR alpha and RXR alpha/gamma. These results provide a molecular mechanism/model for the effects of triiodo-L-thyronine on in vitro myogenesis; the activation of myoD gene expression in the slow twitch fibres and the cascade of myogenic events regulated by thyroid hormone.
An adequate vitamin D status is essential to optimize muscle strength. However, whether vitamin D directly reduces muscle fiber atrophy or stimulates muscle fiber hypertrophy remains subject of debate. A mechanism that may affect the role of vitamin D in the regulation of muscle fiber size is the local conversion of 25(OH)D to 1,25(OH)2 D by 1α-hydroxylase. Therefore, we investigated in a murine C2C12 myoblast culture whether both 1,25(OH)2 D3 and 25(OH)D3 affect myoblast proliferation, differentiation, and myotube size and whether these cells are able to metabolize 25(OH)D3 and 1,25(OH)2 D3 . We show that myoblasts not only responded to 1,25(OH)2 D3 , but also to the precursor 25(OH)D3 by increasing their VDR mRNA expression and reducing their proliferation. In differentiating myoblasts and myotubes 1,25(OH)2 D3 as well as 25(OH)D3 stimulated VDR mRNA expression and in myotubes 1,25(OH)2 D3 also stimulated MHC mRNA expression. However, this occurred without notable effects on myotube size. Moreover, no effects on the Akt/mTOR signaling pathway as well as MyoD and myogenin mRNA levels were observed. Interestingly, both myoblasts and myotubes expressed CYP27B1 and CYP24 mRNA which are required for vitamin D3 metabolism. Although 1α-hydroxylase activity could not be shown in myotubes, after treatment with 1,25(OH)2 D3 or 25(OH)D3 myotubes showed strongly elevated CYP24 mRNA levels compared to untreated cells. Moreover, myotubes were able to convert 25(OH)D3 to 24R,25(OH)2 D3 which may play a role in myoblast proliferation and differentiation. These data suggest that skeletal muscle is not only a direct target for vitamin D3 metabolites, but is also able to metabolize 25(OH)D3 and 1,25(OH)2 D3 . J. Cell. Physiol. 231: 2517-2528, 2016. © 2016 The Authors. Journal of Cellular Physiology Published by Wiley Periodicals, Inc.
The myogenic differentiation 1 (MyoD) gene is a master regulator of myogenesis. We previously reported that the expression of MyoD mRNA oscillates over 24 h in skeletal muscle and that the circadian clock transcription factors, BMAL1 (brain and muscle ARNT-like 1) and CLOCK (circadian locomotor output cycles kaput), were bound to the core enhancer (CE) of the MyoD gene in vivo. In this study, we provide in vivo and in vitro evidence that the CE is necessary for circadian expression of MyoD in adult muscle. Gel shift assays identified a conserved non-canonical E-box within the CE that is bound by CLOCK and BMAL1. Functional analysis revealed that this E-box was required for full activation by BMAL1/CLOCK and for in vitro circadian oscillation. Expression profiling of muscle of CE(loxP/loxP) mice found approximately 1300 genes mis-expressed relative to wild-type. Based on the informatics results, we analyzed the respiratory function of mitochondria isolated from wild-type and CE(loxP/loxP) mice. These assays determined that State 5 respiration was significantly reduced in CE(loxP/loxP) muscle. The results of this work identify a novel element in the MyoD enhancer that confers circadian regulation to MyoD in skeletal muscle and suggest that loss of circadian regulation leads to changes in myogenic expression and downstream mitochondrial function.
Machado-Joseph disease (MJD) is a neurodegenerative disorder, caused by the expansion of the (CAG)n tract in the MJD gene. This encodes the protein ataxin-3, of unknown function. The mouse Mjd gene has a structure similar to that of its human counterpart and it also contains a TATA-less promoter. Its 5' flanking region contains conserved putative binding regions for transcription factors Sp1, USF, Arnt, Max, E47, and MyoD. Upon differentiation of P19 cells, the Mjd gene promoter is preferentially activated in endodermal and mesodermal derivatives, including cardiac and skeletal myocytes; and less so in neuronal precursors. Mouse ataxin-3 is ubiquitously expressed during embryonic development and in the adult, with strong expression in regions of the CNS affected in MJD. It is particularly abundant in all types of muscle and in ciliated epithelial cells, suggesting that it may be associated with the cytoskeleton and may have an important function in cell structure and/or motility.
Lysosomal sialidase is required for the catabolism of sialoglycoconjugates such as gangliosides and deficiency in this enzyme results in the autosomal recessive disease sialidosis. Furthermore, we have shown that overexpression of human sialidase is sufficient to clear accumulated ganglioside in Tay-Sachs neuroglia [Hum. Mol. Genet. 8 (1999) 1111]. In this paper, we have characterized the 5' regulatory region of the mouse lysosomal sialidase gene in order to understand the molecular mechanisms regulating its expression. We used bioinformatic approaches to identify a transcriptional initiation site at -45 bp relative to the ATG and significant sequence homology with the rat and human promoters. Expression by the promoter was found to be cell-type restricted and required at least 750 bp upstream of the ATG for high-level expression. DNAse I footprinting analysis and reporter gene assays indicated that the promoter is responsive to Sp-1. We discovered a CCAAT box and four E-boxes within the mouse upstream region and demonstrated that CCAAT displacement protein as well as the muscle regulatory factors MyoD and Myf-5 influence sialidase expression. Taken together, these results identify cis- and trans-acting factors involved in the regulation of sialidase and point to mechanisms of gene upregulation.
Glycerol kinase (GK) is at the interface of fat and carbohydrate metabolism and has been linked to obesity and type 2 diabetes mellitus (T2DM). The purpose of this study was to investigate the role of GK in fat metabolism and insulin signaling in skeletal muscle (an important end organ tissue in T2DM). Microarray analysis determined that there were 525 genes that were differentially expressed (1.2-fold, p value<0.05) between knockout (KO) and wild-type (WT) mice. Quantitative PCR (qPCR) confirmed the differential expression of genes including glycerol kinase (Gyk), phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase regulatory subunit, polypeptide 1 (p85 alpha) (Pik3r1), insulin-like growth factor 1 (Igf1), and growth factor receptor bound protein 2-associated protein 1 (Gab1). Network component analysis demonstrated that transcription factor activities of myogenic differentiation 1 (MYOD), myogenic regulatory factor 5 (MYF5), myogenin (MYOG), nuclear receptor subfamily 4, group A, member 1 (NUR77) are decreased in the Gyk KO whereas the activity of paired box 3 (PAX3) is increased. The activity of MYOD was confirmed using a DNA binding assay. In addition, myoblasts from Gyk KO had less ability to differentiate into myotubes compared to WT myoblasts. These findings support our previous studies in brown adipose tissue and demonstrate that the role of Gyk in muscle is due in part to its non-metabolic (moonlighting) activities.
KK mice are genetically diabetic animals, showing glucose intolerance and insulin resistance. We examined the effects of 3,3',5-triiodo-L-thyronine (T3) on the blood glucose level and on mRNA levels of muscle cell differentiation markers in hyperglycemic KK mice. T3 treatment (T1, 1 mg; T3, 3 mg; T10, 10 mg/kg/day) of KK mice for 4 days caused a decrease in blood glucose level by 11%, 25%, and 24%, respectively, without affecting body weight. Skeletal muscle of mice treated with T3 (T10) showed a 98% increase in the mRNA level of the glucose transporter isotype 4 (Glut4). In contrast, T3 treatment did not affect the mRNA level of the isotype 1 (Glut1) transporter. The mRNA level of a muscle cell specific differentiation marker, MyoD, showed a significant increase in the T3 treatment group with an accompanying enhancement of glyceraldehyde-3-phosphate dehydrogenase (GAPDH) mRNA level. These results suggest that T3 stimulates muscle cell differentiation in vivo, concomitant with a stimulation of cellular glucose metabolism, thus decreasing the blood glucose level in hyperglycemic KK mice.
Insulin resistance is a predictor of the development of noninsulin-dependent diabetes mellitus (NIDDM) in humans. It is unclear whether insulin resistance is a primary defect leading to NIDDM or the result of hyperinsulinemia and hyperglycemia. To determine if insulin resistance is the result of extrinsic factors such as hyperinsulinemia primary skeletal muscle cell cultures were established from muscle biopsies from Pima Indians with differing in vivo insulin sensitivities. These cell cultures expressed a variety of muscle-specific phenotypes including the proteins alpha-actinin and myosin, muscle-specific creatine kinase activity, and RNA encoding GLUT4, MYF5, MYOD1, and MYOGENIN. Labeled glucose was used to measure the insulin-stimulated conversion of glucose to glycogen in these cultures. The in vivo rates of insulin-stimulated glycogen production (insulin resistance) were correlated with in vitro measures of glycogen production (P = 0.007, r = 0.58). This defect in insulin action is stable in a uniform culture environment and is retained over time. The retention of insulin resistance in myoblast derived cell cultures is consistent with the expression of an underlying biochemical defect in insulin resistant skeletal muscle.
The helix-loop-helix (HLH) family of transcriptional regulatory proteins are key regulators in numerous developmental processes. The class I HLH proteins, such as E12 are ubiquitously expressed. Class II HLH proteins, such as MyoD, are expressed in a tissue-specific manner. Class I and II heterodimers can bind to E-boxes (CANNTG) and regulate lineage commitments of embryonic cells. In an attempt to identify partners for the E12 protein that may exert control during liver development, we performed the yeast 2-hybrid screen using an expression complementary DNA library from human fetal liver. A novel dominant inhibitory HLH factor, designated HHM (human homologue of maid), was isolated and characterized. HHM is structurally related to the Id family and was highly expressed in brain, pituitary gland, lung, heart, placenta, fetal liver, and bone marrow. HHM physically interacted with E12 in vitro and in mammalian cells. Comparison of the dominant inhibitory effects of HHM and Id2 on the binding of E12/MyoD dimer to an E-box element revealed a weaker inhibition by HHM. However, HHM but not Id2 specifically inhibited the luciferase gene activation induced by hepatic nuclear factor 4 (HNF4) promoter. The HHM was transiently expressed during stem-cell-driven regeneration of the liver at the stage in which the early basophilic foci of hepatocytes started to appear. These results suggest that HHM is a novel type of dominant inhibitory HLH protein that might modulate liver-specific gene expression.
The zebrafish fushi tarazu factor-1a (ff1a) is a transcription factor belonging to the NR5A subgroup of nuclear receptors. The NR5A receptors bind DNA as monomers and are considered to be orphans due to their ability to promote transcription of downstream genes without ligands. In zebrafish, four ff1 homologues (Ff1a, Ff1b, Ff1c, and Ff1d) have been identified so far. The gene coding for Ff1a is driven by two separate promoters, and give rise to four splice variants. Ff1a is expressed in the somites and pronephric ducts during somitogenesis and in the brain, liver, and mandibular arch during later embryonic stages. In adults the gene is highly expressed in gonads, liver, and intestine, but can be detected in most tissues. The broad variety of embryonic expression domains indicates several important developmental features. One of the mammalian fushi tarazu factor-1 genes, steroidogenic factor-1 (SF-1), is essential for the development of gonads and adrenals. SF-1 is together with Sox9, WT1, and GATA4 a positive transcriptional regulator of human anti-mullerian hormone (AMH) and thereby linked to the male sex-determining pathway. The zebrafish ff1a dual promoter contains several GATA binding sites and E-boxes, a site for DR4, XFD2, MyoD, Snail, HNF3, S8, and an HMG-box recognition site for Sox9. In a first attempt to dissect the ff1a promoter in vivo we have produced first generation transgenes in order to determine the correlation between the expression of the endogenous ff1a gene and the microinjected ff1a dual promoter coupled to the pEGFP reporter vector. Our results show that the microinjected constructs are expressed in the correct tissues.
The identity of synaptically-enriched genes was investigated by comparing the abundance of various mRNAs in the synaptic and extra-synaptic regions of the same muscle fibers. The mRNAs for several known synaptic proteins were significantly elevated in the synaptic region when measured by real-time PCR. The synaptic mRNAs were then further analyzed using microarrays and real-time PCR to identify putative regulators of the neuromuscular junction (NMJ). MRF4 was the only member of the MyoD family that was concentrated at the mature NMJ, suggesting that it may have a unique role in the maintenance of post-synaptic specialization. Three potential regulators of the NMJ were identified and confirmed by real-time PCR: glia maturation factor gamma was concentrated at the NMJ whereas Unr protein and protein tyrosine phosphatase were repressed synaptically. The identification of synaptically-repressed genes may indicate that synaptic specialization is created by a combination of positive and negative signals.
Muscle wasting in old age or cancer may result from failed myofiber regeneration and/or accelerated atrophy. This study aimed to determine from transcriptomic analysis of human muscle the integrity of the cellular stress response system in relation to satellite cell differentiation or apoptosis in patients with cancer (weight-stable (CWS) or weight-losing (CWL)) or healthy elderly (HE) when compared with healthy middle-aged controls (HMA). 28 patients with cancer (CWS: 18 and CWL: 10), HE: 21 and HMA: 20 underwent biopsy of quadriceps muscle. The expression of transcription factors for muscle regeneration (Pax3, Pax7 and MyoD) was increased in CWS and HE compared with HMA (p≤0.001). In contrast, the expression of the late myogenic differentiation marker MyoG was reduced in CWS and CWL but increased in HE (p≤0.0001). Bax was significantly increased in CWS, CWL and HE (p≤0.0001). Expression of the oxidative defense genes SOD2, GCLM, and Nrf2 was decreased in CWS and CWL but increased in HE (p≤0.0001). There is evidence for blockade of satellite cell maturation, upregulation of apoptosis and reduced oxidative defense in the muscle of cancer patients. In the healthy elderly the potential for differentiation and oxidative defense is maintained.
Skeletal muscles harbour a resident population of stem cells, termed satellite cells (SCs). After trauma, SCs leave their quiescent state to enter the cell cycle and undergo multiple rounds of proliferation, a process regulated by MyoD. To initiate differentiation, fusion and maturation to new skeletal muscle fibres, SCs up-regulate myogenin. However, the regulation of these myogenic factors is not fully understood. In this study we demonstrate that Nrf2, a major regulator of oxidative stress defence, plays a role in the expression of these myogenic factors. In both promoter studies with myoblasts and a mouse model of muscle injury in Nrf2-deficient mice, we show that Nrf2 prolongs SC proliferation by up-regulating MyoD and suppresses SC differentiation by down-regulating myogenin. Moreover, we show that IL-6 and HGF, both factors that facilitate SC activation, induce Nrf2 activity in myoblasts. Thus, Nrf2 activity promotes muscle regeneration by modulating SC proliferation and differentiation and thereby provides implications for tissue regeneration.
Skeletal muscle redox homeostasis is transcriptionally regulated by nuclear erythroid-2-p45-related factor-2 (Nrf2). We recently demonstrated that age-associated stress impairs Nrf2-ARE (antioxidant-response element) transcriptional signaling. Here, we hypothesize that age-dependent decline or genetic ablation of Nrf2 leads to accelerated apoptosis and skeletal muscle degeneration. Under basal-physiological conditions, disruption of Nrf2 significantly downregulates antioxidants and causes oxidative stress. Surprisingly, Nrf2-null mice had enhanced antioxidant capacity identical to wild-type (WT) upon acute endurance exercise stress (AEES), suggesting activation of Nrf2-independent mechanisms (i.e., PGC1α) against oxidative stress. Analysis of prosurvival pathways in the basal state reveals decreased AKT levels, whereas p-p53, a repressor of AKT, was increased in Nrf2-null vs WT mice. Upon AEES, AKT and p-AKT levels were significantly (p < 0.001) increased (>10-fold) along with profound downregulation of p-p53 (p < 0.01) in Nrf2-null vs WT skeletal muscle, indicating the onset of prosurvival mechanisms to compensate for the loss of Nrf2 signaling. However, we found a decreased stem cell population (PAX7) and MyoD expression (differentiation) along with profound activation of ubiquitin and apoptotic pathways in Nrf2-null vs WT mice upon AEES, suggesting that compensatory prosurvival mechanisms failed to overcome the programmed cell death and degeneration in skeletal muscle. Further, the impaired regeneration was sustained in Nrf2-null vs WT mice after 1 week of post-AEES recovery. In an age-associated oxidative stress condition, ablation of Nrf2 results in induction of apoptosis and impaired muscle regeneration.
Myogenesis is an intricate process that coordinately engages multiple intracellular signaling cascades. The Rho family GTPase RhoA is known to promote myogenesis, however, the mechanisms controlling its regulation in myoblasts have yet to be fully elucidated. We show here that the SH2-containing protein tyrosine phosphatase, SHP-2, functions as an early modulator of myogenesis by regulating RhoA. When MyoD was expressed in fibroblasts lacking functional SHP-2, muscle-specific gene activity was impaired and abolition of SHP-2 expression by RNA interference inhibited muscle differentiation. By using SHP-2 substrate-trapping mutants, we identified p190-B RhoGAP as a SHP-2 substrate. When dephosphorylated, p190-B RhoGAP has been shown to stimulate the activation of RhoA. During myogenesis, p190-B RhoGAP was tyrosyl dephosphorylated concomitant with the stimulation of SHP-2's phosphatase activity. Moreover, overexpression of a catalytically inactive mutant of SHP-2 inhibited p190-B RhoGAP tyrosyl dephosphorylation, RhoA activity, and myogenesis. These observations strongly suggest that SHP-2 dephosphorylates p190-B RhoGAP, leading to the activation of RhoA. Collectively, these data provide a mechanistic basis for RhoA activation in myoblasts and demonstrate that myogenesis is critically regulated by the actions of SHP-2 on the p190-B Rho GAP/RhoA pathway.
Myogenesis is a highly ordered process that involves the expression of muscle-specific genes, cell-cell recognition and multinucleated myotube formation. Although protein tyrosine kinases have figured prominently in myogenesis, the involvement of tyrosine phosphatases in this process is unknown. SHP-2 is an SH2 domain-containing tyrosine phosphatase, which positively regulates growth and differentiation. We show that in C2C12 myoblasts, SHP-2 becomes upregulated early on during myogenesis and associates with a 120 kDa tyrosyl-phosphorylated complex. We have identified that the 120 kDa complex consists of the SHP-2 substrate-1 (SHPS-1) and the Grb2-associated binder-1 (Gab-1). SHPS-1, but not Gab-1, undergoes tyrosyl phosphorylation and association with SHP-2 during myogenesis, the kinetics of which correlate with the expression of MyoD. Either constitutive expression or inducible activation of MyoD in 10T(1/2) fibroblasts promotes SHPS-1 tyrosyl phosphorylation and its association with SHP-2. It has been shown that p38 mitogen-activated protein kinase (MAPK) activity is required for the expression/activation of MyoD and MyoD-responsive genes. Inhibition of p38 MAPK by SB203580 in differentiating C2C12 myoblasts blocks MyoD expression, SHPS-1 tyrosyl phosphorylation and the association of SHPS-1 with SHP-2. These data suggest that SHPS-1/SHP-2 complex formation is an integral signaling component of skeletal muscle differentiation.
Shp-2 is a ubiquitously expressed tyrosine phosphatase with two SH2 domains. Homozygous mutant mice with a targeted deletion of 65 amino acid residues in the N-terminal SH2 domain of Shp-2 die in utero at mid-gestation, with multiple defects in mesodermal patterning. To surpass the embryonic lethality in dissecting the Shp-2 function in cell growth and differentiation, we established homozygous Shp-2 mutant embryonic stem (ES) cell lines. Our previous data showed a severe suppression of hematopoietic cell differentiation from Shp-2 mutant ES cells. Here we demonstrate that development of cardiac muscle cells was dramatically delayed and impaired in embryoid bodies (EBs) of Shp-2 mutant origin. Shp-2 mutant ES cells failed to differentiate into epithelial and fibroblast cells in vitro. However, higher efficiency of secondary EB formation was observed from the mutant than the wild-type ES cells. Further, mutant ES cells were more sensitive than wild-type cells to the differentiation suppressing effect of leukemia inhibitory factor (LIF). In addition, mutant ES cells showed a reduced growth rate compared to wild-type cells. These results suggest that the Shp-2 tyrosine phosphatase is a positive regulator for both cell differentiation and proliferation, in contrast to the Src-family kinases which promote cell growth but block differentiation.
Triiodothyronine (T3) positively regulates both the expression of the MyoD gene, a key myogenic regulator, and C2 muscle cell differentiation. To directly examine the role of its nuclear receptors in the control of myogenesis, we introduced a c-erbA expression vector into C2 muscle cells by transient or stable transfection. Our results show that c-erbA can play a potent role in the triggering of muscle terminal differentiation since its overexpression leads to: (1) a complete abrogation of the activity of the myogenesis inhibitor AP-1 (fos/jun) transcription factor; (2) an enhanced induction of MyoD expression upon T3 treatment; (3) the acquisition by T3 of the ability to trigger both growth arrest and terminal differentiation in the presence of large amounts of serum mitogens, a property that is otherwise specific to retinoic acid (RA). Thus, c-erbA is one of the two protooncogenes (with c-ski) that acts as positive regulator of muscle differentiation. Furthermore, the fact that c-erbA overexpression allows T3 to largely mimic the RA effects indicates that their biological differences in the modulation of myogenic program primarily rely on the differential expression of their receptors in C2 muscle cells rather than on an intrinsic specificity of their target genes.
RVR/Rev-erb beta/BD73 is an orphan steroid receptor that has no known ligand in the "classical' sense. RVR binds as a monomer to an element which consists of an A/T-rich sequence upstream of the consensus hexameric half-site. However, RVR does not activate transcription and blocks transactivation of this element by ROR/RZR. The mechanism of RVR action remains obscure, hence we used the GAL4 hybrid system to identify and characterize an active transcriptional silencer in the ligand binding domain (LBD) of RVR. Rigorous deletion and mutational analysis demonstrated that this repressor domain is encoded by amino acids 416-449 of RVR. Furthermore, we demonstrated that efficient repression is dependent on the so-called LBD-specific signature motif, (F/W)AKxxxxFxxLxxxDQxxLL (which spans loop3-4 and helix 4) and helix 5 (H5; identified in the crystal structures of the steroid receptor LBDs). Although RVR is expressed in many adult tissues, including skeletal muscle, and during embryogenesis, its physiological function in differentiation and mammalian development remains unknown. Since other 'orphans', e.g. COUP-TF II and Rev-erbA alpha, have been demonstrated to regulate muscle and adipocyte differentiation, we investigated the expression and functional role of RVR during mouse myogenesis. In C2C12 myogenic cells, RVR mRNA was detected in proliferating myoblasts and was suppressed when the cells were induced to differentiate into post-mitotic, multinucleated myotubes by serum withdrawal. This decrease in RVR mRNA correlated with the appearance of muscle-specific markers (e.g. myogenin mRNA). RVR 'loss of function' studies by constitutive over-expression of a dominant negative RVR delta E resulted in increased levels of p21Cip1/Waf1 and myogenin mRNAs after serum withdrawal. Time course studies indicated that expression of RVR delta E mRNA results in the precocious induction and accumulation of myogenin and p21 mRNAs after serum withdrawal. In addition, we demonstrated that over-expression of the COUP-TF II and Rev-erbA alpha receptors in C2C12 cells completely blocked induction of p21 mRNA after serum withdrawal. In conclusion, our studies identified a potent transcriptional repression domain in RVR, characterized critical amino acids within the silencing region and provide evidence for the physiological role of RVR during myogenesis.
Oestrogen receptors (ER) are present in human skeletal muscle (hSkM) cells; however, the function of the receptor is currently unknown. We investigated the influence of oestradiol and selective ER modulators [tamoxifen (TAM), raloxifene (RAL)] on ER coregulator mRNA expression in hSkM.
Human skeletal muscle cells were treated with 10 nm oestradiol, 5 microm TAM and 10 microm RAL over a 24-h period. Following the treatment period, mRNA expression was quantified using real-time PCR to detect changes in ER-alpha, ER-beta, steroid receptor coactivator (SRC), silencing mediator for retinoid and thyroid hormone receptors (SMRT), MyoD, GLUT4 and c-fos.
ER-alpha mRNA expression increased with all three drug treatments (P < 0.05) while there was no change in mRNA expression of ER-beta in hSkM cells. mRNA expression of SRC increased and SMRT decreased with oestradiol, TAM and RAL in hSkM cells (P < 0.05). Importantly, mRNA expression of MyoD increased with oestradiol and decreased with TAM and RAL in hSkM cells (P < 0.05). mRNA expression of GLUT4 increased with oestradiol and RAL and decreased with TAM in hSkM cells (P < 0.05).
These findings are novel in that they provide the first evidence that oestradiol and selective ER modulators influence ER-alpha function in hSkM cells. This demonstrates the importance of the ER and alterations in its coregulators, to potentially prevent sarcopenia and promote muscle growth in postmenopausal women using these forms of hormone replacement therapy.
Thyroid hormone stimulates myoblast differentiation, through an inhibition of AP-1 activity occurring at the onset of differentiation. In this study we found that the T3 nuclear receptor c-ErbAalpha1 (T3Ralpha1) is involved in a mechanism preserving the duration of myoblast proliferation. Independently of the hormone presence, T3Ralpha1 represses avian MyoD transcriptional activity. Using several mutants of T3Ralpha1, we found that the hinge region plays a crucial role in the inhibition of MyoD activity. In particular, mutations of two small basic sequences included in alpha helices abrogate the T3Ralpha1/MyoD functional interaction. Similarly, the T3 receptor also represses myogenin transcriptional activity. Therefore, despite stimulating avian myoblast differentiation by a T3-dependent pathway not involving myogenic factors, T3Ralpha1 contributes to maintain an optimal myoblast proliferation period by inhibiting MyoD and myogenin activity.
DNA sequences encoding the hormone-binding domains of several steroid hormone receptors were fused in frame to the MyoD gene. When the gene for this chimeric protein was expressed in NIH 3T3 or 10T1/2 fibroblasts, these cells displayed hormone-dependent induction of myogenesis. Our experiments focused on cell lines expressing estrogen receptor-MyoD chimeras. Induction of these lines in the presence of estradiol and an inhibitor of protein synthesis, cycloheximide, resulted in the activation of the endogenous myogenin gene but did not activate the muscle-specific creatine kinase or cardiac alpha-actin gene. This result suggests that MyoD is not a "direct" activator of these downstream myogenic genes but must first activate myogenin as an intermediary. Once muscle is induced by estrogen receptor-MyoD the muscle phenotype is very stable and does not need the continued presence of estradiol for its maintenance.
The leukocyte adhesion receptors M290 (alpha M290/beta 7) and LPAM-1 (alpha 4 beta 7) comprise the beta 7-subfamily of integrins, which are constitutively expressed on subsets of lymphocytes populating the mouse small intestine. They are induced de novo after in vitro activation of lymphocytes and hence may serve a more general role in inflammation. In order to understand how beta 7 integrins are regulated during an immune response, we isolated and characterized the promoter region of the beta 7 gene. Primer extension and rapid amplification of cDNA ends identified one major transcriptional start site in a favourable context, which resembles the initiator of terminal deoxynucleotidyl transferase. Transfection assays with a luciferase reporter gene revealed that cell-specific expression in vitro was retained in a 292 bp sequence, which contained several consensus binding motifs for transcriptional factors preferentially expressed in cells of the lymphoid lineages. Multiple retinoic acid receptor sites for steroid/thyroid hormone receptors which typify the leukocyte cell adhesion molecule subset of integrins are present. The beta 7 promoter, like its alpha 4 chain partner, contains the E box core sequence CACCTG found within the muscle creatine kinase enhancer which binds MyoD in vitro. The number of potential DNA binding sites for transcriptional factors in the beta 7 promoter parallels the complex regulation of expression of M290 and LPAM-1 in inflammation and gut mucosal immunity.
The metamorphosis of anuran amphibians is induced by thyroid hormone (TH). To study the molecular mechanisms underlying tail regression during metamorphosis, we established a cell line, XL-B4, from a Xenopus laevis tadpole tail at a premetamorphic stage. The cells expressed myoblast markers and differentiated into myotubes in differentiation medium. XL-B4 cells expressing fluorescent proteins were transplanted into tadpole tails. At 5 days post-transplantation, fluorescence was observed in myotube-like structures, indicating that the myoblastic cells could contribute to skeletal muscle. Exposure of XL-B4 cells to the TH triiodothyronine (T3) for several days significantly induced apoptotic cell death. We then examined an early response of expression of genes involved in apoptosis or myogenesis to T3. Treatment of the cells with T3 increased transcription of genes for matrix metalloproteinase-9 (MMP-9) and thyroid hormone receptor beta. Interestingly, the T3-treatment also increased myoD transcripts, but decreased the amounts of myogenin mRNA and myosin heavy chain. Importantly, we also observed upregulation of myoD expression and downregulation of myogenin expression in tails, but not in hind limbs, when tadpoles at a premetamorphic stage were treated with T3 for 1 day. These results indicated that T3 could not only induce apoptosis, but also attenuate myogenesis in tadpole tails during metamorphosis.
The TRAP (thyroid hormone receptor-associated proteins) transcription coactivator complex (also known as Mediator) was first isolated as a group of proteins that facilitate the function of the thyroid hormone receptor. This complex interacts physically with several nuclear receptors through the TRAP220 subunit, and with diverse activators through other subunits. TRAP220 has been reported to show ligand-enhanced interaction with peroxisome proliferator-activated receptor gamma(2) (PPAR gamma(2)), a nuclear receptor essential for adipogenesis. Here we show that Trap220(-/-) fibroblasts are refractory to PPAR gamma(2)-stimulated adipogenesis, but not to MyoD-stimulated myogenesis, and do not express adipogenesis markers or PPAR gamma(2) target genes. These defects can be restored by expression of exogenous TRAP220. Further indicative of a direct role for TRAP220 in PPAR gamma(2) function via the TRAP complex, TRAP functions directly as a transcriptional coactivator for PPAR gamma(2) in a purified in vitro system and interacts with PPAR gamma(2) in a ligand- and TRAP220-dependent manner. These data indicate that TRAP220 acts, via the TRAP complex, as a PPAR gamma(2)-selective coactivator and, accordingly, that it is specific for one fibroblast differentiation pathway (adipogenesis) relative to another (myogenesis).
It is very clear that the GH-IGF axis plays a major role in controlling the growth and differentiation of skeletal muscles, as it does virtually all of the tissues in the animal body. One aspect of this control is unquestioned: circulating GH acts on the liver to stimulate expression of the IGF-I and IGFBP3 genes, substantially increasing the levels of these proteins in the circulation. It also seems that GH stimulates expression of IGF-I genes in skeletal muscle, although there are a number of cases in which skeletal muscle IGF-I expression is elevated in the absence of GH. It is substantially less clear that GH acts directly on skeletal muscle to stimulate its growth; the presence of GH receptor mRNA in skeletal muscle is well established, but most investigators have been unsuccessful in demonstrating any specific binding of GH to skeletal muscle or to myoblasts in culture. It has been equally difficult to show direct actions of GH on cultured muscle cells; the only positive report concludes that the early insulin-like effects of GH can result from direct interactions between GH and isolated muscle cells. The effects of the IGFs on skeletal muscle are much clearer. It is well established by studies in a number of laboratories on a variety of systems that IGFs stimulate many anabolic responses in myoblasts, as they do in other cell types. IGFs have the unusual property of stimulating both proliferation and differentiation of myoblasts, responses that are generally believed to be mutually exclusive; in myoblasts, they are in fact temporally separated. The stimulation of differentiation by IGF-I is (at least in part) a result of substantially increased levels of the mRNA for myogenin, the member of the MyoD family most directly associated with terminal myogenesis. As levels of myogenin mRNA rise, those of myf-5 mRNA (the only other member of the MyoD family expressed significantly in L6 myoblasts) fall dramatically, although myf-5 expression is required for the initial elevation of myogenin. The effects of IGFs are significantly modulated by IGFBPs secreted by myoblasts in serum-free medium, inhibitory IG-FBPs-4 and -6 are expressed and secreted by L6A1 myoblasts, while expression of IGFBP-5 rises dramatically as differentiation proceeds. Other myoblasts also secrete IGFBP-2. Even if exogenous IGFs are not added to the low-serum "differentiation" medium, myoblasts express sufficient amounts of autocrine IGF-II to stimulate myogenesis after a period of time; some myogenic cell lines, (such as Sol 8) are so active in expressing the IGF-II gene that it is not possible to demonstrate effects of exogenous IGFs. This autocrine expression of IGFs is by no means unique to skeletal muscle cells; indeed, it is so widely seen in cells responding to mitogenic stimuli that we suggest that IGFs can be viewed as extracellular second messengers that mediate most, if not all, such actions of agents that stimulate cell proliferation. The component of serum that suppresses IGF-II gene expression under "growth" conditions appears to be the IGFs themselves, which exhibit a very high potency in the feedback inhibition of IGF-II expression. In addition, IGFs have effects on the expression of other genes related to differentiation. Treatment of L6A1 cell with IGFs suppresses their expression of the myogenesis-inhibiting TGF beta s with a time course consistent with an initial proliferative step followed by differentiation, i.e. expression is first increased and then very substantially decreased. It is not established that this plays a role in control of differentiation, but experiments with FGF antisense constructs suggests that this may well be the case. Until recently, IGFs were the only circulating agents known to stimulate myoblast differentiation, in contrast to the relatively large number of growth factors that inhibit the process. It is now clear that thyroid hormones and RA also stimulate myogenesis, and that IL-15 enhances the stimulatory eff
Mouse embryonic stem (ES) cells grown in aggregates give rise to several different cell types, including cardiac muscle. Given the lack of cardiac muscle cell lines, ES cells can be a useful tool in the study of cardiac muscle differentiation. The laminin-binding integrin alpha 6 beta 1 exists in two different splice variant forms of the alpha chain (alpha 6A and alpha 6B), the alpha 6A form having been implicated as possibly playing a role in cardiac muscle development, based on its distribution pattern [4, 53]. In this study we characterise the ES cell model system in terms of the expression of the two different alpha 6 splice variants. We correlate their expression with that of muscle markers and the transcription factor GATA-4, using the reverse transcription-polymerase chain reaction (RT-PCR). We confirm that alpha 6B is constitutively expressed by ES cells. In contrast, alpha 6A expression appears later and overlaps in time with a period when the muscle marker myosin light chain-2V (MLC-2V) is expressed, but no MyoD is present, which indicates the presence of cardiac muscle cells in the aggregates. We further show that GATA-4 is present at the same time. Culturing the aggregates under conditions that stimulate (transforming growth factor beta 1 supplement) or inhibit (TGF beta 1 plus 10(-9) M retinoic acid supplement) cardiac muscle differentiation does not lead to any qualitative differences in the timing of expression of these genes, but quantitative changes cannot be excluded. The TGF beta 1 supplement does, however, lead to a relatively greater expression of alpha 6A compared to alpha 6B than the TGF beta 1 plus 10(-9) M RA supplement after 6 days in culture, suggesting that alpha 6A expression is favoured under conditions that stimulate cardiac muscle differentiation. The switch towards alpha 6A expression in ES cell aggregates is paralleled by expression of the binding receptor for TGF beta (T beta RII). Stable expression of a mutated (dominant negative) T beta RII in ES cells, however, still resulted in (TGF beta-independent) upregulation of alpha 6A, demonstrating that these events were not causally related and that parallel or alternative regulatory pathways exist. The initial characterisation of differentiating ES cell aggregates in terms of alpha 6A integrin subunit expression suggests that this model system could be a valuable tool in the study of the role of the alpha 6A beta 1 integrin in cardiac muscle differentiation.
Malignant rhabdoid tumors (MRT) are characterized by unique neoplastic cells demonstrating phenotypic diversity. By using the reverse transcriptase-polymerase chain reaction, we have detected expression of various genes before and after differentiation induction with four different agents in four established MRT cell lines (TM87-16, STM91-01, TTC642, and TTC549). The agents used in this study were all-trans retinoic acid (RA), 12-O-tetradecanoylphorbol-13-acetate (TPA), interleukin-3, or interferon-gamma. Before and after induction, c-myc, IGF-II, IGF-I receptor, and IGF-II receptor were constitutively expressed by all four cell lines. The neurofilament medium-size (NF-M) was constitutively expressed by the TM87-16 and TTC642, and the S100 protein alpha subunit was expressed by TM87-16, TTC642, and TTC549. Chromogranin A was expressed by TM87-16 only after treatment with either TPA or RA. MyoD, N-myc, tyrosine hydroxylase, N-CAM, trkA, and the S100 protein beta subunit were not expressed by any cell line before or after induction with these agents. All the MRT cell lines in this study except TM87-16 were highly resistant to differentiation induction. The proliferating cells in TM87-16 and TTC642 expressed mRNA profiles characteristic of neuroectoderm.
Positive feedback is a common mechanism enabling biological systems to respond to stimuli in a switch-like manner. Such systems are often characterized by the requisite formation of a heterodimer where only one of the pair is subject to feedback. This ASymmetric Self-UpREgulation (ASSURE) motif is central to many biological systems, including cholesterol homeostasis (LXRα/RXRα), adipocyte differentiation (PPARγ/RXRα), development and differentiation (RAR/RXR), myogenesis (MyoD/E12) and cellular antiviral defense (IRF3/IRF7). To understand why this motif is so prevalent, we examined its properties in an evolutionarily conserved transcriptional regulatory network in yeast (Oaf1p/Pip2p). We demonstrate that the asymmetry in positive feedback confers a competitive advantage and allows the system to robustly increase its responsiveness while precisely tuning the response to a consistent level in the presence of varying stimuli. This study reveals evolutionary advantages for the ASSURE motif, and mechanisms for control, that are relevant to pharmacologic intervention and synthetic biology applications.
The uncoupling protein-3 (UCP-3) gene encodes for a mitochondrial protein expressed preferentially in skeletal muscle. UCP-3 mRNA is expressed in cultured muscle cells (C2C12 or L6E9) only when differentiated, at which stage UCP-3 is highly induced by all-trans retinoic acid (RA). Here we report that human UCP-3 promoter activity is dependent on MyoD and inducible by all trans-RA. The action of all trans-RA is increased by co-transfection with RA receptor (RAR). We have characterized the RA response element that controls the induction by RA in the 5' noncoding region of the UCP-3 gene. Deletion and point-mutation analysis of the hUCP-3 promoter led us to identify a direct-repeat element with one base-pair spacing (DR1) at position -71/-59 responsible for the induction by RA of the activity of the promoter. This DR1 element bound a nuclear protein complex from muscle cells that contain RAR and retinoid X receptor (RXR). In the absence of this element, the promoter became unresponsive to RA, but it was still dependent on MyoD. In conclusion, it has been established that UCP-3 gene promoter activity is dependent on MyoD, and the first regulatory pathway for UCP-3 gene promoter regulation has been recognized by identifying RA as a transcriptional activator of the gene.
In C2 myoblasts, retinoic acid (RA) is an efficient inducer of both growth arrest and differentiation. These RA effects are mediated through at least two classes of retinoic acid receptors (RARs and RXRs), which belong to the nuclear receptor superfamily. To determine the role played by each RAR or RXR family in this model system, we have analysed the effects of RA in C2 myoblasts expressing a dominant negative RAR (dnRAR) or a dominant negative RXR (dnRXR). The stable expression of dnRAR or dnRXR in C2 cells delays the RA-induced growth arrest and differentiation, an effect which is more pronounced in C2-dnRXR myoblasts. Furthermore, the RA-inducible expression of MyoD gene is lost in C2-dnRXR but not in C2-dnRAR cells, indicating that each family of retinoid receptors RAR and RXR may regulate distinct subsets of RA-responsive genes. Finally, using C2 cell lines with different retinoid responsiveness, we provided evidence for a link between the RXR and MyoD families in the process of myogenic differentiation. These results illustrate a critical role for RA-receptors in RA-control of C2 myogenesis and provide tools for studying the function of RA and its receptors during vertebrate development.
Betaglycan is a membrane-anchored proteoglycan co-receptor that binds transforming growth factor beta (TGF-beta) via its core protein and basic fibroblast growth factor through its glycosaminoglycan chains. In this study we evaluated the expression of betaglycan during the C(2)C(12) skeletal muscle differentiation. Betaglycan expression, as determined by Northern and Western blot, was up-regulated during the conversion of myoblasts to myotubes. The mouse betaglycan gene promoter was cloned, and its sequence showed putative binding sites for SP1, Smad3, Smad4, muscle regulatory factor elements such as MyoD and MEF2, and retinoic acid receptor. Transcriptional activity of the mouse betaglycan promoter reporter was also up-regulated in differentiating C(2)C(12) cells. We found that MyoD, but not myogenin, stimulated this transcriptional activity even in the presence of high serum. Betaglycan promoter activity was increased by RA and inhibited by the three isoforms of TGF-beta. On the other hand, basic fibroblast growth factor, BMP-2, and hepatocyte growth factor/scatter factor, which are inhibitors of myogenesis, had little effect. In myotubes, up-regulated betaglycan was also detectable by TGF-beta affinity labeling and immunofluorescence microscopy studies. The latter indicated that betaglycan was localized both on the cell surface and in the ECM. Forced expression of betaglycan in C(2)C(12) myoblasts increases their responsiveness to TGF-beta2, suggesting that it performs a TGF-beta presentation function in this cell lineage. These results indicate that betaglycan expression is up-regulated during myogenesis and that MyoD and RA modulate its expression by a mechanism that is independent of myogenin.
The signal transduction mechanism coupled to angiotensin AT2 receptors is still a matter of debate. Based on the findings that AT2 receptor stimulation causes inhibition of proliferation, and that other antiproliferative agents such as transforming growth factor-beta, retinoic acid, and MyoD act via repression of immediate early gene (IEG) expression, this study was aimed at elucidating whether downregulation of IEG expression is also part of the AT2 receptor coupled signaling mechanism. Stimulation of angiotensin AT2 receptors in the rat pheochromocytoma cell line PC12 W following pretreatment with growth factors was able to counteract growth factor induced proliferation but not to repress growth factor induced c-fos and c-jun expression; neither did AT2 receptor stimulation cause an induction of c-fos expression. We conclude that, in contrast to other growth-inhibiting agents, the antiproliferative effect of angiotensin II via the AT2 receptor is not mediated by repression of the immediate early genes c-fos and c-jun.
Bone repair is dependent on the presence of osteocompetent progenitors that are able to differentiate and generate new bone. Muscle is found in close association with orthopaedic injury, however its capacity to make a cellular contribution to bone repair remains ambiguous. We hypothesized that myogenic cells of the MyoD-lineage are able to contribute to bone repair.
We employed a MyoD-Cre+:Z/AP+ conditional reporter mouse in which all cells of the MyoD-lineage are permanently labeled with a human alkaline phosphatase (hAP) reporter. We tracked the contribution of MyoD-lineage cells in mouse models of tibial bone healing.
In the absence of musculoskeletal trauma, MyoD-expressing cells are limited to skeletal muscle and the presence of reporter-positive cells in non-muscle tissues is negligible. In a closed tibial fracture model, there was no significant contribution of hAP+ cells to the healing callus. In contrast, open tibial fractures featuring periosteal stripping and muscle fenestration had up to 50% of hAP+ cells detected in the open fracture callus. At early stages of repair, many hAP+ cells exhibited a chondrocyte morphology, with lesser numbers of osteoblast-like hAP+ cells present at the later stages. Serial sections stained for hAP and type II and type I collagen showed that MyoD-lineage cells were surrounded by cartilaginous or bony matrix, suggestive of a functional role in the repair process. To exclude the prospect that osteoprogenitors spontaneously express MyoD during bone repair, we created a metaphyseal drill hole defect in the tibia. No hAP+ staining was observed in this model suggesting that the expression of MyoD is not a normal event for endogenous osteoprogenitors.
These data document for the first time that muscle cells can play a significant secondary role in bone repair and this knowledge may lead to important translational applications in orthopaedic surgery. Please see related article: http://www.biomedcentral.com/1741-7015/9/136.
Peroxisome proliferator-activated receptor β/δ (PPARβ/δ) regulates postnatal myogenesis by alleviating myostatin activity, but the molecular mechanisms by which it regulates myogenesis are not fully understood. In this study, we investigate molecular mechanisms of PPARβ/δ in myoblast differentiation. C2C12 myoblasts treated with a PPARβ/δ agonist, GW0742 exhibit enhanced myotube formation and muscle-specific gene expression. GW0742 treatment dramatically activates promyogenic kinases, p38MAPK and Akt, in a dose-dependent manner. GW0742-stimulated myoblast differentiation is mediated by p38MAPK and Akt, since it failed to restore myoblast differentiation repressed by inhibition of p38MAPK and Akt. In addition, GW0742 treatment enhances MyoD-reporter activities. Consistently, overexpression of PPARβ/δ enhances myoblast differentiation accompanied by elevated activation of p38MAPK and Akt. Collectively, these results suggest that PPARβ/δ enhances myoblast differentiation through activation of promyogenic signaling pathways.
To determine whether super-activation of PPARγ can reprogram human myoblasts into brown-like adipocytes and to establish a new cell model for browning research.
To enhance the PPARγ signaling, M3, the transactivation domain of MyoD, was fused to PPARγ. PPARγ and M3-PPARγ-lentiviral vectors were used to convert human myoblasts into adipocytes. Brown adipocyte markers of the reprogrammed adipocytes were assessed by qPCR and protein analyses. White adipocytes differentiated from subcutaneous stromal vascular cells and perithyroid brown fat tissues were used as references.
In transient transfections, M3-PPARγ had a stronger constitutive activity than PPARγ by reporter assay. Although the transduction of either PPARγ or M3-PPARγ induced adipogenesis in myoblasts, M3-PPARγ drastically induced the brown adipocyte markers of UCP1, CIDEA, and PRDM16 by 1,050, 2.4, and 5.0 fold, respectively and increased mitochondria contents by 4 fold, compared to PPARγ.
Super-activation of PPARγ can effectively convert human myoblasts into brown-like adipocytes and a new approach to derive brown-like adipocytes.
Twenty-four pregnant Nellore cows were randomly assigned into 2 feeding level groups (control [CTL]; fed 1.0 times the maintenance requirement; n = 12; and overnourished [ON]; fed at 1.5 times the maintenance requirement; n = 12) to evaluate effects of maternal overnutrition on fetal skeletal muscle development. Cows were slaughtered at 135, 190, and 240 d of gestation and samples of fetal LM were collected for analysis of mRNA expression analysis and for histological evaluation of collagen content and number of muscle cells. There was no interaction between gestational period and maternal nutrition for the variables evaluated (P > 0.05). The mRNA expression of Cadherin-associated protein, β 1 (β-catenin) tended to be greater in fetuses from ON cows (P = 0.08), while myogenic differentiation 1 (MyoD; P = 0.56), myogenin (MyoG; P = 0.70), and the number of muscle cells (P = 0.90) were not affected by maternal overnutrition. Gestational period did not affect the mRNA expression of β-catenin (P = 0.60) and MyoG (P = 0.21). The mRNA expression of MyoD tended to increase with days of gestation (P = 0.06). The mRNA expression of zinc finger protein 423 (Zfp423; P < 0.0001), C/EBPα (P = 0.01), and PPARγ (P < 0.0001) were enhanced in ON fetuses. No effects of days of gestation were observed for mRNA expression of Zfp423 (P = 0.75) and C/EBPα (P = 0.48). The mRNA expression of PPARγ in fetuses at 190 d of gestation tended to be greater than those at 135 and 240 d of gestation (P = 0.06). The mRNA expression of transforming growth factor β (TGF-β; P < 0.0001), collagen type III, α I (COL3A1; P < 0.0001), and collagen content (P = 0.01) were increased in ON fetuses. Gestational period did not affect the mRNA expression of collagen type I, α I (COL1A1; P = 0.65). The mRNA expression of COL3A1 (P = 0.09) in fetuses at 190 d of gestation tended to be greater than fetuses at 135 and 240 d of gestation. The mRNA expression of TGF-β in fetuses at 190 d of gestation was greater than in fetuses at 135 d of gestation (P = 0.03), and the values observed in fetuses at 240 d of gestation did not differ from the other gestational time points. The least value of collagen content (P = 0.01) was observed in fetuses at 135 d of gestation, and no differences were observed among the other gestational time points. These data shows that maternal overnutrition enhances fibrogenesis and likely adipogenesis without compromising myogenesis in fetal skeletal muscle of cattle.
The discreteness of cell fates is an inherent and fundamental feature of multicellular organisms. Here we show that cross-antagonistic mechanisms of actions of MyoD and PPARγ, which are the master regulators of muscle and adipose differentiation, respectively, confer robustness to the integrity of cell differentiation. Simultaneous expression of MyoD and PPARγ in mesenchymal stem/stromal cells led to the generation of a mixture of multinucleated myotubes and lipid-filled adipocytes. Interestingly, hybrid cells (i.e., lipid-filled myotubes) were not generated, suggesting that these differentiation programs are mutually exclusive. Mechanistically, although exogenously expressed MyoD was rapidly degraded in adipocytes through ubiquitin-proteasome pathways, exogenously expressed PPARγ was not downregulated in myotubes. In PPARγ-expressing myotubes, PPARγ-dependent histone hyperacetylation was inhibited in a subset of adipogenic gene loci, including that of C/EBPα, an essential effector of PPARγ. Thus, the cross-repressive interactions between MyoD- and PPARγ-induced differentiation programs ensure discrete cell-fate decisions.
This study evaluated the effectiveness of local administration of cationic liposome-delivered myostatin-targeting siRNA. Myostatin (Mst)-siRNA and scrambled (scr)-siRNA-lipoplexes were injected into the masseter muscles of wild type and dystrophin-deficient mdx mice, which model Duchenne muscular dystrophy. One week after injection, the masseter muscles were dissected for histometric analyses. To evaluate changes in masseter muscle activity, masseter electromyographic (EMG) measurements were performed. One week after local administration of Mst-siRNA-lipoplexes, masseter muscles and myofibrils were significantly larger compared to control masseter muscles treated with scr-siRNA-lipoplexes. Real-time polymerase chain reaction (PCR) analyses revealed significant upregulation of the myogenic regulatory factors MyoD and myogenin and significant downregulation of the adipogenic transcription factors peroxisome proliferator-activated receptor-γ (PPARγ) and CCAAT/enhancer binding protein-α (CEBPα) in masseter muscles treated with Mst-siRNA-lipoplexes. The duty times of masseter muscle activity exceeding 5% showed a slight tendency to increase in both wild type and mdx mice. Therefore, cationic liposome-mediated local administration of Mst-siRNA could increase muscular size and improve muscle activity. Since cationic liposomes delivered siRNA to muscles effectively and are safe and cost-effective, they may represent a therapeutic tool for use in treating muscular diseases.
Administration of β2-agonists triggers skeletal muscle anabolism and hypertrophy. We investigated the time course of the molecular events responsible for rat skeletal muscle hypertrophy in response to 1, 3 and 10 days of formoterol administration (i.p. 2000μg/kg/day). A marked hypertrophy of rat tibialis anterior muscle culminated at day 10. Phosphorylation of Akt, ribosomal protein S6, 4E-BP1 and ERK1/2 was increased at day 3, but returned to control level at day 10. This could lead to a transient increase in protein translation and could explain previous studies that reported increase in protein synthesis following β2-agonist administration. Formoterol administration was also associated with a significant reduction in MAFbx/atrogin-1 mRNA level (day 3), suggesting that formoterol can also affect protein degradation of MAFbx/atrogin1 targeted substrates, including MyoD and eukaryotic initiation factor-3f (eIF3-f). Surprisingly, mRNA level of autophagy-related genes, light chain 3 beta (LC3b) and gamma-aminobutyric acid receptor-associated protein-like 1 (Gabarapl1), as well as lysosomal hydrolases, cathepsin B and cathepsin L, was significantly and transiently increased after 1 and/or 3 days, suggesting that autophagosome formation would be increased in response to formoterol administration. However, this has to be relativized since the mRNA level of Unc-51-like kinase1 (Ulk1), BCL2/adenovirus E1B interacting protein3 (Bnip3), and transcription factor EB (TFEB), as well as the protein content of Ulk1, Atg13, Atg5-Atg12 complex and p62/Sqstm1 remained unchanged or was even decreased in response to formoterol administration. These results demonstrate that the effects of formoterol are mediated, in part, through the activation of Akt-mTOR pathway and that other signaling pathways become more important in the regulation of skeletal muscle mass with chronic administration of β2-agonists.
Mesenchymal stem cell (MSC) therapy holds promise for treating diseases and tissue repair. Regeneration of skeletal muscle tissue that is lost during pathological muscle degeneration or after injuries is sustained by the production of new myofibers. Human Adipose stem cells (ASCs) have been reported to regenerate muscle fibers and reconstitute the pericytic cell pool after myogenic differentiation in vitro. Our aim was to evaluate the differentiation potential of constructs made from a new cross-linked hyaluronic acid (XHA) scaffold on which different sorted subpopulations of ASCs were loaded. Thirty days after engraftment in mice, we found that NG2(+) ASCs underwent a complete myogenic differentiation, fabricating a human skeletal muscle tissue, while NG2(-) ASCs merely formed a human adipose tissue. Myogenic differentiation was confirmed by the expression of MyoD, MF20, laminin, and lamin A/C by immunofluorescence and/or RT-PCR. In contrast, adipose differentiation was confirmed by the expression of adiponectin, Glut-4, and PPAR-γ. Both tissues formed expressed Class I HLA, confirming their human origin and excluding any contamination by murine cells. In conclusion, our study provides novel evidence that NG2(+) ASCs loaded on XHA scaffolds are able to fabricate a human skeletal muscle tissue in vivo without the need of a myogenic pre-differentiation step in vitro. We emphasize the translational significance of our findings for human skeletal muscle regeneration.
The self-healing potential of each tissue belongs to endogenous stem cells residing in the tissue; however, there are currently no reports mentioned for the isolation of human rotator cuff-derived mesenchymal stem cells (RC-MSCs) since. To isolate RC-MSCs, minced rotator cuff samples were first digested with enzymes and the single cell suspensions were seeded in plastic culture dishes. Twenty-four hours later, nonadherent cells were removed and the adherent cells were further cultured. The RC-MSCs had fibroblast-like morphology and were positive for the putative surface markers of MSCs, such as CD44, CD73, CD90, CD105, and CD166, and negative for the putative markers of hematopoietic cells, such as CD34, CD45, and CD133. Similar to BM-MSCs, RC-MSCs were demonstrated to have the potential to undergo osteogenic, adipogenic, and chondrogenic differentiation. Upon induction in the defined media, RC-MSCs also expressed lineage-specific genes, such as Runx 2 and osteocalcin in osteogenic induction, PPAR-γ and LPL in adipogenic differentiation, and aggrecan and Col2a1 in chondrogenic differentiation. The multipotent feature of RC-MSCs in the myogenic injury model was further strengthened by the increase in myogenic potential both in vitro and in vivo when compared with BM-MSCs. These results demonstrate the successful isolation of MSCs from human rotator cuffs and encourage the application of RC-MSCs in myogenic regeneration.
Foetal growth restriction impairs skeletal muscle development and adult muscle mitochondrial biogenesis. We hypothesized that key genes involved in muscle development and mitochondrial biogenesis would be altered following uteroplacental insufficiency in rat pups, and improving postnatal nutrition by cross-fostering would ameliorate these deficits. Bilateral uterine vessel ligation (Restricted) or sham (Control) surgery was performed on day 18 of gestation. Males and females were investigated at day 20 of gestation (E20), 1 (PN1), 7 (PN7) and 35 (PN35) days postnatally. A separate cohort of Control and Restricted pups were cross-fostered onto a different Control or Restricted mother and examined at PN7. In both sexes, peroxisome proliferator-activated receptor (PPAR)-γ coactivator-1α (PGC-1α), cytochrome c oxidase subunits 3 and 4 (COX III and IV) and myogenic regulatory factor 4 expression increased from late gestation to postnatal life, whereas mitochondrial transcription factor A, myogenic differentiation 1 (MyoD), myogenin and insulin-like growth factor I (IGF-I) decreased. Foetal growth restriction increased MyoD mRNA in females at PN7, whereas in males IGF-I mRNA was higher at E20 and PN1. Cross-fostering Restricted pups onto a Control mother significantly increased COX III mRNA in males and COX IV mRNA in both sexes above controls with little effect on other genes. Developmental age appears to be a major factor regulating skeletal muscle mitochondrial and developmental genes, with growth restriction and cross-fostering having only subtle effects. It therefore appears that reductions in adult mitochondrial biogenesis markers likely develop after weaning.
Arthritis is a chronic inflammatory illness that induces cachexia, which has a direct impact on morbidity and mortality. Fenofibrate, a selective PPARα activator prescribed to treat human dyslipidemia, has been reported to decrease inflammation in rheumatoid arthritis patients. The aim of this study was to elucidate whether fenofibrate is able to ameliorate skeletal muscle wasting in adjuvant-induced arthritis, an experimental model of rheumatoid arthritis. On day 4 after adjuvant injection, control and arthritic rats were treated with 300 mg/kg fenofibrate until day 15, when all rats were euthanized. Fenofibrate decreased external signs of arthritis and liver TNFα and blocked arthritis-induced decreased in PPARα expression in the gastrocnemius muscle. Arthritis decreased gastrocnemius weight, which results from a decrease in cross-section area and myofiber size, whereas fenofibrate administration to arthritic rats attenuated the decrease in both gastrocnemius weight and fast myofiber size. Fenofibrate treatment prevented arthritis-induced increase in atrogin-1 and MuRF1 expression in the gastrocnemius. Neither arthritis nor fenofibrate administration modify Akt-FoxO3 signaling. Myostatin expression was not modified by arthritis, but fenofibrate decreased myostatin expression in the gastrocnemius of arthritic rats. Arthritis increased muscle expression of MyoD, PCNA, and myogenin in the rats treated with vehicle but not in those treated with fenofibrate. The results indicate that, in experimental arthritis, fenofibrate decreases skeletal muscle atrophy through inhibition of the ubiquitin-proteasome system and myostatin.
Understanding fate choice and fate switching between the osteoblast lineage (ObL) and adipocyte lineage (AdL) is important to understand both the developmental inter-relationships between osteoblasts and adipocytes and the impact of changes in fate allocation between the two lineages in normal aging and certain diseases. The goal of this study was to determine when during lineage progression ObL cells are susceptible to an AdL fate switch by activation of endogenous peroxisome proliferator-activated receptor (PPAR)gamma.
Multiple rat calvaria cells within the ObL developmental hierarchy were isolated by either fractionation on the basis of expression of alkaline phosphatase or retrospective identification of single cell-derived colonies, and treated with BRL-49653 (BRL), a synthetic ligand for PPARgamma. About 30% of the total single cell-derived colonies expressed adipogenic potential (defined cytochemically) when BRL was present. Profiling of ObL and AdL markers by qRT-PCR on amplified cRNA from over 160 colonies revealed that BRL-dependent adipogenic potential correlated with endogenous PPARgamma mRNA levels. Unexpectedly, a significant subset of relatively mature ObL cells exhibited osteo-adipogenic bipotentiality. Western blotting and immunocytochemistry confirmed that ObL cells co-expressed multiple mesenchymal lineage determinants (runt-related transcription factor 2 (Runx2), PPARgamma, Sox9 and MyoD which localized in the cytoplasm initially, and only Runx2 translocated to the nucleus during ObL progression. Notably, however, some cells exhibited both PPARgamma and Runx2 nuclear labeling with concomitant upregulation of expression of their target genes with BRL treatment.
We conclude that not only immature but a subset of relatively mature ObL cells characterized by relatively high levels of endogenous PPARgamma expression can be switched to the AdL. The fact that some ObL cells maintain capacity for adipogenic fate selection even at relatively mature developmental stages implies an unexpected plasticity with important implications in normal and pathological bone development.
Menopause, the age-related loss of ovarian hormone production, promotes increased adiposity and associated metabolic pathology, but molecular mechanisms remain unclear. We previously reported that estrogen increases skeletal muscle PPARdelta expression in vivo, and transgenic mice overexpressing muscle-specific PPARdelta are reportedly protected from diet-induced obesity. We thus hypothesized that obesity observed in ovariectomized mice, a model of menopause, may result in part from abrogated expression of muscle PPARdelta and/or downstream mediators such as FoxO1. To test this hypothesis, we ovariectomized (OVX) or sham-ovariectomized (SHM) 10-week old female C57Bl/6J mice, and subsequently harvested quadriceps muscles 12weeks later for gene expression studies. Compared to SHM, muscle from OVX mice displayed significantly decreased expression of PPARdelta (3.4-fold), FoxO1 (4.5-fold), PDK-4 (2.3-fold), and UCP-2 (1.8-fold). Consistent with studies indicating PPARdelta and FoxO1 regulate muscle fiber type, we observed dramatic OVX-specific decreases in slow isoforms of the contractile proteins myosin light chain (11.1-fold) and troponin C (11.8-fold). In addition, muscles from OVX mice expressed 57% less myogenin (drives type I fiber formation), 2-fold more MyoD (drives type II fiber formation), and 1.6-fold less musclin (produced exclusively by type II fibers) than SHM, collectively suggesting a shift towards less type I oxidative fibers. Finally, and consistent with changes in PPARdelta and FoxO1 activity, we observed decreased expression of atrogin-1 (2.3-fold) and MuRF-1 (1.9-fold) in OVX mice. In conclusion, muscles from ovariectomized mice display decreased PPARdelta and FoxO1 expression, abrogated expression of downstream targets involved in lipid and protein metabolism, and gene expression profiles indicating less type I oxidative fibers.
Sirtuin 3 (SIRT3), one of the seven mammalian sirtuins, is a mitochondrial NAD+-dependent deacetylase known to control key metabolic pathways. SIRT3 deacetylases and activates a large number of mitochondrial enzymes involved in the respiratory chain, in ATP production, and in both the citric acid and urea cycles. We have previously shown that the regulation of myoblast differentiation is tightly linked to mitochondrial activity. Since SIRT3 modulates mitochondrial activity, we decide to address its role during myoblast differentiation. For this purpose, we first investigated the expression of endogenous SIRT3 during C2C12 myoblast differentiation. We further studied the impact of SIRT3 silencing on both the myogenic potential and the mitochondrial activity of C2C12 cells. We showed that SIRT3 protein expression peaked at the onset of myoblast differentiation. The inhibition of SIRT3 expression mediated by the stable integration of SIRT3 short inhibitory RNA (SIRT3shRNA) in C2C12 myoblasts, resulted in: 1) abrogation of terminal differentiation - as evidenced by a marked decrease in the myoblast fusion index and a significant reduction of Myogenin, MyoD, Sirtuin 1 and Troponin T protein expression - restored upon MyoD overexpression; 2) a decrease in peroxisome proliferator-activated receptor gamma coactivator 1-alpha (PGC-1α) and citrate synthase protein expression reflecting an alteration of mitochondrial density; and 3) an increased production of reactive oxygen species (ROS) mirrored by the decreased activity of manganese superoxide dismutase (MnSOD). Altogether our data demonstrate that SIRT3 mainly regulates myoblast differentiation via its influence on mitochondrial activity.
Stimulation of the mouse hindlimb via the sciatic nerve was performed for a 4-h period to investigate acute muscle gene activation in a model of muscle phenotype conversion. Initial force production (1.6 +/- 0.1 g/g body wt) declined 45% within 10 min and was maintained for the remainder of the experiment. Force returned to initial levels upon study completion. An immediate-early growth response was present in the extensor digitorum longus (EDL) muscle (FOS, JUN, activating transcription factor 3, and musculoaponeurotic fibrosarcoma oncogene) with a similar but attenuated pattern in the soleus muscle. Transcript profiles showed decreased fast fiber-specific mRNA (myosin heavy chains 2A and 2B, fast troponins T(3) and I, alpha-tropomyosin, muscle creatine kinase, and parvalbumin) and increased slow transcripts (myosin heavy chain-1beta/slow, troponin C slow, and tropomyosin 3y) in the EDL versus soleus muscles. Histological analysis of the EDL revealed glycogen depletion without inflammatory cell infiltration in stimulated versus control muscles, whereas ultrastructural analysis showed no evidence of myofiber damage after stimulation. Multiple fiber type-specific transcription factors (tea domain family member 1, nuclear factor of activated T cells 1, peroxisome proliferator-activated receptor-gamma coactivator-1alpha and -beta, circadian locomotor output cycles kaput, and hypoxia-inducible factor-1alpha) increased in the EDL along with transcription factors characteristic of embryogenesis (Kruppel-like factor 4; SRY box containing 17; transcription factor 15; PBX/knotted 1 homeobox 1; and embryonic lethal, abnormal vision). No established in vivo satellite cell markers or genes activated in our parallel experiments of satellite cell proliferation in vitro (cyclins A(2), B(2), C, and E(1) and MyoD) were differentially increased in the stimulated muscles. These results indicated that the molecular onset of fast to slow phenotype conversion occurred in the EDL within 4 h of stimulation without injury or satellite cell recruitment. This conversion was associated with the expression of phenotype-specific transcription factors from resident fiber myonuclei, including the activation of nascent developmental transcriptional programs.
Uncoupling protein 3 (Ucp3) is a transport protein of the inner mitochondrial membrane and presumably is implicated in the maintenance or tolerance of high lipid oxidation rates. Ucp3 is predominantly expressed in skeletal muscle and brown adipose tissue and is regulated by a transcription factor complex involving peroxisome proliferator-activated receptor-alpha, MyoD, and COUP transcription factor II. By analysis of a mutant Djungarian hamster model lacking Ucp3 transcription specifically in brown adipose tissue, we identified a putative transcription factor-binding site that confers tissue specificity. A naturally occurring intronic point mutation disrupting this site leads to brown adipose tissue-specific loss of Ucp3 expression and an altered body weight trajectory. Our findings provide insight into tissue-specific Ucp3 regulation and, for the first time, unambiguously demonstrate that changes in Ucp3 expression can interfere with body weight regulation.
Pluripotent mesenchymal stem cells (MSCs) are bone marrow stromal progenitor cells that can differentiate into osteogenic, chondrogenic, adipogenic, and myogenic lineages. Several signaling pathways have been shown to regulate the lineage commitment and terminal differentiation of MSCs. Here, we conducted a comprehensive analysis of the 14 types of bone morphogenetic protein (BMPs) for their abilities to regulate multilineage specific differentiation of MSCs. We found that most BMPs exhibited distinct abilities to regulate the expression of Runx2, Sox9, MyoD, and PPARgamma2. Further analysis indicated that BMP-2, BMP-4, BMP-6, BMP-7, and BMP-9 effectively induced both adipogenic and osteogenic differentiation in vitro and in vivo. BMP-induced commitment to osteogenic or adipogenic lineage was shown to be mutually exclusive. Overexpression of Runx2 enhanced BMP-induced osteogenic differentiation, whereas knockdown of Runx2 expression diminished BMP-induced bone formation with a decrease in adipocyte accumulation in vivo. Interestingly, overexpression of PPARgamma2 not only promoted adipogenic differentiation, but also enhanced osteogenic differentiation upon BMP-2, BMP-6, and BMP-9 stimulation. Conversely, MSCs with PPARgamma2 knockdown or mouse embryonic fibroblasts derived from PPARgamma2(-/-) mice exhibited a marked decrease in adipogenic differentiation, coupled with reduced osteogenic differentiation and diminished mineralization upon BMP-9 stimulation, suggesting that PPARgamma2 may play a role in BMP-induced osteogenic and adipogenic differentiation. Thus, it is important to understand the molecular mechanism behind BMP-regulated lineage divergence during MSC differentiation, as this knowledge could help us to understand the pathogenesis of skeletal diseases and may lead to the development of strategies for regenerative medicine.
Women exhibit an enhanced capability for lipid metabolism during endurance exercise compared with men. The underlying regulatory mechanisms behind this sex-related difference are not well understood but may comprise signaling through a myocyte enhancer factor 2 (MEF2) regulatory pathway. The primary purpose of this study, therefore, was to investigate the protein signaling of MEF2 regulatory pathway components at rest and during 90 min of bicycling exercise at 60% Vo(2peak) in healthy, moderately trained men (n = 8) and women (n = 9) to elucidate the potential role of these proteins in substrate utilization during exercise. A secondary purpose was to screen for mRNA expression of MEF2 isoforms and myogenic regulatory factor (MRF) family members of transcription factors at rest and during exercise. Muscle biopsies were obtained before and immediately after exercise. Nuclear AMP-activated protein kinase-alpha (alphaAMPK) Thr(172) (P < 0.001), histone deacetylase 5 (HDAC5) Ser(498) (P < 0.001), and MEF2 Thr (P < 0.01) phosphorylation increased with exercise. No significant sex differences were observed at rest or during exercise. At rest, no significant sex differences were observed in mRNA expression of the measured transcription factors. mRNA for transcription factors MyoD, myogenin, MRF4, MEF2A, MEF2C, MEF2D, and peroxisome proliferator-activated receptor-gamma coactivator 1alpha (PGC1alpha) were significantly upregulated by exercise. Of these, MEF2A mRNA increased 25% specifically in women (P < 0.05), whereas MEF2D mRNA tended to increase in men (P = 0.11). Although minor sex differences in mRNA expression were observed, the main finding of the present study was the implication of a joint signaling action of AMPK, HDAC5, and PGC1alpha on MEF2 in the immediate regulatory response to endurance exercise. This signaling response was independent of sex.
The importance of connexins is implicated in proliferation and differentiation of cells. In skeletal muscle cells, connexin43 (Cx43) has been identified as the major connexin, and gap-junctional communication mediated by connexins has been shown to be required for their myogenic differentiation. In addition, inhibition of connexin function has been shown to induce transdifferentiation of osteoblasts to an adipocytic phenotype. In the present study, we examined whether the inhibition of connexin function could induce phenotypic changes in skeletal muscle cells. Treatment of skeletal muscle cells with an inhibitor of connexin function, 18alpha-glycyrrhetinic acid (AGRA), resulted in a reduction in the number of MyoD-positive cells and complete inhibition of myotube formation, concomitantly with an increase in the number of C/EBPalpha-positive cells. AGRA-treated cells cultured in adipogenic differentiation medium could give rise to mature adipocytes that express both PPARgamma and C/EBPalpha. The presence of AGRA during adipogenic differentiation did not inhibit adipogenesis of skeletal muscle cells. AGRA treatment did not affect Cx43 expression in skeletal muscle cells but reduced its phosphorylation. These results indicate that inhibition of connexin function induces phenotypic changes of skeletal muscle cells to enter adipogenesis.
To investigate the effects of the wingless-related MMTV integration site 3A (Wnt3a) signaling on the proliferation, migration, and the myogenic and adipogenic differentiation of rat bone marrow mesenchymal stem cells (rMSC).
Primary MSC were isolated and cultured from Sprague-Dawley rats and characterized by flow cytometry. Mouse L cells were transfected with Wnt3a cDNA, and conditioned media containing active Wnt3a proteins were prepared. Cell proliferation was evaluated by cell count and 5-bromodeoxyuridine incorporation assay. The migration of rMSC was performed by using a transwell migration and wound healing assay. The myogenic and adipogenic differentiation in rMSC were examined by light microscopy, immunofluorescence, and RT-PCR at different time points after myogenic or adipogenic introduction.
Wnt3a signaling induced beta-catenin nuclear translocation and activated the Wnt pathway in rMSC. In the presence of Wnt3a, rMSC proliferated more rapidly than the control cells, keeping their differentiation potential. Moreover, Wnt3a signaling induced 2.62% and 3.76% of rMSC-expressed desmin and myosin heavy chain after being cultured in myogenic medium. The myogenic differentiation genes, including Pax7, MyoD, Myf5, Myf4, and myogenin, were activated after Wnt3a treatment. On the other hand, Wnt3a inhibited the adipogenic differentiation in rMSC through the downregulated expression of CCAAT/enhancer-binding protein alpha (C/EBPalpha) and peroxisome proliferator-activated receptor gamma (PPARgamma). Furthermore, Wnt3a promoted the migration capacity of rMSC.
The results indicate that Wnt3a signaling can induce myogenic differentiation in rMSC. Wnt3a signaling is also involved in the regulation of the proliferation and migration of rMSC. These results could provide a rational foundation for cell-based tissue repair in humans.
Muscle fibres have different properties with respect to force, contraction speed, endurance, oxidative/glycolytic capacity etc. Although adult muscle fibres are normally post-mitotic with little turnover of cells, the physiological properties of the pre-existing fibres can be changed in the adult animal upon changes in usage such as after exercise. The signal to change is mainly conveyed by alterations in the patterns of nerve-evoked electrical activity, and is to a large extent due to switches in the expression of genes. Thus, an excitation-transcription coupling must exist. It is suggested that changes in nerve-evoked muscle activity lead to a variety of activity correlates such as increases in free intracellular Ca(2+) levels caused by influx across the cell membrane and/or release from the sarcoplasmatic reticulum, concentrations of metabolites such as lipids and ADP, hypoxia and mechanical stress. Such correlates are detected by sensors such as protein kinase C (PKC), calmodulin, AMP-activated kinase (AMPK), peroxisome proliferator-activated receptor δ (PPARδ), and oxygen dependent prolyl hydroxylases that trigger intracellular signaling cascades. These complex cascades involve several transcription factors such as nuclear factor of activated T-cells (NFAT), myocyte enhancer factor 2 (MEF2), myogenic differentiation factor (myoD), myogenin, PPARδ, and sine oculis homeobox 1/eyes absent 1 (Six1/Eya1). These factors might act indirectly by inducing gene products that act back on the cascade, or as ultimate transcription factors binding to and transactivating/repressing genes for the fast and slow isoforms of various contractile proteins and of metabolic enzymes. The determination of size and force is even more complex as this involves not only intracellular signaling within the muscle fibres, but also muscle stem cells called satellite cells. Intercellular signaling substances such as myostatin and insulin-like growth factor 1 (IGF-1) seem to act in a paracrine fashion. Induction of hypertrophy is accompanied by the satellite cells fusing to myofibres and thereby increasing the capacity for protein synthesis. These extra nuclei seem to remain part of the fibre even during subsequent atrophy as a form of muscle memory facilitating retraining. In addition to changes in myonuclear number during hypertrophy, changes in muscle fibre size seem to be caused by alterations in transcription, translation (per nucleus) and protein degradation.
The effects of distinct classes of peroxisome proliferator-activated receptor gamma (PPARgamma) ligands on myogenesis and MyoD gene expression were examined in mouse skeletal muscle C2C12 myoblasts. Treatment of C2C12 cells with the PPARgamma ligand, 15-deoxy-Delta12,14-prostaglandin J2 (15d-PGJ2), repressed morphologically defined myogenesis and reduced endogenous mRNA levels of the myogenic differentiation markers MyoD, myogenin, and alpha-actin. In contrast, two synthetic PPARgamma ligands, L-805645 and ciglitazone, exhibited no effects. In transient transfection assays, 15d-PGJ2 specifically inhibited the expression of a MyoD promoter-luciferase reporter gene (MyoDLuc) in a cell type- and promoter-specific manner, indicating that 15d-PGJ2 functions in part by repressing MyoD gene transcription. The inhibition of MyoD gene expression by 15d-PGJ2 is mediated by the distal region of the MyoD gene promoter. PPARgamma on its own also inhibited MyoDLuc expression and further augmented the 15d-PGJ2 response. In contrast, L-805645 and ciglitazone did not inhibit MyoDLuc expression on their own but did so in the presence of ectopically expressed PPARgamma. Interestingly, a transdominant inhibitor of PPARgamma (hPPARgamma2Delta500) had no effect on the 15d-PGJ2-dependent repression of MyoDLuc expression but overcame L-805645/PPARgamma-dependent repression. Finally, saturating concentrations of L-805645, which did not affect myogenesis, failed to ablate 15d-PGJ2-mediated repression of the myogenic program. Thus, distinct PPARgamma ligands may repress MyoD gene expression through PPARgamma-dependent and -independent pathways, and 15d-PGJ2 can inhibit the myogenic program independent of its cognate receptor, PPARgamma.
Peroxisome proliferator-activated receptor γ (PPARγ) is a key transcription factor in adipogenesis and can be regulated by adipogenesis-related factors. However, little information is available regarding its regulation by myogenic factors. In this study, we found that over-expression of MyoD enhanced porcine adipocyte differentiation and up-regulated PPARγ expression, whereas small interfering RNA against MyoD significantly attenuated porcine adipocyte differentiation and inhibited PPARγ expression. The MyoD-binding sites in the PPARγ promoter region at -412 to -396 and -155 to -150 were identified by promoter deletion analysis and site-directed mutagenesis. Electrophoretic mobility shift assays and chromatin immunoprecipitation further showed that these two regions are MyoD-binding sites, both in vitro and in vivo, indicating that MyoD directly interacts with the porcine PPARγ promoter. Thus, our results demonstrate that an Enhancer box and a binding site for a cooperative co-activator of MyoD are present in the promoter region of porcine PPARγ; furthermore, MyoD up-regulates PPARγ expression and promotes porcine adipocyte differentiation.
Maternal obesity is linked with offspring obesity and type 2 diabetes. Skeletal muscle (SM) insulin resistance is central to the development of diabetes. Adenosine monophosphate (AMP)-activated protein kinase (AMPK) is inhibited in SM of fetuses born to obese mothers.
The aim of this study was to evaluate the effect of maternal metformin administration on AMPK activity and reversion of adverse changes in offspring SM of obese mice.
Female weanling C57BL/6J mice received either control diet (CON, 6 mice) or high-fat diet (HFD; OB, 12 mice) for 8 weeks before mating. After mating, mice continued receiving their respective CON or OB diets. In addition, 6 of those 12 mice fed with fat diet also received metformin administration (2 mg per ml in drinking water) throughout gestation and lactation (MET). After weaning at postnatal 21 days, offspring were fed a HFD to mimic a postnatal obesogenic environment until necropsy.
Mothers receiving the fat diet developed obesity. OB offspring showed higher adiposity than CON and MET offspring. AMPK phosphorylation was lower in SM of OB offspring. β-Catenin and myogenic regulatory factors, MyoD and myogenin, were downregulated in OB muscle, whereas the adipogenic marker, peroxisome proliferator-activated receptor-γ, was upregulated compared with CON muscle. Metformin administration prevented these changes in OB offspring SM. OB but not MET offspring demonstrated glucose intolerance. Mitochondrial content decreased, and activities of citrate synthase and β-hydroxyacyl-CoA dehydrogenase also decreased in OB offspring SM, whereas they were recovered in MET offspring SM.
Maternal metformin administration improves SM development in OB offspring.
Mesenchymal stem cells (MSCs) are multipotent cells that represent a promising source for regenerative medicine. MSCs are capable of osteogenic, chondrogenic, adipogenic and myogenic differentiation. Efficacy of differentiated MSCs to regenerate cells in the injured tissues requires the ability to maintain the differentiation toward the desired cell fate. Since MSCs represent an attractive source for autologous transplantation, cellular and molecular signaling pathways and micro-environmental changes have been studied in order to understand the role of cytokines, chemokines, and transcription factors on the differentiation of MSCs. The differentiation of MSC into a mesenchymal lineage is genetically manipulated and promoted by specific transcription factors associated with a particular cell lineage. Recent studies have explored the integration of transcription factors, including Runx2, Sox9, PPARγ, MyoD, GATA4, and GATA6 in the differentiation of MSCs. Therefore, the overexpression of a single transcription factor in MSCs may promote trans-differentiation into specific cell lineage, which can be used for treatment of some diseases. In this review, we critically discussed and evaluated the role of transcription factors and related signaling pathways that affect the differentiation of MSCs toward adipocytes, chondrocytes, osteocytes, skeletal muscle cells, cardiomyocytes, and smooth muscle cells.
Intramuscular fat (IMF) or intramuscular triglycerides are interspersed throughout the skeletal muscles. The IMF, also called marbling, imparts meat with flavor and juiciness and is one of the core criteria for judging carcass value. The quantity of IMF is influenced entirely by genetics. Recently, understanding the underlying genetic bases of IMF has been a focus particularly in the beef industry. In this study, with the deep insights of ameliorating the beef quality by genetic means, the role of the CCAAT/enhancer binding protein alpha (C/EBPα) gene was investigated by over-expressing C/EBPα in bovine muscle stem cells (MSCs) to initiate the adipogenic program. Prior to this, bovine MSCs were isolated and induced to differentiate into adipocytes from cells that were exposed to dexamethasone isobutylmethylxanthine and indomethacin; the presence of insulin and fetal bovine serum was examined. Either ectopic expression of C/EBPα or treatment with dexamethasone and insulin induced the accumulation of fat droplets and the expression of adipogenic induction genes (LPL, PPARγ, C/EBPβ, and C/EBPδ). The expression levels of myoblast-related genes (MyoD, Myf5, and Pax7) were also measured to assess the accuracy of the differentiation process. This study provides evidence that the C/EBPα gene is essential for cattle adipose tissue growth and development. Hence, this finding can contribute to improving beef carcass quality.
Chemerin is an adipocyte-secreted adipokine that regulates the differentiation and metabolism of adipose through auto-/paracrine signaling. Its function in the differentiation of multipotent myoblast cells has thus far received little attention. In this study, C2C12 myoblast cells were cultured in the medium with Chemerin, and the differentiation potential of C2C12 myoblasts was analyzed. The results showed that Chemerin increased ROS levels and TG content of C2C12 cells. At the same time, the mRNA expressions and protein concentrations of the adipogenic factors PPARγ, C/EBPα and UCP1 were up-regulated, while the muscle specific transcription factors MyoD, Myogenin and MyHC were decreased in cultured C2C12 cells. In conclusion, the adipokine Chemerin promoted the adipogenic differentiation potential and altered the fate of myoblast cells from myogenesis to adipogenesis, which contributed in part to the up-regulated adipocyte genes. Our study reveals the importance of functional Chemerin signaling in adipogenesis and in directing the differentiation of multipotent myoblast cells.
Mesenchymal stem cells (MSCs) are pluripotent cells which can differentiate into several distinct lineages, such as chondrocytes, adipocytes and myofibers. It has been reported that the lineage-specific transcriptional factors including Runt related transcription factor 2 (RUNX2), Peroxisome proliferator-activator receptor gamma (PPARgamma) and Myogenic differentiation 1 (MyoD) may play key regulatory roles among the differentiation of MSCs. Recently, researches have confirmed that the Hippo pathway impacts the differentiation fates of MSCs through regulating the activity of line- age-specific transcription factors by the Hippo pathway effectors Tafazzin (TAZ) and/or Yes-associated protein (YAP). The interaction between TAZ and RUNX2 boosts the osteogenic processes and promotes MSCs differentiating into osteoblast lineage. However, PPARgamma binding to TAZ may inhibit the adipocytes differentiation, and thus overexpression of TAZ in mesenchymal stem cell-like cells increases the expression of myogenic genes and hastens myofiber formation through a MyoD-dependent manner. Moreover, other signaling pathways (such as BMP-2, TNF-alpha, Eph-Ephrin, etc.), small molecules (KR62980, TM-25659, etc.), and mechanistic stimuli can also affect the fate by regulating the activity of TAZ/YAP. In this review, we summarized the signaling pattern of Hippo pathway and the function mechanism of TAZ and/or YAP by enumerating their interaction to several lineage-specific transcriptional factors and relationship with other signal pathways during MSCs differentiation.
Muscle development in domesticated animals is important for meat production. Furthermore, intramuscular fat content is an important trait of meat intended for consumption. Here, we examined differences in the expression of factors related to myogenesis, adipogenesis and skeletal muscle growth during fetal muscle development of lean (Yorkshire) and obese (Chenghua) pig breeds. At prenatal days 50 (d50) and 90 (d90), muscles and sera were collected from pig fetuses. Histology revealed larger diameters and numbers of myofibers in Chenghua pig fetuses than those in Yorkshire pig fetuses at d50 and d90. Yorkshire fetuses had higher serum concentrations of myostatin (d90), a negative regulator for muscle development, and higher mRNA expression of the growth hormone receptor Ghr (d90), myogenic MyoG (d90) and adipogenic LPL (d50). By contrast, Chenghua fetuses exhibited higher serum concentration of growth hormone (d90), and higher mRNA expression of myogenic MyoD (d90) as well as adipogenic PPARG and FABP4 (d50). Our results revealed distinct expression patterns in the two pig breeds at each developmental stage before birth. Compared with Chenghua pigs, development and maturation of fetal skeletal muscles may occur earlier in Yorkshire pigs, but the negative regulatory effects of myostatin may suppress muscle development at the later stage.
Periodontal ligament (PDL) cells in stationary two-dimensional culture systems are in a double default state. Our aim therefore was to engineer and characterize three-dimensional constructs, by seeding PDL cells into hyaluronan-gelatin hydrogel films (80-100 μm) in a format capable of being mechanically deformed.
Human PDL constructs were cultured with and without connective tissue growth factor (CTGF) and fibroblast growth factor (FGF)-2 in (i) stationary cultures, and (ii) mechanically active cultures subjected to cyclic strains of 12% at 0.2 Hz each min, 6 h/d, in a Flexercell FX-4000 Strain Unit. The following parameters were measured: cell number and viability by laser scanning confocal microscopy; cell proliferation with the MTS assay; the expression of a panel of 18 genes using real-time RT-PCR; matrix metalloproteinases (MMPs) 1-3, TIMP-1, CTGF and FGF-2 protein levels in supernatants from mechanically activated cultures with Enzyme-linked immunosorbent assays. Constructs from stationary cultures were also examined by scanning electron microscopy and immunostained for actin and vinculin.
Although initially randomly distributed, the cells became organized into a bilayer by day 7; apoptotic cells remained constant at approximately 5% of the total. CTGF/FGF-2 stimulated cell proliferation in stationary cultures, but relative quantity values suggested modest effects on gene expression. Two transcription factors (RUNX2 and PPARG), two collagens (COL1A1, COL3A1), four MMPs (MMP-1-3, TIMP-1), TGFB1, RANKL, OPG and P4HB were detected by gel electrophoresis and Ct values < 35. In mechanically active cultures, with the exception of P4HB, TGFB1 and RANKL, each was upregulated at some point in the time scale, as was the synthesis of MMPs and TIMP-1. SOX9, MYOD, SP7, BMP2, BGLAP or COL2A1 were not detected in either stationary or mechanically active cultures.
Three-dimensional tissue constructs provide additional complexity to monolayer culture systems, and suggest some of the assumptions regarding cell growth, differentiation and matrix turnover based on two-dimensional cultures may not apply to cells in three-dimensional matrices. Primarily developed as a transitional in vitro model for studying cell-cell and cell-matrix interactions in tooth support, the system is also suitable for investigating the pathogenesis of periodontal diseases, and importantly from the clinical point of view, in a mechanically active environment.
We assessed the developmental ability of embryos cloned from porcine neural stem (NS) cells, amniotic fluid-derived stem (AFS) cells, fetal fibroblast cells, adult fibroblast, and mammary gland epithelial cells. The five cell lines were transfected with enhanced green fluorescence protein gene respectively using lipofection. NS and AFS cells were induced to differentiate in vitro. Stem cells and their differentiated cells were harvested for analysis of the markers using RT-PCR. The five cell lines were used for nuclear transfer. The two-cell stage-cloned embryos derived from each cell line were transferred into the oviducts of surrogate mothers. The results showed that both NS and AFS cells expressed POU5F1, THY1 and SOX2, and they were both induced to differentiate into astrocyte (GFAP+), oligodendrocyte (GalC+), neuron (NF+, ENO2+, and MAP2+), adipocyte (LPL+ and PPARG-D+), osteoblast (osteonectin+ and osteocalcin+), myocyte (MYF6+ and MYOD+), and endothelium (PECAM1+, CD34+, CDH5+, and NOS3+) respectively. Seven cloned fetuses (28 days and 32 days) derived from stem cells were obtained. The in vitro developmental ability (morula-blastocyst rate was 28.26-30.07%) and in vivo developmental ability (pregnancy rate were 1.67-2.17%) of the embryos cloned from stem cells were higher (P<0.05) than that of the embryos cloned from somatic cells (morula-blastocyst rate was 16.27-19.28% and pregnancy rate was 0.00%), which suggests that the undifferentiated state of the donor cells increases cloning efficiency.
Skeletal muscle wasting is an important public health problem associated with aging, chronic disease, cancer, kidney dialysis, and HIV/AIDS. 1,25-Dihydroxyvitamin D (1,25-D3), the active form of vitamin D, is widely recognized for its regulation of calcium and phosphate homeostasis in relation to bone development and maintenance and for its calcemic effects on target organs, such as intestine, kidney, and parathyroid glands. Emerging evidence has shown that vitamin D administration improves muscle performance and reduces falls in vitamin D-deficient older adults. However, little is known of the underlying mechanism or the role 1,25-D3 plays in promoting myogenic differentiation at the cellular and/or molecular level. In this study, we examined the effect of 1,25-D3 on myoblast cell proliferation, progression, and differentiation into myotubes. C(2)C(12) myoblasts were treated with 1,25-D3 or placebo for 1, 3, 4, 7, and 10 d. Vitamin D receptor expression was analyzed by quantitative RT-PCR, Western blottings and immunofluorescence. Expression of muscle lineage, pro- and antimyogenic, and proliferation markers was assessed by immunocytochemistry, PCR arrays, quantitative RT-PCR, and Western blottings. Addition of 1,25-D3 to C(2)C(12) myoblasts 1) increased expression and nuclear translocation of the vitamin D receptor, 2) decreased cell proliferation, 3) decreased IGF-I expression, and 4) promoted myogenic differentiation by increasing IGF-II and follistatin expression and decreasing the expression of myostatin, the only known negative regulator of muscle mass, without changing growth differentiation factor 11 expression. This study identifies key vitamin D-related molecular pathways for muscle regulation and supports the rationale for vitamin D intervention studies in select muscle disorder conditions.
Patients with vitamin D insufficiency often exhibit muscle weakness and/or atrophy which can be cured by vitamin D and Ca supplementation. However, its molecular mechanism is largely unknown. The direct effects of vitamin D on skeletal muscle cells include induction of transcription factors such as c-myc (genomic action) ;and activation of Ca channels, Src tyrosine kinase and MAP kinase (non-genomic action). Recent studies on VDR gene knockout mice revealed that VDR also regulates expression of the MyoD family of transcription factors in skeletal muscle. Thus, vitamin D and Ca appear to regulate proliferation, maturation and function of skeletal muscle through these complex actions.
The homology between mouse chromosome 7 and human chromosomes 11, 15, and 19 was examined using interspecific backcross animals derived from mating C3H/HeJ-gld/gld and Mus spretus mice. In an earlier study, we reported on the linkage relationships of 16 loci on mouse chromosome 7 and the homologous relationship between this chromosome and the myotonic dystrophy gene region on human chromosome 19. Segregation analyses were used to extend the gene linkage relationships on mouse chromosome 7 by an additional 21 loci. Seven of these genes (Cyp2a, D19F11S1h, Myod-1, Otf-2, Rnu1p70, Rnu2pa, and Xrcc-1) were previously unmapped in the mouse. Several potential mouse chromosome 7 genes (Mel, Hkr-1, Icam-1, Pvs) did not segregate with chromosome 7 markers, and provisional chromosomal assignments were made. This study establishes a detailed molecular genetic linkage map of mouse chromosome 7 that will be useful as a framework for determining linkage relationships of additional molecular markers and for identifying homologous disease genes in mice and humans.
Overexpression of multidrug resistance 1 (MDR1) in cancer remains one of the major causes for the failure of chemotherapy. In the present study, we found that MyoD and PEA3 could activate P-glycoprotein (P-gp) expression in SGC7901 cells. Knockdown of MyoD and PEA3 attenuated MDR1 expression and increased the sensitivity of multidrug resistant cancer cells to cytotoxic drugs that were transported by P-gp in SGC7901/VCR cells. MyoD or PEA3 could bind to the E-box and PEA3 sites on the MDR1 promoter and activate its transcription. The regulation of MDR1 expression by MyoD and PEA3 may provide potential ways to overcome MDR in cancer treatment.
Promoter DNA methylation of CpG islands is an important epigenetic mechanism in cancer development. We have characterized the promoter methylation profile of 82 genes in three prostate cancer cell lines (LNCaP, PC3, and DU145) and two normal prostate cell lines (RWPE1 and RWPE2). The methylation pattern was analyzed using a Panomics gene array system that consists of immobilized probes of known gene promoters on a nitrocellulose membrane. Methylation binding protein-purified methylated DNA was hybridized on the membrane and detected by the chemiluminescence method. We analyzed methylation profile in normal (RWPE1) versus cancerous cells and androgen receptor (AR)-sensitive (LNCaP) versus AR-negative cells (DU145 and PC3). Our study shows that >50% of the genes were hypermethylated in prostate cancer cells compared with 13% in normal cell lines. Among these were the tumor suppressor (RB, TMS1, DAPK, RBL1, PAX6, and FHIT), cell cycle (p27KIP1 and CDKN2A), transporters (MDR1, MLC1, and IGRP), and transcription factor (STAT1, CIITA, MYOD, and NPAT) genes. Relative methylation pattern shows that most of these genes were methylated from 5-fold to >10-fold compared with the normal prostate cells. In addition, promoter methylation was detected for the first time in target genes such as RIOK3, STAT5, CASP8, SRBC, GAGE1, and NPAT. A significant difference in methylation pattern was observed between AR-sensitive versus AR-negative cancer cells for the following genes: CASP8, GPC3, CD14, MGMT, IGRP, MDR1, CDKN2A, GATA3, and IFN. In summary, our study identified candidate genes that are methylated in prostate cancer.
Overexpression of MDR1 in breast cancer remains a major cause for the failure of chemotherapy. In the present report, we find UHRF1 plays an important role in inhibiting MDR1 promoter activity by directly binding to the MDR1 promoter. Knockdown of UHRF1 activates MDR1 promoter activity and expression, attenuates the binding of UHRF1 and HDAC1 to the MDR1 promoter.Overexpression of UHRF1 in NCI/ADR-RES cells can induce deacetylation of histones H3 and H4 on the MDR1 promoter, which is facilitated by recruitment of HDAC1 to the MDR1 promoter. Loss of histone acetylation is accompanied by loss of binding of the key transcription factor, MyoD, CBP and p300, locking in marked suppression of MDR1, increasing sensitivity of MDR cancer cells to cytotoxic drugs that are transported by P-glycoprotein(P-gp). The inhibition of MDR1 expression by UHRF1 may provide potential ways to overcome multidrug resistance (MDR) in breast cancer treatment.
Fibroblast growth factor 6 (FGF6) is selectively expressed during muscle development and regeneration. We examined its effect on muscle precursor cells (mpc) by forcing stable FGF6 expression in C2C12 cells in vitro. FGF6 produced in genetically engineered mpc was active, inducing strong morphological changes, altering cell adhesion and compromising their ability to differentiate into myotubes. Expression of MyoD and myogenin, but not of Myf5, was abrogated in FGF6 engineered mpc. These effects were reversed by FGF inhibitors. Ectopic expression of MyoD also restored fiber formation indicating that FGF6 interferes with the myogenic differentiation pathway upstream of MyoD. We also report that in the presence of FGF6, the minor (0.5-2%) subpopulation of cells actively excluding Hoechst 33342 in a verapamil-dependent manner (SP phenotype) was increased to 15-20% and the expression of the mdr1a gene (but not mdr1b) was upregulated by 400-fold. Our data establish a previously undescribed link between FGF6--a muscle specific growth factor--and a multidrug resistance gene expressed in stem cells, and suggest a role for FGF6 in the maintenance of a reserve pool of progenitor cells in the skeletal muscle.
To establish a rabbit model for investigating the effects of intermittent cyclic mechanical tension (ICMT) on promoting degeneration of endplate cartilage.
Forty New Zealand white rabbits were subjected to surgery and randomly divided into three equal groups as follows: control group (no treatment, n = 10), sham group (animals underwent a sham operation but were not subjected to mechanical tensile strain, n = 15) and loaded group (discs were subjected to 1.5 MPa external tensile loading by using an external loading device during the animals' daily activity, n = 15). Mechanical tensile strain was applied for 8 h/d. The animals were examined radiologically after 8 weeks treatment and then killed for removal of endplate cartilage tissue samples from their spines. Histological staining was performed to examine the morphology of endplate cartilage tissue. Multiple strategies were employed to examine degeneration of endplate cartilage and nuclear factor (NF)-κB signaling pathway activation.
After ICMT loading for 56 days, radiology revealed ossification, hyperosteogeny and stenosis in the intervertebral spaces. Examination of hematoxylin and eosin staining of sections of endplate cartilage showed significant damage as the load duration increased in the ICMT loading group. Expression of aggrecan (ACAN), type II collagen (COL-2A), SRY-related high mobility group-box gene 9 (SOX9) was down-regulated (FACAN = 21.515, P < 0.01; FCOL-2A = 6.670, P = 0.05; FSOX9 = 7.888, P < 0.05), whereas that of matrix metallopeptidase 13 (MMP13) was up-regulated (FMMP13 = 14.120, P < 0.01) after ICMT. Western blot and immunofluorescence revealed that expression of protein was consistent with gene expression results. Additionally, ICMT loading can lead to NF-κB signaling pathway activation as well as degeneration of endplate cartilage.
These experiments indicate that ICMT contributes to the activation of NF-κB signaling pathway in vivo and that the NF-κB signaling pathway further up-regulates MMP13, leading to degeneration of endplate cartilage.
Selenium toxicity to oviparous vertebrates is often attributed to selenomethionine (SeMet), which can biomagnify through maternal transfer. Although oxidative stress is implicated in SeMet toxicity, knowledge gaps remain in how SeMet causes characteristic spinal deformities. In the present study, we use the Japanese medaka (Oryzias latipes) model to investigate the role of oxidative stress, cell death, and the unfolded protein response (UPR) on skeletal gene expression and SeMet toxicity, linking localization of cellular effects to observed abnormalities. Medaka embryos were treated with 2.5μM or 5μM SeMet for 24h at stage 25 (48h post fertilization). Post treatment, embryos were separated into normal, deformed (mild, moderate or severe), or dead categories. Dichlorofluorescein staining demonstrated oxidative stress in tails of embryos with observable spinal malformations. Furthermore, acridine orange staining for apoptosis identified significantly more dead cells in tails of treated embryos. Gene expression studies for the UPR suggest a potential role for CHOP (c/ebp homologous protein) induced apoptosis deformed embryos after 5μM SeMet, accompanied by a significant decrease in PDIA4 (protein disulfide isomerase A4) and no change in Dnajb9 (ER DNA J Domain-Containing Protein 4). This expression was distinct from the UPR induced by well-studied ER stress inducer, tunicamycin, which robustly activated CHOP, PDIA4 and Dnajb9. Finally, SeMet treatment significantly decreased transcripts of cartilage development, Sox9 (SRY box 9), while increasing Runx2 in deformed embryos, without altering Twist or Collagen 2a1. Results suggest that oxidative stress, the UPR and cell death play key roles in SeMet induced deformities and altered skeletal development factors.
The sex-determining gene SRY induces SOX9 expression in the testes of eutherian mammals via two pathways. SRY binds to testis-specific enhancer of Sox9 (TESCO) with SF1 to activate SOX9 transcription. SRY also up-regulates ER71 expression, and ER71 activates Sox9 transcription. After the initiation of testis differentiation, SOX9 enhances Amh expression by binding to its promoter with SF1. SOX8, SOX9 and SOX10, members of the SOXE gene family, also enhance the activities of the Amh promoter and TESCO. In this study, we investigated the regulation of these sexual differentiation genes in Tokudaia osimensis, which lacks a Y chromosome and the SRY gene. The activity of the AMH promoter was stimulated by SOXE genes and SF1. Mutant AMH promoters, with mutations in its SOX and SF1 binding sites, did not show significant activity by SOX9 and SF1. These results indicate that AMH expression was regulated by the binding of SOX9 and SF1. By contrast, SOXE genes could not enhance TESCO activity. These results indicate that TESCO enhancer activity was lost in this species. Furthermore, the activity of the SOX9 promoter was enhanced by ER71, indicating that ER71 may play an important role in the testis-specific expression of SOX9.
In a 46, XY individual, the presence of the Y chromosome harboring the testis-determining factor (SRY) triggers testis determination and differentiation. In a 46, XX individual, the absence of SRY along with the activation of genes associated with the female pathway leads to ovarian development. The latter process has long been considered as a default pathway. However, recent studies have cast doubts on this dogma. Here, after a brief overview of the main steps of ovarian development, we focus on three genes WNT4, RSPO1 and FOXL2 that are essential for ovarian determination, differentiation and/or maintenance. Especial attention is paid to FOXL2 whose mutations are responsible for the blepharophimosis syndrome, often associated with female infertility, and for cancer. We highlight the cooperation of WNT4, RSPO1 and FOXL2 within a regulatory network and the need for further research to better understand their role in defining and maintaining ovarian identity.
A novel color-tunable phosphor Sr3Y(PO4)3:Ce(3+),Tb(3+) was synthesized through solid-state reaction method. Several techniques, such as X-ray diffraction, Fourier transform infrared spectroscopy, scanning electron microscopy, and energy dispersive X-ray spectroscopy, were used to investigate the obtained phosphors. Results of luminescence spectra and decay time measurements revealed that an efficient energy transfer occurred from Ce(3+) to Tb(3+) via a dipole-dipole mechanism, where Ce(3+) exhibited a strong excitation band in the near-ultraviolet region. CIE chromaticity coordinates were tuned from deep blue (0.162, 0.090) to green (0.230, 0.411) by adjusting the relative concentrations between Ce(3+) and Tb(3+) ions. Results revealed that the as-synthesized phosphors had color-tunable characteristics and can be used as promising materials in the field of phosphor-converted white light-emitting diodes.
Constitutional translocations between sex chromosomes are rather rare in humans with breakpoints at Xp11 and Yq11 as the most frequent. Breakpoints on the short arm of the Y chromosome form one subgroup of t(X;Y), giving rise to a derived chromosome with the centromeres of both the X and Y chromosomes, dic(X;Y). Here, we report a rare congenital chromosomal aberration, 46,X,dic(X;Y)(p22.33;p11.32)[20]/45,X[10], in an adult male.
Primary myelofibrosis, a malignant haematological disease, was diagnosed in a 63-year-old man following liver transplantation after hepatocellular carcinoma. By the analysis of the bone marrow sample, the karyotype 46,X,dic(X;Y)(p22.33;p11.32) was detected in all the mitoses analysed and verified with multicolour fluorescence in situ hybridization (mFISH). A cytogenetic examination of stimulated peripheral blood cells revealed the constitutional karyotype 46,X,dic(X;Y)(p22.33;p11.32)[20]/45,X[10]. The cell line 45,X was confirmed with FISH in 35 % of interphase nuclei. The SRY locus was present on the dicentric chromosome. A CGH/SNP array (Illumina) revealed a gain of 153,7 Mbp of the X chromosome and a 803-kbp microdeletion (including the SHOX gene), which were also confirmed with FISH. SHOX encodes a transcriptional factor that regulates the growth of the long bones. The deletion of the SHOX gene together with the Madelung deformity of the forearm and the short stature of the proband led to a diagnosis of Léri-Weill dyschondrosteosis (LWD). The gain of almost the whole X chromosome (153,7 Mbp) was considered a variant of Klinefelter syndrome (KS). The levels of gonadotropins and testosterone were consistent with gonadal dysfunction. A malformation of the right external ear was detected.
We have reported a structural aberration of the sex chromosomes, dic(X;Y)(p22.33;p11.32). The related genomic imbalance is associated with two known hereditary syndromes, LWD and a KS variant, identified in our proband at an advanced age. Because the breakpoints did not involve cancer genes, we inferred that the two malignancies in the proband were not caused by this abnormality. The possible influence of SHOX haploinsufficiency on the growth regulation of auricular chondrocytes is discussed.
Tissue engineering-based therapies rely on the delivery of monolayered fibroblasts on two-dimensional polystyrene-coated and extracellular matrix (ECM) surfaces to regenerate connective tissues. However, this approach may fail to mimic their three-dimensional (3D) native architecture and function. We hypothesize that ECM fibrous proteins, which direct the migration of cells in vivo, may attach and guide polystyrene- and Matrigel™-ECM (M-ECM)-adherent fibroblasts to rearrangement into large multicellular macrostructures with the ability to proliferate. Gingival monolayered fibroblasts and their derived spheroids were added and adhered to tissue culture polystyrene and M-ECM surfaces. The cells were covered with a layer of collagen1 hydrogel combined with vitronectin, fibronectin or fibrin, or 10% M-ECM. The development of 3D cell constructs was characterized by epifluorescence and confocal scanning microscope image analysis. The ECM turnover and the proliferative capabilities of the fibroblasts were determined via gene expression profiling of collagen1, fibronectin, matrix metalloproteinase/metallopeptidase 2, Nanog, and SRY (sex-determining region Y)-box2 (Sox2). Expression of the Sox2 protein was followed by immunostaining. The collagen1 protein had the strongest effect on monolayered and spheroid cell rearrangements, forming large spherical shapes and fused 3D macroconstructs. The addition of fibrin protein was typically required to achieve a similar effect on M-ECM-adherent monolayered fibroblasts. The spheroid fusion process was followed by an increase in cell density and the formation of tight clusters. The fused spheroids continued to maintain their intracellular ECM turnover and proliferation capacities. Collagen1 is a valuable component in the rearrangement of adherent fibroblast monolayers and spheroids. Fibroblast spheroids should preferably be used as basic building blocks to assemble multicellular connective tissue-like macrostructures.
A general problem is posed by analysis of transcriptional thresholds governing cell-fate decisions in metazoan development. A model is provided by testis determination in therian mammals. Its key step-Sertoli-cell differentiation in the embryonic gonadal ridge-is initiated by SRY, a Y-encoded architectural transcription factor. Mutations in human SRY cause gonadal dysgenesis leading to XY female development (Swyer syndrome). Here, we have characterized an inherited mutation compatible with either male or female somatic phenotypes as respectively observed in an XY father and XY daughter. The mutation (a crevice-forming substitution at a conserved back surface of the SRY high-mobility-group box) markedly destabilizes the domain but preserves specific DNA affinity and induced DNA bend angle. On transient transfection of diverse human and rodent cell lines, the variant SRY exhibited accelerated proteasomal degradation (relative to wild-type) associated with increased ubiquitination; in vitro susceptibility to ubiquitin-independent (″default″) cleavage by the 20S core proteasome was unchanged. The variant's gene-regulatory activity (as assessed in a cellular model of the rat embryonic XY gonadal ridge) was reduced by twofold relative to wild-type SRY at similar levels of mRNA expression. Chemical proteasome inhibition restored native-like SRY expression and transcriptional activity in association with restored occupancy of a sex-specific enhancer element in principal downstream gene Sox9, demonstrating that the variant SRY exhibits essentially native activity on a per-molecule basis. Our findings define a novel mechanism of impaired organogenesis: accelerated ubiquitin-directed proteasomal degradation of a master transcription factor leading to a developmental decision poised at the edge of ambiguity.
In this commentary we briefly summarize early work on circular RNAs derived from spliceosome mediated circularization. We highlight how this early work inspired work on the basic mechanisms of nuclear RNA splicing, the possible function of circular RNAs and the potential uses of circular RNAs as tools in biomedicine. Recent developments in the study of circular RNAs, summarized in this volume, have brought these questions back to the foreground.
SRY-related HMG box (Sox) genes are characterized by the presence of a DNA-binding HMG domain and involved in a diverse range of developmental processes. In this study, we identified a novel Sox gene, designated as EsSoxB2-1, from the Chinese mitten crab Eriocheir sinensis. The EsSoxB2-1 encodes a protein of 259 amino acids, sharing the highest identity with the beetle Tribolium castaneum SOX21b. Unlike insect Sox21b, however, EsSoxB2-1 is intronless and exhibits a gonad-specific expression pattern at both mRNA and protein level. Two core promoters in 5' flanking region were demonstrated to be essential for inducing transcriptional regulatory activity. The transcription of EsSoxB2-1 mRNA begins in spermatogonia stage, while the translation of EsSOXB2-1 protein initiates at spermiogenesis stage. Interestingly, EsSOXB2-1 protein was exclusively localized in the nucleus of spermatid and spermatozoa even at the end of acrosome reaction, and was bound to the uncondensed chromatin in nucleoplasm of mature spermatozoa. Knockdown of EsSoxB2-1 by RNAi leads to abnormal transformation of the nucleus during spermiogenesis. Together, these findings demonstrated the requirement of EsSoxB2-1 for the spermatozoa nucleus maturation and also suggested that EsSoxB2-1 would be delivered into fertilized eggs along with chromatins as a paternal transcription factor for regulating early embryonic development.
Ossification of the ligamentum flavum (OLF) is a disorder of heterotopic ossification of spinal ligaments and is the main cause of thoracic spinal canal stenosis. Previous studies suggested that miR-132-3p negatively regulates osteoblast differentiation. However, whether miR-132-3p is involved in the process of OLF has not been investigated. In this study, we investigated the effect of miR-132-3p and its target genes forkhead box O1 (FOXO1), growth differentiation factor 5 (GDF5) and SRY-box 6 (SOX6) on the osteogenic differentiation of ligamentum flavum (LF) cells. We demonstrated that miR-132-3p was down-regulated during the osteogenic differentiation of LF cells and negatively regulated the osteoblast differentiation. Further, miR-132-3p targeted FOXO1, GDF5 and SOX6 and down-regulated the protein expression of these genes. Meanwhile, FOXO1, GDF5 and SOX6 were up-regulated after osteogenic differentiation and the down-regulation of endogenous FOXO1, GDF5 or SOX6 suppressed the osteogenic differentiation of LF cells. In addition, we also found FOXO1, GDF5 and SOX6 expression in the ossification front of OLF samples. Overall, these results suggest that miR-132-3p inhibits the osteogenic differentiation of LF cells by targeting FOXO1, GDF5 and SOX6.
Monozygotic twinning has not previously been genetically confirmed in the dog. This case report describes the finding of two viable male monozygotic foetuses within one placental site during caesarean section. Their umbilical cords attached to a single placenta. Genetic profiling using a total of 38 microsatellite markers, as well as amelogenin and SRY for sex determination, revealed identical DNA profiles, whether derived from blood or tissue (buccal swabs) samples. To the best of our knowledge, this is the first report of monozygotic twinning in the dog confirmed using DNA profiling.
The SRY gene (SRY) provides instructions for making a transcription factor called the sex-determining region Y protein. The sex-determining region Y protein causes a fetus to develop as a male. In this study, SRY of 15 spices included of human, chimpanzee, dog, pig, rat, cattle, buffalo, goat, sheep, horse, zebra, frog, urial, dolphin and killer whale were used for determine of bioinformatic differences.
Nucleotide sequences of SRY were retrieved from the NCBI databank. Bioinformatic analysis of SRY is done by CLC Main Workbench version 5.5 and ClustalW (http:/www.ebi.ac.uk/clustalw/) and MEGA6 softwares.
The multiple sequence alignment results indicated that SRY protein sequences from Orcinus orca (killer whale) and Tursiopsaduncus (dolphin) have least genetic distance of 0.33 in these 15 species and are 99.67% identical at the amino acid level. Homosapiens and Pantroglodytes (chimpanzee) have the next lowest genetic distance of 1.35 and are 98.65% identical at the amino acid level.
These findings indicate that the SRY proteins are conserved in the 15 species, and their evolutionary relationships are similar.
It is unclear why some patients with in situ melanoma develop metastases. Few reports demonstrate occult invasion with immunohistochemistry staining, which were discordant with reports interpreting such staining as false-positive.
To investigate the occurrence of occult invasive disease within in situ melanoma by using methods to circumvent potential limitations in prior study designs.
Unequivocal in situ melanoma without associated nevi or regression was identified using a consecutive sample of 33 cases plus 1 index case in an academic medical center. After cutting deeper into the most representative tissue block, 3 sequential slides were stained with hematoxylin-eosin (H-E), melanoma antigen (melan-A), and again with H-E. Melan-A-stained slides showing definitive invasion were double-stained with Sry-related HMg-Box gene 10 (SOX10) to confirm the melanocytic nature of the cells of interest. The study evaluated the possibilities of occult invasion detected by immunohistochemistry, sectioning deeper into the tissue block, or both. Slides were independently scored by 3 dermatopathologists with interrater reliability assessed. The study was conducted from January 1, 2012, to July 31, 2014.
Assessment of the occurrence of occult invasion, diagnosis of invasion by immunohistochemistry alone vs cutting deeper into the tissue block, and occurrence of false-positive results using immunohistochemistry alone.
Occult invasive melanoma was detected in 11 of 33 consecutive cases (33%) of previously diagnosed unequivocal in situ melanoma. Six of 11 melanomas (55%) were diagnosable only by immunohistochemistry. The remaining 5 tumors (45%) were diagnosable by both melan-A and H-E staining, likely as a result of simply cutting deeper into the tissue block. Four cases (12%) showed a few melan-A-positive cells in the dermis, which was insufficient for a diagnosis of invasive melanoma and most consistent on a cytomorphologic basis with occult nevi.
Although rare, in situ melanoma may metastasize. Occult microinvasion was demonstrated in up to one-third of the specimens in the present study, which provides a plausible explanation for this adverse event. Thus, history and physical examination including regional lymph nodes, education, and surveillance recommendations should be based on a very low, but not zero, risk of metastasis.
To investigate the feasibility of noninvasive fetal ABO genotyping based on RASSF1A gene with circulating cell-free fetal DNA(cffDNA) from maternal plasma.
DNA was extracted from the O group pregnant plasma, and the presence of cffDNA was confirmed by fetal DNA maker SRY and RASSF1A. B and non-O were detected by real-time PCR, and the genotyping results were evaluated by using the serologic tests for ABO phenotyping.
Among the samples of 20 cases, the SRY was found in 11 cases by detecteion, the detection results were consistent with sex of infants after delivery; the RASSF1A was amplified all in samples of other 9 cases after BstU1 cleavage, which confirmed existance of cffDNA. The ABO gene detection of cffDNA in plasma showed that out of 20 samples, both non O and B were amplified simultancously in 8 cases, suggesting the B blood group; the non O was amplified, but the B was not amplified only in 5 cases, suggesting A blood group, the non O and B both were not amplified in samples of 7 cases, suggesting O blood group. The above-mentioned detection results were consistent with new born ABO blood group by serological test.
The proposed protocol for the detection of fetal ABO based on RASSF1A gene by using fetal DNA from maternal plasma can be used for noninvasive prenatal diagnosis of fetal ABO blood group.
The present study demonstrated that T cell factor 1 (TCF-1) protein, a component of the canonical Wnt/β-catenin signaling pathway, can regulate the expression of runt-related transcription factor 2 (runx2) gene and Sry-related HMG box 9 (sox9) gene, which may participate in the differentiation of chondrosarcoma. Dedifferentiated chondrosarcoma (DDCS) is a special variant of conventional chondrosarcoma (CCS), associated with poor survival and high metastasis rate. However, little is known about the mechanism of its occurrence; thus, no effective treatment is available except surgery. Earlier, high expression of runx2 and low expression of sox9 were found in DDCS compared with CCS. Using Western blot to detect clinical tissue samples (including 8 CCS samples and 8 DDCS samples) and immunohistochemistry to detect 85 different-grade chondrosarcoma specimens, a high expression of TCF-1 in DDCS tissues was found compared with CCS tissues. This difference in expression was related to patients' prognosis. Results of luciferase, chromatin immunoprecipitation, and gel electrophoresis mobility shift assays demonstrated that TCF-1 protein could bind to the promoter of runx2 gene directly and sox9 gene indirectly. Hence, it could regulate expression of runx2 gene positively and sox9 gene negatively. Furthermore, in vitro and in vivo experiments showed that TCF-1 protein was closely related to the phenotype and aggressiveness of chondrosarcoma. In conclusion, this study proved that TCF-1 participates in the dedifferentiation of DDCS, which may be mediated by runx2 gene and sox9 gene. Also, TCF-1 can be of important prognostic value and a promising therapeutic target for DDCS patients.
The present case report describes a 6-year old subfertile pony mare, which became pregnant after the eleventh artificial insemination. The examination of the ovaries and the uterus did not reveal any abnormal clinical findings and the mare showed a regular oestrous cycle. Based on cytogenetic and molecular genetic analyses it became possible to elucidate the observed subfertility. The mosaic karyotype of the mare consisted of 63,X (20%) and 64,XX (80%) cells. A PCR analysis failed to amplify sequences from the equine SRY gene. The observed classic 63,X/64,XX mosaicism is a plausible explanation for the subfertility of the mare.
Abstract available from the publisher.
5-Azacytidine is a well-known anticancer drug that is clinically used in the treatment of breast cancer, melanoma and colon cancer. It has been reported that 5-azacytidine suppresses the biological behavior of esophageal cancer cells. However, corresponding mechanisms remain unclear. In this study, using Transwell invasion and cell proliferation assays, we demonstrated that 5-azacytidine significantly inhibited the metastasis and proliferation of EC9706 cells, and upregulated the expression of cadherin 1 (CDH1) and SRY-box containing gene 17 (SOX17). Moreover, the inhibition of the metastasis of the 5-azacytidine-treated EC9706 cells was impaired following transfection with siRNA targeting CDH1 (CDH1 siRNA), and the inhibition of cell proliferation was attenuated following the downregulation of SOX17 by siRNA targeting SOX17 (SOX17 siRNA). Furthermore, 5-azacytidine remarkably reduced the CDH1 and SOX17 promoter methylation levels, suggesting that 5-azacytidine upregulates the expression of SOX17 and CDH1 by inhibiting the methylation of the SOX17 and CDH1 promoter. The findings of our study confirm that 5-azacytidine suppresses the proliferation and metastasis of EC9706 esophageal cancer cells by upregulating the expression of CDH1 and SOX17. The expression levels of CDH1 and SOX17 negatively correlate with the promoter methylation levels. CDH1 and SOX17 are potential indicators of the clinical application of 5-azacytidine.
The X and Y sex chromosomes of placental mammals show hallmarks of a tumultuous evolutionary past. The X Chromosome has a rich and conserved gene content, while the Y Chromosome has lost most of its genes. In the Transcaucasian mole vole Ellobius lutescens, the Y Chromosome including Sry has been lost, and both females and males have a 17,X diploid karyotype. Similarly, the closely related Ellobius talpinus, has a 54,XX karyotype in both females and males. Here, we report the sequencing and assembly of the E. lutescens and E. talpinus genomes. The results indicate that the loss of the Y Chromosome in E. lutescens and E. talpinus occurred in two independent events. Four functional homologs of mouse Y-Chromosomal genes were detected in both female and male E. lutescens, of which three were also detected in the E. talpinus genome. One of these is Eif2s3y, known as the only Y-derived gene that is crucial for successful male meiosis. Female and male E. lutescens can carry one and the same X Chromosome with a largely conserved gene content, including all genes known to function in X Chromosome inactivation. The availability of the genomes of these mole vole species provides unique models to study the dynamics of sex chromosome evolution.
Somatic cell nuclear transfer (SCNT) provides an excellent model for studying epigenomic reprogramming during mammalian development. We mapped the whole genome and whole methylome for potential anomalies of mutations or epimutations in SCNT-generated dogs with XY chromosomal sex but complete gonadal dysgenesis, which is classified as 78, XY disorder of sex development (DSD). Whole genome sequencing revealed no potential genomic variations that could explain the pathogenesis of DSD. However, extensive but stochastic anomalies of genome-wide DNA methylation were discovered in these SCNT DSD dogs. Persistent abnormal hypermethylation of the SRY gene was observed together with its down-regulated mRNA and protein expression. Failure of SRY expression due to hypermethylation was further correlated with silencing of a serial of testis determining genes, including SOX9, SF1, SOX8, AMH and DMRT1 in an early embryonic development stage at E34 in the XY(DSD) gonad, and high activation of the female specific genes, including FOXL2, RSPO1, CYP19A1, WNT4, ERα and ERβ, after one postnatal year in the ovotestis. Our results demonstrate that incomplete demethylation on the SRY gene is the driving cause of XY(DSD) in these XY DSD dogs, indicating a central role of epigenetic regulation in sex determination.
To investigate the phenotype-genotype association of isodicentromere Y chromosome by analysis of two female patients carrying the chromosome with sexual development disorders.
The karyotypes of the two patients were determined by application of conventional G banding of peripheral blood samples and fluorescence in situ hybridization (FISH). PCR was applied to detect the presence of SRY gene.
Conventional karyotype analysis showed case 1 to be a mosaic: mos.45,X[38]/46,X,+mar[151]/47,XY,+mar[5]/47,X,+mar × 2[2]/46,XY[4], FISH showed that 12 different cell lines were presented in the karyotype of case 1 and partial cell lines with SRY gene, the marker is an isodicentromere Y chromosome [idic(Y)(p)]. No mutation was found in the SRY gene. The karyotype of case 2 was mos.45,X[25]/46,X,+mar[35]. FISH showed the marker to be an idic(Y)(p) without the SRY gene.
The karyotype of patients carrying idic(Y)(p) seems unstable, and female patients have the characteristics of short stature and secondary sexual hypoplasia. Karyotype analysis combined with FISH analysis can accurately determine the breakpoint of idic(Y) and identify the types of complex mosaic, which may facilitate genetic counseling and prognosis.
The mammalian Y chromosome is considered a symbol of maleness, as it encodes a gene driving male sex determination, Sry, as well as a battery of other genes important for male reproduction. We previously demonstrated in the mouse that successful assisted reproduction can be achieved when the Y gene contribution is limited to only two genes, Sry and spermatogonial proliferation factor Eif2s3y. Here, we replaced Sry by transgenic activation of its downstream target Sox9, and Eif2s3y, by transgenic overexpression of its X chromosome-encoded homolog Eif2s3x. The resulting males with no Y chromosome genes produced haploid male gametes and sired offspring after assisted reproduction. Our findings support the existence of functional redundancy between the Y chromosome genes and their homologs encoded on other chromosomes.
Spermatogenesis is a key developmental process allowing for a formation of a mature male gamete. During its final phase, spermiogenesis, haploid round spermatids undergo cellular differentiation into spermatozoa, which involves extensive restructuring of cell morphology, DNA, and epigenome. Using mouse models with abrogated Y chromosome gene complements and Y-derived transgene we identified Y chromosome encoded Zfy2 as the gene responsible for sperm formation and function. In the presence of a Zfy2 transgene, mice lacking the Y chromosome and transgenic for two other Y-derived genes, Sry driving sex determination and Eif2s3y initiating spermatogenesis, are capable of producing sperm which when injected into the oocytes yield live offspring. Therefore, only three Y chromosome genes, Sry, Eif2s3y and Zfy2, constitute the minimum Y chromosome complement compatible with successful intracytoplasmic sperm injection in the mouse.
This paper introduces a two-step cascade enrichment method for isolating nucleated red blood cells (NRBCs) in maternal blood. The two-step enrichment platform consists of a positive enrichment process based on a red blood cell (RBC) hyperaggregation method and a negative enrichment process using microfluidic technology. An analytical evaluation using blood samples from patients with leukemia showed that the while blood cell (WBC) depletion and NRBC loss rates of the positive enrichment process were 93.98 % and 6.02 %, respectively. Through the two-step cascade enrichment method, 1-396 NRBCs and only 0-6 WBCs were isolated from 1 mL of 18 maternal blood samples. Experimental results also showed that the WBC depletion rate of the proposed two-step method was more than 625,000-fold, and the purity of enriched NRBCs ranged from 20 % to 100 %. Furthermore, SRY (the sex-determining region of the Y chromosome) genes were detected in enriched NRBCs, thereby demonstrating that enriched NRBCs contain fetus-derived NRBCs.
Gonadoblastoma (GB), a rare in situ germ cell tumor derived from sex cord and germ cells, is closely associated with gonadal dysgenesis. About 80% of GB individuals exhibit 46, XY female phenotype while the others are 45, XY and 46, XX with disorders of sex development. Moreover, 35% of GB can eventually develop into malignant tumors, such as seminoma and dysgerminoma tumors. The molecular genetic mechanism of GB remains to be fully uncovered due to phenotypic and genetic heterogeneity. Increasing studies show that the formation of GB is closely related to genes regulating sexual differentiation and determination (e.g., SRY, WT1, SOX9, Foxl2, TSPY, etc), and is affected by the interaction of genetic and epigenetic regulation. Here we describe the clinical and pathological features, diagnosis and treatment of GB, and also summarize the molecular genetic and epigenetic mechanisms underlying the gonadal abnormalities that lead to GB. We analyze and construct the common gene regulatory networks related to the development of GB, and describe some obstacles and deficiencies in current studies to provide innovative perspectives on further studying the pathological and molecular mechanisms of GB.
Sex determination in mammals requires expression of the Y-linked gene Sry in the bipotential genital ridges of the XY embryo. Even minor delay of the onset of Sry expression can result in XY sex reversal, highlighting the need for accurate gene regulation during sex determination. However, the location of critical regulatory elements remains unknown. Here, we analysed Sry flanking sequences across many species, using newly available genome sequences and computational tools, to better understand Sry's genomic context and to identify conserved regions predictive of functional roles.
Flanking sequences from 17 species were analysed using both global and local sequence alignment methods. Multiple motif searches were employed to characterise common motifs in otherwise unconserved sequence.
We identified position-specific conservation of binding motifs for multiple transcription factor families, including GATA binding factors and Oct/Sox dimers. In contrast with the landscape of extremely low sequence conservation around the Sry coding region, our analysis highlighted a strongly conserved interval of ~106 bp within the Sry promoter (which we term the Sry Proximal Conserved Interval, SPCI). We further report that inverted repeats flanking murine Sry are much larger than previously recognised.
The unusually fast pace of sequence drift on the Y chromosome sharpens the likely functional significance of both the SPCI and the identified binding motifs, providing a basis for future studies of the role(s) of these elements in Sry regulation.
A single-born, 15-month-old Holstein cattle, diagnosed as hermaphrodite, was investigated for estrous cycle, hormonal profiles, karyotype, presence of SRY, as well as anatomopathological and histological aspects. Normal continuous estrous cycles and basal testosterone levels were reported. Necropsy showed the presence of a female genital tract that mismatched a vulvar opening and a male pelvic urethra continued within a penis. Moreover, we observed islands of seminiferous tubules with the presence of germline cells, 2 pampiniform plexi, the corpus cavernosum, the penile urethra, the corpus spongiosum and the glans. Cytogenetic analyses of the blood cells showed an XX karyotype, while the molecular analyses revealed the presence of the SRY gene in several tissues, including blood. This is the first report in the scientific literature of an SRY-positive hermaphrodite Holstein cattle with continuous ovarian cycles.
Gonadal sex in most mammals is determined based on sex differentiation of the supporting cell lineages. In mouse XY gonads, SRY induces SOX9 upregulation and subsequent FGF9 expression by embryonic day 11.5 (E11.5), leading to the differentiation of Sertoli cells. XX gonads, lacking SRY action, start on the ovarian program through the actions of WNT4 and FOXL2 from around E11.5-12.0. These 2 ovarian factors, together with retinoic acid (RA) action, promote feminization partially through the repression of the masculinizing activities of SOX9, FGF9 and DMRT1. RA initiates meiosis in female germ cell cysts, in which intercellular bridges between interconnected germ cells rapidly undergo cyst breakdown by E17.5. Ovarian morphogenesis is characterized by continuous recruitment of pre-granulosa progenitor cells from the coelomic epithelia during the embryonic stage, which results in the formation of ovigerous cords and tight packing of non-interconnected oocytes (i.e. oocyte nests) at the perinatal stages. At birth, the oocyte nests break down into single oocytes surrounded by granulosa cells, leading to the assembly of primordial follicles. This review focuses on recent advances in the molecular and cellular events of initial ovarian differentiation, meiotic initiation, germ cell nest breakdown, and primordial follicle formation based on anatomical and morphogenetic aspects.
Animal researches and clinical studies have supported the relevance between phthalates exposure and testicular dysgenesis syndrome (TDS). These disorders may comprise common origin in fetal life, especially during sex determination and differentiation, where the mechanism remains unclear. The present study evaluated the disturbances in gene regulatory networks of sex determination in fetal mouse by in utero Di (2-ethylhexyl) phthalate (DEHP) exposure. Temporal expression of key sex determination genes were examined during the critical narrow time window, using whole-mount in situ hybridization and quantitative-PCR. DEHP exposure resulted in significant reduction in mRNA of Sry during sex determination from gestation day (GD) 11.0 to 11.5 in male fetal mice, and the increasing of Sry expression to threshold level on GD 11.5 was delayed. Meanwhile, Gadd45g and Gata4, the upstream genes of Sry, and downstream gene Sox9 were also significantly downregulated in expression. In fetal females, the expression of Wnt4 and beta-catenin were up-regulated by DEHP exposure. Taken together, the results suggest that the potential mechanism of gonadal development disorder by DEHP may origin from repression of important male sex determination signaling pathway, involving Gadd45g → Gata4 → Sry → Sox9. The results would promote a better understanding of the association between phthalate esters (PAEs) exposure and the reductive disorder.
The SOX gene family includes many genes that play a determinant role in several developmental pathways. The SOX9 gene has been identified as a major factor in testis development in mammals after it is activated by the SRY gene. However, duplication of the gene itself in some mammalian species, or of a well-delimited upstream 'RevSex' region in humans, has been shown to result in testis development in the absence of the SRY gene. In the current study, we present an accurate analysis of the genomic organization of the SOX9 locus in dogs by both in silico and FISH approaches. Contrary to what is observed in the current dog genome assembly, we found that the genomic organization is quite similar to that reported in humans and other mammalian species, including the position of the RevSex region in respect to SOX9. The analysis of the conserved sequences within this region in 7 mammalian species facilitated the highlighting of a consensus sequence for SRY binding. This new information could help in the identification of evolutionarily conserved elements relevant for SOX9 gene regulation, and could provide valid targets for mutation analysis in XY DSD patients.
Diagnosis of fetal gender early in pregnancy is very useful as it would prevent invasive fetal sampling in almost half the cases at risk of inheriting X-linked disorders or those affecting sexual differentiation. Noninvasive prenatal diagnosis (NIPD) using circulating cell-free fetal (cff) DNA from maternal circulation has emerged as a useful alternative to existing methods for prenatal diagnosis of gender. NIPD eliminates the risk of miscarriage from invasive prenatal diagnosis and the necessity of possessing specialized obstetric skills for fetal tissue sampling. The aim of this study was to compare two Y chromosome markers-SRY and DYS14-for their utility in the diagnosis of fetal gender.
Forty-eight plasma samples from pregnant women between 9 and 25 weeks of gestation were analyzed. Real-time polymerase chain reaction was performed on cff DNA extracted from maternal plasma to detect fetal Y chromosome with SRY (n=27) and DYS14 (n=48) markers.
We observed 100% sensitivity and 85.6% specificity in noninvasive Y chromosome detection with the combined use of DYS14 and SRY markers (n=27) compared with the results obtained on using DYS14 (n=48 sensitivity 94%; specificity 71.4%) and SRY (n=27, sensitivity 84%; specificity 92.8%) markers alone.
Our results show that the test performance improved with the employment of two Y-amplification assays.
Sex-reversal cases in humans and genetic models in mice have revealed that the fate of the bipotential gonad hinges upon the balance between pro-testis SOX9 and pro-ovary beta-catenin pathways. Our central query was: if SOX9 and beta-catenin define the gonad's identity, then what do the gonads become when both factors are absent? To answer this question, we developed mouse models that lack either Sox9, beta-catenin, or both in the somatic cells of the fetal gonads and examined the morphological outcomes and transcriptome profiles. In the absence of Sox9 and beta-catenin, both XX and XY gonads progressively lean toward the testis fate, indicating that expression of certain pro-testis genes requires the repression of the beta-catenin pathway, rather than a direct activation by SOX9. We also observed that XY double knockout gonads were more masculinized than their XX counterpart. To identify the genes responsible for the initial events of masculinization and to determine how the genetic context (XX vs. XY) affects this process, we compared the transcriptomes of Sox9/beta-catenin mutant gonads and found that early molecular changes underlying the XY-specific masculinization involve the expression of Sry and 21 SRY direct target genes, such as Sox8 and Cyp26b1. These results imply that when both Sox9 and beta-catenin are absent, Sry is capable of activating other pro-testis genes and drive testis differentiation. Our findings not only provide insight into the mechanism of sex determination, but also identify candidate genes that are potentially involved in disorders of sex development.
This report describes a disorder of the sexual development in a beagle dog resulting in an intersex condition. A 6 mo old beagle was presented for evaluation of a protruding structure from the vulva consistent with an enlarged clitoris. Ultrasonographic examination revealed the presence of both gonadal and uterine structures. Retrograde cystourethrovaginogram showed the presence of an os clitoris and severe vaginal stenosis. Histological studies revealed the presence of bilateral ovotestes and uterus. The gonad had interstitial cells within seminiferous-like tubules lined only with Sertoli cells and abundant interstitial cells among primordial, primary, and secondary follicles. Hormone assays completed before and after gonadohysterectomy showed an elevation in the levels of progesterone and dihydrotestosterone that returned to baseline 3 mo after surgery. Testosterone levels that were within the male reference ranges before surgery decreased to basal levels postsurgically. 17-β-Estradiol levels showed little variation and values were always within the reference ranges for a male. Cytogenetic analysis showed a normal female karyotype (2n = 78, XX) and polymerase chain reaction analysis revealed the absence of the sex-determining region Y gene. In summary, the dog presented bilateral ovotestes and a 2n = 78, XX chromosomal complement lacking the sex determining region Y gene, consistent with a diagnosis of true hermaphroditism.
The acquisition of stemness is a hallmark of aggressive human hepatocellular carcinoma (hHCC). The stem cell marker OCT4 is frequently expressed in HCCs, and its expression correlates with those of putative cancer stem cell (CSC) markers and CSC properties. Here, we describe a novel mechanism of CSC maintenance by SRY through OCT4. We previously reported that Sry is involved in tumor malignancy in rodent HCCs. However, the oncogenic function of SRY in hHCCs is poorly understood. Ectopic expression of SRY increased multiple stem cell factors, including OCT4 and CD13. The OCT4 promoter contained SRY-binding sites that were directly activated by SRY. In HCC-derived cells, SRY knockdown decreased OCT4 expression and cancer stem-like phenotypes such as self-renewal, chemoresistance, and tumorigenicity. Conversely, OCT4 and SRY overexpression promoted cancer stem-like phenotypes. OCT4 knockdown in SRY clones downregulated the self-renewal capacity and chemoresistance. These data suggest that SRY is involved in the maintenance of cancer stem-like characteristics through OCT4. Moreover, CSCs of HCC-derived cells differentiated into Tuj1-positive neuron-like cells by retinoic acid. Noteworthily, SRY was highly expressed in some hHCC patients. Taken together, our findings imply a novel therapeutic strategy against CSCs of hHCCs.
Nonsyndromic 46,XX testicular disorders of sex development (46,XX testicular DSD) are characterized by the presence of a 46,XX karyotype; male external genitalia ranging from normal to ambiguous; two testicles; azoospermia; and absence of Müllerian structures. Approximately 85% of individuals with nonsyndromic 46,XX testicular DSD present after puberty with normal pubic hair and normal penile size, but small testes, gynecomastia, and sterility resulting from azoospermia. Approximately 15% of individuals with nonsyndromic 46,XX testicular DSD present at birth with ambiguous genitalia. Gender role and gender identity are reported as male. If untreated, males with 46,XX testicular DSD experience the consequences of testosterone deficiency.
Diagnosis of nonsyndromic 46,XX testicular DSD is based on the combination of clinical findings, endocrine testing, and cytogenetic testing. Endocrine studies usually show hypergonadotropic hypogonadism secondary to testicular failure. Cytogenetic studies at the 550-band level demonstrate a 46,XX karyotype. SRY, the gene that encodes the sex-determining region Y protein, is the principal gene known to be associated with 46,XX testicular DSD. Approximately 80% of individuals with nonsyndromic 46,XX testicular DSD are SRY positive as shown by use of FISH or chromosomal microarray (CMA). Rearrangements in or around SOX9 and SOX3 detected by CMA, or rarely karyotype, have recently been reported in a few cases; at least one more as-yet-unknown gene at another locus is implicated.
Treatment of manifestations: Similar to that for other causes of testosterone deficiency. After age 14 years, low-dose testosterone therapy is initiated and gradually increased to reach adult levels. In affected individuals with short stature who are eligible for growth hormone therapy, testosterone therapy is either delayed or given at lower doses initially in order to maximize the growth potential. Reduction mammoplasty may need to be considered if gynecomastia remains an issue following testosterone replacement therapy. Treatment for osteopenia is by standard protocols. Providers are encouraged to anticipate the need for further psychological support. Surveillance: Monitor for testosterone effects during testosterone replacement therapy, including prostate size and prostate-specific antigen (PSA) in adults; routine monitoring of hematocrit, lipid profile, and liver function tests; bone mineral density determination by bone densitometry (DEXA) annually, if osteopenia has been diagnosed. Agents/circumstances to avoid: Contraindications to testosterone replacement therapy include prostate cancer (known or suspected) and breast cancer; oral androgens such as methyltestosterone and fluoxymesterone should not be given because of liver toxicity.
SRY-positive 46,XX testicular DSD is generally not inherited because it results from de novo abnormal interchange between the Y chromosome and the X chromosome, resulting in the presence of SRY on the X chromosome and infertility. When SRY is translocated to another chromosome or when fertility is preserved, sex-limited autosomal dominant inheritance is observed. Autosomal dominant inheritance has been documented for familial cases thought to be caused by CNV in or around SOX9. The mode of inheritance of other SRY-negative 46,XX testicular DSD is not known, but autosomal recessive inheritance has been postulated. Prenatal diagnosis for pregnancies at risk for SRY-positive 46,XX testicular DSD is possible.
Mixed gonadal dysgenesis (MGD) is a disorder of sexual development that typically has a mosaic 45,X/46,XY karyotype. A 1-year-old infant with 46,XY identified by peripheral blood karyotype demonstrated clinical manifestations and gonadal pathologic features of MGD. Fluorescence in situ hybridization (FISH) for X and Y chromosomes and immunofluorescence for SRY along with testicular and ovarian lineage markers SOX9 and FOXL2, respectively, were performed on paraffin sections from the gonad to ascertain the somatic mosaic state for 45,X monosomy and 46,XY cells. The gonad consisted of cells with X and XY signals, which were further quantified in comparison with a normal control testis by a digital image analysis program. The average percentages of 45,X cells of this patient's gonad and a control testis were 39.0% and 5.7%, respectively (χ2 test, P < 0.001). SRY expression was absent in approximately 10% of precursor granulosa cells (FOXL2 positive) and precursor Sertoli/granulosa cells (both SOX9 and FOXL2 positive) within gonadoblastomas, confirming the involvement of 45,X cells. A combination of analysis of FISH and immunofluorescence for SRY in the gonadal tissue could identify 45,X cells in MGD with 46,XY.
To assess genetic mutations and associated somatic anomalies in a series of patients with 46,XY gonadal dysgenesis (GD).
Single center retrospective study.
University pediatric hospital.
Fourteen patients with 46,XY GD.
None.
Genotype-phenotype relationship.
The presenting symptom was disorders of sex development (6 patients), primary amenorrhea (2 patients), discordance between 46,XY karyotype and female external genitalia (3 patients), discovery of Müllerian structures at surgery (2 patients), or diagnosed in the evaluation of a gonadal tumor (1 patient). Müllerian structures were shown by ultrasound evaluation in 7 of 13 patients, genitography in 3 of 6 patients and/or surgery in 8 of 10 patients (3 not seen at imaging), or only by histologic examination (1 patient). Three patients had gonadoblastoma and/or seminoma. A mutation was found in 7 patients of whom 2 had family history of reproductive problems and 5 had associated somatic anomalies. The mutations were FOG2/ZFPM2 (1 patient), SRY (2 patients), WT1 (1 patient), or deletions of distal chromosome 9p (3 patients). Among the three other patients with associated anomalies and no mutation, two had ectodermal dysplasia and one had leukemia.
Mutations were observed in half of the patients with 46,XY GD with Müllerian structures. We also describe for the first time the association between GD and ectodermal dysplasia. Müllerian structures can be found in some cases only by histologic examination, which should be coupled to preventive gonadectomy because of the risk of tumor formation.
The RNA binding motif protein 38 (RBM38, also known as RNPC1) plays a pivotal role in regulating a wide range of biological processes, from cell proliferation and cell cycle arrest to cell myogenic differentiation. It was originally recognized as an oncogene, and was frequently found to be amplified in prostate, ovarian and colorectal cancer, chronic lymphocytic leukemia, colon carcinoma, esophageal cancer, dog lymphomas and breast cancer. In the present study, the complete RNPC1 gene was identified in a number of vertebrate genomes, suggesting that RNPC1 exists in all types of vertebrates, including fish, amphibians, birds and mammals. In the different genomes, the gene had a similar 4 exon/3 intron organization, and all the genetic loci were syntenically conserved. The phylogenetic tree demonstrated that the RNPC1 gene from the mammalian, bird, reptile and teleost lineage formed a species-specific cluster. A total of 34 functionally relevant single nucleotide polymorphisms (SNPs), including 14 SNPs causing missense mutations, 8 exonic splicing enhancer SNPs and 12 SNPs causing nonsense mutations, were identified in the human RNPC1 gene. RNPC1 was found to be expressed in bladder, blood, brain, breast, colorectal, eye, head and neck, lung, ovarian, skin and soft tissue cancer. In 14 of the 94 tests, an association between RNPC1 gene expression and cancer prognosis was observed. We found that the association between the expression of RNPC1 and prognosis varied in different types of cancer, and even in the same type of cancer from the different databases used. This suggests that the function of RNPC1 in these tumors may be multidimensional. The sex determining region Y (SRY)-box 5 (Sox5), runt-related transcription factor 3 (RUNX3), CCAAT displacement protein 1 (CUTL1), v-rel avian reticuloendotheliosis viral oncogene homolog (Rel)A, peroxisome proliferator-activated receptor γ isoform 2 (PPARγ2) and activating transcription factor 6 (ATF6) regulatory transcription factor binding sites were identified in the upstream (promoter) region of the RNPC1 gene, and may thus be involved in the effects of RNPC1 in tumors.
Fibroblast growth factors (FGFs) function as mitogens and morphogens during vertebrate development. In the present study, to characterise the regulatory mechanism of FGF8 gene expression in developing Xenopus embryos the upstream region of the Xenopus FGF8 (XFGF8) gene was isolated. The upstream region of the XFGF8 gene contains two putative binding sites for the SRY (sex-determining region Y)-box 2 (SOX2) transcription factor. A reporter assay with serially deleted constructs revealed that the putative SOX2-binding motif may be a critical cis-element for XFGF8 gene activation in developing Xenopus embryos. Furthermore, Xenopus SOX2 (XSOX2) physically interacted with the SOX2-binding motif within the upstream region of the XFGF8 gene in vitro and in vivo. Depletion of endogenous XSOX2 resulted in loss of XFGF8 gene expression in midbrain-hindbrain junction, auditory placode, lens placode and forebrain in developing Xenopus embryos. Collectively, our results suggest that XSOX2 directly upregulates XFGF8 gene expression in the early embryonic development of Xenopus.
Nuclear receptor subfamily 5, group A, member 1 (NR5A1 previously known as SF-1/AD4BP) is a transcription factor involved in the development of adrenal/gonadal tissues and steroidogenic lineage cell differentiation in adult somatic stem cells. To understand the cellular signaling network that regulates NR5A1 gene expression, loss of function screening with an siRNA kinome library, and gain of function screening with an addressable full-length cDNA library representing one quarter of the human genome was carried out. The NR5A1 gene expression was activated in mesenchymal stem cells by siRNA directed against protein kinase C (PKC)-delta, erb-B3, RhoGAP (ARHGAP26), and hexokinase 2, none of which were previously known to be involved in the NR5A1 gene expression. Among these, we identified crosstalk between erb-B3 and PKC-delta signaling cascades. In addition, the gain of function studies indicated that sex-determining region Y (SRY)-box 15 (SOX15), TEA domain family member 4, KIAA1257 (a gene of unknown function), ADAM metallopeptidase with thrombospondin type 1 motif 6, Josephin domain containing 1, centromere protein, TATA box-binding protein-associated factor 5-like RNA polymerase, and inducible T-cell co-stimulator activate NR5A1 gene expression. These results provide new insights into the molecular mechanisms of NR5A1 gene expression.
It is known that the Y chromosome or Y-specific sequence is present in about 6% of Turner syndrome (TS) patients and that it predisposes them to gonadoblastoma formation with an estimated risk of 15-25%. In this study, we performed a polymerase chain reaction (PCR) in 32 patients with TS to detect Y-specific sequence. The results were compared with those obtained by the fluorescence in situ hybridaization (FISH) method.
Cytogenetic analysis was performed by phytohaemagglutinin (PHA)-stimulated peripheral lymphocyte cultures, using G-banding. DNA was extracted from peripheral blood for PCR. Seven different sets of oligonucleotide primers, sex determining region Y (SRY), zinc finger gene on the Y chromosome (ZFY), testis specific protein Y (TSPY), DYZ3, DYF49S1, RNA binding motif protein (RBM), and DYZ1, spanning on centromeres and short and long arms of the Y chromosome were used for PCR. FISH was carried out using X and Y chromosome enumeration probe for Xp11.1-q11.1 (DXZ1 locus) and Yp11.1-q11.1 (DYZ3 locus), respectively.
Among 32 patients with TS, four (12.5%) were positive for Y specific sequence by PCR. Of these, two patients were detected previously by a cytogenetic analysis: 45,X/47,XYY and 45,X/46,XY. Only one Y specific sequence, DYZ3, was detected by PCR in the other two patients without cytogenetically obvious Y chromosome. Y signal was not detected by FISH for the last two patients.
It may be reasonable to consider using a PCR method to screen for Y-specific sequences in all patients with TS. Even though we did not demonstrate Y-signal by FISH in patients with PCR positive and cytogenetically no obvious Y chromosome, FISH may be another useful method in TS patient, and futher investigation is nessessary.
A cDNA encoding rat homologue of the previously characterized mouse Sox6 was isolated by a polymerase chain reaction (PCR) cloning strategy. Comparison of this eDNA with homologous mouse, human and rainbow trout cDNA exhibited an overall amino acid sequence identity of 99.6, 89.3 and 76.3% respectively. The leucine-zipper and HMG-box motif were almost completely conserved between these homologues. The expression of Sox6 was determined in rat by Northern hybridization and Real-time quantitative reverse transcription (RT)-PCR. rSox6 (rat Sox6) was specifically expressed in the neonatal brain and adult testis with Northern blotting. Real-time quantitative RT-PCR for the determination of Sox6 mRNA was examined. The rSox6 was expressed in the neonatal brain and adult testis as well as by Northern blotting and also expressed in the adult eyeball and slightly in the ovary.
The SOX (sex-determining region [SRY]-type high mobility group [HMG] box) family of transcription factors play key roles in determining cell fate during organ development. In this study, we have identified a new human SOX gene, SOX13, as encoding the type 1 diabetes autoantigen, islet cell antigen 12 (ICA12). Sequence analysis showed that SOX13 belongs to the class D subgroup of SOX transcription factors, which contain a leucine zipper motif and a region rich in glutamine. SOX13 autoantibodies occurred at a significantly higher frequency among 188 people with type 1 diabetes (18%) than among 88 with type 2 diabetes (6%) or 175 healthy control subjects (4%). Deletion mapping of the antibody epitopes showed that the autoantibodies were primarily directed against an epitope requiring the majority of the protein. SOX13 RNA was detected in most human tissues, with the highest levels in the pancreas, placenta, and kidney. Immunohistochemistry on sections of human pancreas identified SOX13 in the islets of Langerhans, where staining was mostly cytoplasmic. In mouse pancreas, Sox13 was present in the nucleus and cytoplasm of beta-cells as well as other islet cell types. Recombinant SOX13 protein bound to the SOX consensus DNA motif AACAAT, and binding was inhibited by homodimer formation. These observations-along with the known molecular interactions of the closely related protein, rainbow trout Sox23-suggest that SOX13 may be activated for nuclear import and DNA binding through heterodimer formation. In conclusion, we have identified ICA12 as the putative transcription factor SOX13 and demonstrated an increased frequency of autoantibody reactivity in sera from type 1 diabetic subjects compared with type 2 diabetic and healthy control subjects.
Leydig cells and Sertoli cells of the testes produce hormones that cause male differentiation, if receptors are present. The Y chromosomal SRY gene (sex determining Region Y gene) acts as TDF and is required for regular male sex determination. SRY represents a transcription factor belonging to the superfamily of genes sharing the HMG-box motif(high-mobility group-box), which acts as DNA binding region. Here, we describe a nonmosaic XY sex-reversed female with pure gonadal dysgenesis (46,XY karyotype, completely female external genitalia, normal Müllerian ducts, absence of Wolffian ducts, streak gonads) who harbored a yolk-sac tumor and was referred for the assessment of primary amenorrhea. Using genomic PCR analysis, a 423-bp PCR product, encompassing the HMG-box of the SRY gene, was amplified from the proposita, her father, and her three brothers, whereas no band was visible in the patient's mother and her three sisters. The PCR products were sequenced for mutations subsequently. A new de novo missense mutation within the HMG-box of the SRY gene was discovered in the proposita. A G is replaced by an A in codon 95 at position +284, resulting in the replacement of the nonpolar aminoacid glycine by the polar amino acid glutamate. The glycine at codon 95 is highly conserved between the family of HMG-box proteins and between species. This point mutation has not been described earlier and brings the total number of SRY mutations described so far to 36, each mutation being unique. This mutation was not detected in the patient's father and her male siblings. The present data provide further evidence to support the functional importance of the putative DNA binding activity of the SRY HMG-box domain.
In vertebrates several proteins containing a covalently bound selenocysteine residue have been identified. Among these, selenoprotein P is the most unusual one: depending on the species, 8-12 selenocysteine residues are cotranslationally integrated into the polypeptide chain. The protein was traced in rat plasma, but its role has not been worked out so far. In order to improve our understanding on selenoprotein P we investigated its tissue-specific expression and its genomic DNA. RNA in situ hybridization analyses confirmed the liver-specific expression in mice. Selenoprotein P was also found to be expressed in testis, brain, gut, and hematopoietic cells. The murine selp gene contains five exons within 10.3 kb with a coding sequence restricted to exons 2 to 5. The complete gene including the selp promoter was sequenced. One TATA motif 38 bp upstream to exon 1 suggests transcription of selp by RNA polymerase II. Within the 1116 bp upstream of exon 1 four hepatic nuclear factor 3beta (HNF3beta) binding motifs were found, which is in line with liver-specific expression of selenoprotein P. The expression in hematopoietic cells might be due to multiple GATA-1 motifs. Two BRN-2 motifs suitable for the binding of brain-specific regulatory factors correlated to the selenoprotein P expression in the cerebellum. Selenoprotein P was also expressed in Leydig cells which could be regulated by binding proteins docking to the SRY motifs present in the promoter region.
The presence of Y chromosome sequences in Turner syndrome (TS) patients may predispose them to gonadoblastoma formation with an estimated risk of 15-25%. The aim of this study was to determine the presence and the incidence of cryptic Y chromosome material in the genome of TS patients. The methodology involved a combination of polymerase chain reaction (PCR) and nested PCR followed by Southern blot analysis of three genes the sex determining region Y (SRY), testis specific protein Y encoded (TSPY) and RNA binding motif protein (RBM) (previously designated as YRRM) and nine additional STSs spanning all seven intervals of the Y chromosome. The methodology has a high sensitivity as it detects one 46,XY cell among 10(5) 46,XX cells. Reliability was ensured by taking several precautions to avoid false positive results. We report the results of screening 50 TS patients and the identification of cryptic Y chromosome material in 12 (24%) of them. Karyotypes were divided in four groups: 5 (23.8%) patients out of the 21 TS patients which have the 45,X karyotype (group A) also have cryptic Y sequences; none (0%) of the 7 patients who have karyotypes with anomalies on one of the X chromosomes have Y mosaicism (group B); 1 (6.3%) of the 16 patients with a mosaic karyotype have Y material (group C); and 6 (100%) out of 6 patients with a supernumerary marker chromosome (SMC) have Y chromosome sequences (group D). Nine of the 12 patients positive for cryptic Y material were recalled for a repeat study. Following new DNA extraction, molecular analysis was repeated and, in conjunction with fluorescent in situ hybridization (FISH) analysis using the Y centromeric specific probe Yc-2, confirmed the initial positive DNA findings. This study used a reliable and sensitive methodology to identify the presence of Y chromosome material in TS patients thus providing not only a better estimate of a patient's risk in developing either gonadoblastoma or another form of gonadal tumor but also the overall incidence of cryptic Y mosaicism.
Evidence from developmental and regeneration studies of the cochlea and other tissues gives reason to hypothesize a role for nonneural cells in the growth and regeneration of cochlear spiral ganglion nerve fibers. We examined the spontaneous associations of regrowing neurites and nonneural cells in mixed cultures of dissociated newborn mouse spiral ganglia. After 7 days in vitro, nonneural cells formed a confluent layer in the culture well. Regrowing neurites grew atop this layer, forming non-uniform patterns that were similar to those formed by endogenously expressed laminin-1, entactin and integrin beta4, but not fibronectin or tenascin. In cultures grown for 42 h and maintained in three different growth media, all regrowing neurites were preferentially associated with spindle-shaped nonneural cells. The spindle-shaped cells incorporated bromodeoxyuridine in culture and were immunoreactive for the proteins S100, laminin-1, laminin-2, SRY-related high-mobility-group box 10 transcription factor (Sox10), neurotrophin receptor (P75) and connexin29 but negative for fibronectin and glial fibrillary acidic protein. These cells existed in the culture within a much larger, general population of fibronectin positive cells. Immunolabeling of fixed cochleas from neonatal mice localized Sox10, P75 and connexin29, to peripheral nerve bundles. The observed expressions of protein markers and the bipolar, spindle shape of the neurite-associated cells indicate that they are derived in vitro from the original Schwann or satellite cells in the ganglion or spiral lamina. The spontaneous and preferential association of neurites in culture with mitotic Schwann cells highlights the potential contribution neurite-Schwann cell interactions may have in promoting the growth and regrowth of damaged spiral ganglion neurons in the cochlea.
MicroRNAs (miRNAs) are a class of short non-coding RNAs that pave a new avenue for understanding immune responses and cancer progression. Although the miRNAs are involved in breast cancer development, their axis with the transcription factors that show therapeutic potential in breast cancer is largely unknown. Previous studies showed anti-metastatic roles of agonist-activated aryl hydrocarbon receptor (Ahr) in various breast cancer cell lines. Recently, we demonstrated that agonist-activated Ahr induced a highly conserved miRNA cluster, named miR-212/132, in murine cellular immune compartment. Therefore, current study was performed to examine if this miRNA cluster mediates the anti-metastatic properties of Ahr agonists.
The expression of miR-212/132 cluster and coding genes were examined by real-time PCR, and the protein levels were detected by western blot. The 2,3,7,8-tetrachlorodibenzo-p-dioxin (TCDD) and 3,3'-diindolylmethane (DIM) were used to activate Ahr in MDA-MB-231 and T47D breast cancer cells. Chromatin immunoprecipitation (ChIP) assay was used to identify the binding site(s) for Ahr on miR-212/132 promoter. For prediction of potentially target gene of the miRNA cluster, bioinformatics analysis was carried out, and to test targeting, luciferase activity was quantified. Besides, biological effects of Ahr-miR-212/132 axis were examined in vitro by cell migration, expansion and invasion, and examined in vivo by orthotopic model of spontaneous metastasis.
The miR-212/132 cluster was transcriptionally activated in MDA-MB-231 and T47D cells by TCDD and DIM, and this activation was regulated by Ahr. A reciprocal correlation was identified between Ahr agonists-induced miR-212/132 and the pro-metastatic SRY-related HMG-box4 (SOX4), and a new specific binding sites for miR-212/132 were identified on the untranslated region (3'UTR) of SOX4. Interestingly, miR-212/132 over-expression showed direct anti-migration, anti-expansion and anti-invasion properties, and an inhibition of the miRNA cluster mitigated the anti-invasive properties of TCDD and DIM. Further in vivo studies demonstrated that the Ahr-miR-212/132-SOX4 module was induced by Ahr activation.
Taken together, the findings provide the first evidences of the synergistic anti-metastatic properties of miR-212/132 cluster through suppression of SOX4. Also, current study suggest a new miRNA-based mechanism elucidating the anti-metastatic properties of Ahr agonists, suggesting possibility of using miR-212/132 to control metastasis in breast cancer patients.
Teleost fish are characterized by exceptionally high levels of brain estrogen biosynthesis when compared to the brains of other vertebrates or to the ovaries of the same fish. Goldfish (Carassius auratus) and zebrafish (Danio rerio) have utility as complementary models for understanding the molecular basis and functional significance of exaggerated neural estrogen biosynthesis. Multiple cytochrome P450 aromatase (P450arom) cDNAs that derive from separate gene loci (cyp19a and cyp19b) are differentially expressed in brain (P450aromB>A) and ovary (P450aromA>B) and have a different developmental program (B>A) and response to estrogen upregulation (B only). As measured by increased P450aromB mRNA, a functional estrogen response system is first detected 24-48 h post-fertilization (hpf), consistent with the onset of estrogen receptor (ER) expression (alpha, beta, and gamma). The 5'-flanking region of the cyp19b gene has a TATA box, two estrogen response elements (EREs), an ERE half-site (ERE1/2), a nerve growth factor inducible-B protein (NGFI-B)/Nur77 responsive element (NBRE) binding site, and a sequence identical to the zebrafish GATA-2 gene neural specific enhancer. The cyp19a promoter region has TATA and CAAT boxes, a steroidogenic factor-1 (SF-1) binding site, and two aryl hydrocarbon receptor (AhR)/AhR nuclear translocator factor (ARNT) binding motifs. Both genes have multiple potential SRY/SOX binding sites (16 and 8 in cyp19b and cyp19a, respectively). Luciferase reporters have basal promoter activity in GH3 cells, but differences (a>b) are opposite to fish pituitary (b>a). When microinjected into fertilized zebrafish eggs, a cyp19b promoter-driven green fluorescent protein (GFP) reporter (but not cyp19a) is expressed in neurons of 30-48 hpf embryos, most prominently in retinal ganglion cells (RGCs) and their projections to optic tectum. Further studies are required to identify functionally relevant cis-elements and cellular factors, and to determine the regulatory role of estrogen in neurodevelopment.
Diet and microbiome derived indole derivatives are known to activate the ligand induced transcription factor, the Aryl hydrocarbon Receptor (AhR). While the current understanding of AhR biology has confirmed its role in mucosal lymphocytes, its function in intestinal antigen presenting cells (APCs) is poorly understood. Here, we report that Cre-mediated deletion of AhR in CD11c-expressing cells in C57/BL6 mice is associated with altered intestinal epithelial morphogenesis in vivo. Moreover, when co-cultured with AhR-deficient DCs ex vivo, intestinal organoids showed reduced SRY (sex determining region Y)-box 9 and increased Mucin 2 expression, which correlates with reduced Paneth cells and increased goblet cell differentiation, similar to the data obtained in vivo. Further, characterization of intestinal APC subsets, devoid of AhR, revealed an expression pattern associated with aberrant intrinsic Wnt pathway regulation. At a functional level, the loss of AhR in APCs resulted in a dysfunctional epithelial barrier, associated with a more aggressive chemically induced colitis compared to wild type animals. Our results are consistent with a model whereby the AhR signalling pathway may participate in the regulation of innate immunity through intestinal epithelium development and mucosal immunity.
Developmental exposure to arylhydrocarbon receptor (AhR) ligands abolishes sex differences in a wide range of neural structures and functions. A well-studied example is the anteroventral periventricular nucleus (AVPV), a structure that controls sex-specific luteinizing hormone (LH) release. In the male, testosterone (T) secreted by the developing testes defeminizes LH release mechanisms; conversely, perinatal AhR activation by 2,3,7,8,-tetrachlorodibenzo-p-dioxin (TCDD) blocks defeminization. To better understand developmental mechanisms altered by TCDD exposure, we first verified that neonatal TCDD exposure in male rats prevented the loss of AVPV GABA/glutamate neurons that are critical for female-typical LH surge release. We then used whole genome arrays and quantitative real-time polymerase chain reaction (QPCR) to compare AVPV transcriptomes of males treated neonatally with TCDD or vehicle. Our bioinformatics analyses showed that TCDD enriched gene sets important for neuron development, synaptic transmission, ion homeostasis, and cholesterol biosynthesis. In addition, upstream regulatory analysis suggests that both estrogen receptors (ER) and androgen receptors (AR) regulate genes targeted by TCDD. Of the 23 mRNAs found to be changed by TCDD at least 2-fold (p<0.05), most participate in the functions identified in our bioinformatics analyses. Several, including matrix metallopeptidase 9 and SRY-box 11 (Sox11), are known targets of E2. CUG triplet repeat, RNA binding protein 2 (cugbp2) is particularly interesting because it is sex-specific, oppositely regulated by estradiol (E2) and TCDD. Moreover, it regulates the post-transcriptional processing of molecules previously linked to sexual differentiation of the brain. These findings provide new insights into how TCDD may interfere with defeminization of LH release patterns.
Teleost fish are characterized by exceptionally high levels of neural estrogen biosynthesis when compared with the brains of other vertebrates or to the ovaries of the same fish. Two P450arom mRNAs which derive from separate gene loci (cyp19a and cyp19b) are differentially expressed in brain (b>a) and ovary (a>b) and have a different developmental program (b>a) and estrogen upregulation (b only). A polymerase chain reaction (PCR)-based genomic walking strategy was used to isolate the 5'-flanking regions of the goldfish (Carassius auratus) cyp19 genes. Sequence analysis of the cyp19b gene approximately 1.8 kb upstream of the transcription start site revealed a TATA box at nucleotide (nt) -30, two estrogen responsive elements (EREs; nt -351 and -211) and a consensus binding site (NBRE) for nerve growth factor inducible-B protein (NGFI-B/Nur77) at -286, which includes another ERE half-site. Also present were a sequence at nt -399 (CCCTCCT) required for neural specificity of the zebrafish GATA-2 gene, and 16 copies of an SRY/SOX binding motif. The 5'-flanking region ( approximately 1.0 kb) of the cyp19a gene had TATA (nt -48) and CAAT (nt -71) boxes, a steroidogenic factor-1 (SF-1) binding site (nt -265), eight copies of the SRY/SOX motif, and two copies of a recognition site for binding the arylhydrocarbon receptor (AhR)/AhR nuclear translocator factor (ARNT) heterodimer. Both genes had elements previously identified in the brain specific exon I promoter of the mouse aromatase gene. Cyp19a- and -b/luciferase constructs showed basal promoter activity in aromatase-expressing rodent pituitary (GH3) cells, but differences (a>b) did not reflect expression in fish pituitary in vivo (b>a), implying a lack of appropriate cell factors. Consistent with the onset of cyp19b expression in zebrafish embryos, microinjection of a green fluorescent protein (GFP) reporter plasmid into fertilized eggs revealed labeling in neural tissues at 30-48 h post-fertilization (hpf), most prominently in retinal ganglion cells (RGC) and axon-like projections to the optic tectum. Expression of a cyp19a/GFP reporter was not detectable up to 72 hpf. Tandem analysis of cyp19a and cyp19b promoters in living zebrafish embryos can be a useful approach for identifying cis-elements and cellular factors involved in the correct tissue-specific, spatial, temporal and estrogen regulated expression of aromatase genes during CNS and gonadal development.
To investigate whether triptolide can prolong the survival of rat mesenchymal stem cells (MSCs) transfected with the mouse hyperpolarization-activated cyclic nucleotide-gated channel 4 (mHCN4) gene in the myocardium.
Grafted cell survival was determined using a sex-mismatched cell transplantation model and analysis of Y chromosome-specific Sry gene expression from hearts harvested at different time points after cell transplantation. ELISA and RT-PCR were used to measure protein and mRNA levels, respectively, of nuclear factor (NF)-κB, IL-1β, IL-6 and TNF-α.
Donor cell numbers decreased over time. Pretreatment with triptolide improved graft survival both 24 (29.3 ± 0.9%) and 72 h (17.5 ± 1.2%) after transplantation of MSCs and resulted in a 2.5-fold increase in the total cell number 72 h after cell transplantation. The mRNA expression and protein content of NF-κB, IL-1β, IL-6 and TNF-α were significantly reduced in the triptolide-treated group compared with the control groups. In addition, triptolide downregulated Bax but upregulated Bcl-2 in the injected region.
Transient treatment with triptolide may significantly improve the early survival of MSCs in vivo. The mechanism underlying this effect involves attenuating the inflammatory response via inhibition of the NF-κB signaling pathway.
Abnormal activation of the Wnt/β-catenin signaling pathway is common in human cancers, including cervical cancer. Many papers have shown that SRY (sex-determining region Y)-box (SOX) family genes serve as either tumor suppressor genes (TSGs) or oncogenes by regulating the Wnt signaling pathway in different cancers. We have demonstrated recently that epigenetic silencing of SOX1 gene occurs frequently in cervical cancer. However, the possible role of SOX1 in cervical cancer remains unclear. This study aimed to explore whether SOX1 functions as a TSG in cervical cancer.
We established a constitutive and an inducible system that overexpressed SOX1 and monitored its function by in vitro experiments. To confirm SOX1 function, we manipulated SOX1 using an inducible expression approach in cell lines. The effect of SOX1 on tumorigenesis was also analyzed in animal models.
Overexpression of SOX1 inhibited cell proliferation, anchorage independency, and invasion in vitro. SOX1 suppressed tumor growth in nonobese diabetic/severe combined immunodeficiency mice. After induction of SOX1 by doxycycline (DOX), SOX1 inhibited cell growth and invasion in the inducible system. Repression of SOX1 by withdrawal of DOX partially reversed the malignant phenotype in cervical cells. SOX1 inhibited TCF-dependent transcriptional activity and the Wnt target genes. SOX1 also repressed the invasive phenotype by regulating the expression of invasion-related genes.
Taken together, these data suggest that SOX1 can function as a tumor suppressor partly by interfering with Wnt/β-catenin signaling in cervical cancer.
Liver fibrosis is the excessive accumulation of extracellular matrix (ECM) proteins including collagen that occurs in most types of chronic liver diseases. Studies concerning the capacity of mesenchymal stem cells (MSCs) and simvasatain (SIMV) to repair fibrotic tissues through reducing inflammation, collagen deposition, are still controversial. This study aimed to investigate the therapeutic efficacy of bone marrow (BM)-derived MSCs and SIMV on carbon tetrachloride (CCl4)-induced liver fibrosis in rats. Rats were divided into: normal, CCl4, CCl4/MSCs, CCl4/SIMV, CCl4/MSCs/SIMV, and SIMV groups. BM-derived MSCs were detected by RT-PCR of CD29 and were then infused into the tail vein of female rats that received CCl4 injection to induce liver fibrosis. Sex-determining region Y (SRY) gene on Y-chromosome gene was assessed by PCR to confirm homing of the male stem cells in liver tissue of the female recipients. Serum liver function tests, liver procollagens I and III, tissue inhibitors of metalloproteinase-1 (TIMP-1), endoglin, matrix metalloproteinase-1 (MMP-1) gene expressions, transforming growth factor-beta (TGF-β1) immunostaining, and histopathologicl examination were performed. MSCs and SIMV decreased liver procollagens I and III, TIMP-1 and endoglin gene expressions, TGF-β1 immunostaining, and serum liver function tests compared with the CCl4 group. MMP-1 expression was increased in the CCl4/MSCs group. Histopathological examination as well as fibrosis score supports the biochemical and molecular findings. It can be concluded that MSCs and SIMV were effective in the treatment of hepatic CCl4-induced fibrosis-rat model. Treatment with MSCs was superior to SIMV. This antifibrotic effect can be attributed to their effect on the MMPs/TIMPs balance which is central in fibrogenesis.
Oncogenic activation of the Wnt/β-catenin signaling pathway is common in hepatocellular carcinoma (HCC). Our recent studies have demonstrated that SRY (sex determining region Y)-box 1 (SOX1) and secreted frizzled-related proteins are concomitantly promoter-hypermethylated, and this might lead to abnormal activation of the Wnt signaling pathway in HCC. SOX1 encodes a transcription factor involved in the regulation of embryonic development and cell fate determination. However, the expression and functional role of SOX1 in HCC remains unclear. In this study, we confirmed via quantitative methylation-specific polymerase chain reaction that SOX1 was frequently downregulated through promoter hypermethylation in HCC cells and tissues. Overexpression of SOX1 by a constitutive or inducible approach could suppress cell proliferation, colony formation, and invasion ability in HCC cell lines, as well as tumor growth in nonobese diabetic/severe combined immunodeficiency mice. Conversely, knockdown of SOX1 by withdrawal of doxycycline could partially restore cell proliferation and colony formation in HCC cells. We used a T cell factor (TCF)-responsive luciferase reporter assay and western blot analysis to prove that SOX1 could regulate TCF-responsive transcriptional activity and inhibit the expression of Wnt downstream genes. Furthermore, we used glutathione S-transferase pull-down, co-immunoprecipitation, and confocal microscopy to demonstrate that SOX1 could interact with β-catenin but not with the β-catenin/TCF complex. Moreover, restoration of the expression of SOX1 induces significant cellular senescence in Hep3B cells.
Our data show that a developmental gene, SOX1, may function as a tumor suppressor by interfering with Wnt/β-catenin signaling in the development of HCC.
To investigate the distributive path and proliferative rule of marrow mesenchymal stem cells (MSCs) in the rat transplanted via caudal vein from male rat to female rats model of chronic aristolochic acid nephropathy (CAAN).
Cells taken from femoral bone marrow of male Wistar rats were made into single cell suspension, cultured, purified and identified as MSCs. MSCs were transplanted via caudal vein into 50 female Wistar CAAN model rats allocated in the test group, they were killed, 10 rats in a batch, at various time points (6 h, 48 h, 10 d, 30 d and 60 d after transplantation). Besides, 10 rats allocated in the control group were killed on the 30th day after received sham-transplantation. Kidney tissue of all rats was taken for detecting cells originated from the donors by fluorescence in situ hybridization test with FAM-labeled sex determining region of Y chromosome (SRY FISH) probe, and their number in SRY was counted using SRY PCR.
MSCs were mainly distributed in the glomerular capillaries at the time points of 6 h and 48 h, but the number of MSCs in glomerular capillaries decreased and those in renal mesenchyma increased at the time points from 10 d to 60 d gradually, then tended to a steady state, meanwhile it showed a stable increasing trend in renal tubule. Cell colony of MSCs could be found in mesenchyma with a slowed down increasing between 30 d to 60 d, but the increasing in tubule was still steady.
MSCs originated from the donor can enter the kidney of acceptor and distribute from blood capillary to renal mesenchyma and tubule, and they can long time inhabit there and make propagation.
To investigate the potentiality of mesenchymal stem cells (MSCs) to differentiate into vascular endothelia cells (ECs) in peritubular capillary (PTC) in chronic aristolochic acid nephropathy (CAAN).
MSCs were isolated from a male Wistar rat. The surface markers were identified with flow cytometry. Thirty female Wistar rats were randomly divided into 3 equal groups: Group A, perfused intragastrically with decoction of Caulis Aristolochiae manshuriensis for 12 weeks to establish CAAN models, Group B, perfused intragastrically with decoction of Caulis Aristolochiae manshuriensis for 12 weeks to establish CAAN models and injected with the MSCs by caudal vein in the 12th week, and Group C, perfused intragastrically with drinking water for 12 weeks and then injected with normal saline by caudal vein to be used as normal controls. At week 16, specimens of blood and urine were collected to detect the blood urea nitrogen (BUN), serum creatinine (Scr) and urine protein, and then the rats were killed with their kidneys taken out. Sex-determining region of the Y chromosome-fluorescence in situ hybridization (SRY-FISH) test with carboxyfluorescein (FAM)- was used to detect the cells originated from the source of the male donors. Immunohistochemistry was used to detect CD34, marker antigen pf EC. HE and Masson staining and electron microscope were used to observe the pathology of the kidney. Immunohistochemistry and RT-PCR were used to detect the expression of vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF). Correlation analysis was conducted to study the relationships among these indices.
Y chromosome and CD34 double positive cells could be seen in the renal tissue of Group B. At week 16, the density of PTC and integrated optical density of VEGF of Group A were (5.3 +/- 0.8)/0.13 mm2 and (2.8 +/- 0.4) x 10(3) respectively, both significantly lower than those of Group B [(26.5 +/- 1.6)/0.13 mm2 and (14.7 +/- 1.7) x 10(3) respectively, both P < 0.011]. The Scr and urine protein of Group A were significantly higher than those of Group B. The expression of VEGF mRNA of Group A was significantly lower than that of Group B.
MSCs can differentiate into ECs. MSCs transplantation has beneficial effects on CAAN, which is possibly related with the reduction of PTC.
We tested the role of sex chromosome complement and gonadal hormones in sex differences in several different paradigms measuring nociception and opioid analgesia using "four core genotypes" C57BL/6J mice. The genotypes include XX and XY gonadal males, and XX and XY gonadal females. Adult mice were gonadectomized and tested 3-4 weeks later, so that differences between sexes (mice with testes vs. ovaries) were attributable mainly to organizational effects of gonadal hormones, whereas differences between XX and XY mice were attributable to their complement of sex chromosomes. In Experiment 1 (hotplate test of acute morphine analgesia), XX mice of both gonadal sexes had significantly shorter hotplate baseline latencies prior to morphine than XY mice. In Experiment 2 (test of development of tolerance to morphine), mice were injected twice daily with 10 mg/kg morphine or saline for 6 days. Saline or the competitive NMDA antagonist CPP (3-(2-carboxypiperazin-4yl) propyl-1-phosphonic acid) (10 mg/kg) was co-injected. On day 7, mice were tested for hotplate latencies before and after administration of a challenge dose of morphine (10 mg/kg). XX mice showed shorter hotplate latencies than XY mice at baseline, and the XX-XY difference was greater following morphine. In Experiment 3, mice were injected with morphine (10 mg/kg) or saline, 15 min before intraplantar injection of formalin (5%/25 microl). XX mice licked their hindpaw more than XY mice within 5 min of formalin injection. The results indicate that X- or Y-linked genes have direct effects, not mediated by gonadal secretions, on sex differences in two different types of acute nociception.
Liver progenitor/oval cells differentiate into hepatocytes and biliary epithelial cells, repopulating the liver when the regenerative capacity of hepatocytes is impaired. Recent studies have shown that hematopoietic bone marrow (BM) stem/progenitor cells can give rise to hepatocytes in diseased/damaged liver. One study has reported that BM cells can transdifferentiate into liver progenitor/oval cells, but it has not been proven that the latter can repopulate the liver. To answer this question, we have lethally irradiated female DPP4(-) mutant F344 rats and transplanted them with 50 million wild-type male F344 BM cells. One month after transplantation, the recipient BM was reconstituted with male hematopoietic cells, determined by quantitative polymerase chain reaction using primers for Y chromosome-specific sry gene. In addition, DPP4(+) cells, single or in clusters and predominantly in the periportal region, were detected in all liver sections of recipient rats. Animals were subjected to the following three different liver injury protocols for activation and expansion of oval cells: D-galactosamine, retrorsine/partial hepatectomy (Rs/PH), and 2-acetylaminofluorene/partial hepatectomy (2-AAF/PH). In all three models, prominent expansion and accumulation of cytokeratin 19-positive (CK-19(+)) oval cells was observed. However, most of the DPP4(+) clusters dispersed over time, and their total number decreased. Very few oval cells (less than 1%) showed double DPP4/CK-19 labeling. None of the small hepatocytic clusters in the Rs/PH or 2-AAF/PH model were comprised of DPP4(+) cells. These data demonstrate that the sources of oval cells and small hepatocytes in the injured liver are endogenous liver progenitors and that they do not arise through transdifferentiation from BM cells.
A real-time PCR-based gene expression survey was performed on isolated European sea bass follicles from primary growth to late vitellogenesis. Expression levels of 18 transcripts with demonstrated relevance during oogenesis, encoding gonadotropin, thyrotropin, estrogen, androgen, and vitellogenin receptors, steroidogenesis-related as well as growth and transcription factors were measured. Primary oocytes showed high mRNA levels of insulin-like growth factors 1 and 2, bone morphogenetic protein 4, estrogen receptor 2b, androgen receptor b, and SRY-box containing gene 17 together with low transcript amounts of gonadotropin receptors. Follicles at the lipid vesicles stage (i.e., the beginning of the secondary growth phase) showed elevated mRNA amounts of follicle stimulating hormone receptor (fshr) and anti-Mullerian hormone. Early-to-mid vitellogenic follicles showed high mRNA levels of fshr and cytochrome P450, family 19, subfamily A, polypeptide 1a while mid-to-late vitellogenic follicles expressed increasing transcript amounts of luteinizing hormone/choriogonadotropin receptor, steroidogenic acute regulatory protein, and estrogen receptors 1 and 2a. The molecular data presented here may serve as a solid base for future studies focused on unraveling the specific mechanisms orchestrating follicular development in teleost fish.
The expression of biliary/progenitor markers by hepatocellular carcinoma (HCC) is often associated with poor prognosis and stem cell-like behaviors of tumor cells. Hepatocellular adenomas (HCA) also often express biliary/progenitor markers and frequently act as precursor lesions for HCC. However, the cell of origin of HCA and HCC that expresses these markers still remains unclear. Therefore, to evaluate if mature hepatocytes give rise to HCA and HCC tumors, and to understand the molecular pathways involved in tumorigenesis, we lineage-labeled hepatocytes by injecting adeno-associated virus (AAV) containing thyroxine-binding globulin (TBG) promoter driven-Cre into Rosa(YFP) mice. Yellow fluorescent protein (YFP) was present in more than 96% of hepatocytes before exposure to carcinogens. We treated AAV-TBG-Cre;Rosa(YFP) mice with diethylnitrosamine (DEN) followed by multiple injections of carbon tetrachloride (CCl4 ) to induce carcinogenesis and fibrosis, and found that HCA and HCC nodules were YFP(+) lineage-labeled and also positive for osteopontin (Opn), SRY (sex determining region Y)-box 9 (Sox9), and epithelial cell adhesion molecule (EpCAM), and enriched for transcripts of biliary/progenitor markers such as Prom1, Cd44, and Dlk1. Next, we performed the converse experiment and lineage-labeled Foxl1-positive hepatic progenitor cells simultaneously with exposure to carcinogens. None of the tumor nodules expressed YFP, indicating that Foxl1-expressing cells are not the cell of origin for hepatotoxin-induced liver tumors. We confirmed that HCA and HCC cells are derived from mature hepatocytes and not from Foxl1-Cre-marked cells in a second model of toxin-induced hepatic neoplasia, using DEN and 3,3',5,5'-tetrachloro-1,4-bis(pyridyloxy)benzene (TCPOBOP).
Our results indicate that hepatocytes are the cell of origin of HCA and HCC in DEN/CCl4 and DEN/TCPOBOP-induced liver tumors. This article is protected by copyright. All rights reserved.
The testis-determining gene SRY is not well-conserved among mammals, and particularly between mouse and other mammals. To evaluate SRY function in a nonrodent species, we produced an antibody against goat SRY and used it to investigate the expression pattern of SRY throughout goat testicular development. By contrast with the mouse, SRY is primarily expressed in most cells of XY genital-ridges and not solely in pre-Sertoli cells. Between cord formation and prepuberty, SRY remains expressed in both Sertoli and germinal cells. During adulthood, SRY expression declines and then disappears from meiotic germ cells, only remaining present at low levels in some spermatogonia. Unlike the germinal lineage, SRY continues to be highly expressed in adult Sertoli cells with a typical nuclear staining. Our data indicate that in goat, the role of SRY may not be limited to testis determination and could have other functions in testicular maintenance and hence male fertility.
The testis-determining gene SRY is not well-conserved among mammals, particularly between mouse and other mammals, both in terms of protein structure and of expression regulation. To evaluate SRY phylogenic conservation in regards to its function, we expressed the goat gene (gSRY) in XX transgenic mouse gonads. Here, we show that gSRY induces testis formation, despite a goat expression profile. Our results demonstrate that sex-reversal can be induced in XX-mice by a non-mouse SRY thus suggesting a conserved molecular mechanism of action of this testis-determining gene across mammalian species.
In mammals, the Y-located SRY gene is known to induce testis formation from the indifferent gonad. A related gene, SOX9, also plays a critical role in testis differentiation in mammals, in birds and reptiles. It is now assumed that SRY acts upstream of SOX9 in the sex determination cascade, but the regulatory link which should exist between these two genes remains unknown. Studies on XX sex reversal in polled goats (PIS mutation: Polled Intersex Syndrome) have led to the discovery of a female-specific locus crucial for ovarian differentiation. This genomic region is composed of at least two genes, FOXL2 and PISRT1, which share a common transcriptional regulatory region, PIS. In this review, we present the expression pattern of these PIS-regulated genes in mice. The FOXL2 expression profile of mice is similar to that described in goats in accordance with a conserved role of this ovarian differentiating gene in mammals. On the contrary, the PISRT1 expression profile is different between mice and goats, suggesting different mechanisms of the primary switch in the testis determination process within mammals. A model based on two different modes of SOX9 regulation in mice and other mammals is proposed in order to integrate our results into the current scheme of gonad differentiation.
SOX genes are a family of genes that encode for proteins which are characterised by the presence of a HMG-domain related to that of the mammalian sex-determining gene (SRY). By definition, the DNA binding domain of SOX genes is at least 50% identical to the 79 amino acid HMG domain of the SRY gene. We report here two HMG-box sequences from two microbat species (R. ferrumequinum and P. Pipistrellus) which were PCR amplified using a primer pair specific to the mouse Sry HMG-box. The high percentage of identity of this sequences with the human and mouse SOX30 HMG-box suggests that they are the SOX30 HMG-box for these two bat species.
Concentration of maternal BICOID (BCD) establishes the anterior pattern in the Drosophila embryo. Successive deletions in the bcd promoter allowed us to localize an enhancer sequence in the 5'-UTR and a down-regulating element downstream of the ATG initiator codon, and identify a 49 bp region sufficient to drive transcription of a reporter gene specifically in nurse cells. This fragment contains two binding sites for the Serendipity (Sry) d zinc finger activator, that mediate its cooperative binding. Both sites (sdbs) are essential for bcd expression. Further analysis showed that the bcd promoter configuration is decisive for Sry d activating function. Replacement of sdbs by binding sites for Sry b, the Sry d paralog, restores bcd transcription in sry d mutant ovaries, demonstrating that the functional divergence between these two proteins during evolution was mainly driven by changes in their DNA-specific recognition properties, resulting in the control of separate developmental pathways.
The drug discovery research for cholestatic liver diseases has been hampered by the lack of a well-established human cholangiocyte model. Functional cholangiocyte-like cells differentiated from human induced pluripotent stem (iPS) cells are expected to be a promising candidate for such research, but there remains no well-established method for differentiating cholangiocytes from human iPS cells. In this study, we searched for a suitable extracellular matrix to promote cholangiocyte differentiation from human iPS cells, and found that both laminin 411 and laminin 511 were suitable for this purpose. The gene expression levels of the cholangiocyte markers, aquaporin 1 (AQP1), SRY-box 9 (SOX9), cystic fibrosis transmembrane conductance regulator (CFTR), G protein-coupled bile acid receptor 1 (GPBAR1), Jagged 1 (JAG1), secretin receptor (SCTR), and γ-glutamyl transferase (GGT1) were increased by using laminin 411 or laminin 511 as a matrix. In addition, the percentage of AQP1-positive cells was increased from 61.8% to 92.5% by using laminin 411 or laminin 511. Furthermore, the diameter and number of cysts consisted of cholangiocyte-like cells were increased when using either matrix. We believe that the human iPS cell-derived cholangiocyte-like cells, which were generated by using our differentiation technology, would be useful for the drug discovery research of cholestatic liver diseases.
To investigate the effect of transplanted fetal liver epithelial progenitor (FLEP) cells on liver fibrosis in mice.
FLEP cells were isolated from embryonal day (ED) 14 BALB/c mice and transplanted into female syngenic BALB/c mice (n = 60). After partial hepatectomy (PH), diethylnitrosamine (DEN) was administered to induce liver fibrosis. Controls received FLEP cells and non-supplemented drinking water, the model group received DEN-spiked water, and the experimental group received FLEP cells and DEN. Mice were killed after 1, 2, and 3 mo, and alanine aminotransferase (ALT), aspartate aminotransferase (AST), hyaluronic acid (HA), and laminin (LN) in serum, and hydroxyproline (Hyp) content in liver were assessed. Alpha-smooth muscle actin (alpha-SMA) of liver was tested by immunohistochemistry. Transplanted male mice FLEP cells were identified by immunocytochemistry for sry (sex determination region for Y chromosome) protein.
Serum ALT, AST, HA, and LN were markedly reduced by transplanted FLEP cells. Liver Hyp content and alpha-SMA staining in mice receiving FLEP cells were lower than that of the model group, which was consistent with altered liver pathology. Transplanted cells proliferated and differentiated into hepatocytes and bile duct epithelial cells with 30%-50% repopulation in the liver fibrosis induced by DEN after 3 mo.
Transplanted FLEP cells proliferate and differentiate into hepatocytes and bile duct epithelial cells with high repopulation capacity in the fiberized liver induced by DEN, which restores liver function and reduces liver fibrosis.
The autoimmune nature of primary biliary cirrhosis (PBC) is well established. We tested the hypothesis that fetal microchimerism indicated by the persistence of circulating fetal cells in women years after pregnancy might contribute to the aetiopathogenesis of PBC through a graft-versus-host-like response. We extracted DNA from the peripheral blood cells of 36 women carefully selected from 173 consecutive PBC patients, who were matched with 36 healthy women by age, age of last son, and number of children. Both patients and controls had to have male offspring, and no history of miscarriages or blood transfusions; they could not be twins. We tested all of the samples for the presence of two specific Y-chromosome sequences (SY154 and SRY) by amplifying DNA in a nested polymerase chain reaction. Y-chromosome-specific DNA was detected in the peripheral blood cell DNA of 13 (36%) of the 36 women with PBC and in 11 (31%) of the 36 healthy controls. The two groups of PBC patients with and without male DNA sequences were similar in terms of their clinical, biochemical, and serological features. Y-chromosome sequences were found in three of the four PBC women with associated systemic sclerosis. All of the 24 Y-positive samples contained SY154 sequences, but only three PBC patients and six controls showed the presence of both SY154 and SRY sequences. This discrepancy may suggest that not only fetal cells but also fragments of fetal DNA are present in maternal circulation. Overall, our data do not support the hypothesis that fetal microchimerism plays a significant role in the onset or progression of PBC.
This study aimed to evaluate whether female adult offspring born with intrauterine growth retardation induced by prenatal nicotine exposure (PNE) are susceptible to osteoarthritis (OA) and to explore the underlying programming mechanisms. Pregnant rats were treated with nicotine or saline at 2.0 mg/kg/d from gestational d 11 to 20. The female adult offspring with or without PNE were forced with a strenuous treadmill running for 6 wk to induce OA. Nicotine's effects on fetal articular chondrocytes were studied by exposing chondrocytes to nicotine for 10 d, and dihydro-β-erythroidine, a selective α4β2-nicotinic acetylcholine receptor (nAChR) inhibitor, was used to identify the change of nicotine's effect. For adult offspring, increased cartilage destruction and accelerated OA progression were observed in the PNE group with running; the expression of α1 chain of type II collagen (Col2A1), aggrecan, SRY-type high mobility group box 9 (Sox9), and IGF1 signaling molecules in the cartilage of PNE offspring were decreased. For fetuses, elevated serum corticosteroid and nicotine levels and suppressed IGF1 levels were observed; expression of Col2A1, aggrecan, Sox9, and IGF1 were reduced. The result of chondrocytes revealed that nicotine impeded the expression of Col2A1, aggrecan, and IGF1; blocking α4β2-nAChR rescued nicotine's suppression. In conclusion, PNE increases the susceptibility of adult offspring to OA; the potential mechanism involves IGF1 low-functional programming in articular cartilage caused directly by the action of nicotine on α4β2-nAChR.
Prenatal stress is known to cause intrauterine fetal growth retardation, and is also associated with various long-term effects in the form of metabolic and neurodevelopmental diseases in adults. Many of the diseases associated with prenatal stress exhibit a sex bias. Perturbations and vulnerability to prenatal stress are often more profound in males, but the mechanisms responsible for this relationship are not clear. We have previously shown that administration of the synthetic glucocorticoid, dexamethasone (Dex), at embryonic days 7.5, 8.5, and 9.5, induces embryonic growth restriction in a sex-dependent manner in a mouse model. Here we examined the effect of prenatal exposure to Dex on gonadal development. During male gonadal development, sex-determining genes, such as Sry, Sox9, and other downstream genes, were found to be dysregulated in response to prenatal Dex, whereas the genes for the ovarian pathway were affected to a lesser degree in females. In addition, fetal testosterone concentrations were decreased by prenatal exposure to Dex, in parallel with reduced numbers of 3β-hydroxysteroid dehydrogenase (3β-HSD)-positive cells in the embryonic testis. These results show that prenatal exposure to Dex differentially influences male versus female on the gene expression and hormone production during sex determination. We believe these studies provide valuable insights into possible mechanisms responsible for sex-specific responses to prenatal stress.
The knowledge that diverse populations of dopaminergic neurons within the ventral tegmental area (VTA) can be distinguished in terms of their molecular, electrophysiological and functional properties, as well as their differential projections to cortical and subcortical regions has significance for key brain functions, such as the regulation of motivation, working memory and sensorimotor control. Almost without exception, this understanding has evolved from landmark studies performed in the male sex. However, converging evidence from both clinical and pre-clinical studies illustrates that the structure and functioning of the VTA dopaminergic systems are intrinsically different in males and females. This may be driven by sex differences in the hormonal environment during adulthood ('activational' effects) and development (perinatal and/or pubertal 'organizational' effects), as well as genetic factors, especially the SRY gene on the Y chromosome in males, which is expressed in a sub-population of adult midbrain dopaminergic neurons. Stress and stress hormones, especially glucocorticoids, are important factors which interact with the VTA dopaminergic systems in order to achieve behavioral adaptation and enable the individual to cope with environmental change. Here, also, there is male/female diversity not only during adulthood, but also in early life when neurobiological programing by stress or glucocorticoid exposure differentially impacts dopaminergic developmental trajectories in male and female brains. This may have enduring consequences for individual resilience or susceptibility to pathophysiological change induced by stressors in later life, with potential translational significance for sex bias commonly found in disorders involving dysfunction of the mesocorticolimbic dopaminergic systems. These findings highlight the urgent need for a better understanding of the sexual dimorphism in the VTA if we are to improve strategies for the prevention and treatment of debilitating conditions which differentially affect men and women in their prevalence and nature, including schizophrenia, attention/deficit hyperactivity disorder, autism spectrum disorders, anxiety, depression and addiction.
Prenatal dexamethasone (DEX) treatment has been proposed since 1984 to prevent genital virilization in girls with congenital adrenal hyperplasia (CAH). DEX is effective in CAH females if initiated before the sixth week of gestation, but its safety in children treated in utero remains controversial regarding cognitive functions.
To avoid prenatal DEX in males and initiate DEX in due time in CAH females, we proposed in 2002 a protocol for fetal sex determination in the maternal serum (SRY test).
We conducted a retrospective study of the management of 258 fetuses in the period 2002 through 2011 in pregnancies managed in referent medical centers with an institutional practice.
A total of 258 fetuses at risk of CAH (134 males and 124 females) were included.
DEX was offered after informed consent to pregnant women.
The sensitivity of an early SRY test was evaluated after data collection.
The SRY test is sensitive from 4 weeks and 5 days of gestation. It avoided prenatal DEX in 68% of males, and this percentage increased over the years. DEX was maintained until prenatal diagnosis in non-CAH females. Virilization was prevented in 12 CAH girls treated at the latest at 6 weeks gestation and minimized in 3 girls treated between 6 and 7 weeks gestation. Maternal tolerance was correct. No fetal malformations were noted in the 154 children treated in utero.
The SRY test is reliable to avoid prenatal DEX in males, but its application must be improved. Prenatal DEX should be maintained to prevent virilization and traumatic surgery in CAH girls after informed consent and information provided to families about the benefit to risk ratio in limiting hyperandrogenism during fetal life. Our large multicentric French cohort has helped to better assess the risks previously reported.
Normal male sex development requires the SRY gene on the Y chromosome, the regression of Müllerian structures via anti-Müllerian hormone (AMH) signalling, the development of the Wolffian duct system into normal male internal genital structures consequent to testosterone secretion by the testicular Leydig cells, and finally, sufficient activation of testosterone to dihydrotestosterone by 5alpha-reductase. All these events take place during weeks 8-12 of gestation, a narrow window of sexual differentiation. Recent studies in human fetal development have demonstrated the early fetal expression of the adrenocorticotrophic hormone (ACTH) receptor and all steroidogenic components necessary for the biosynthesis of cortisol. These findings provide compelling evidence for the assumed pathogenesis of congenital adrenal hyperplasia (CAH) due to 21-hydroxylase deficiency, diminished feedback to the pituitary due to glucocorticoid deficiency, subsequent ACTH excess, and up-regulation of adrenal androgen production with subsequent virilization. Another CAH variant, P450 oxidoreductase deficiency, manifests with 46,XX disorder of sex development (DSD), i.e., virilized female genitalia, despite concurrently low circulating androgens. This CAH variant illustrates the existence of an alternative pathway toward the biosynthesis of active androgens in humans which is active in human fetal life only. Thus CAH teaches important lessons from nature, providing privileged insights into the window of human sexual differentiation, and particularly highlighting the importance of steroidogenesis in the process of human sexual differentiation.
Mutations in the gene encoding 110-hydroxylase (CYPI]BJ) are the second most common cause of congenital adrenal hyperplasia (CAH), a disorder characterized by adrenal insufficiency and virilization of female external genitalia.
We describe a new case of 1113-hydroxylase CAH caused by donor splice site mutation in the CYPllB1 gene.
A 46,XX patient of Pakistani descent was identified with severe virilization soon after birth. The karyotype was negative for SRY. Pelvic ultrasound showed normal uterus and cervix. Periniogram revealed a 3-cm long urogenital sinus, ACTH stimulation test showed normal 17-hydroxyprogesterone, low cortisol, elevated 11-deoxycortisol and deoxycorticosterone (DOC) levels, consistent with 11beta-hydroxylase deficiency. Glucocorticoid treatment was started on the basis of a low baseline cortisol and severely virilized external genitalia. The patient did not develop salt wasting and/or hypertension.
Analysis of the CYPllBlgene revealed homozygosity for a codon 318+1G--C substitution at the 5'-splice donor site of intron 5 resulting in a missense mutation. The parents of the patients are consanguineous and are heterozygous for the same mutation.
In a previous reported case a donor splice mutation was identified for the first time at the same position codon 318 of the CYPIIB1 gene. We present this case in detail along with a literature review of 11beta-hydroxylase deficiency CAH.
The type 1 parathyroid hormone receptor (PTHR1) binds, with equal affinity, two ligands with distinct biological functions: PTH, the major peptide hormone controlling calcium homeostasis, and the paracrine factor, PTH-related peptide (PTHrP), a local regulator of cellular proliferation and differentiation. To clarify the complexity of possible interactions between two distinct ligands, PTH and PTHrP, and their common receptor in the intact organism, and to identify as yet unrecognized roles for PTH in normal physiology, we have cloned and characterized the structural organization, nucleotide sequence and transcriptional regulation of the murine gene encoding PTH. One recombinant clone isolated from a mouse genomic library contained 14 kb of DNA, encompassing the entire Pth gene. The transcriptional unit spans 3.2 kb of genomic DNA and, analogous to the human PTH gene, it is interrupted by two introns. The deduced mRNA encodes the 115-amino acid precursor, preproPTH. Comparison of the murine preproPTH sequence with other mammalian forms of the protein shows it to be highly conserved and to share limited structural similarity to PTHrP at the amino-terminal region, a domain critical for binding and activation of their common receptor. Putative binding motifs for the transcription factors sex-determining region Y gene product, transcriptional repressor CDP, hepatic nuclear factor 3beta, GATA-binding factor 1, glucocorticoid receptor, SRY-related high mobility group box protein 5 and cAMP response element binding protein were identified in the 5' flanking region of the Pth gene. When placed upstream of a reporter gene, these sequences failed to confer transcriptional regulation in response to 1,25(OH)(2) vitamin D(3), but responded positively to the addition of isoproterenol and forskolin. Mutational analysis identified a cAMP-response element in the Pth promoter.
To examine the effect of immunosuppression with intramuscularly injected cyclosporine and topical corticosteroid on limbal allograft survival in a new model in the inbred rat.
Orthotopic limbal tissue harvested from male Fischer 344 (isografts) or male Wistar-Firth donors (allografts) was sutured into superior and inferior lamellar excision sites in female recipient Fischer 344 rats. Grafts were examined clinically for at least 55 days. Superficial epithelial cells were sampled weekly, and the DNA extracted and probed for the male-specific gene Sry by polymerase chain reaction. Recipients were killed at established intervals for immunohistochemistry. Graft-recipient animals were randomly assigned to receive either intramuscular cyclosporine plus topical prednisolone phosphate or vehicle for 4 weeks from the time of transplantation.
Isografts survived for a median of more than 55 days. Allografts underwent clinical rejection at a median of 6 to 7 days after grafting. Acutely rejecting allografts showed a dense mononuclear infiltrate consisting of activated CD4(+) and CD8(+) T cells with some macrophages. Genomic Sry was usually detectable in cells sampled from the ocular surface for more than 55 days in isografts, but not beyond 7 days in allografts. Immunosuppression prolonged allograft survival significantly, as assessed clinically, but did not prolong donor cell survival on the ocular surface, as assessed by detection of genomic Sry.
A robust model of limbal transplantation was developed in the rat. Isografts survived for the long term, whereas allografts underwent rapid rejection. Although clinical allograft survival was prolonged to a modest extent by immunosuppression, donor cell survival on the ocular surface was not improved.
SOX9 is a transcription factor that activates type II procollagen (Col2a1) gene expression during chondrocyte differentiation. Glucocorticoids are also known to promote chondrocyte differentiation via unknown molecular mechanisms. We therefore investigated the effects of a synthetic glucocorticoid, dexamethasone (DEX), on Sox9 gene expression in chondrocytes prepared from rib cartilage of newborn mice. Sox9 mRNA was expressed at high levels in these chondrocytes. Treatment with DEX enhanced Sox9 mRNA expression within 24 h and this effect was observed at least up to 48 h. The effect of DEX was dose dependent, starting at 0.1 nM and maximal at 10 nM. The half life of Sox9 mRNA was approximately 45 min in the presence or absence of DEX. Western blot analysis revealed that DEX also enhanced the levels of SOX9 protein expression. Treatment with DEX enhanced Col2a1 mRNA expression in these chondrocytes and furthermore, DEX enhanced the activity of Col2-CAT (chloramphenicol acetyltransferase) construct containing a 1.6 kb intron fragment where chondrocyte-specific Sry/Sox- consensus sequence is located. The enhancing effect of DEX was specific to SOX9, as DEX did not alter the levels of Sox6 mRNA expression. These data suggest that DEX promotes chondrocyte differentiation through enhancement of SOX9.
Because of two successive rounds of tetraploidization at their inception, the vertebrates contain four times more protein-coding genes in their genome than the invertebrates: 60,000 vs. 15,000. Consequently, each invertebrate gene has been amplified to the maximum of four paralogous genes in vertebrates: the one-to-four rule. When this rule is applied to genes pertinent to gonadal development and differentiation, the following emerged: (i) Two closely related zinc-finger transcription factor genes in invertebrates have been amplified to two paralogous groups in vertebrates. One consisted of EGR1, EGR2, EGR3 and EGR4, whereas the only known paralogue of the other is WT1, which controls the developmental fate of the entire nephric system, and therefore of gonads. Interestingly, EGR1 and WT1 act as antagonists of each other in nephroblastic cells. (ii) SF-1, which controls the fate of two steroid hormone-producing organs, adrenals and gonads, is descended from the invertebrate Ftz-F1 gene, and its only known paralogue is GCNF-1. (iii) The Y-linked SRY, the mammalian testis-determining gene, is a paralogue neither of SOX3 (SRX) nor of SOX9. Its ancient origin suggests that SRY once became extinct in earlier vertebrates, only to revive itself in the mammalian ancestor. (iv) Inasmuch as four paralogues of one invertebrate nuclear receptor gene have differentiated to receptors of androgen, mineralocorticoid, glucocorticoid and progesterone, there should at most be four paralogous estrogen-receptor genes in the vertebrate genome. It is likely that one of them plays a pivotal role in the estrogen-dependent sex-determining mechanism so commonly found among reptiles, amphibians and fish.
The onset of the expression of Sry and other sex-determining genes such as SF-1, DAX-1, WT-1 and SOX family initiates the testis organogenesis from the bipotential primordium. The fetal testis produces anti-Mullerian hormone and testosterone. These two hormones play essential role in the further development of the male phenotype. The bases for the activity of the sexual function and behavior are created within frames of these processes. Interindividual differences in these characters may achieve high degrees. Alleles of the sex-determining genes and the genes of the other genetic systems which participate in regulation of reproduction may be responsible for this variability. For example, the inherited variations in testosterone levels in the blood are negatively correlated to the alpha2-adrenergic receptor densities in the hypothalamus in males of mouse strains. Testosterone level in the fetal blood during critical period of sexual differentiation is one of the key points through which genetic and ontogenetic factors affect male sexual development. We have found nearly twofold interstrain differences in testosterone levels in the blood of male rat fetuses of 2 strains. The rats with higher testosterone levels during intrauterine development have higher rates of sexual maturation and sexual activity in future life. Genetic differences were also found in sensitivity of fetal testosterone to disruptive influences. These differences may be the reason for the strain-specific effects of prenatal stress or glucocorticoid treatment on the male sexual development in rats and mice. Substances and treatments which are capable of changing testosterone levels and/or interaction of these hormones with their receptors: ionizing radiation, pesticides, xenoestrogenes, drugs, alcohol, various stressors are the risk factors of the male sexual development.
Because of two successive rounds of tetraploidization at their inception, the vertebrates contain four times more protein-coding genes in their genome than the invertebrates: 60,000 versus 15,000. Consequently, each invertebrate gene has been amplified to the maximum of four paralogous genes in vertebrates: the one-to-four rule. When this rule is applied to genes pertinent to gonadal development and differentiation, the following emerged: (i) Two closely related zinc-finger transcription factor genes in invertebrates have been amplified to two paralogous groups in vertebrates. One consisted of EGR1, EGR2, EGR3 and EGR4, whereas the only known paralogue of the other is WT1, which controls the developmental fate of the entire nephric system, and therefore of gonads. Interestingly, EGR1 and WT1 act as antagonists of each other in nephroblastic cells. (ii) SF-1, which controls the fate of two steroid hormone-producing organs, adrenals and gonads, is descended from the invertebrate Ftz-F1 gene, and its only known paralogue is GCNF-1. (iii) The Y-linked SRY, the mammalian testis-determining gene, is a paralogue neither of SOX3 (SRX) nor of SOX9. Its ancient origin suggests that SRY once became extinct in earlier vertebrates, only to revive itself in the mammalian ancestor. (iv) Inasmuch as four paralogues of one invertebrate nuclear receptor gene have differentiated to receptors of androgen, mineralocoticoid, glucocorticoid and progesterone, there should at most be four paralogous estrogen-receptor genes in the vertebrate genome. It is likely that one of them plays a pivotal role in the estrogen-dependent sex-determining mechanism so commonly found among reptiles, amphibians and fish.
A de novo apparently balanced translocation involving chromosomes 8 and 20 was found in a 14-year-old boy with minor anomalies, mild skeletal abnormalities and ambiguous external genitalia including perineoscrotal hypospadias, rudimentary fused labioscrotal folds, bilateral cryptorchidism, and small penis. The karyotype was 46,XY, t(8;20)(q22.3-23;p13). No signs of other conditions known to be associated with structural anomalies of either chromosome 8 or 20 were present and incomplete masculinisation of the external genitalia appears to be the main component of the phenotype. Clinical and biological studies showed apparently normal testicular function in utero and after birth. Examinations excluded 5 alpha-reductase deficiency or a block in any enzymatic steps of testosterone, glucocorticoid and mineralocorticoid biosynthesis. Coding sequences of the sex-determining gene (SRY) and androgen receptor gene (AR) were found to be identical to those of a normal male excluding their role in the cause of the present condition. Since several other reports describe the association of hypospadias and hypertelorism with deletions or translocations involving 8q, we suggest that a locus necessary for male sex differentiation is located at distal 8q.
Patients with ambiguous genitalia stand a far better chance of receiving a rapid diagnosis, appropriate replacement therapy, and functional surgical reconstruction than was the case even a decade ago. Although the etiologies of true hermaphroditism and mixed gonadal dysgenesis remain elusive, most gene defects in female pseudohermaphroditism or CAH have been pinpointed to the 21-hydroxylase gene. Incomplete masculinization has been found to be due to defects in the androgen receptor, 5 alpha-reductase, or enzymes in the pathway from cholesterol to testosterone. SRY point mutations have been implicated in 46XY pure gonadal dysgenesis. Retained müllerian ducts have been attributed to point mutations in the MIS gene; those with normal MIS levels should be expected to have receptor deficits. In utero diagnoses and treatment and diagnosis at the preimplantation stage may prove to be very important for the care of some of these patients, who may be potential candidates for gene replacement therapy. When necessary, surgical reconstruction can be done. If the child is to be raised as a female, clitoral recession, labioscrotal reductions and advancements, and vaginoplasties for exteriorization can be accomplished in early infancy as an extensive one-stage procedure. If patients are to be raised as males, then various types of hypospadias repair can be done, gonads can be replaced with prostheses, the prepenile scrotum can be reconstructed, and müllerian structures can be removed with the goal of preserving the vas deferens. Replacement therapy with glucocorticoids and mineralocorticoids must be precisely managed to permit proper growth, and testosterone, estrogen, and progesterone replacement must be carefully considered and managed. A most important element in the care of these patients is the psychological support that first the families and then the patient require. This must be delivered with sensitivity. The proper care of these complex patients requires that the physician be a scientist as well as a clinician and a skilled technician.
Di-(2-ethylhexyl) phthalate (DEHP) is a plasticizer with endocrine disrupting properties that is found ubiquitously in the environment as well as in human amniotic fluid, umbilical cord blood, human milk, semen, and saliva. It is used in the industry to add flexibility to polyvinyl chloride-derived plastics and its wide spread use and presence has resulted in constant human exposure through fetal development and postnatal life. Epidemiological studies have suggested an association between phthalate exposures and human reproductive effects in infant and adult populations. The effects of fetal exposure to phthalates on the male reproductive system were unequivocally shown on animal models, principally rodents, in which short term deleterious reproductive effects are well established. By contrast, information on the long term effects of DEHP in utero exposure on gonadal function are scarce, while its potential effects on other organs are just starting to emerge. The present review focuses on these novel findings, which suggest that DEHP exerts more complex and broader disruptive effects on the endocrine system and metabolism than previously thought. This article is part of a Special Issue entitled "CSR 2013".
To report a translocation between chromosomes 3 and 4: 46,XY,t(3;4)(p25;q31.3) in a male infant with a disorder of sexual development.
Case report.
University hospital.
A 1-year-old infant who presented with abnormal location of the urethral meatus.
Cytogenetic analysis, fluorescence in situ hybridization (FISH), and serum concentrations measurement (using peripheral blood), and clinical examination.
Karyotype and clinical findings.
On clinical examination, bilateral testicular volume and phallus were determined to be undersized. Serum concentrations of T and DHEAS were low. G-banding of his chromosomes showed that the patient had a balanced translocation involving chromosomes 3 and 4: 46,XY,t(3;4)(p25;q31.3). This karyotype finding was confirmed by FISH. The FISH analysis revealed the presence of sex-determining region (SRY). The proband inherited this translocation from his father. His sister had the same translocation. However, the father and sister of the proband were clinically normal.
The presence of this chromosomal anomaly and hypospadias was unique to our patient compared with others with the 46,XY,t(3;4) translocation. Although no such association has been reported to date, we think that the severe hypospadias in our case might be associated with this translocation.
Tyrosine hydroxylase (TH) is the rate-limiting enzyme in catecholamine biosynthesis. Common genetic variation at the human TH promoter predicts alterations in autonomic activity and blood pressure, but how such variation influences human traits and, specifically, whether such variation affects transcription are not yet known.
Pairwise linkage disequilibrium across the TH locus indicated that common promoter variants (C-824T, G-801C, A-581G, and G-494A) were located in a single 5' linkage disequilibrium block in white, black, Hispanic, and Asian populations. Polymorphisms C-824T and A-581G were located in highly conserved regions and were predicted to disrupt known transcriptional control motifs myocyte enhancer factor-2 (MEF2), sex-determining region Y (SRY), and forkhead box D1 (FOXD1) at C-824T and G/C-rich binding factors specificity protein 1 (SP1), activating enhancer-binding protein 2 (AP2)], early growth response protein 1 (EGR1) at A-581G. At C-824T and A-581G, promoter and luciferase reporter plasmids indicated differential allele strength (T>C at C-824T; G>A at A-581G) under both basal circumstances and secretory stimulation. C-824T and A-581G displayed the most pronounced effects on both transcription in cella and catecholamine secretion in vivo. We further probed the functional significance of C-824T and A-581G by cotransfection of trans-activating factors in cella; MEF2, SRY, and FOXD1 differentially activated C-824T, whereas the G/C-rich binding factors SP1, AP2, and EGR1 differentially activated A-581G. At C-824T, factor MEF2 acted in a directionally coordinate fashion (at T>C) to explain the in vivo trait associations, whereas at A-581G, factors SP1, AP2, and EGR1 displayed similar differential actions (at G>A). Finally, chromatin immunoprecipitation demonstrated that the endogenous factors bound to the motifs in cella.
We conclude that common genetic variants in the proximal TH promoter, especially at C-824T and A-581G, are functional in cella and alter transcription so as to explain promoter marker-on-trait associations in vivo. MEF2, FOXD1, and SRY contribute to functional differences in C-824T expression, whereas SP1, AP2, and EGR1 mediate those of A-581G. The SRY effect on TH transcription suggests a mechanism whereby male and female sex may differ in sympathetic activity and hence blood pressure. These results point to new strategies for diagnostic and therapeutic intervention into disorders of human autonomic function and their cardiovascular consequences.
Stearic acid is known as a potent anti-inflammatory lipid. This fatty acid has profound and diverse effects on liver metabolism. The aim of this study was to investigate the effect of stearic acid on markers of hepatocyte transplantation in rats with acetaminophen (APAP)-induced liver damage.
Wistar rats were randomly assigned to 10-day treatment. Stearic acid was administered to the rats with APAP-induced liver damage. The isolated liver cells were infused intraperitoneally into rats. Blood samples were obtained to evaluate the changes in the serum liver enzymes, including activities of aspartate aminotransferase (AST), alanine aminotransferase (ALT) and alkaline phosphatase (ALP) and the level of serum albumin. To assess the engraftment of infused hepatocytes, rats were euthanized, and the liver DNA was used for PCR using sex-determining region Y (SRY) primers.
The levels of AST, ALT and ALP in the serum of rats with APAP-induced liver injury were significantly increased and returned to the levels in control group by day six. The APAP-induced decrease in albumin was significantly improved in rats through cell therapy, when compared with that in the APAP-alone treated rats. SRY PCR analysis showed the presence of the transplanted cells in the liver of transplanted rats.
Stearic acid-rich diet in combination with cell therapy accelerates the recovering of hepatic dysfunction in a rat model of liver injury.
The sex differentiation mechanisms in zebrafish (Danio rerio) remains elusive, partly because of the absence of sex chromosomes but also because the process appears to depend on the synchrony of multiple genes and possibly environmental factors. Zebrafish gonadal development is initiated through the development of immature oocytes. Depending on multiple signaling cues, in about half of the individuals, the juvenile ovaries degenerate or undergo apoptosis to initiate testes development while the other half maintains the oogenic pathway. We have previously shown that activation of NFκB and prostaglandin synthase 2 (ptgs2) results in female-biased sex ratios. Prostaglandin synthase and prostaglandins are involved in multiple physiological functions, including cell survival and apoptosis. In the present study, we show that inhibition of ptgs2 by meloxicam results in male-biased sex ratios. On further evaluation, we observed that exposure with the prostaglandin D2 (PGD2) analogue BW-245C induced SRY-box containing gene 9a (sox9a) and resulted in male-biased sex ratios. On the other hand, prostaglandin E2 (PGE2) treatment resulted in female-biased sex ratios and involved activation of NFκB and the β-catenin pathway as well as inhibition of sox9. Exposure to the β-catenin inhibitor PNU-74654 resulted in up-regulation of ptgds and male-biased sex ratios, further confirming the involvement of β-catenin in the female differentiation pathway. In this study, we show that PGD2 and PGE2 can program the gonads to either the testis or the ovary differentiation pathways, indicating that prostaglandins are involved in the regulation of zebrafish gonadal differentiation.
Valproic acid (VPA), a short-chain fatty acid, is used clinically as an anticonvulsant and mood stabilizer. Valproic acid also inhibits histone deacetylase activity, which is associated with histone hyperacetylation and changes in gene expression. In this study, we examined the effects of VPA on the expression of selected neurotrophic and differentiation factors in C17.2 neural stem cells. Reverse transcription-polymerase chain reaction analysis revealed a significant increase in conserved dopamine neurotrophic factor (CDNF) and glial cell line-derived neurotrophic factor mRNA expression, after treatment with clinically relevant concentrations of VPA (0.5 or 1.0 mM) for 24 hr. Increases in the protein expression of CDNF and mesencephalic astrocyte-derived neurotrophic factor were also observed, after similar treatment with VPA. In addition, significant increases in the mRNA levels of the early dopaminergic neuron marker, nuclear receptor-related protein 1(Nurr1), and the transcriptional regulator, early growth response protein 1 (Egr1), were observed after treatment with VPA for 24 hr. C17.2 neural stem cells exhibited high basal mRNA expression of brain-derived neurotrophic factor and SRY (sex determining region Y)-box 2 (Sox2), which was not altered by VPA treatment. Western analysis revealed hyperacetylation of histone H3 proteins in C17.2 cells after VPA treatment for 24 hr or 48 hr, suggesting involvement of an epigenetic mechanism in the observed gene induction by this drug. These findings support a role for VPA in modulating neurotrophic and differentiation factor expression, in keeping with its reported neuroprotective and neurodevelopmental effects.
Mesenchymal stem cells (MSC) are multipotent progenitor cells localized in the stromal compartment of the bone marrow (BM). The potential of MSC for mesenchymal differentiation has been well documented in different animal models predominantly on rodents. However, information regarding bovine MSC (bMSC) is limited, and the differentiation potential of bMSC derived from fetal BM remains unknown. In the present study we sought to isolate bMSC from abattoir-derived fetal BM and to characterize the multipotent and differentiation potential under osteogenic, chondrogenic and adipogenic conditions by quantitative and qualitative analyses.
Plastic-adherent bMSC isolated from fetal BM maintained a fibroblast-like morphology under monolayer culture conditions. These cells expressed high levels of MSC surface markers (CD73, CD90, and CD105) and low levels of hematopoietic surface markers (CD34 and CD45). Culture of bMSC under osteogenic conditions during a 27-day period induced up-regulation of the osteocalcin (OC) gene expression and alkaline phosphatase (ALPL) activity, and promoted mineralization of the matrix. Increasing supplementation levels of ascorbic acid to culture media enhanced osteogenic differentiation of bMSC; whereas, reduction of FBS supplementation compromised osteogenesis. bMSC increased expression of cartilage-specific genes aggrecan (ACAN), collagen 2A1 (COL2A1) and SRY (sex-determining region Y) box 9 (SOX9) at Day 21 of chondrogenic differentiation. Treatment of bMSC with adipogenic factors increased levels of fatty acid-binding protein 2 (AP2) mRNA and accumulation of lipid vacuoles after 18 days of culture. NANOG mRNA levels in differentiating bMSC were not affected during adipogenic culture; however, osteogenic and chondrogenic conditions induced higher and lower levels, respectively.
Our analyses revealed the potential multilineage differentiation of bMSC isolated from abattoir-derived fetal BM. NANOG mRNA pattern in differentiating bMSC varied according to differentiation culture conditions. The osteogenic differentiation of bMSC was affected by ascorbic acid and FBS concentrations in culture media. The simplicity of isolation and the differentiation potential suggest that bMSC from abattoir-derived fetal BM are appropriate candidate for investigating MSC biology and for eventual applications for regenerative therapy.
H-rev107 is a member of the HREV107 type II tumor suppressor gene family which includes H-REV107, RIG1, and HRASLS. H-REV107 has been shown to express at high levels in differentiated tissues of post-meiotic testicular germ cells. Prostaglandin D2 (PGD2) is conjectured to induce SRY-related high-mobility group box 9 (SOX9) expression and subsequent Sertoli cell differentiation. To date, the function of H-rev107 in differentiated testicular cells has not been well defined.
In the study, we found that H-rev107 was co-localized with prostaglandin D2 synthase (PTGDS) and enhanced the activity of PTGDS, resulting in increase of PGD2 production in testis cells. Furthermore, when H-rev107 was expressed in human NT2/D1 testicular cancer cells, cell migration and invasion were inhibited. Also, silencing of PTGDS would reduce H-rev107-mediated increase in PGD2, cAMP, and SOX9. Silencing of PTGDS or SOX9 also alleviated H-rev107-mediated suppression of cell migration and invasion.
These results revealed that H-rev107, through PTGDS, suppressed cell migration and invasion. Our data suggest that the PGD2-cAMP-SOX9 signal pathway might play an important role in H-rev107-mediated cancer cell invasion in testes.
Retinoid-inducible gene 1 (RIG1), also called tazarotene-induced gene 3, belongs to the HREV107 gene family, which contains five members in humans. RIG1 is expressed in high levels in well-differentiated tissues, but its expression is decreased in cancer tissues and cancer cell lines. We found RIG1 to be highly expressed in testicular cells. When RIG1 was expressed in NT2/D1 testicular cancer cells, neither cell death nor cell viability was affected. However, RIG1 significantly inhibited cell migration and invasion in NT2/D1 cells. We found that prostaglandin D2 synthase (PTGDS) interacted with RIG1 using yeast two-hybrid screens. Further, we found PTGDS to be co-localized with RIG1 in NT2/D1 testis cells. In RIG1-expressing cells, elevated levels of prostaglandin D2 (PGD2), cAMP, and SRY-related high-mobility group box 9 (SOX9) were observed. This indicated that RIG1 can enhance PTGDS activity. Silencing of PTGDS expression significantly decreased RIG1-mediated cAMP and PGD2 production. Furthermore, silencing of PTGDS or SOX9 alleviated RIG1-mediated suppression of migration and invasion. These results suggest that RIG1 will suppress cell migration/invasion through the PGD2 signaling pathway. In conclusion, RIG1 can interact with PTGDS to enhance its function and to further suppress NT2/D1 cell migration and invasion. Our study suggests that RIG1-PGD2 signaling might play an important role in cancer cell suppression in the testis.
Genetic control of gonadal development proceeds through either the male or female molecular pathways, driving bipotential gonadal anlage differentiation into a testis or ovary. Antagonistic interactions between the 2 pathways determine the gonadal sex. Essentially sex determination is the enhancement of one of the 2 pathways according to genetic sex. Initially, Sry with other factors upregulates Sox9 expression in XY individuals. Afterwards the expression of Sox9 is maintained by a positive feedback loop with Fgf9 and prostaglandin D2 as well as by autoregulative ability of Sox9. If these factors reach high concentrations, then Sox9 and/or Fgf9 may inhibit the female pathway. Surprisingly, splicing, nuclear transport, and extramatrix proteins may be involved in sex determination. The male sex determination pathway switches on the expression of genes driving Sertoli cell differentiation. Sertoli cells orchestrate testicular differentiation. In the absence of Sry, the predomination of the female pathway results in the realization of a robust genetic program that drives ovarian differentiation.
Activation by the Y-encoded testis determining factor SRY and maintenance of expression of the Sox9 gene encoding the central transcription factor of Sertoli cell differentiation are key events in the mammalian sexual differentiation program. In the mouse XY gonad, SOX9 upregulates Fgf9, which initiates a Sox9/Fgf9 feedforward loop, and Sox9 expression is stimulated by the prostaglandin D2 (PGD2) producing lipocalin prostaglandin D synthase (L-PGDS, or PTDGS) enzyme, which accelerates commitment to the male pathway. In an attempt to decipher the genetic relationships between Sox9 and the L-Pgds/PGD2 pathway during mouse testicular organogenesis, we found that ablation of Sox9 at the onset or during the time window of expression in embryonic Sertoli cells abolished L-Pgds transcription. By contrast, L-Pgds(-/-) XY embryonic gonads displayed a reduced level of Sox9 transcript and aberrant SOX9 protein subcellular localization. In this study, we demonstrated genetically that the L-Pgds/PGD2 pathway acts as a second amplification loop of Sox9 expression. Moreover, examination of Fgf9(-/-) and L-Pgds(-/-) XY embryonic gonads demonstrated that the two Sox9 gene activity amplifying pathways work independently. These data suggest that, once activated and maintained by SOX9, production of testicular L-PGDS leads to the accumulation of PGD2, which in turn activates Sox9 transcription and nuclear translocation of SOX9. This mechanism participates together with FGF9 as an amplification system of Sox9 gene expression and activity during mammalian testicular organogenesis.
Induction and patterning of the testis occurs over a brief window of time. Before male-specific morphogenesis, the gonad primordium is bipotential and capable of developing into either an ovary or testis. However, expression of the transcription factor SRY initiates male development and induces patterning, proliferation, and epithelialization specific to the testis. Male sex determination begins with commitment of Sertoli cells via autonomous and nonautonomous mechanisms. These mechanisms have recently been shown to both promote the male fate and simultaneously repress ovarian development. A second critical event in the development of the testis is the epithelialization of testis cords. After their specification, Sertoli cells epithelialize and surround the male germ line to form large looping structures bound by extracellular matrix. Cells excluded from cord structures are called interstitial cells and comprise several different cell types, including steroidogenic cells, endothelial cells, and a smooth muscle cell that directly surround the cords. Numerous male-specific signaling pathways influence testis cord morphogenesis and specification of distinct cell types, although a coherent progression of events is unclear. In this article we focus on signals in the male gonad that first are responsible for the specification of Sertoli cells, and second for the specification and patterning of interstitial cells.
In mammals, male sex is determined by the Y-chromosomal gene Sry (sex-determining region of Y chromosome). The expression of Sry and subsequently Sox9 (SRY box containing gene 9) in precursors of the supporting cell lineage results in the differentiation of these cells into Sertoli cells. Sertoli cells in turn orchestrate the development of all other male-specific cell types. To ensure that Sertoli cells differentiate in sufficient numbers to induce normal testis development, the early testis produces prostaglandin D(2) (PGD(2)), which recruits cells of the supporting cell lineage to a Sertoli cell fate. Here we show that the gene encoding prostaglandin D synthase (Pgds), the enzyme that produces PGD(2), is expressed in Sertoli cells immediately after the onset of Sox9 expression. Promoter analysis in silico and in vitro identified a paired SOX/SRY binding site. Interestingly, only SOX9, and not SRY, was able to bind as a dimer to this site and transactivate the Pgds promoter. In line with this, a transgenic mouse model showed that Pgds expression is not affected by ectopic Sry expression. Finally, chromatin immunoprecipitation proved that SOX9 but not SRY binds to the Pgds promoter in vivo.
We have raised an antibody specifically recognizing endogenous mouse SRY protein and used it to investigate the molecular and cellular mode of action of SRY in testis determination. We find that expression of SRY protein closely mirrors the expression of Sry mRNA in mouse genital ridges and is detectable for 6 to 8 h after the mRNA ceases to be detectable. The subset of somatic cells that expresses SRY begins to express SOX9 almost immediately. Since these SOX9-positive cells go on to develop as Sertoli cells, it appears that SRY expression marks the pre-Sertoli cell lineage and leads to up-regulation of Sox9 expression cell-autonomously. However, a small proportion of SOX9-positive cells did not appear to express SRY, possibly reflecting the additional involvement of paracrine signaling in activating Sox9 transcription in these cells. We confirmed by ex vivo cell mixing experiments that SRY is able to engage receptor-mediated signaling to up-regulate Sox9 expression. Finally, we showed by employing specific inhibitors that the causative signaling molecule is prostaglandin D2 (PGD2) and that PGD2 can induce Sox9 transcription in cultured XX gonads. Our data indicate a mechanism whereby Sry uses both a cell-autonomous mechanism and a PGD2-mediated signaling mechanism to stimulate expression of Sox9 and induce the differentiation of Sertoli cells in vivo.
During mammalian gonadal development, nuclear import/export of the transcription factor SOX9 is a critical step of the Sry-initiated testis-determining cascade. In this study, we identify a molecular mechanism contributing to the SOX9 nuclear translocation in NT2/D1 cells, which is mediated by the prostaglandin D2 (PGD2) signalling pathway via stimulation of its adenylcyclase-coupled DP1 receptor. We find that activation of cAMP-dependent protein kinase A (PKA) induces phosphorylation of SOX9 on its two S64 and S181 PKA sites, and its nuclear localization by enhancing SOX9 binding to the nucleocytoplasmic transport protein importin beta. Moreover, in embryonic gonads, we detect a male-specific prostaglandin D synthase expression and an active PGD2 signal at the time and place of SOX9 expression. We thus propose a new step in the sex-determining cascade where PGD2 acts as an autocrine factor inducing SOX9 nuclear translocation and subsequent Sertoli cell differentiation.
We have examined specific genes whose expression is altered during apoptosis induced by prostaglandin (PG)A2 and Delta12-PGJ2 in human hepatocellular carcinoma Hep3B cells. Using mRNA differential display, we have identified two genes: one is specifically up-regulated and encodes for human Sox-4 (Sry-HMG box gene) and the other is significantly down-regulated and is the human homolog of yeast Ssf-1, a novel splicing factor. Northern blot analysis confirmed their differential expressions. Interestingly, Sox-4 was highly expressed in subcutaneous tumors grown in nude mice as a xenograft from Hep3B cells. These results suggest that the expression of Sox-4 may be related to the apoptosis pathway leading to cell death as well as to tumorigenesis, and that Ssf-1 gene may serve as a negative regulator of PGA2/Delta12-PGJ2-mediated Hep3B cell apoptosis.
We describe a method for rapid and efficient polymerase chain reaction (PCR) amplification of specific target DNA sequences directly from cells fixed in 3:1 methanol-acetic acid (Carnoy's fixative) for routine cytogenetic analysis. The fixed cells used had been stored at -20 degrees C from a few weeks up to 6 years. Primer sets used correspond to loci on an autosome (retinoblastoma, RB1), as well as the X (Duchenne muscular dystrophy, DMD) and Y (sex-determining region of the Y, SRY) chromosomes. Sizes of amplified products were the expected 400, 251 and 609 bps, respectively. No differences in quality of amplification products were found between PCR templates obtained from fresh tissues or from cells fixed for varying lengths of time in Carnoy's fixative. This technique has the following advantages: (1) it allows retrospective studies of genetic disorders from archived specimens; (2) it requires only a limited number of cells; (3) it is rapid and simple; and (4) it avoids multistep procedures required in extraction of the DNA.
Consequences of obstructive nephropathy include tissue fibrosis, a major pathophysiological mechanism contributing to development of end-stage renal disease. Transforming growth factor β 1 (Tgfβ1) is involved in the progression of renal fibrosis. According to recent observations, ammonium chloride (NH4Cl) prevented phosphate-induced vascular remodeling, effects involving decrease of Tgfβ1 expression and inhibition of Tgfβ1-dependent signaling. The present study, thus, explored whether NH4Cl influences renal Tgfβ1-induced pro-fibrotic signaling in obstructive nephropathy induced by unilateral ureteral obstruction (UUO).
UUO was induced for seven days in C57Bl6 mice with or without additional treatment with NH4Cl (0.28 M in drinking water). Transcript levels were determined by RT-PCR as well as protein abundance by Western blotting, blood pH was determined utilizing a blood gas and chemistry analyser.
UUO increased renal mRNA expression of Tgfb1, Tgfβ-activated kinase 1 (Tak1) protein abundance and Smad2 phosphorylation in the nuclear fraction of the obstructed kidney tissues, effects blunted in NH4Cl treated mice as compared to control treated mice. The mRNA levels of the transcription factors nuclear factor of activated T cells 5 (Nfat5) and SRY (sex determining region Y)-box 9 (Sox9) as well as of tumor necrosis factor α (Tnfα), interleukin 6 (Il6), plasminogen activator inhibitor 1 (Pai1) and Snai1 were up-regulated in the obstructed kidney tissues following UUO, effects again significantly ameliorated following NH4Cl treatment. Furthermore, the increased protein and mRNA expression of α-smooth muscle actin (α-Sma), fibronectin and collagen type I in the obstructed kidney tissues following UUO were significantly attenuated following NH4Cl treatment.
NH4Cl treatment ameliorates Tgfβ1-dependent pro-fibrotic signaling and renal tissue fibrosis markers following obstructive nephropathy.
Allograft fibrosis is a prominent feature of chronic rejection. Although intragraft fibroblasts contribute to this process, their origin and exact role remain poorly understood.
Using a rat model of chronic rejection, LEW to F344, cardiac fibroblasts were isolated at the point of rejection and examined in a collagen gel contraction assay to measure fibroblast activation. The allograft microenvironment was examined using immunohistochemistry for fibrogenic markers (transforming growth factor [TGF]-beta, platelet-derived growth factor [PDGF], tissue plasminogen activator [TPA], plasminogen activator inhibitor [PAI]-1, matrix metalloproteinase [MMP]-2, and tissue inhibitor of matrix metalloproteinase [TIMP]-2). The origin of intragraft fibroblasts was studied using female to male allografts followed by polymerase chain reaction [PCR] and in situ hybridization for the male sry gene.
The cardiac fibroblasts isolated from allografts with chronic rejection exhibited higher gel contractibility (50.9% +/- 6.1% and 68.2% +/- 3.8% at 4 and 24 hr) compared with naive cardiac fibroblasts (30.7% +/- 3.5% and 55.3% +/- 6.6% at 4 and 24 hr; P<0.05 and <0.05, respectively). Immunostaining for TGF-beta, PDGF, TPA, PAI-1, MMP-2 and TIMP-2 was observed in all allografts at the time of rejection. In situ hybridization demonstrated the presence of sry positive cells in female allografts rejected by male recipients. Sixty-five percent of fibroblast colonies (55 of 85) isolated from female heart allografts expressed the male sry gene.
Cardiac fibroblasts are activated and exist in a profibrogenic microenvironment in allografts undergoing chronic rejection. A substantial proportion of intragraft fibroblasts are recruited from allograft recipients in this experimental model of chronic cardiac allograft rejection.
The molecular mechanisms governing sex determination and differentiation in the zebrafish (Danio rerio) are not fully understood. To gain more insights into the function of specific genes in these complex processes, the expression of multiple candidates needs to be assessed, preferably on the protein level. Here, we developed a targeted proteomics method based on selected reaction monitoring (SRM) to study the candidate sex-related proteins in zebrafish which were selected based on a global proteomics analysis of adult gonads and representational difference analysis of male and female DNA, as well as on published information on zebrafish and other vertebrates. We employed the developed SRM protocols to acquire time-resolved protein expression profiles during the gonad differentiation period in vas::EGFP transgenic zebrafish. Evidence on protein expression was obtained for the first time for several candidate genes previously studied only on the mRNA level or suggested by bioinformatic predictions. Tuba1b (tubulin alpha 1b), initially included in the study as one of the potential housekeeping proteins, was found to be preferentially expressed in the adult testis with nearly absent expression in the ovary. The revealed changes in protein expression patterns associated with gonad differentiation suggest that several of the examined proteins, especially Ilf2 and Ilf3 (interleukin enhancer-binding factors 2 and 3), Raldh3 (retinaldehyde dehydrogenase type 3), Zgc:195027 (low density lipoprotein-related receptor protein 3) and Sept5a (septin 5a), may play a specific role in the sexual differentiation in zebrafish.
Differentiating embryonic stem (ES) cells are an increasingly important source of hematopoietic progenitors, useful for both basic research and clinical applications. To date, characteristics of specific factors capable of influencing hematopoietic cell fate from ES cells remains elusive. We report that mMSC Feeder Layer and the combination of VEGF, SCF and TPO strongly promote hematopoietic differentiation. The results showed that the cells induced from ES-D3 expressed hematopoietic progenitor antigens (CD34 and CD117), myelocyte cell antigen (CD11b), erythrocyte cell antigen (Ter119), and transcription factors (Flk-1, GATA-2, SCL, beta-H1 and beta-major). Furthermore, those induced differentiated cells were injected into female C57BL/6 mice which were treated with high dose topotecan chemotherapy to restore part of their blood system function. We observed rapid white blood cell recovery, which suggested that the infusion of differentiated cells has a positive impact on hematopoiesis. The Sry gene in peripheral blood, bone marrow and spleen of transplanted female mice was confirmed by PCR analysis, which affirmed the existence of the chimera.
Emerging data suggest that cancer stem cells (CSCs) exist in equilibrium with differentiated cells and that stochastic transitions between these states can account for tumor heterogeneity and drug resistance. The aim of this study was to establish an in vitro system that recapitulates stem cell plasticity in head and neck squamous cell cancers (HNSCCs) and identify the factors that play a role in the maintenance and repopulation of CSCs. Tumor spheres were established using patient-derived cell lines via anchorage-independent cell culture techniques. These tumor spheres were found to have higher aldehyde dehydrogenase (ALD) cell fractions and increased expression of Kruppel-like factor 4, SRY (sex determining region Y)-box 2, and Nanog and were resistant to γ-radiation, 5-fluorouracil, cisplatin, and etoposide treatment compared with monolayer culture cells. Monolayer cultures were subject to single cell cloning to generate clones with high and low ALD fractions. ALDHigh clones showed higher expression of stem cell and epithelial-mesenchymal transition markers compared with ALDLow clones. ALD fractions, representing stem cell fractions, fluctuated with serial passaging, equilibrating at a level specific to each cell line, and could be augmented by the addition of epidermal growth factor (EGF) and/or insulin. ALDHigh clones showed increased EGF receptor (EGFR) and insulin-like growth factor-1 receptor (IGF-1R) phosphorylation, with increased activation of downstream pathways compared with ALDLow clones. Importantly, blocking these pathways using specific inhibitors against EGFR and IGF-1R reduced stem cell fractions drastically. Taken together, these results show that HNSCC CSCs exhibit plasticity, with the maintenance of the stem cell fraction dependent on the EGFR and IGF-1R pathways and potentially amenable to targeted therapeutics.
Non-gestational ovarian choriocarcinoma (NGCO) is an extremely rare malignant tumor with a poor prognosis and is difficult to distinguish from gestational choriocarcinoma. True hermaphrodite (TH) is genetically a heterogenous condition causing ovarian and testicular tissue development in the same individual. We report here the first case of pure NGCO in the right ovotestis of a 23-year-old 45,XO/46X,X sex-determining region Y chromosome (SRY)-negative TH. The diagnosis of non-gestational origin was confirmed by testing five short tandem repeats (STR). The patient responded well to radical surgery with bleomycin, etoposide, cisplatin (BEP) regimen. We also hypothesize that some mutations of an X-linked or autosomal gene lead to testicular determination in SRY-negative TH patients.
In the past 15 years, anomalies of male sexual differentiation have greatly increased in both wildlife and humans in different parts of the world. Environmental endocrine disruptors have been implicated in the dramatic rise in neonatal ambiguous genitalia with variable rates of severity, such as micropenis, cryptorchidism, and isolated or associated hypospadias. Because most environmental pollutants, such as organochlorine pesticides, polychlorinated biphenyls, dioxins and furans, alkylphenol polyetholyethoxylates, and phytoestrogens and phtalates, have estrogenic and antiandrogenic activity, they are able to interfere with normal fetal male sexual differentiation. In a neonatal screening program of ambiguous genitalia, we had the opportunity to evaluate three newborns with male pseudohermaphroditism (MPH) whose mothers were exposed to endocrine disruptors during pregnancy. All had normal testosterone production after human chorionic gonadotrophin stimulation testing, suggesting androgen resistance or so-called idiopathic MPH. Sequences of the 5alpha reductase and androgen receptor genes were normal. Since environmental pollutants are known for their estrogenic activity and can be released progressively from the adipose tissue where they accumulate, we detected their presence by measuring the estrogenic bioactivity of the newborns' serum with a recently developed ultrasensitive bioassay. We found higher estrogenic bioactivity in these newborns than in controls. In conclusion, the maternal exposure to environmental pollutants during pregnancy and high estrogenic bioactivity in the newborns' serum highly suggest that ambiguous genitalia are related to fetal exposure to endocrine disruptors.
Mice may share similar mechanism with human underlying reproductive toxicity induced by di(2-ethylhexyl) phthalate (DEHP), which is not supposed to be associated with decreased testicular testosterone. Pregnant mice were exposed to DEHP by gavage, with the dosage regime beginning at human relevant exposure level. After in utero DEHP exposure, loss of Sertoli cells and germ cells were observed in the male pups at postnatal days 21. And SRY-related HMG box 9 (SOX9), Fibroblast growth factor-9 (FGF9), and Double-sex and Mab-3 related transcripttion factor 1 (DMRT1) proteins were significantly downregulated by DEHP at 2 mg/kg/d and above, suggesting the depression of Sertoli cell differentiation. The repression of Sox9 genes expression was supported by whole-mount in situ hybridization and real-time real-time-quantitative PCR. The expressions of Cyp11α1 and Star were not significantly affected by in utero DEHP exposure, indicating the absence of effects on testosterone biosynthesis. Furthermore, the testosterone-independent pathway regulating Sertoli cells differentiation was disturbed in fetus by DEHP at 2 mg/kg/d and above during the critical time window of sex determination, involving Gadd45g → Gata4/Fog2 → Sry → Sox9 → Fgf9 The results suggest that in utero DEHP exposure damaged Sertoli cells in the postnatal life of mice offspring via disturbance of the differentiation regulating pathway, potentially inducing declines in spermatogenesis.
Insulin-like androgenic gland hormone gene (IAG) is a sex regulator specifically expressed in male crustaceans, controlling the male sexual differentiation, spermatogenesis and reproductive strategy. Our previous study reported the cloning and characterization of the prawn Macrobrachium nipponense IAG (MnIAG). In this study, we further identified a 2214-bp MnIAG 5'-flanking region, and analyzed its transcription factor binding sites and transcriptional activity. The results showed that there were two potential promoter core sequences, three TATA boxes and one CAAT box existing in the MnIAG 5'-flanking region as well as many potential transcription factor binding sites, such as SRY, Sox-5, GATA-1, etc. Notably, the transcriptional activity was weak in this region, and a negative regulatory region was found in -604 to -231bp. In addition, we constructed M. nipponense yeast libraries and identified proteins interacting with the MnIAG protein by yeast two hybridization assay. The yeast two-hybrid screening yielded ten positive clones, of which five were annotated by NCBI database, namely heat shock protein 21, NADH dehydrogenase, zinc finger protein, beta-N-acetylglucosaminidase and a hypothetical protein. The identification of MnIAG putative regulatory region and proteins that interact with IAG will facilitate our understanding of the regulatory role of MnIAG and provide a foundation for deep insight into the prawn sex differentiation mechanism and signaling transduction pathways.
Lung carcinoma is the most common and aggressive malignant tumor with poor clinical outcome. Identification of new marker of lung cancer is essential for the diagnosis and prognosis of the disease. To identify differentially expressed genes (DEGs) and find associated pathways that may function as targets of lung cancer. Gene expression profiling of GSE40791 were downloaded from GEO (Gene Expression Omnibus), including 100 normal specimens and 94 lung cancer samples. The DEGs were screened out by LIMMA package in R language. Besides, novel genes associated with lung cancer were identified by co-expression analysis. Then, GO enrichment and transcription binding site analysis were performed on these DEGs, and novel genes were predicted using DAVID. Finally, PPI network was constructed by String software in order to get the hub codes involved in cancer carcinoma. A total of 541 DEGs were filtered out between normal samples and patients with lung carcinoma, including 155 up-regulated genes and 386 down-regulated genes. Additionally, nine novel genes, CA4, CDC20, CHRDL1, DLGAP5, EMCN, GPM6A, NUSAP1, S1PR1 and TCF21, were figured out. The transcription biding site analysis showed that these genes were regulated by LHX3, HNF3B, CDP, HFH1, FOXO4, STAT, SOX5, MEF2, FOXO3 and SRY. Hub codes as BUB1B, MAD2L and TOP2A may play as target genes in lung carcinoma in the result of PPI network analysis. Newly predicted genes and hub codes can perform as target genes for diagnose and clinical therapy of lung cancer.
Single nucleotide polymorphisms (SNPs) are an important cause of functional variation in proteins leading to tumorigenesis. We aimed to identify candidate biomarkers with polymorphisms in gastric cancer (GC).
The SNP microarray profile GSE29996 including 50 GC samples and 50 normal controls, and gene expression data GSE56807 consisting of 5 GC samples and 5 controls were downloaded from the Gene Expression Omnibus database. After preprocessing of raw data, GC-associated SNPs were identified using the Cochran-Armitage trend test, and differentially expressed genes (DEGs) were screened out using the limma package in R. Significant DEGs with risk associated SNP loci were screened using the Fisher combination test. Gene ontology function and pathway enrichment analyses were performed for DEGs with risk associated SNP loci by GenCLip online tool. Transcriptional regulatory analysis was also conducted for transcription factor and target DEGs.
A total of 79 DEGs with risk associated SNP loci were identified from GC samples compared with normal controls. These DEGs were mainly enriched in anatomical structure development, including embryo development. Additionally, DEGs were significantly involved in the NO1 pathway, including actin, alpha 1, skeletal muscle (ACTA1). In the regulatory network, transcription factor forkhead box L1 (FOXL1) regulated 26 DEGs with risk associated SNP loci, including Iroquois homeobox 1 (IRX1) rs11134044, sex determining region Y (SRY)-box1 (SOX1) rs9549447 and msh homeobox 1 (MSX1) rs41451149.
IRX1, SOX1 and MSX1 with risk associated SNP loci may serve as candidate biomarkers for diagnosis and prognosis of GC.
The use of serologically detectable male (SDM; also called H-Y) antigens to identify male embryos may be limited by the source of anti-SDM antibody. In the present study, novel anti-SDM B9-Fab recombinant clones (obtained by chain shuffling of an A8 original clone) were used to detect SDM antigens on murine embryos. Murine morulae and blastocysts (n=138) were flushed from the oviducts of Kunming mice and incubated with anti-SDM B9-Fab for 30 min at 37°C. With an indirect immunofluorescence assay, the membrane and inner cell mass had bright green fluorescence (presumptive males). Overall, 43.5% (60/138) were classified as presumptive males and 56.5% (78/138) as presumptive females, with 85.0 and 88.5% of these, respectively, confirmed as correct predictions (based on PCR analysis of a male-specific [Sry] sequence). We concluded that the anti-SDM B9-Fab molecule had potential for non-invasive, technically simple immunological sexing of mammalian embryos.
46,XX testicular disorder of sex development is a rare genetic syndrome, characterized by a complete or partial mismatch between genetic sex and phenotypic sex, which results in infertility because of the absence of the azoospermia factor region in the long arm of Y chromosome.
We report a case of a 14-year-old male with microorchidism and mild bilateral gynecomastia who referred to our hospital because of abnormal gender characteristics. The patient was treated for congenital scrotal type hypospadias at the age of 4 years. Semen analysis indicated azoospermia by centrifugation of ejaculate. Levels of follicle-stimulating hormone and luteinizing hormone were elevated, while that of testosterone was low and those of estradiol and prolactin were normal. The results of gonadal biopsy showed hyalinization of the seminiferous tubules, but there was no evidence of spermatogenic cells. Karyotype analysis of the patient confirmed 46,XX karyotype and fluorescent in situ hybridization analysis of the sex-determining region Y (SRY) gene was negative. Molecular analysis revealed that the SRY gene and the AZFa, AZFb and AZFc regions were absent. No mutation was detected in the coding region and exon/intron boundaries of the RSPO1, DAX1, SOX9, SOX3, SOX10, ROCK1, and DMRT genes, and no copy number variation in the whole genome sequence was found.
This study adds a new case of SRY-negative 46,XX testicular disorder of sex development and further verifies the view that the absence of major regions from the Y chromosome leads to an incomplete masculine phenotype, abnormal hormone levels and infertility. To date, the mechanisms for induction of testicular tissue in 46,XX SRY-negative patients remain unknown, although other genetic or environmental factors play a significant role in the regulation of sex determination and differentiation.
Although members of SOX family have been well documented for their essential roles in embryonic development, cell proliferation and disease, the functional role and molecular mechanism of SOX30 in cancer are largely unexplored. Here, we first identified SRY-box containing gene 30 (SOX30) as a novel preferentially methylated gene using genome-wide methylation screening. SOX30 hypermethylation was detected in 100% of lung cancer cell lines (9/9) and 70.83% (85/120) of primary lung tumor tissues compared with none (0/20) of normal and 8.0% (2/25) of peri-tumoral lung tissues (P<0.01). SOX30 was expressed in normal and peri-tumoral lung tissues in which SOX30 was unmethylated, but was silenced or downregulated in lung cancer cell lines and primary lung tumor tissues harboring a hypermethylated SOX30. De-methylation experiments further confirmed that silence of SOX30 was regulated by its hypermethylation. Ectopic expression of SOX30 induces cancer cell apoptosis with inhibiting proliferation in vitro and represses tumor formation in vivo, whereas knockdown of SOX30 demonstrates a reversed effect both in vitro and in vivo. At the molecular level, the antitumorigenic effect of SOX30 is mediated by directly binding to CACTTTG (+115 to +121) of p53 promoter region and activating p53 transcription, suggesting that SOX30 is a novel transcriptional activating factor of p53. Indeed, blockade of p53 attenuates the tumor inhibition of SOX30. Overall, these findings demonstrate that SOX30 is a novel epigenetic silenced tumor suppressor acting through direct regulation of p53 transcription and expression. This study provides novel insights on the mechanism of tumorigenesis in lung cancer.
We report on a patient with a 47,XXY karyotype who presents a normal female phenotype, which is an extremely rare observation worldwide. The patient is infertile. Type B ultrasound scans and other tests suggested that her ovaries had completely failed. Microsatellite DNA marker analysis revealed that the 2 X chromosomes were derived from her mother and that this abnormality was caused by non-disjunction of the maternal X chromosomes during meiosis II. Copy number variation analysis identified 2 large de novo deletions in her Y chromosome. Remarkably, one of the deleted regions includes the SRY gene locus, which might explain her female phenotype. However, the genetic mechanism of her ovarian failure remains unclear. This paper is the first report of a 47,XXY female with ovarian failure.
To study microchimerism's role and function after microtransplantation and identify novel genetic markers for microchimerism detection.
Analyzing microchimerisms from patients microtransplanted to determine the presence of GSTT1, GSTM1, SRY and other genetic markers by real-time PCR.
Microchimerism could be detected for a short time after microtransplantation simultaneously with hematopoietic recovery. In conclusion, microchimerism might accelerate hematopoietic recovery and GSTT1 and GSTM1 genes could be used as genetic markers to differentiate donor cells.
Microchimerism could exist for a short time after microtransplantation and appears to function in hematopoietic recovery. According to published reports, cytokines secreted from microchimerisms could be detected in recipients and exhibit some function on the host. Therefore, cytokines secreted from donor cells are hypothesized to accelerate hematopoietic recovery. The evidence to prove a longer existence for microchimerism is insufficient and needs supports by additional experiments; however, we cannot deny its existence just because of the limited sensitivity of methods.
To review the possible mechanisms proposed to explain the etiology of 46, XX sex reversal by investigating the clinical characteristics and their relationships with chromosomal karyotype and the SRY(sex-determining region Y)gene.
Five untreated 46, XX patients with SRY-positive were referred for infertility. Clinical data were collected, and Karyotype analysis of G-banding in lymphocytes and Fluorescence in situ hybridization (FISH) were performed. Genomic DNA from peripheral blood of the patients using QIAamp DNA Blood Kits was extracted. The three discrete regions, AZFa, AZFb and AZFc, located on the long arm of the Y chromosome, were performed by multiplex PCRs(Polymerase Chain Reaction) amplification. The set of PCR primers for the diagnosis of microdeletion of the AZFa, AZFb and AZFc region included: sY84, sY86, sY127, sY134, sY254, sY255, SRY and ZFX/ZFY.
Our five patients had a lower body height. Physical examination revealed that their testes were small in volume, soft in texture and normal penis. Semen analyses showed azoospermia. All patients had a higher follicle-stimulating hormone(FSH), Luteinizing Hormone(LH) level, lower free testosterone, testosterone level and normal Estradiol, Prolactin level. Karyotype analysis of all patients confirmed 46, XX karyotype, and FISH analysis showed that SRY gene were positive and translocated to Xp. Molecular analysis revealed that the SRY gene were present, and the AZFa, AZFb and AZFc region were absent.
This study adds cases on the five new 46, XX male individuals with SRY-positive and further verifies the view that the presence of SRY gene and the absence of major regions in Y chromosome should lead to the expectance of a completely masculinised phenotype, abnormal hormone levels and infertility.
The transcription factor SOX11 is one of members of the SRY box-containing (SOX) family emerging as important transcriptional regulators. In recent years, up-regulation of SOX11 has been detected in various types of solid tumors. In this study, the effects of promoter methylation of the SOX11 gene on SOX11 expression and cell growth and invasion of nasopharyngeal carcinoma were investigated.
In this study,methylation-specific PCR and real time quantitative PCR have been applied to investigate the effect of promoter methylation of the SOX11 gene on SOX11 expression in the nasopharyngeal carcinoma and chronic inflammation tissues. The nasopharyngeal carcinoma cell line (CNE2) was treated with 5-aza-2'-deoxycytidine. The effect of promoter methylation of SOX11 on growth and invasion of nasopharyngeal carcinoma cells was detected with MTT test and Boyden chamber Matrigel invasion assay.
No or weak expression of SOX11 mRNA was detected in the nasopharyngeal carcinoma tissues of SOX11 gene promoter methylation. Strong expression of SOX11 mRNA was detected in the nasopharyngeal carcinoma tissues of SOX11 gene promoter unmethylation and chronic inflammation tissues of pharynx nasalis. SOX11 mRNA and protein were re-expressed, SOX11 gene was demethylated, and growth and invasion of cells were inhibited in CNE2 cell line after 5-aza-2'-deoxycytidine treatment.
The results of the study indicate that expression of SOX11 mRNA and protein were related to SOX11 gene methylation status. SOX11 gene methylation may be plays a role in growth and invasion of nasopharyngeal carcinoma cells.
MiR-375 is an important small non-coding RNA that is specifically expressed in islet cells of the pancreas. miR-375 is required for normal pancreatic genesis and influences not only β-cell mass but also α-cell mass. miR-375 is also important to glucose-regulated insulin secretion through the regulation of the expression of Mtpn and Pdk1 genes. When human embryonic stem cells (hESCs) differentiate into endodermal lineages, miR-375 is highly expressed in the definitive endoderm, which suggests that miR-375 may have a distinct role in early development. miR-375 plays an important role in the complex regulatory network of pancreatic development, which could be regulated by pancreatic genes, such as NeuroD1, Ngn3, Pdx1 and Hnf6; additionally, miR-375 regulates genes related to pancreas development, cell growth and proliferation and insulin secretion genes to exert its function. Because of the special role of miR-375, it may be a potential target to treat diabetes. Antagonising miR-375 may enhance the effects of exendin-4 in patients, and controlling the expression of miR-375 could assist mature hESCs-derived β-cells.
Ovarian-specific promoter (OSP) is a tissue-specific promoter only expressed in the ovary to regulate its development. To investigate the activity of OSP in diverse dairy goat cells, OSP was cloned from dairy goat genome and used to construct the luciferase reporter vector pGL3-OSP to examine the transcriptional activity of OSP. Consequently, a 461-bp OSP fragment was obtained. Bioinformatics analysis indicated that the fragment contained multiple transcription factor binding sites, such as SRY, HSF, AP-1, C/EBP, CAAT, TATA, and so on, and the nucleotide sequence of OSP shared 99% and 97% similarity with those of OSP-1 and OSP-2 in rat. In addition, two variants were identified in the OSP (g.164T was deletion and g.375T<C). In diverse cells, the expression of luciferase in ovarian granulosa cells (GCs) and stromal cells of ovarian cortex was extremely significantly higher than that in fetal fibroblasts and oviduct epithelial cells. Meanwhile, the expression of luciferase in ovarian GCs was extremely significantly higher than that in the stromal cells of ovarian cortex. In summary, we successfully extracted dairy goat OSP and identified its transcriptional activity, which in part shed light on the study of ovarian-specific transcription and provided further insights into the development and regulation of dairy goat's ovary as well.
Long noncoding RNAs (lncRNAs) have been attracting immense research interest, while only a handful of lncRNAs have been characterized thoroughly. Their involvement in the fundamental cellular processes including regulate gene expression at epigenetics, transcription, and post-transcription highlighted a central role in cell homeostasis. However, lncRNAs studies are still at a relatively early stage, their definition, conservation, functions, and action mechanisms remain fairly complicated. Here, we give a systematic and comprehensive summary of the existing knowledge of lncRNAs in order to provide a better understanding of this new studying field. lncRNAs play important roles in brain development, neuron function and maintenance, and neurodegenerative diseases are becoming increasingly evident. In this review, we also highlighted recent studies related lncRNAs in central nervous system (CNS) development and neurodegenerative diseases, including Alzheimer's disease (AD), Parkinson's disease (PD), Huntington's disease (HD) and amyotrophic lateral sclerosis (ALS), and elucidated some specific lncRNAs which may be important for understanding the pathophysiology of neurodegenerative diseases, also have the potential as therapeutic targets.
The SRY-related HMG-box 5 (SOX5) gene encodes a member of the SOX family of transcription factors. Recently, genome-wide association studies have implicated SOX5 as a candidate gene for susceptibility to four cardiac-related endophenotypes: higher resting heart rate (HR), the electrocardiographic PR interval, atrial fibrillation and left ventricular mass. We have determined that human SOX5 has a highly conserved Drosophila ortholog, Sox102F, and have employed transgenic Drosophila models to quantitatively measure cardiac function in adult flies. For this purpose, we have developed a high-speed and ultrahigh-resolution optical coherence tomography imaging system, which enables rapid cross-sectional imaging of the heart tube over various cardiac cycles for the measurement of cardiac structural and dynamical parameters such as HR, dimensions and areas of heart chambers, cardiac wall thickness and wall velocities. We have found that the silencing of Sox102F resulted in a significant decrease in HR, heart chamber size and cardiac wall velocities, and a significant increase in cardiac wall thickness that was accompanied by disrupted myofibril structure in adult flies. In addition, the silencing of Sox102F in the wing led to increased L2, L3 and wing marginal veins and increased and disorganized expression of wingless, the central component of the Wnt signaling pathway. Collectively, the silencing of Sox102F resulted in severe cardiac dysfunction and structural defects with disrupted Wnt signaling transduction in flies. This implicates an important functional role for SOX5 in heart and suggests that the alterations in SOX5 levels may contribute to the pathogenesis of multiple cardiac diseases or traits.
The aim has been to set up a rapid and accurate microarray assay using sandwich mode for sex determination of bovine preimplantation embryos. Twelve sequence-specific oligonucleotide capture probes used to discriminate 12 samples were spotted onto the aldehyde-modified glass slides by Arrayer. The 2 recognition probes used to identify coding regions of the sex-determining region of the Y chromosome gene (SRY) and β-casein (CSN2) reference gene were coupled with biotin. The assay was optimized by using genomic DNA extracted from blood samples of known sex individuals. Polymerase chain reaction (PCR) was used to amplify the fragments in the HMG box region of SRY gene and CSN2 gene with sequence-specific primers. The sex of samples was identified by detecting both the SRY and CSN2 genes simultaneously in 2 reaction cells of microarrays, with the male having SRY and CSN2 signals and the female only CSN2. The sex of 20 bovine preimplantation embryos was determined by oligonucleotide microarray. The protocol was run with a blind test that showed a 100% (82/82) specificity and accuracy in sexing of leukocytes. The bovine embryos were transferred into 20 bovine recipients, with a pregnant rate of 40% (8/20). Three calves were born at term, and 5 fetuses were miscarried. Their sexes were fully in accordance with the embryonic sex predetermination predicted by oligonucleotide microarray. This suggests that the oligonucleotide microarray method of SRY gene analysis can be used in early sex prediction of bovine embryos in breeding programs.
The Sry-containing protein Sox2 initially was known to regulate the self-renewal of the mouse and human embryonic stem cells (ESCs). It is also important for the maintenance of stem cells in multiple adult tissues including the brain and trachea, and it is one of the key transcription factors for establishing induced pluripotent stem cells. Recently, overexpression and gene amplification of Sox2 have been associated with the development of squamous cell carcinoma in multiple tissues such as the lung and esophagus. These different roles for Sox2 involve a complicated regulatory networks consisting of microRNAs, kinases and signaling molecules. While the levels of Sox2 are modulated transcriptionally and translationally, post-translational modification is also important for the various functions of Sox2. In clinics, high levels of Sox2 are correlated with poor prognosis and increased proliferation of cancer stem cells. Therefore targeting Sox2 can be potentially explored for a new therapeutic avenue to treat cancers. This review will focus on the different roles for Sox2 in stem cell maintenance and its oncogenic roles in the context of signal transcription and microRNA regulation. We will also review the main upstream and downstream targets of Sox2, which can be potentially used as therapeutic measures to treat cancer with abnormal levels of Sox2.
The collagen, type IX, alpha 1 (COL9A1) gene was previously identified as a candidate gene for idiopathic congenital talipes equinovarus (ICTEV), a congenital lower limb deformity in humans. In the present study, increased expression levels of COL9A1 were identified in the abductor hallucis muscle of ICTEV patients compared with those in control samples. The COL9A1 gene is regulated by SRY (sex‑determining region Y)‑box 9 (SOX9). Immunofluorescence analysis of SOX9 and COL9A1 proteins identified colocalization to the sarcolemma, endomysium and muscle membrane in muscle samples of ICTEV. No mutations in the exons and promoters of SOX9 were detected in blood samples of 84 ICTEV patients by denaturing gradient gel electrophoresis. mRNA and protein expression levels of SOX9 were detected by real‑time polymerase chain reaction and western blot analysis, respectively and were found to be significantly higher in ICTEV muscle samples compared with those in control samples. Based on present observations, we hypothesize that overexpression of the SOX9 gene may play a role in the genetic etiology of ICTEV.
The aims of this study were to investigate the expression of SOX9 (sex determining region Y [SRY]-related high-mobility group box 9) and carcinoembryonic antigen-related cell adhesion molecule 1 (CEACAM1) in benign, premalignant, and malignant gastric lesions and to explore the association between SOX9 and CEACAM1 in gastric carcinogenesis. SOX9 and CEACAM1 expression was detected in normal gastric mucosa, hyperplastic polyp, intestinal metaplasia, gastric intraepithelial neoplasia, and adenocarcinoma by immunohistochemistry. There was low expression of SOX9 and no CEACAM1 expression in normal gastric mucosa and hyperplastic polyps. Intestinal metaplasia began to express CEACAM1 and showed more membranous staining of CEACAM1 than normal mucosa and hyperplastic polyps (P = .000), but SOX9 expression had no significant difference, and the coexpression of SOX9 and CEACAM1 ascended; therefore, the difference was significant (P = .000). Gastric intraepithelial neoplasia showed more SOX9 expression, coexpression of SOX9, and CEACAM1 than in intestinal metaplasia (P = .014 and P = .026, respectively). Carcinoma showed more cytoplasmic CEACAM1 (P = .010), more SOX9 expression (P = .001), and more their coexpression (P = .023) than gastric intraepithelial neoplasia. As to the histologic classification, poorly differentiated carcinoma showed more cytoplasmic CEACAM1 than well and moderately differentiated carcinoma (P = .006 and P = .024, respectively). In the Laurén classification, diffuse carcinoma showed more cytoplasmic CEACAM1 than intestinal carcinoma (P = .0035), but the SOX9 expression and their coexpresison showed no difference (P = .065 and P = .074, respectively). With the elevation of SOX9 expression and the changing of CEACAM1 expression patterns, the coexpressions of SOX9 and CEACAM1 were highly elevated from benign proliferative lesions to malignant lesions. Moreover, the SOX9 expression and the coexpression with CEACAM1 were correlated positively (r = 0.310; P = .015). In addition, SOX9 expression was positively correlated with CEACAM1 expression patterns (r = 0.124; P = .032). In addition, CEACAM1 expression patterns and coexpression of SOX9 and CEACAM1 show significant difference between T1 and T2 and T3 and T4 (P = .021 and P = .011, respectively). Accordingly, compared with N0, N2 and N3 showed significant difference in SOX9 expression (P = .018), CEACAM1 expression patterns (P = .010), and their coexpression (P = .010). SOX9 expression significantly increased from nonneoplastic lesions to neoplastic lesions, and CEACAM1 expression patterns markedly changed; their coexpression also showed signally elevated suggesting that SOX9, as a transcriptional regulator, play important roles in the changing of CEACAM1 expression patterns, which might promote the tumor progression.
Stem cell transplantation has become a promising therapeutic approach for the treatment of myocardial infarction (MI). However, the poor survival of the donor cells after transplantation has restricted its therapeutic efficacy. Hydrogen sulfide (H(2)S), one gaseous signaling molecule, has been applied to inhibit cell apoptosis and promote cell survival. In the present study, we therefore examined the effects of H(2)S on the survival of mesenchymal stem cells (MSCs). MSCs were isolated from the femur of male Sprague-Dawley rats (about 4 weeks old, 100 g). Preconditioning MSCs with 200 µmol/L NaHS (as the donor of H(2)S) for 30 min decreased the hypoxia-induced cell apoptosis in vitro. The mechanisms contributing to the beneficial effects of H(2)S on MSCs were associated with increased levels of phosphorylated Akt (pAkt), phosphorylated Erk1/2 (pErk1/2) and phosphorylated glycogen synthase kinase-3β (pGSK-3β) in MSCs. Subsequently, MSCs (1 × 10(6)), MSCs preconditioned with H(2)S (1 × 10(6)), or phosphate buffered saline (PBS) were injected into rat hearts immediately after MI (the ligation of the left anterior descending of coronary artery). Real-time PCR for the Sry gene, located on the Y chromosome, indicated that preconditioning with H(2)S improved the survival rate of the transplanted MSCs in infarcted myocardium 4 days after MI, compared with the untreated MSCs. Furthermore, transplantation of the H(2)S-pretreated MSCs reduced the infarct size and increased left ventricular (LV) function, as judged by transthoracic echocardiography. In conclusion, H(2)S preconditioning effectively promotes MSCs survival under ischemic injury and helps cardiac repair after MI, which has great clinical significance.
Disorders of sex development (DSD) affect the development of chromosomal, gonadal and/or anatomical sex. We analyzed a patient with ambiguous genitalia aiming to correlate the genetic findings with the phenotype. Blood and tissue samples from a male patient with penoscrotal hypospadias were analyzed by immunohistochemistry, karyotyping and FISH. DNA was sequenced for the AR, SRY and DHH genes, and further 26 loci in different sex chromosomes were analyzed by MLPA. The gonosomal origin was evaluated by simple tandem repeat (STR) analysis and SNP array. Histopathology revealed a streak gonad, a fallopian tube and a rudimentary uterus, positive for placental alkaline phosphatase, cytokeratin-7 and c-kit, and negative for estrogen, androgen and progesterone receptors, alpha-inhibin, alpha-1-fetoprotein, β-hCG, and oct-4. Karyotyping showed a 45,X/46,XY mosaicism, yet FISH showed both 46,XX/46,XY mosaicism (gonad and urethral plate), 46,XX (uterus and tube) and 46,XY karyotypes (rudimentary testicular tissue). DNA sequencing revealed intact sequences in SOX9, WNT4, NR0B1, NR5A1, CYP21A2, SRY, AR, and DHH. STR analysis showed only one maternal allele for all X chromosome markers (uniparental isodisomy, UPD), with a weaker SRY signal and a 4:1 ratio in the X:Y signal. Our findings suggest that the observed complex DSD phenotype is the result of somatic gonosomal mosaicism and UPD despite a normal blood karyotype. The presence of UPD warrants adequate genetic counseling for the family and frequent, lifelong, preventive follow-up controls in the patient.
The objective of this study was to determine the gene expression profiles of the androgen/androgen receptor (AR) and anti-Müllerian hormone (AMH)/ Sry-related high-mobility group box 9 (SOX9) pathways in granulosa-luteal cells from patients undergoing standard in vitro fertilization (IVF) with or without recombinant luteinizing hormone (rLH) therapy.
Levels of reproductive hormones in the pre-ovulatory follicular fluid and the expression levels of LHR (luteinizing hormone receptor), AR, SOX9, AMH, AR-associated protein 54(ARA54)and ARA70 were determined in granulosa-luteal cells by real-time reverse-transcription PCR. The effects of androgen and rLH treatments on AR and AMH expression levels were also tested in vitro using HO23 cells.
We collected 35 an 70 granulosa cell samples from patients cycled with and without rLH supplementation, respectively. The clinical outcomes were similar in patients who received rLH therapy and those who did not, though the pre-ovulatory follicular fluid levels of androstenedione, testosterone, and estradiol were significantly higher and progesterone was lower in the rLH supplementation group. Moreover, granulosa-luteal cell mRNA levels of LHR, AR, AMH, and SOX9 were significantly higher in the rLH supplementation group relative to the group that did not receive rLH supplementation. In addition, we observed significant correlations between LHR and AR mRNA expression and among AR, AMH, and SOX9 mRNA expression in granulosa-luteal cells from patients undergoing standard IVF treatment.
Increased expression of LHR, AR, AMH, and SOX9 is characteristic of granulosa-luteal cells from IVF/ intracytoplasmic sperm injection (ICSI) patients receiving rLH supplementation.
The discovery of the role of a teleost-specific aquaporin (Aqp1ab) during the process of oocyte hydration in marine fish producing pelagic (floating) eggs, recently confirmed by molecular approaches, has revealed that this mechanism is more sophisticated than initially thought. Recent phylogenetic and genomic studies suggest that Aqp1ab likely evolved by tandem duplication from a common ancestor and further neofunctionalized in oocytes for water transport. Investigations into the regulation of Aqp1ab during oogenesis indicate that the mRNA and protein product are highly accumulated during early oocyte growth, possibly through the transcriptional activation of the aqp1ab promoter by the classical nuclear progesterone receptor and perhaps by Sry-related high mobility group [HMG]-box (Sox) transcription factors. During oocyte growth and maturation, Aqp1ab intracellular trafficking may be regulated by phosphorylation and/or dephosphorylation of specific C-terminal residues in Aqp1ab, as well as by signal-mediated sorting processes. These mechanisms possibly regulate the temporal insertion of Aqp1ab into the oocyte plasma membrane during oocyte hydration, although the intracellular signaling pathways involved are yet unknown. Interestingly, in some freshwater species that spawn partially hydrated eggs, high accumulation of transcripts encoding functional Aqp1ab channels have also been found in the ovary. These findings suggest that the Aqp1ab-mediated mechanism for oocyte hydration is likely conserved in teleosts. The tight regulation of Aqp1ab during oogenesis, at both the transcriptional and posttranslational levels, highlights the essential physiological role of this water channel and opens new research avenues for understanding the molecular basis of egg formation in fish.
Reproductive functions controlled by the hypothalamus are highly sexually differentiated. One of the most dramatic differences involves estrogen positive feedback, which leads to ovulation. A crucial feature of this positive feedback is the ability of estradiol to facilitate progesterone synthesis in female hypothalamic astrocytes. Conversely, estradiol fails to elevate hypothalamic progesterone levels in male rodents, which lack the estrogen positive feedback-induced luteinizing hormone (LH) surge. To determine whether hypothalamic astrocytes are sexually differentiated, we examined the cellular responses of female and male astrocytes to estradiol stimulation.
Primary adult hypothalamic astrocyte cultures were established from wild type rats and mice, estrogen receptor-α knockout (ERKO) mice, and four core genotype (FCG) mice, with the sex determining region of the Y chromosome (Sry) deleted and inserted into an autosome. Astrocytes were analyzed for Sry expression with reverse transcription PCR. Responses to estradiol stimulation were tested by measuring free cytoplasmic calcium concentration ([Ca2+]i) with fluo-4 AM, and progesterone synthesis with column chromatography and radioimmunoassay. Membrane estrogen receptor-α (mERα) levels were examined using surface biotinylation and western blotting.
Estradiol stimulated both [Ca2+]i release and progesterone synthesis in hypothalamic astrocytes from adult female mice. Male astrocytes had a significantly elevated [Ca2+]i response but it was significantly lower than in females, and progesterone synthesis was not enhanced. Surface biotinylation demonstrated mERα in both female and male astrocytes, but only in female astrocytes did estradiol treatment increase insertion of the receptor into the membrane, a necessary step for maximal [Ca2+]i release. Regardless of the chromosomal sex, estradiol facilitated progesterone synthesis in astrocytes from mice with ovaries (XX and XY-), but not in mice with testes (XY-Sry and XXSry).
Astrocytes are sexually differentiated, and in adulthood reflect the actions of sex steroids during development. The response of hypothalamic astrocytes to estradiol stimulation was determined by the presence or absence of ovaries, regardless of chromosomal sex. The trafficking of mERα in female, but not male, astrocytes further suggests that cell signaling mechanisms are sexually differentiated.
SOX-9, an essential factor for male sexual development, can be induced by prostaglandin D2 in a Sry-independent mechanism. Recent data suggest that the hedgehog pathway is involved in the differentiation of normal Sertoli and Leydig cells. The purpose of our study was to investigate the mechanisms involved in the differentiation of ovarian sex cord-stromal tumour (SCST) cells. Two Sertoli-Leydig cell tumours and two granulosa cell tumours with a minor Sertoli element were studied using immunohistochemistry on paraffin-embedded tissue sections. Sertoli cells expressed anti-Mullerian hormone (AMH), SOX-9, prostaglandin D synthase (Pgds) and bcl-2 (in four of four cases); sonic hedgehog (Shh) and p53 (in three of four cases) and androgen receptors (AR; in one of four cases). Ki-67 index ranged from 10% to 50%. Leydig cells expressed Shh and AR (two of two cases), while they showed no expression of p53, bcl-2 and 0% Ki-67 index. Granulosa cells expressed AMH, Pgds, Shh, estrogen receptors, progesterone receptors, AR and bcl-2 (in two of two cases) and p53 (in one of two cases). Ki-67 index was 10% and 40%, respectively. Further investigation is required to clarify the role of the molecules outlined above in the histogenesis of ovarian SCST, as Pgds-mediated SOX-9 upregulation could provide a reasonable explanation for the presence of testicular differentiation in ovarian SCST.
To assess the relative roles of sex chromosome genes and gonadal steroid hormones in producing sex differences in progesterone receptor (PR) expression in the forebrain of neonatal mice, we used mice in which the Sry gene had been deleted from the Y-chromosome and inserted as a transgene on an autosome in both XX and XY genotypes. Levels of PR immunoreactivity (PRir) in the anteroventral periventricular nucleus, the medial preoptic nucleus, and the ventromedial nucleus were significantly higher in mice that possessed an Sry transgene compared with mice that lacked an Sry transgene, regardless of their complement of sex chromosomes (XX vs. XY). This result suggests that sexual differentiation of PR expression in these regions is likely controlled mainly by gonadal hormones, not by the genetic sex of the brain cells. No differences in PRir were detected between wild-type XY mice with the Sry gene on the Y-chromosome and XY mice with the Sry transgene, suggesting that testicular hormones produced in these two genotypes have comparable effects on neural tissue.
In mammals, Sry expression in the bipotential, undifferentiated gonad directs the support cell precursors to differentiate as Sertoli cells, thus initiating the testis differentiation pathway. In the absence of Sry, or if Sry is expressed at insufficient levels, the support cell precursors differentiate as granulosa cells, thus initiating the ovarian pathway. The molecular mechanisms upstream and downstream of Sry are not well understood. We demonstrate that the transcription factor GATA4 and its co-factor FOG2 are required for gonadal differentiation. Mouse fetuses homozygous for a null allele of Fog2 or homozygous for a targeted mutation in Gata4 (Gata4(ki)) that abrogates the interaction of GATA4 with FOG co-factors exhibit abnormalities in gonadogenesis. We found that Sry transcript levels were significantly reduced in XY Fog2(-/-) gonads at E11.5, which is the time when Sry expression normally reaches its peak. In addition, three genes crucial for normal Sertoli cell function (Sox9, Mis and Dhh) and three Leydig cell steroid biosynthetic enzymes (p450scc, 3betaHSD and p450c17) were not expressed in XY Fog2(-/-) and Gata(ki/ki) gonads, whereas Wnt4, a gene required for normal ovarian development, was expressed ectopically. By contrast, Wt1 and Sf1, which are expressed prior to Sry and necessary for gonad development in both sexes, were expressed normally in both types of mutant XY gonads. These results indicate that GATA4 and FOG2 and their physical interaction are required for normal gonadal development.
Sertoli-Leydig cell tumors (SLCT) are rare sex-cord stromal tumors of the ovary composed of undifferentiated gonadal stromal cells, Leydig cells (LC), and Sertoli cells (SC), with the latter forming structures resembling fetal testicular tubules. The histogenetic basis of morphological male differentiation patterns in females is controversial. Here, we report a SLCT with intermediate differentiation in a 23-year-old woman investigated by light microscopy, immunohistochemistry for intermediate filaments, and sex steroid hormone receptors (SSHR), as well as by polymerase chain reaction (PCR) for the presence of the sex-determining region Y gene (SRY). Our investigation shows that the SCs of SLCT express progesterone and androgen receptors as well as cytokeratins and vimentin. By PCR, SLCT-derived genomic DNA lacked the SRY gene, indicating that the SLCT results from a SRY gene-independent pathway of pseudomale gonadal differentiation. The expression of progesterone receptors (PRs) in the SCs of the SLCT is in contrast to their absence in testicular SCs, but in line with their presence in ovarian granulosa and surface epithelial cells. Thus, our results provide strong evidence for a close histogenetic relationship between the SLCT and the female gonocyte-supporting cell, the granulosa cell (GC).
To study the process of mammalian sex determination and in particular to further understand the mechanisms of transcriptional regulation of the SRY gene, we have isolated a 4.5-kilobase (kb) pig SRY 5' flanking sequence. To facilitate the in vitro analysis of these sequences, we have generated a porcine genital ridge (PGR) cell line (9E11) that expresses SRY as well as SOX9, steroidogenic factor-1 (SF-1), and DAX1. Via primer extension analysis on RNA from this cell line, a transcription start site for porcine SRY was identified at -661 base pairs (bps) 5' from the translation initiation site. Deletion studies of the SRY 5' flanking sequences in PGR 9E11 cells demonstrated that -1.4 kb of 5' flanking sequences retained full transcriptional activity compared with the -4.5 kb fragment, but that transcriptional activity fell when further deletions were made. Sequences downstream of the transcriptional start site are important for promoter activity, because deleting transcribed but not translated sequences eliminated promoter activity. Sequence analysis of the -1.4 kb fragment identified two potential binding sites for SF-1, at -1369 and at -290 from the ATG. To address the role of SF-1 transactivation in SRY promoter activity, mutagenesis studies of the potential SF-1 binding sites were performed and revealed that these sites were indeed important for SRY promoter activity. Cotransfection studies in a heterologous cell system (mouse CV-1 cells) demonstrated that pig SF-1 was able to transactivate the pig SRY promoter. Gel shift assays confirmed that the upstream site was recognized by mouse SF-1 protein. We conclude that two sites for SF-1 transactivation exist within the pig SRY promoter, at -1369 bp and at -290 bp, and that the site at -1369 bp is quantitatively the most important.
The purpose of this study is to understand whether naturally occurring genetic variation in the promoter of chromogranin B (CHGB), a major constituent of catecholamine storage vesicles, is functional and confers risk for cardiovascular disease.
CHGB plays a necessary (catalytic) role in catecholamine storage vesicle biogenesis. Previously, we found that genetic variation at CHGB influenced autonomic function, with association maximal toward the 5' region.
Here we explored transcriptional mechanisms of such effects, characterizing 2 common variants in the proximal promoter, A-296C and A-261T, using transfection/cotransfection, electrophoretic mobility shift assay (EMSA), and chromatin immunoprecipitation (ChIP). We then tested the effects of promoter variation on cardiovascular traits.
The A-296C disrupted a c-FOS motif, exhibiting differential mobility shifting to chromaffin cell nuclear proteins during EMSA, binding of endogenous c-FOS on ChIP, and differential response to exogenous c-FOS. The A-261T disrupted motifs for SRY and YY1, with similar consequences for EMSA, endogenous factor binding, and responses to exogenous factors. The 2-SNP CHGB promoter haplotypes had a profound (p=3.16E-20) effect on blood pressure (BP) in the European ancestry population, with a rank order of CT<AA<CA<AT on both systolic blood pressure (SBP) and diastolic blood pressure (DBP), accounting for approximately 2.3% to approximately 3.4% of SBP/DBP variance; the haplotype effects on BP in vivo paralleled those on promoter activity in cella. Site-by-site interactions at A-296C and A-261T yielded highly nonadditive effects on SBP/DBP. The CHGB haplotype effects on BP were also noted in an independent (African ancestry) sample. In normotensive twins, parallel effects were noted for a pre-hypertensive phenotype, BP response to environmental stress.
The common CHGB promoter variants A-296C and A-261T, and their consequent haplotypes, alter binding of specific transcription factors to influence gene expression in cella as well as BP in vivo. Such variation contributes substantially to risk for human hypertension. Involvement of the sex-specific factor SRY suggests a novel mechanism for development of sexual dimorphism in BP.
Trophoblast migration into the maternal circulation is increased in preeclampsia and can trigger the endothelial dysfunction that characterizes the clinical disease. We hypothesised that 'fetal trafficking' is increased in women with severe preeclampsia and that the quantity of trafficking is greater in women with more severe disease.
To test the hypothesis, we used a technique that quantifies a genetic marker specific for the fetomaternal unit, that is, the SRY gene in a pregnant woman carrying a male fetus. Thirty two women with pre-eclampsia and 32 control women (women without preeclampsia) were recruited. Preeclampsia was defined according to the International Society for the Study of Hypertension in Pregnancy (ISSHP). All subjects with preeclampsia had evidence of the multisystemic nature of the disease. DNA was extracted from maternal peripheral blood and RTQ PCR analysis was performed to quantify the fetal DNA (SRY) and the total DNA (beta-actin) in each sample. The ratio of fetal to total DNA was calculated and compared between women with preeclampsia and controls.
The women with preeclampsia and the control women did not differ in parity, blood pressure at booking, and gestational age at sampling. The groups differed significantly in age (29 +/- 5.7 vs 25 +/- 5.1 years; P =.007), diastolic blood pressure (DBP) at sampling (101 +/- 9.5 vs 70 +/- 5.5 mm Hg; P <.0001), gestational age at delivery (33 +/- 4.3 vs 39 +/- 1.8 weeks; P <.001), and fetal weight (1.98 +/- 1 vs 3.35 +/- 0.5 kgs; P <.0001). SRY was detected in 31 out of 32 women with preeclampsia and in 24 out of 32 control women (P <.001). The median SRY copy number per micro L was greater in women with preeclampsia (10.6, interquartile range 12.89) than in the control women (8.6, interquartile range 20.1) but these differences were not statistically significant at P =.75. The median ratio of fetal to total DNA was almost identical in both groups (0.06, interquartile range 0.13) in PET compared to (0.06, interquartile range 0.17) the control women. No correlation was found between the quantity of fetal DNA and disease severity.
Fetal trafficking is more likely to be detected in women with preeclampsia compared to control women but the quantity does not appear to correlate with disease severity.
CatSper channels are essential for hyperactivity of sperm flagellum, progesterone-mediated chemotaxis and oocyte fertilization. Catsper genes are exclusively expressed in the testis during spermatogenesis, but the function and regulation of the corresponding promoter regions are unknown. Here, we report the cloning and characterization of the promoter regions in the human and murine Catsper1 genes. These promoter regions were identified and isolated from genomic DNA, and transcriptional activities were tested in vitro after transfection into human embryonic kidney 293, mouse Sertoli cells 1 and GC-1spg cell lines as well as by injecting plasmids directly into mouse testes. Although the human and murine Catsper1 promoters lacked a TATA box, a well-conserved CRE site was identified. Both sequences may be considered as TATAless promoters because their transcriptional activity was not affected after deletion of TATA box-like sites. Several transcription initiation sites were revealed by RNA ligase-mediated rapid amplification of the cDNA 5'-ends. We also found that the immediate upstream region and the first exon in the human CATSPER1 gene negatively regulate transcriptional activity. In the murine Catsper1 promoter, binding sites for transcription factors SRY, SOX9 and CREB were protected by the presence of nuclear testis proteins in DNAse degradation assays. Likewise, the mouse Catsper1 promoter exhibited transcriptional activity in both orientations and displayed significant expression levels in mouse testis in vivo, whereas the suppression of transcription signals in the promoter resulted in low expression levels. This study, thus, represents the first identification of the transcriptional control regions in the genes encoding the human and murine CatSper channels.
SOX9 is a member of the SOX [Sry-related high-mobility group (HMG) box] family and is required for the development and differentiation of multiple cell lineages. To clarify the significance of SOX9 in gastric carcinoma (GC), immunohistochemical expression of SOX9 and the CpG island methylation status of SOX9 were evaluated and compared with clinicopathological factors including overall survival. SOX9 expression was immunohistochemically evaluated in 382 GC tumors and the methylation status was examined in 121 GC tumors. SOX9 expression and its methylation status in six GC cell lines, their Epstein-Barr virus (EBV)-infected cell lines, and two EBV-associated GC cell lines was also examined. The SOX9 expression increased from non-neoplastic mucosa to early cancer. High expression of SOX9 was seen in 212 cases (56%). SOX9 expression was inversely related to advanced tumor stage, vessel infiltration, nodal metastasis, and EBV infection. Fifty-eight (48%) of 121 GC tumors had a methylated promoter in GC and the methylated status was related to low expression. The expression and methylation status were not related to prognosis. Three of six cell lines had increased methylation through EBV infection and decreased SOX9 expression. Upregulation of SOX9 is related to GC development. Downregulation by promoter methylation is related to GC progression and EBV infection. SOX9 is closely related to GC carcinogenesis and EBV-associated GC carcinogenesis.
In the adult testis, Sertoli cells (SCs) are the epithelial supporting cells of the seminiferous tubules that provide germ cells (GCs) with the required nutrients and structural and regulatory support to complete spermatogenesis. SCs also form the blood-testis barrier, phagocytose apoptotic spermatocytes and cell debris derived from spermiogenesis, and produce and secrete numerous paracrine and endocrine signals involved in different regulatory processes. In addition to their essential functions in the adult testis, SCs play a pivotal role during testis development. They are the first cells to differentiate in the embryonic XY gonadal primordium and are involved in the regulation of testis-specific differentiation processes, such as prevention of GC entry into meiosis, Leydig and peritubular myoid cell differentiation, and regression of the Müllerian duct, the anlagen of the uterus, oviducts, and the upper part of the vagina. Expression of the Y-linked gene SRY in pre-SCs initiates a genetic cascade that leads to SC differentiation and subsequently to testis development. Since the identification of the SRY gene, many Sertoli-specific transcription factors and signals underlying the molecular mechanisms of early testis differentiation have been identified. Here, we review the state of the art of the molecular interactions that commit the supporting cell lineage of the gonadal primordium to differentiate as SCs and the subsequent Sertoli-specific signaling pathways involved in early testis differentiation.
Epithelial-mesenchymal transition (EMT) changes polarized epithelial cells into migratory phenotypes associated with loss of cell-cell adhesion molecules and cytoskeletal rearrangements. This form of plasticity is seen in mesodermal development, fibroblast formation, and cancer metastasis.
Here we identify prominent transcriptional networks active during three time points of this transitional process, as epithelial cells become fibroblasts. DNA microarray in cultured epithelia undergoing EMT, validated in vivo, were used to detect various patterns of gene expression. In particular, the promoter sequences of differentially expressed genes and their transcription factors were analyzed to identify potential binding sites and partners. The four most frequent cis-regulatory elements (CREs) in up-regulated genes were SRY, FTS-1, Evi-1, and GC-Box, and RNA inhibition of the four transcription factors, Atf2, Klf10, Sox11, and SP1, most frequently binding these CREs, establish their importance in the initiation and propagation of EMT. Oligonucleotides that block the most frequent CREs restrain EMT at early and intermediate stages through apoptosis of the cells.
Our results identify new transcriptional interactions with high frequency CREs that modulate the stability of cellular plasticity, and may serve as targets for modulating these transitional states in fibroblasts.
The past few years have seen an enormous increase in the knowledge of the signaling pathways and the transcription factors that control endochondral bone development. Recent studies of rare chondrodysplasias that exhibit disproportionate dwarfism due to the impairment of endochondral ossification have identified many responsible genes and have clarified pathogenic mechanisms of these diseases by using molecular genetics and biology. The details of human diseases related to collagen type II alpha1 (COL2A1), collagen type X alpha1 (COL10A1), parathyroid hormone (PTH) /parathyroid hormone-related protein (PTHrP) receptor, guanylate cyclase B (GC-B), sry-box 9 (SOX9), runt-related transcription factor 2 (RUNX2), which play important roles in the process of endochondral ossification, will be outlined.
Waardenburg syndrome (WS) is an auditory-pigmentary disorder that exhibits varying combinations of sensorineural hearing loss and abnormal pigmentation of the hair and skin. WS type 4 (WS4), a subtype of WS, is characterized by the presence of the aganglionic megacolon and is associated with mutations in the gene encoding either endothelin 3, endothelin receptor type B (EDNRB), or Sry-box 10 (SOX10). Here, we provide evidence that SOX10 regulates the expression of EDNRB gene in human melanocyte-lineage cells, as judged by RNA interference and chromatin immunoprecipitation analyses. Human melanocytes preferentially express the EDNRB transcripts derived from the conventional EDNRB promoter. SOX10 transactivates the EDNRB promoter through the cis-acting elements, the two CA-rich sequences and the GC box. Moreover, a transcription factor Sp1 enhances the degree of the SOX10-mediated transactivation of the EDNRB promoter through these cis-acting elements. Furthermore, we have shown that the EDNRB promoter is heavily methylated in HeLa human cervical cancer cells, lacking EDNRB expression, but not in melanocytes and HMV-II melanoma cells. The expression of EDNRB became detectable in HeLa cells after treatment with a demethylating reagent, 5'-aza-2'-deoxycytidine, which was further enhanced in the transformed cells over-expressing SOX10. We therefore suggest that SOX10, alone or in combination with Sp1, regulates transcription of the EDNRB gene, thereby ensuring appropriate expression level of EDNRB in human melanocytes.
The Wilms tumor 1 (WT1) gene product may regulate the mullerian-inhibiting substance (MIS) gene, because mutations in WT1 can cause persistence of the mullerian duct in men. In the present study, we show by gel shift and chromatin immunoprecipitation assays that WT1 bound to a GC-rich sequence in the murine Mis promoter. Mutation in this site abolished WT1-mediated activation of the Mis promoter. The WT1, SRY box protein 9, and steroidogenic factor 1 could synergistically activate the Mis promoter, and at least two factors were necessary for minimal activation. The WT1 is an essential factor for activation of the Mis promoter; therefore, the persistence of the mullerian duct in patients with Denys-Drash syndrome may result from deregulation of the MIS gene.
Sulphamidase is a lysosomal enzyme necessary for the degradation of heparan sulphate. The deficiency of this hydrolase causes a disorder known as mucopolysaccharidosis type IIIA, characterized by a profound neurological deterioration. Human and mouse exon-intron structures were reported without any characterization of their promoter regions [DNA Res. 3 (1996) 269; Mamm. Genome 11 (2000) 436]. The promoter region was isolated and characterized to understand the factors affecting the expression of mouse sulphamidase. The 5'-flanking region was shown to contain a GC-rich region and putative binding sites for the transcription factors SRY, MZF1 and Nkx-2.5 with no TATA or CAAT boxes present. The 5' region had promoter activity to drive luciferase gene expression in transfected COS cells. The transcription initiation site of mouse sulphamidase was mapped to a single adenine residue 355 bases upstream of ATG codon. Northern blot analysis revealed differential expression of a major transcript of 4.5 kb in all tissues examined. Finally, the 3'-untranslated region of the mouse sulphamidase gene was isolated and found to be longer than the region identified in the human gene.
Gonadal differentiation is dependent upon a molecular cascade responsible for ovarian or testicular development from the bipotential gonadal ridge. Genetic analysis has implicated a number of gene products essential for this process, which include Sry, WT1, SF-1, and DAX-1. We have sought to better define the role of WT1 in this process by identifying downstream targets of WT1 during normal gonadal development. We have noticed that in the developing murine gonadal ridge, wt1 expression precedes expression of Dax-1, a nuclear receptor gene. We document here that the spatial distribution profiles of both proteins in the developing gonad overlap. We also demonstrate that WT1 can activate the Dax-1 promoter. Footprinting analysis, transient transfections, promoter mutagenesis, and mobility shift assays suggest that WT1 regulates Dax-1 via GC-rich binding sites found upstream of the Dax-1 TATA box. We show that two WT1-interacting proteins, the product of a Denys-Drash syndrome allele of wt1 and prostate apoptosis response-4 protein, inhibit WT1-mediated transactivation of Dax-1. In addition, we demonstrate that WT1 can activate the endogenous Dax-1 promoter. Our results indicate that the WT1-DAX-1 pathway is an early event in the process of mammalian sex determination.
Determination of 41.2 kb of Y chromosome genomic sequence has been made from a cosmid that spans the Yp pseudoautosomal boundary and includes 18.5 kb of sequence from the patient-defined sex-determining region of the Y chromosome. An AceDB database of the sequence and the analysis data have been produced as a resource for studies of the evolution and population genetics of the Y chromosome. Comparison of the 18.5 kb from the sex determining region to the sex determining region of mouse does not locate any areas of similarity outside SRY/Sry. Indeed, no coding regions other than those previously reported can be detected anywhere in the 41 kb. The Y-specific and pseudoautosomal portions of this sequence have different repeat sequence and GC contents: this may have relevance both to the events defining the pseudoautosomal boundary and to the course of sequence evolution in the absence of recombination.
What are the effects of experimentally manipulating meiosis signalling by addition of retinoic acid (RA) in cultured human fetal gonads?
RA-treatment accelerated meiotic entry in cultured fetal ovary samples, while addition of RA resulted in a dysgenetic gonadal phenotype in fetal testis cultures.
One of the first manifestations of sex differentiation is the initiation of meiosis in fetal ovaries. In contrast, meiotic entry is actively prevented in the fetal testis at this developmental time-point. It has previously been shown that RA-treatment mediates initiation of meiosis in human fetal ovary ex vivo.
This was a controlled ex vivo study of human fetal gonads treated with RA in 'hanging-drop' tissue cultures. The applied experimental set-up preserves germ cell-somatic niche interactions and the investigated outcomes included tissue integrity and morphology, cell proliferation and survival and the expression of markers of meiosis and sex differentiation.
Tissue from 24 first trimester human fetuses was included in this study, all from elective terminations at gestational week (GW) 7-12. Gonads were cultured for 2 weeks with and without addition of 1 µM RA. Samples were subsequently formalin-fixed and investigated by immunohistochemistry and cell counting. Proteins investigated and quantified included; octamer-binding transcription factor 4 (OCT4), transcription factor AP-2 gamma (AP2γ) (embryonic germ cell markers), SRY (sex determining region Y)-box 9 (SOX9), anti-Müllerian hormone (AMH) (immature Sertoli cell markers), COUP transcription factor 2 (COUP-TFII) (marker of interstitial cells), forkhead box L2 (FOXL2) (granulosa cell marker), H2A histone family, member X (γH2AX) (meiosis marker), doublesex and mab-3 related transcription factor 1 (DMRT1) (meiosis regulator), cleaved poly ADP ribose polymerase (PARP), cleaved Caspase 3 (apoptosis markers) and Ki-67 antigen (Ki-67) (proliferation marker). Also, proliferation was determined using a 5'-bromo-2'-deoxyuridine (BrdU) incorporation assay.
A novel ex vivo 'hanging-drop' culture model for human fetal gonads was successfully established. Continued proliferation of cells without signs of increased apoptosis was observed after 2 weeks of culture. In cultured fetal ovaries treated with RA, an increased number of meiotic germ cells (P < 0.05) and DMRT1-positive oogonia initiating meiosis (P < 0.05) was observed, which is in agreement with a previous study. In fetal testes, RA-treatment resulted in a decreased number of gonocytes (P < 0.05), a reduced percentage of proliferating gonocytes (P < 0.05), altered expression pattern of the somatic cell markers AMH and COUP-TFII, as well as disrupted seminiferous cord structure and testis morphology.
The number of samples included in this study was relatively small due to the limited availability of human fetal tissue.
The hanging-drop culture, similarly to other organ culture approaches, allows studies of germ cell-somatic niche interactions and determination of effects after manipulating specific signalling pathways. Our novel finding of disrupted fetal testis development after treatment with RA indicates that abnormal meiosis regulation can potentially cause gonadal dysgenesis. Further studies will elucidate the exact mechanisms and timing of observed effects.
This work was supported in part by an ESPE Research Fellowship, sponsored by Novo Nordisk A/S to A.Jø. Additional funding for this project was obtained from The Research Council of the Capital Region of Denmark (E.R.-D.M.), The Research Fund at Rigshospitalet (A.Ju. and J.E.N.), Familien Erichssens Fund (A.Jø.), Dagmar Marshalls Fund (A.Jø.) and Aase & Ejnar Danielsens Fund (A.Jø.). The authors have no conflicts of interest.
This study was aimed to identify the prognostic risk markers for thyroid papillary carcinoma (TPC) by bioinformatics. The clinical data of TPC and their microRNAs (miRNAs) and genes expression profile data were downloaded from The Cancer Genome Atlas. Elastic net-Cox's proportional regression hazards model (EN-COX) was used to identify the prognostic associated factors. The receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve and Kaplan-Meier (KM) curve were used to screen the significant prognostic risk miRNA and genes. Then, the target genes of the obtained miRNAs were predicted followed by function prediction. Finally, the significant risk genes were performed literature mining and function analysis. Total 1046 miRNAs and 20531 genes in 484 cases samples were identified after data preprocessing. From the EN-COX model, 30 prognostic risk factors were obtained. Based on the 30 risk factors, 3 miRNAs and 11 genes were identified from the ROC and KM curves. The target genes of miRNA-342 such as B-cell CLL/lymphoma 2 (BCL2) were mainly enriched in the biological process related to cellular metabolic process and Disease Ontology terms of lymphoma. The target genes of miRNA-93 were mainly enriched in the pathway of G1 phase. Among the 11 prognostic risk genes, v-maf avian musculoaponeurotic fibrosarcoma oncogene homologue F (MAFF), SRY (sex-determining region Y)-box 4 (SOX4), and retinoic acid receptor, alpha (RARA) encoded transcription factors. Besides, RARA was enriched in four pathways. These prognostic markers such as miRNA-93, miRNA-342, RARA, MAFF, SOX4, and BCL2 may be used as targets for TPC chemoprevention.
The sex of primordial germ cells (PGCs) is determined in developing gonads on the basis of cues from somatic cells. In XY gonads, sex-determining region Y (SRY) triggers fibroblast growth factor 9 (FGF9) expression in somatic cells. FGF signaling, together with downstream nodal/activin signaling, promotes male differentiation in XY germ cells by suppressing retinoic acid (RA)-dependent meiotic entry and inducing male-specific genes. However, the mechanism by which nodal/activin signaling regulates XY PGC fate is unknown. We uncovered the roles of SMAD2/3 and p38 MAPK, the putative downstream factors of nodal/activin signaling, in PGC sexual fate decision. We found that conditional deletion of Smad2, but not Smad3, from XY PGCs led to a loss of male-specific gene expression. Moreover, suppression of RA signaling did not rescue male-specific gene expression in Smad2-mutant testes, indicating that SMAD2 signaling promotes male differentiation in a RA-independent manner. By contrast, we found that p38 signaling has an important role in the suppression of RA signaling. The Smad2 deletion did not disrupt the p38 signaling pathway even though Nodal expression was significantly reduced, suggesting that p38 was not regulated by nodal signaling in XY PGCs. Additionally, the inhibition of p38 signaling in the Smad2-mutant testes severely impeded XY PGC differentiation and induced meiosis. In conclusion, we propose a model in which p38 and SMAD2 signaling coordinate to determine the sexual fate of XY PGCs.
The rabbit is an attractive species for the study of gonad differentiation because of its 31-day long gestation, the timing of female meiosis around birth and the 15-day delay between gonadal switch and the onset of meiosis in the female. The expression of a series of genes was thus determined by qPCR during foetal life until adulthood, completed by a histological analysis and whenever possible by an immunohistological one. Interesting gene expression profiles were recorded. Firstly, the peak of SRY gene expression that is observed in early differentiated XY gonads in numerous mammals was also seen in the rabbit, but this expression was maintained at a high level until the end of puberty. Secondly, a peak of aromatase gene expression was observed at two-thirds of the gestation in XX gonads as in many other species except in the mouse. Thirdly, the expression of STRA8 and DMC1 genes (which are known to be specifically expressed in germ cells during meiosis) was enhanced in XX gonads around birth but also slightly and significantly in XY gonads at the same time, even though no meiosis occurs in XY gonad at this stage. This was probably a consequence of the synchronous strong NANOS2 gene expression in XY gonad. In conclusion, our data highlighted some rabbit-specific findings with respect to the gonad differentiation process.
Members of the SOX (SRY box) family proteins play critical roles in multiple aspects of development. SRY, as a founder member of SOX family, has been long believed to be involved in the development of sexual gonads by triggering signaling cascades which lead to the formation of testis or ovary from bipotential gonads. However, less is known about other potential regulatory roles of SRY in the development and differentiation. In order to gain further insight into the possible roles of SRY during development, we looked into possible SRY-regulated genes and their levels of expression in a human embryonic carcinoma cell line, named NTera2, before and after induction of differentiation. For this respect, SRY incorporation on the regulatory regions of two groups of genes including OCT4, NANOG, and SOX2 as pluripotency marker genes, and NESTIN and PAX6 as differentiation marker genes were evaluated quantitatively. Chromatin immunoprecipitation using SRY antibody was performed on chromatin extract of a human embryonic carcinoma cell line, NT2/NTERA-2, before and after onset of differentiation. The results showed that incorporation of SRY in both groups of genes was increased after induction of differentiation. Besides, lower expression of OCT4, SOX2, and NANOG and higher expression of PAX6 and NESTIN genes in differentiated cells suggest that SRY may act as a transcription repressor for pluripotency-associated genes and as a transcription activator for differentiation-related genes.
Calcific aortic valve disease (CAVD) is a major public health problem with no effective treatment available other than surgery. We previously showed that mature heart valves calcify in response to retinoic acid (RA) treatment through downregulation of the SRY transcription factor Sox9. In this study, we investigated the effects of excess vitamin A and its metabolite RA on heart valve structure and function in vivo and examined the molecular mechanisms of RA signaling during the calcification process in vitro.
Using a combination of approaches, we defined calcific aortic valve disease pathogenesis in mice fed 200 IU/g and 20 IU/g of retinyl palmitate for 12 months at molecular, cellular, and functional levels. We show that mice fed excess vitamin A develop aortic valve stenosis and leaflet calcification associated with increased expression of osteogenic genes and decreased expression of cartilaginous markers. Using a pharmacological approach, we show that RA-mediated Sox9 repression and calcification is regulated by classical RA signaling and requires both RA and retinoid X receptors.
Our studies demonstrate that excess vitamin A dietary intake promotes heart valve calcification in vivo. Therefore suggesting that hypervitaminosis A could serve as a new risk factor of calcific aortic valve disease in the human population.
B6.Y(Tir) (mice with Y chromosome from a strain in Tirano, Italy, and autosomes and X-chromosomes from the B6 strain) mice provide an excellent model for analysing sex development that occurs during gonadal differentiation; however, the molecular mechanisms that contribute to sex reversal are unclear. Our aim has been to establish which molecular events participate in this sex reversal. The pattern of gene expression related to testicular [Sry (sex-determining region of the Y chromosome), Sox9 (Sry-related high-mobility group box gene 9) and Mis (Müllerian-inhibiting substance)] and ovarian [Wnt4 (Wingless-type MMTV (murine-mammary-tumour virus) integration site family, member 4), Rspo1 (cysteine-rich secretory protein containing a thrombospondin type 1 repeat) and Stra8 (stimulated by retinoic acid gene 8)] differentiation was analysed by applying immunofluorescence and real-time RT-PCR (reverse transcription-PCR), focusing on XY gonads from the B6.Y(Tir) mouse, but also analysing the normal strains CD-1 and C57BL/6J (B6). The expression of genes related to the process of sexual differentiation was altered in the case of the B6.Y(Tir) strain, both at the transcript and protein level, inducing differentiation of ovaries and ovotestes, but not the formation of the testes, which were normal. Our results indicate that the expression of testicular genes is inhibited at various levels, permitting the expression of ovarian genes such as Wnt4, Stra8 and Rspo1. However, their activity was not clear when the data were averaged. Correlation analysis indicated that an ovary differentiation pathway is activated when the testicular differentiation pathway is inhibited.
The male gender is determined by the sex-determining region on the Y chromosome (SRY) transcription factor. The unexpected action of SRY in the control of voluntary movement in male rodents suggests a role in the regulation of dopamine transmission and dopamine-related disorders with gender bias, such as Parkinson's disease. We investigated SRY expression in the human brain and function in vitro. SRY immunoreactivity was detected in the human male, but not female substantia nigra pars compacta, within a sub-population of tyrosine hydroxylase (TH) positive neurons. SRY protein also co-localized with TH positive neurons in the ventral tegmental area, and with GAD-positive neurons in the substantia nigra pars reticulata. Retinoic acid-induced differentiation of human precursor NT2 cells into dopaminergic cells increased expression of TH, NURR1, D2 R and SRY. In the human neuroblastoma cell line, M17, SRY knockdown resulted in a reduction in TH, DDC, DBH and MAO-A expression; enzymes which control dopamine synthesis and metabolism. Conversely, SRY over-expression increased TH, DDC, DBH, D2 R and MAO-A levels, accompanied by increased extracellular dopamine levels. A luciferase assay demonstrated that SRY activated a 4.6 kb 5' upstream regulatory region of the human TH promoter/nigral enhancer. Combined, these results suggest that SRY plays a role as a positive regulator of catecholamine synthesis and metabolism in the human male midbrain. This ancillary genetic mechanism might contribute to gender bias in fight-flight behaviours in men or their increased susceptibility to dopamine disorders, such as Parkinson's disease and schizophrenia.
Sex determination in fetal germ cells depends on a balance between exposure to retinoic acid (RA) and the degradation of RA achieved by the testis-specific expression of the catabolic cytochrome P450 enzyme, CYP26B1. Therefore, identification of factors regulating the expression of the Cyp26b1 gene is an important goal in reproductive biology. We used in situ hybridization to demonstrate that Cyp26b1 and transcription factor genes steroidogenic factor-1 (Sf1) and Sry-related HMG box 9 (Sox9) are coexpressed in Sertoli cells, whereas Cyp26b1 and Sf1 are coexpressed in Leydig cells in mouse fetal testes. In the mouse gonadal somatic cell line TM3, transfection of constructs expressing SOX9 and SF1 activated Cyp26b1 expression, independently of the positive regulator RA. In embryonic gonads deficient in SOX9 or SF1, Cyp26b1 expression was decreased relative to wild-type (WT) controls, as measured by quantitative RT-PCR (qRT-PCR). Furthermore, qRT-PCR showed that Cyp26b1 up-regulation by SOX9/SF1 was attenuated by the ovarian transcription factor Forkhead box L2 (FOXL2) in TM3 cells, whereas in Foxl2-null mice, Cyp26b1 expression in XX gonads was increased ∼20-fold relative to WT controls. These data support the hypothesis that SOX9 and SF1 ensure the male fate of germ cells by up-regulating Cyp26b1 and that FOXL2 acts to antagonize Cyp26b1 expression in ovaries.
Calcification of heart valve structures is the most common form of valvular disease and is characterized by the appearance of bone-like phenotypes within affected structures. Despite the clinical significance, the underlying etiology of disease onset and progression is largely unknown and valve replacement remains the most effective treatment. The SRY-related transcription factor Sox9 is expressed in developing and mature heart valves, and its function is required for expression of cartilage-associated proteins, similar to its role in chondrogenesis. In addition to cartilage-associated defects, mice with reduced sox9 function develop skeletal bone prematurely; however, the ability of sox9 deficiency to promote ectopic osteogenic phenotypes in heart valves has not been examined.
This study aims to determine the role of Sox9 in maintaining connective tissue homeostasis in mature heart valves using in vivo and in vitro approaches.
Using histological and molecular analyses, we report that, from 3 months of age, Sox9(fl/+);Col2a1-cre mice develop calcific lesions in heart valve leaflets associated with increased expression of bone-related genes and activation of inflammation and matrix remodeling processes. Consistently, ectopic calcification is also observed following direct knockdown of Sox9 in heart valves in vitro. Furthermore, we show that retinoic acid treatment in mature heart valves is sufficient to promote calcific processes in vitro, which can be attenuated by Sox9 overexpression.
This study provides insight into the molecular mechanisms of heart valve calcification and identifies reduced Sox9 function as a potential genetic basis for calcific valvular disease.
Sox3/SOX3 [SRY (sex determining region Y)-box 3] is considered to be one of the earliest neural markers in vertebrates, playing a role in specifying neuronal fate. We have previously reported characterization of the SOX3 promoter and demonstrated that the general transcription factors NF-Y (nuclear factor-Y), Sp1 (specificity protein 1) and USF (upstream stimulatory factor) are involved in transcriptional regulation of SOX3 promoter activity. In the present study we provide the first evidence that the TALE (three-amino-acid loop extension) transcription factors PBX1 (pre-B-cell leukaemia homeobox 1) and MEIS1 (myeloid ecotropic viral integration site 1 homologue) participate in regulating human SOX3 gene expression in NT2/D1 cells by direct interaction with the consensus PBX/MEIS-binding site, which is conserved in all mammalian orthologue promoters analysed. PBX1 is present in the protein complex formed at this site with nuclear proteins from uninduced cells, whereas both PBX1 and MEIS1 proteins were detected in the complex created with extract from RA (retinoic acid)-induced NT2/D1 cells. By functional analysis we also showed that mutations of the PBX1/MEIS1-binding sites resulted in profound reduction of SOX3 promoter responsiveness to RA. Finally, we demonstrated that overexpressed PBX1 and MEIS1 increased endogenous SOX3 protein expression in both uninduced and RA-induced NT2/D1 cells. With the results of the present study, for the first time, we have established a functional link between the TALE proteins, PBX1 and MEIS1, and expression of the human SOX3 gene. This link is of particular interest since both TALE family members and members of the SOX superfamily are recognized as important developmental regulators.
Balanced production and degradation of retinoids is important in regulating development of several organ systems in the vertebrate embryo. Among these, it is known that retinoic acid (RA), and the retinoid-catabolyzing enzyme CYP26B1 together regulate the sex-specific behavior of germ cells in developing mouse gonads. We report here that the gene encoding a cytosolic class-1 aldehyde dehydrogenase, ALDH1A1, a weak catalyst of RA production, is strongly expressed in a male-specific manner in somatic cells of the developing mouse testis, beginning shortly after Sry expression is first detectable. This expression pattern is conserved in the developing male gonad of the chicken and is dependent on the testis-specific transcription factor SOX9. Our data suggest that low levels of RA may be required for early developmental events in the testis, or that Aldh1a1 expression in the fetus may prefigure a later requirement for ALDH1A1 in regulating spermatogenesis postnatally.
DAX-1 (DSS-AHC Critical Region on the X Chromosome-1) is a member of the nuclear hormone receptor superfamily that has an important role in steroidogenesis and gonadogenesis. To investigate the role of DAX-1 in the testis, a yeast two-hybrid screen was performed and SOX6, member of the Sry box (SOX) protein family, was cloned as candidate. The interaction was confirmed biochemically and expression of SOX6 overlapped with that of DAX-1 in the developing gonad, as well as in Sertoli cells of the adult testis. We show here that DAX-1 is able to inhibit splicing in in vivo and in vitro splicing assays, and this inhibition is relieved by the addition of SOX6. SOX6 appears to inhibit the interaction between DAX-1 and the splicing machinery, thus providing a likely mechanism for functional interference. We conclude that DAX-1 and SOX6 proteins interact, have overlapped expression in the testis, and act antagonistically during pre-mRNA splicing. Developmental Dynamics 238:1595-1604, 2009. (c) 2009 Wiley-Liss, Inc.
Mammalian gonad differentiation involves sexually dimorphic cell-fate decisions within the bipotential gonadal primordia. Testis differentiation is initiated by a center-to-poles wave of Sry expression that induces supporting cell precursors (SCPs) to become Sertoli rather than granulosa cells. The initiation of ovary differentiation is less well understood. We identified two novel SCP markers, 1700106J16Rik and Sprr2d, whose expression is ovary-biased during early gonad development, and altered in Wnt4, Sf1, Wt1, and Fog2 mutant gonads. In XX and XY gonads, both genes were up-regulated at approximately E11 in a center-to-poles wave, and then rapidly down-regulated in XY gonads in a center-to-poles wave, which is reminiscent of Sry expression in XY gonads. Our data suggest that 1700106J16Rik and Sprr2d may have important roles in early gonad development, and are consistent with the hypothesis that ovarian SCP differentiation occurs in a center-to-poles wave with similar timing to that of testicular SCP differentiation.
Gene expressions are sex-specific in the sex development of mammals. Different genes express in different phases and tend to change with the time. The functions of some genes, such as SRY, SOX9, SOX8, DAX1, and FGF9, have already been defined in male gonadal morphogenesis. This paper presents a review of the genes involved in the formation of the male gonad in mammals.
The primary role of Anti-Müllerian hormone (AMH) during mammalian development is the regression of Müllerian ducts in males. This highly conserved function is retained in birds and is supported by the high levels of AMH expression in developing testes. Mammalian AMH expression is regulated by a combination of transcription factors, the most important being Sry-type high-mobility-group box transcription factor-9 (SOX9). In the chicken embryo, however, AMH mRNA expression precedes that of SOX9, leading to the view that AMH may play a more central role in avian testicular development. To define its role in chicken gonadal development, AMH was overexpressed using the RCASBP viral vector. AMH caused the gonads of both sexes to develop as small and undeveloped structures at both embryonic and adult stages. Molecular analysis revealed that although female gonads developed testis-like cords, gonads lacked Sertoli cells and were incapable of steroidogenesis. A similar gonadal phenotype was also observed in males, with a complete loss of both Sertoli cells, disrupted SOX9 expression and gonadal steroidogenesis. At sexual maturity both sexes showed a female external phenotype but retained sexually dimorphic body weights that matched their genetic sexes. These data suggest that AMH does not operate as an early testis activator in the chicken but can affect downstream events, such as sex steroid hormone production. In addition, this study provides a unique opportunity to assess chicken sexual development in an environment of sex hormone deficiency, demonstrating the importance of both hormonal signaling and direct cell autonomous factors for somatic sex identity in birds.
A female thoroughbred successful in horse racing was positively tested for high testosterone values. This horse neither showed stallion-like-behaviour nor signs of ambiguous external genitalia. The karyotype of this horse was 2n = 64,XY and the sex-determining region of Y (SRY) PCR was positive. Hair samples tested for naturally testosterone revealed values normal for stallions, and tests for eight synthetic testosterone esters remained negative. The phenotype, ultrasonographic examination, hormone status, cytogenetic evaluation and molecular diagnostics lead to the diagnosis of an XY testicular disorder of sexual development (DSD) due to a complete androgen insensitivity syndrome. To our knowledge this is the first report about a thoroughbred in racing sports with an XY testicular disorder of sexual development. To date, intersex racing horses have never been described in thoroughbreds or a regulation for intersexes in regard to horse races has been issued.
The establishment of social hierarchies is a naturally occurring, evolutionarily conserved phenomenon with a well-established impact on fitness and health. Investigations of complex social group dynamics may offer novel opportunities for translational studies of autism spectrum disorder. Here we describe a robust behavioral paradigm using an automated version of the tube test. Isogenic groups of male and female mice establish linear social hierarchies that remain highly stable for at least 14 days, the longest interval tested. Remarkably, however, their social strategy is sex-specific: females primarily utilize intrinsic attributes, whereas males are strongly influenced by prior social experience. Using both genetic and pharmacological manipulations, we identify testosterone as a critical sex-specific factor for determining which social strategy is used. Males inheriting a null mutation of the sex-determining region Y (Sry) gene used a similar social cognitive strategy as females. In contrast, females with transgenic expression of Sry utilized a typically male social strategy. Analogously, castration of males and testosterone supplementation of females yielded similar outcomes, with a reversal of their social cognitive strategy. Together, our results demonstrate a sex-specific mechanism underlying social hierarchy, in which both males and females retain the functional capacity to adapt their social strategy. More generally, we expect the automated tube test to provide an important complementary approach for both fundamental and translational studies of social behavior.
In teleosts, the expression of steroidogenic enzymes and related transcription factor genes occurs in a stage- and tissue-specific manner causing sexual development. The role of sox3, an evolutionary ancestor of SRY, has not been studied in detail. Therefore, the full-length cDNA of sox3 (1,197 kb) was cloned from catfish testis, and mRNA expression was analyzed during gonadal development, during the seasonal reproductive cycle, and after human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG) induction. Tissue distribution analysis showed that sox3 expression was higher in testis, ovary, and brain compared to other tissues analyzed. Developing and mature testis showed higher sox3 expression than ovary of corresponding stages, and more sox3 transcripts were found during the spawning phase of the seasonal reproductive cycle. Expression of sox3 was upregulated by hCG after in vivo and in vitro induction, suggesting that gonadotropins might stimulate it. In situ hybridization and immunohistochemistry showed the presence of sox3 mRNA and protein in somatic and interstitial cell layers of the testis. Sox3 could also be found in the zona radiata of developing and mature oocytes. Exposure of methyltestosterone (1 µg/l) and ethinylestradiol (1 µg/l) for 21 days during testicular development showed lower sox3 expression levels in the testis and brain, indicating a certain feedback intervention. These results suggest a possible role for Sox3 in the regulation of testicular development and function.
To do clinical, hormonal and chromosomal analysis in undervirilized male / XY disorder of sex development and to make presumptive etiological diagnosis according to the new Disorder of Sex Development (DSD) classification system.
Case series.
Endocrine Unit at National Institute of Child Health, Karachi, Pakistan, from January 2007 to December 2012.
Patients of suspected XY DSD / undervirilized male visiting endocrine clinic were enrolled in the study. Criteria suggested XY DSD include overt genital ambiguity, apparent female/male genitalia with inguinal/labial mass, apparent male genitalia with unilateral or bilateral non-palpable testes, micropenis and isolated hypospadias or with undescended testis. The older children who had delayed puberty were also evaluated with respect to DSD. As a part of evaluation of XY DSD, abdominopelvic ultrasound, karyotype, hormone measurement (testosterone, FSH, LH), FISH analysis with SRY probing, genitogram, laparoscopy, gonadal biopsy and HCG stimulation test were performed. Frequencies and percentages applied on categorical data whereas mean, median, standard deviation were calculated for continuous data.
A total of 187 patients met the criteria of XY DSD. Age ranged from 1 month to 15 years, 55 (29.4%) presented in infancy, 104 (55.6%) between 1 and 10 years and 28 (15%) older than 10 years. Twenty five (13.4%) were raised as female and 162 as (86.6%) male. The main complaints were ambiguous genitalia, unilateral cryptorchidism, bilateral cryptorchidism, micropenis, delayed puberty, hypospadias, female like genitalia with gonads, inguinal mass. The karyotype was 46 XY in 183 (97.9%), 46 XX in 2 (1.1%), 47 XXY in 1 (0.5%), 45 X/46 XY in 1 (0.5%) patient. HCG stimulation test showed low testosterone response in 43 (23 %), high testosterone response in 62 (33.2%), partial testosterone response in 32 (17.1%) and normal testosterone response in 50 (26.7%). Genitogram was carried out in 86 (45.98%) patients. Presumptive etiological diagnosis of androgen sensitivity syndrome/ 5-alpha reductase deficiency, testicular biosynthetic defect/ leydig cell hypoplasia, partial gonadal dysgenesis, ovotesticular DSD, XX testicular DSD, mixed gonadal dysgenesis, testicular vanishing syndrome, klinefelter syndrome, hypogonadotropic hypogonadism, isolated hypospadias and isolated micropenis was made.
Clinical, chromosomal and hormonal assessment may help in making the presumptive etiological diagnosis. Further molecular genetics analysis are needed in differentiating these abnormalities and to make a final diagnosis.
In this study, a short stature male with infertility is reported. Semen analysis and serum concentrations of FSH, LH, T and PRL were estimated. Chromosome analysis was performed on lymphocytes obtained from both the male and his parents. Cytogenomic studies were performed by fluorescent in situ hybridisation and the CytoScan(™)  HD array analysis to detect Y chromosomal rearrangements and copy number mutations. Semen analysis showed severe oligozoospermia. Numerous spermatogenic cells were observed in the semen, and approximately 60% of the cells examined in semen were primary spermatocytes, showing spermatogenic arrest at the primary spermatocyte level. Cytogenomic studies of blood revealed his karyotype which was 46,X,i(Y) (p11.32) (Yqter→Yp11.32::Yp11.32→Yqter).ish (DYZ3++, SRY++, SHOX-). array (PLCXD1→SHOX) ×1,(SRY →GOLGA2P3Y)×2, (DHRSX→ ASMT, SPRY3 →IL9R)×3. The rearrangement Y chromosome is de novo. This is the first case reported with a nonmosaic 46,X, i (Y) (p11.32), which will be useful to estimate the infertility phenotype-molecular karyotype correlation. Haploinsufficiency of short stature homeobox-containing gene is primarily responsible for the short stature. Aberrations in pseudoautosomal region 1 on the rearranged Y chromosome may result in the deficiency of X-Y pairing or recombination, ultimately lead to the spermatogenic failure.
Whilst gonadal hormones can substantially influence sexual differentiation of the brain, recent findings have suggested that sex-linked genes may also directly influence neurodevelopment. Here we used the well-established murine 'four core genotype' (FCG) model on a gonadally-intact, outbred genetic background to characterise the contribution of Sry-dependent effects (i.e. those arising from the expression of the Y-linked Sry gene in the brain, or from hormonal sequelae of gonadal Sry expression) and direct effects of sex-linked genes other than Sry ('sex chromosome complement' effects) to sexually dimorphic mouse behavioural phenotypes. Over a 24 hour period, XX and XY gonadally female mice (lacking Sry) exhibited greater horizontal locomotor activity and reduced food consumption per unit bodyweight than XX and XY gonadally male mice (possessing Sry); in two behavioural tests (the elevated plus and zero mazes) XX and XY gonadally female mice showed evidence for increased anxiety-related behaviours relative to XX and XY gonadally male mice. Exploratory correlational analyses indicated that these Sry-dependent effects could not be simply explained by brain expression of the gene, nor by circulating testosterone levels. We also noted a sex chromosome complement effect on food (but not water) consumption whereby XY mice consumed more over a 24hr period than XX mice, and a sex chromosome complement effect in a third test of anxiety-related behaviour, the light-dark box. The present data suggest that: i) the male-specific factor Sry may influence activity and feeding behaviours in mice, and ii) dissociable feeding and anxiety-related murine phenotypes may be differentially modulated by Sry and by other sex-linked genes. Our results may have relevance for understanding the molecular underpinnings of sexually dimorphic behavioural phenotypes in healthy men and women, and in individuals with abnormal sex chromosome constitutions.
The vanishing testis with maleness is a rare syndrome with frequency of 1 in 20,000 males. Here, we report about a 30 years old male subject with vanishing testis syndrome, feminization and gynecomastia. Follicle stimulating hormone (FSH) and Leutinizing hormone (LH) levels were elevated whereas testosterone was below normal and anti-mullerian-hormone level was undetectable in the patient. The chromosomal analysis and DNA analysis of SRY and ZFY, DAX-I, AZFa, AZFb, AZFc and heterochromatic region of Y chromosome with STS primer (sY160) were done to detect any genetic changes at specified sites (both at chromosomal and molecular level). Karyotyping confirmed patient as 46, XY male, with no evidence of mosaicism in blood cells. PCR amplification of SRY gene indicated that the SRY gene of the patient was normal. PCR amplification of SRY, ZFY, DAX-I, AZFa, AZFb, AZFc gene and Y chromosome heterochromatic region using STS primer sY(160) did not reveal any microdeletions. The anti-mullerian-hormone level was undetectable indicating that the patient didn't have any testicular tissue in scrotum. Increased levels of FSH, LH and reversed androgen: estrogen ratio might have given rise to gynecomastia in the patient. SRY-positive 46,XY male with vanishing testis might be due to torsion of testis during descent in fetal period. The torsion of testis might have caused vascular occlusion and thereby regression of testicular tissue occurred, but the exact genetic condition yet to understand.
Data of the literature demonstrated controversial results of a correlation between transsexualism and genetic mutations.
To evaluate the hormone and gene profile of male-female (M-F) transsexual.
Thirty M-F transsexuals aged 24-39. Seventeen had already undergone sex reassignment surgery, 13 were awaiting. All subjects had been undergoing estrogen and antiandrogen therapy. We studied hormones of the hypothalamus- pituitary-testicular axis, thyroid and adrenal profile, GH basal and after GHRH stimulation, IGF-I. The gene study analyzed SRY, AR, DAX1, SOX9, AZF region of the Y chromosome.
Pre-surgery subjects had elevated PRL, reduced testosterone and gonadotropins. Post-surgery subjects showed reduced androgens, a marked increase in LH and FSH and normal PRL. Cortisol and ACTH were similar to reference values in pre- and post-surgery patients. There was a marked increase in the baseline and post-stimulation GH values in 6 of the 13 pre-surgery patients, peaking at T15. IGF-I was similar to reference values in both groups except for one post-surgery patient, whose level was below the normal range. There were no polymorphisms in the amplified gene region for SOX9, and a single nucleotide synonimous polymorphism for DAX1. No statistically significant differences were seen in the mean of CAG repeats between controls and transsexual subjects. SRY gene was present in all subjects. Qualitative analysis of the AZFa, AZFb, and AZFc regions did not reveal any microdeletions in any subject.
This gender disorder does not seem to be associated with any molecular mutations of some of the main genes involved in sexual differentiation.
Sex differences exist in the regulation of arterial pressure and renal function by the renin-angiotensin system (RAS). This may in part stem from a differential balance in the pressor and depressor arms of the RAS. In males, the ACE/AngII/AT(1)R pathways are enhanced, whereas, in females, the balance is shifted towards the ACE2/Ang(1-7)/MasR and AT(2)R pathways. Evidence clearly demonstrates that premenopausal women, as compared to aged-matched men, are protected from renal and cardiovascular disease, and this differential balance of the RAS between the sexes likely contributes. With aging, this cardiovascular protection in women is lost and this may be related to loss of estrogen postmenopause but the possible contribution of other sex hormones needs to be further examined. Restoration of these RAS depressor pathways in older women, or up-regulation of these in males, represents a therapeutic target that is worth pursuing.
Normal sexual differentiation depends on completion of chromosomal sex determination, gonadal differentiation, and development of the phenotypic sex. An irregularity in any of these three steps can lead to a disorder in sexual development (DSD). We examined nine dogs with DSD by abdominal ultrasonography, laparotomy, histologic examination of the gonads, and reproductive tract, cytogenetic analysis, and mRNA expression of the SRY gene. We also determined the plasma concentrations of luteinizing hormone (LH), estradiol-17β, and testosterone before and after administration of gonadotropin-releasing hormone (GnRH) and compared these results with those obtained in anestrous bitches and male control dogs. The gonads of three dogs with DSD contained both testicular and ovarian tissue, while in the other six only testicular tissue was found. Each of the dogs had a uterus. Based on gynecologic examination, cytogenetic analysis, and the histology of the gonads, seven of the nine dogs appeared to be XX sex reversals. Three of these were XX true hermaphrodites and four were XX males; the other two dogs had incomplete XY gonadal dysgenesis. All seven XX sex-reversed dogs were found to be negative for the SRY gene by polymerase chain reaction. The basal plasma luteinizing hormone (LH) concentration was significantly higher in dogs with DSD than in anestrous bitches but not significantly different from that in male dogs. The basal plasma LH concentration increased significantly after GnRH administration in all dogs with DSD. The basal plasma estradiol concentration was significantly higher in dogs with DSD than in anestrous bitches but not significantly different from that in male dogs. The basal plasma testosterone concentration was lower in dogs with DSD than in male dogs. In all dogs with DSD both the basal and GnRH-induced plasma testosterone concentrations were above the upper limit of their respective ranges in the anestrous bitches. In conclusion, the secretion of LH and estradiol in these dogs with DSD, all of which had testicular tissue in their gonads, was similar to that in male control dogs. These results indicate that the basal and/or GnRH-stimulated plasma testosterone concentration might be used to detect the presence of testicular tissue in dogs with DSD.
An early investigation and management op cryptorchidism are essential for the diagnosis of associated pathologies, because intra-abdominal testis are associated with infertility and neoplasic risk. The authors describe a case of late presentation of cryptorchidism associated with genetic disorder.
Adolescent male with 17 years old, referred to Adolescent Clinic for short stature and bilateral cryptorchidism. Hypertension, short stature and bilateral cryptorchidism were detected in clinical evaluation. Bone age is coincident with chronological age and testosterone was slightly below normal values. The study of secondary hypertension was negative. He underwent bilateral orchidopexy, and histological analysis revealed severe bilateral testicular atrophy. The karyotype showed 45,X[15]/46,X,+mar.ish der(Y)(SRY+)[117] mosaicism.
With this case report the authors intend to enhance the need of early management of cryptorchidism and short stature, in order to improve the prognosis.
A Thoroughbred colt with ambiguous external genitalia was presented for clinical and histological examinations. The colt had a short penis that faced backward between his hind limbs. The measurements of luteinizing hormone, follicle stimulating hormone, testosterone and ir-inhibin showed a tendency to increase gradually from April. Both the sex-determining region of the Y chromosome and amelogenin gene fragments were detected by the PCR method. A cytogenetic analysis revealed the 63,XO/64,XY mosaic karyotype (ratio 83:17). In autopsy, immature symmetrical subcutaneous testes were found in the inguinal regions. The testes and other accessory sex organs were histologically normal. These results add to our knowledge of chromosomal abnormality and information concerning disorders of sex development in the horse.
The authors report a case of a dysgenetic male pseudohermaphroditism with a 45,X/46,XY karyotype in a mosaic form, which was diagnosed in an infant. The one-week-old infant was evaluated because of proximal hypospadias and retention of the right testis. The results of hormonal tests were the followings: serum FSH 5.2 mU/ml; LH: 2.0 mU/ml; testosterone: 144.3 ng/dl; androstendione: 0.42 µg/l; 17-hydroxyprogesterone: 1.12 ng/ml. Chromosomal analysis revealed 45,X/46,XY karyotype. Fluorescent in vitro hybridization showed that 51% of the lymphocytes had the Y chromosome and the SRY gene. Analysis of the SRY showed no deletion in the AZF a,b,c regions. Pelvic magnetic resonance imaging indicated the presence of vagina between the bladder and the rectum, and it showed a mass measuring 15×8 mm in the right inguinal canal as well as an oval gonadal mass with a size of 13×7 mm in the left scrotum. During surgical intervention, performed at the age of one, the right gonad was removed and biopsy of the scrotal testis was performed. Histological examination revealed dysgenetic testis in both sides. The authors emphasize the necessity of cytogenetic and endocrinological investigations of newborns with perineoscrotal hypospadia and bilateral or unilateral maldescent testes immediately after birth. Surgical removal of the dysgenetic testicular tissue located in the abdominal cavity and its histological evaluation provides separation of mixed gonadal dysgenesis, dysgenetic male pseudohermaphroditism, bilateral gonadal dysgenesis and ovotestis in the 45,X/46,XY mosaic cases. An accurate evaluation is necessary for a correct sex assignment and for surgical intervention to prevent neoplastic degeneration of the dysgenetic gonad.
To describe a rare case of 45,X Turner's syndrome with elevated T and clitoromegaly caused by ovarian hilus cell hyperplasia.
Case report.
Tertiary care pediatric hospital.
An 11-and-a-half-year-old girl with 45,X karyotype showed signs of accelerated growth and clitoromegaly and was found to have elevated serum T. Fluorescence in situ hybridization was used to confirm her karyotype as monosomy X and absence of the SRY gene. Elevated gonadotropins indicated absence of ovarian function.
Laparoscopic bilateral gonadectomy.
Serum T level.
Pathology showed ovarian hilus cell hyperplasia within the removed gonads. Serum T levels returned to normal after gonadectomy.
Ovarian hilus cell hyperplasia is an extremely rare cause of virilization in Turner's syndrome. Gonadectomy should be considered for patients with confirmed 45,X karyotype who exhibit virilization.
The renin-angiotensin system (RAS) is subject to sex-specific modulation by hormones and gene products. However, sex differences in the balance between the vasoconstrictor/proliferative ACE/ANG II/AT1 axis, and the vasodilator/antiproliferative ACE2/ANG-(1-7)/MAS axis are poorly known. Data in the rat have suggested the male-specific Y-chromosome gene Sry to contribute to balance between these two axes, but why the testis-determining gene has these functions remains unknown. A combination of in silico genetic/protein comparisons, functional luciferase assays for promoters of the human RAS, and RNA-Seq profiling in rat were used to address if regulation of Sry on the RAS is conserved in the homologous X-chromosome gene, Sox3. Both SRY and SOX3 upregulated the promoter of Angiotensinogen (AGT) and downregulated the promoters of ACE2, AT2, and MAS, likely through overlapping mechanisms. The regulation by both SRY and SOX3 on the MAS promoter indicates a cis regulation through multiple SOX binding sites. The Renin (REN) promoter is upregulated by SRY and downregulated by SOX3, likely through trans and cis mechanisms, respectively. Sry transcripts are found in all analyzed male rat tissues including the kidney, while Sox3 transcripts are found only in the brain and testis, suggesting that the primary tissue for renin production (kidney) can only be regulated by SRY and not SOX3. These results suggest that SRY regulation of the RAS is partially shared with its X-chromosome homolog SOX3, but SRY gained a sex-specific control in the kidney for the rate-limiting step of the RAS, potentially resulting in male-specific blood pressure regulation.
Mammalian sex determination hinges on the development of ovaries or testes, with testis fate being triggered by the expression of the transcription factor sex-determining region Y (Sry). Reduced or delayed Sry expression impairs testis development, highlighting the importance of its accurate spatiotemporal regulation and implying a potential role for SRY dysregulation in human intersex disorders. Several epigenetic modifiers, transcription factors and kinases are implicated in regulating Sry transcription, but it remains unclear whether or how this farrago of factors acts co-ordinately. Here we review our current understanding of Sry regulation and provide a model that assembles all known regulators into three modules, each converging on a single transcription factor that binds to the Sry promoter. We also discuss potential future avenues for discovering the cis-elements and trans-factors required for Sry regulation.
The Y-chromosomal gene SRY acts as the primary trigger for male sex determination in mammalian embryos. Correct regulation of SRY is critical: aberrant timing or level of Sry expression is known to disrupt testis development in mice and we hypothesize that mutations that affect regulation of human SRY may account for some of the many cases of XY gonadal dysgenesis that currently remain unexplained. However, the cis-sequences involved in regulation of Sry have not been identified, precluding a test of this hypothesis. Here, we used a transgenic mouse approach aimed at identifying mouse Sry 5' flanking regulatory sequences within 8 kb of the Sry transcription start site (TSS). To avoid problems associated with conventional pronuclear injection of transgenes, we used a published strategy designed to yield single-copy transgene integration at a defined, transcriptionally open, autosomal locus, Col1a1. None of the Sry transgenes tested was expressed at levels compatible with activation of Sox9 or XX sex reversal. Our findings indicate either that the Col1a1 locus does not provide an appropriate context for the correct expression of Sry transgenes, or that the cis-sequences required for Sry expression in the developing gonads lie beyond 8 kb 5' of the TSS.
Zona pellucida (ZP) proteins are glycoproteins synthesized in liver, ovary or in both tissues in fish. In the present study, we aimed to determine the responsiveness of ZP2 and ZP3 to 17α-ethinylestradiol (EE2) in adult rare minnow Gobiocypris rarus. The full length of ZP3 cDNA was firstly characterized and its tissue distribution revealed that ZP3 mRNA was predominantly expressed in ovary of G. rarus. The gene expression profiles of ZP2, ZP3 and vitellogenin (VTG) were analyzed in gonad and liver of adult G. rarus exposed to EE2 at 1, 5, 25, and 125 ng/L for 3 and 6 days. The results show that ZP2 is more sensitive than ZP3 in gonads of both genders, and VTG in liver is extremely sensitive to EE2 in male fish. However, at lower concentrations (1 and 5 ng/L), the ZP2 in testes shows higher responsiveness to EE2 compared with VTG in rare minnow. The 5' flanking regions of ZP2 and ZP3 were isolated and the comparison of transcription factors in the regions of ZP2 and ZP3 suggested that the disparity for the responsiveness of ZP2 and ZP3 to EE2 could partly be a result of differential cis-elements such as oocyte-specific protein (Osp1) binding sites or/and sex-determining region Y (SRY) binding site.
To provide a summary of the recent major advances in the field of molecular genetics and understanding of psychosexual development, as these developments have resulted in changes in terminology and classification of disorders of sexual differentiation (DSD)/intersex; and to provide a quick and simplified review of the basic information.
Recent publications (over the last 10 years) were identified by a PubMed search, as were relevant previous studies, using the keywords; 'sex chromosomes', 'psychosexual development', 'classifications', 'disorders of sexual differentiation', 'Chicago consensus', 'gonadal malignancy', 'intersex' and 'ambiguous genitalia'.
The newly proposed terminology and classification has eliminated some confusion for both patient and family, as well as among health professionals. The new advances have facilitated the categorisation of gonadal malignancy in patients with DSD into high-, intermediate- and low-risk groups.
The major changes in terminology and classification of DSD should be considered as the first steps on a long road of research effort. The current available data remain far from sufficient. More molecular genetics studies will allow a better understanding of the causes of each condition of DSD.
Patients with Disorders of Sex Development (DSD), especially those with gonadal dysgenesis and hypovirilization are at risk of developing malignant type II germ cell tumors/cancer (GCC) (seminoma/dysgerminoma and nonseminoma), with either carcinoma in situ (CIS) or gonadoblastoma (GB) as precursor lesion. In 10-15% of 46,XY gonadal dysgenesis cases (i.e., Swyer syndrome), SRY mutations, residing in the HMG (High Mobility Group) domain, are found to affect nuclear transport or binding to and bending of DNA. Frasier syndrome (FS) is characterized by gonadal dysgenesis with a high risk for development of GB as well as chronic renal failure in early adulthood, and is known to arise from a splice site mutation in intron 9 of the Wilms' tumor 1 gene (WT1). Mutations in SRY as well as WT1 can lead to diminished expression and function of SRY, resulting in sub-optimal SOX9 expression, Sertoli cell formation and subsequent lack of proper testicular development. Embryonic germ cells residing in this unfavourable micro-environment have an increased risk for malignant transformation. Here a unique case of a phenotypically normal female (age 22 years) is reported, presenting with primary amenorrhoea, later diagnosed as hypergonadotropic hypogonadism on the basis of 46,XY gonadal dygenesis with a novel missense mutation in SRY. Functional in vitro studies showed no convincing protein malfunctioning. Laparoscopic examination revealed streak ovaries and a normal, but small, uterus. Pathological examination demonstrated bilateral GB and dysgerminoma, confirmed by immunohistochemistry. Occurrence of a delayed progressive kidney failure (focal segmental glomerular sclerosis) triggered analysis of WT1, revealing a pathogenic splice-site mutation in intron 9. Analysis of the SRY gene in an additional five FS cases did not reveal any mutations. The case presented shows the importance of multi-gene based diagnosis of DSD patients, allowing early diagnosis and treatment, thus preventing putative development of an invasive cancer.
In most mammals, the Y chromosomal Sry gene initiates testis formation within the bipotential gonad, resulting in male development. SRY is a transcription factor and together with SF1 it directly up-regulates the expression of the pivotal sex-determining gene Sox9 via a 1.3-kb cis-regulatory element (TESCO) which contains an evolutionarily conserved region (ECR) of 180 bp. Remarkably, several rodent species appear to determine sex in the absence of Sry and a Y chromosome, including the mole voles Ellobius lutescens and Ellobius tancrei, whereas Ellobius fuscocapillus of the same genus retained Sry. The sex-determining mechanisms in the Sry-negative species remain elusive. We have cloned and sequenced 1.1 kb of E. lutescens TESCO which shares 75% sequence identity with mouse TESCO indicating that testicular Sox9 expression in E. lutescens might still be regulated via TESCO. We have also cloned and sequenced the ECRs of E. tancrei and E. fuscocapillus. While the three Ellobius ECRs are highly similar (94-97% sequence identity), they all display a 14-bp deletion (Δ14) removing a highly conserved SOX/TCF site. Introducing Δ14 into mouse TESCO increased both basal activity and SF1-mediated activation of TESCO in HEK293T cells. We propose a model whereby Δ14 may have triggered up-regulation of Sox9 in XX gonads leading to destabilization of the XY/XX sex-determining mechanism in Ellobius. E. lutescens/E. tancrei and E. fuscocapillus could have independently stabilized their sex determination mechanisms by Sry-independent and Sry-dependent approaches, respectively.
Schizosaccharomyces pombe, the fission yeast, cells alternate between P- and M-mating type, controlled by the alternate alleles of the mating-type locus (mat1). The mat1 switching occurs by replacing mat1 with a copy derived from a silenced "donor locus," mat2P or mat3M. The mechanism of donor choice ensuring that switching occurs primarily and productively to the opposite type, called directionality, is largely unknown. Here we identified the mat1-Mc gene, a mammalian sex-determination gene (SRY) homolog, as the primary gene that dictates directionality in M cells. A previously unrecognized, shorter swi2 mRNA, a truncated form of the swi2, was identified, and its expression requires the mat1-Mc function. We also found that the abp1 gene (human CENPB homolog) controls directionality through swi2 regulation. In addition, we implicated a cis-acting DNA sequence in mat2 utilization. Overall, we showed that switching directionality is controlled by judicious expression of two swi2 transcripts through a cell-type-regulated dual promoter. In this respect, this regulation mechanism resembles that of the Drosophila sex-determination Slx gene.
Sex determining region Y (SRY)-box 2 (SOX2) anophthalmia syndrome is an autosomal dominant disorder manifesting as severe developmental eye malformations associated with brain, esophageal, genital, and kidney abnormalities. The syndrome is usually caused by de novo mutations or deletions in the transcription factor SOX2. To investigate any potential parental susceptibility factors, we set out to determine the parent of origin of the mutations or deletions, and following this, to determine if birth order or parental age were significant factors, as well as whether mutation susceptibility was related to any sequence variants in cis with the mutant allele.
We analyzed 23 cases of de novo disease to determine the parental origin of SOX2 mutations and deletions using informative single nucleotide polymorphisms and a molecular haplotyping approach. We examined parental ages for SOX2 mutation and deletion cases, compared these with the general population, and adjusted for birth order.
Although the majority of subjects had mutations or deletions that arose in the paternal germline (5/7 mutation and 5/8 deletion cases), there was no significant paternal bias for new mutations (binomial test, p=0.16) or deletions (binomial test, p=0.22). For both mutation and deletion cases, there was no significant association between any single nucleotide polymorphism allele and the mutant chromosome (p>0.05). Parents of the subjects with mutations were on average older at the birth of the affected child than the general population by 3.8 years (p=0.05) for mothers and 3.3 years (p=0.66) for fathers. Parents of the subjects with deletions were on average younger than the general population by 3.0 years (p=0.17) for mothers and 2.1 years (p=0.19) for fathers. Combining these data, the difference in pattern of parental age between the subjects with deletions and mutations was evident, with a difference of 6.5 years for mothers (p=0.05) and 5.0 years for fathers (p=0.22), with the mothers and fathers of subjects with mutations being older than the mothers and fathers of subjects with deletions. We observed that 14 of the 23 (61%) affected children were the first-born child to their mother, with 10/15 of the mutation cases (66%) and 4/8 deletion cases (50%) being first born. This is in comparison to 35% of births with isolated congenital anomalies overall who are first born (p=0.008).
Sporadic SOX2 mutations and deletions arose in both the male and female germlines. In keeping with several genetic disorders, we found that SOX2 mutations were associated with older parental age and the difference was statistically significant for mothers (p=0.05), whereas, although not statistically significant, SOX2 deletion cases had younger parents. With the current sample size, there was no evidence that sequence variants in cis surrounding SOX2 confer susceptibility to either mutations or deletions.
CD133 has been recognized as a specific cell surface marker for cancer stem cells in various tumors, although its biological functions and transcriptional regulation remain unclear. We found that the CD133 expression level was up-regulated in the lung cancer cell lines N417, H358, and A549, when these cell lines were cultured under hypoxic conditions. Among the five promoters (P1-P5) of human CD133 gene loci, P1 promoter was most strongly associated with hypoxia-induced promoter activity of CD133 gene expression. The P1 promoter possesses several cis-regulatory elements, including RUNT, GATA, ETS, OCT, SRY, and CREB-binding sites. A series of deletion and base substitution mutants of the P1 promoter revealed that OCT- and SRY-binding sites are important for hypoxia-induced promoter activity. The chromatin immunoprecipitation assay further confirmed the direct binding of Octamer biding trans-cription factor 3/4 (OCT4) and/or SRY-box containing gene 2 (SOX2) to the P1 promoter region of CD133 gene loci. In addition, the enhancement of both OCT4 and SOX2 expression by the α subunit of hypoxia-inducible factors (HIF1α and HIF2α) was required for hypoxia-induced CD133 expression. Knockdown of OCT4 or SOX2 expression in N417 cells with stabilized HIF1α and/or HIF2α abolished CD133P1 activity, while ectopic OCT4 or SOX2 expression triggers CD133P1 activity in the absence of HIF1α or HIF2α. Thus, in the hypoxic conditions, OCT4 and SOX2, both of which are induced by HIF1α/HIF2α. promote CD133 expression in the lung cancer cells via their direct interaction with the P1 promoter.
Specific regulatory states, i.e., sets of expressed transcription factors, define the gene expression capabilities of cells in animal development. Here we explore the functional significance of an unprecedented example of regulatory state conservation from the cnidarian Nematostella to Drosophila, sea urchin, fish, and mammals. Our probe is a deeply conserved cis-regulatory DNA module of the SRY-box B2 (soxB2), recognizable at the sequence level across many phyla. Transphyletic cis-regulatory DNA transfer experiments reveal that the plesiomorphic control function of this module may have been to respond to a regulatory state associated with neuronal differentiation. By introducing expression constructs driven by this module from any phyletic source into the genomes of diverse developing animals, we discover that the regulatory state to which it responds is used at different levels of the neurogenic developmental process, including patterning and development of the vertebrate forebrain and neurogenesis in the Drosophila optic lobe and brain. The regulatory state recognized by the conserved DNA sequence may have been redeployed to different levels of the developmental regulatory program during evolution of complex central nervous systems.
A Bernese mountain dog was subjected for clinical evaluation due to the presence of ambiguous external genitalia (enlarged clitoris). Anatomical and histological studies revealed the presence of one testicle, one ovotestis and a uterus. This dog was classified as a female-to-male sex reversal, with 2 normal X chromosomes and a lack of the Y chromosome-linked genes SRY and ZFY. It is the first case of this syndrome in this breed. Apparently a Robertsonian translocation, rob(5;23), was also identified in this dog and it is again the first case of this type of chromosome abnormality in this breed, as well as the first case of co-occurrence of the sex reversal syndrome along with a centric fusion in the dog. Since on the canine chromosome 23 (CFA23) 3 genes (FOXL2,PISRT1 and CTNNB1) involved in the sex determination process are present, further cytogenetic FISH studies were carried out with the use of BAC probes specific for this chromosome. It was found that a pericentromeric fragment of CFA23 was deleted as a result of the centric fusion. We hypothesize that a cis regulatory sequence for the sex determination genes on CFA23 (e.g. proximally located CTNNB1) is present in the deleted fragment. Thus, a causative mutation responsible for this sex reversal syndrome may reside on CFA23.
The genome of a multi-cellular organism acquires various functional capabilities in different cell types by means of distinct chromatin modifications and packaging states. Acquired during early development, the cell type-specific epigenotype is maintained by cellular memory mechanisms that involve epigenetic modifications. Here we present the epigenetic status of the euchromatic region of the human Y chromosome that has mostly been ignored in earlier whole genome epigenetic mapping studies. Using ChIP-on-chip approach, we mapped H3K9ac, H3K9me3, H3K27me3 modifications and CTCF binding sites while DNA methylation analysis of selected CpG islands was done using bisulfite sequencing. The global pattern of histone modifications observed on the Y chromosome reflects the functional state and evolutionary history of the sequences that constitute it. The combination of histone and DNA modifications, along with CTCF association in some cases, reveals the transcriptional potential of all protein coding genes including the sex-determining gene SRY and the oncogene TSPY. We also observe preferential association of histone marks with different tandem repeats, suggesting their importance in genome organization and gene regulation. Our results present the first large scale epigenetic analysis of the human Y chromosome and link a number of cis-elements to epigenetic regulatory mechanisms, enabling an understanding of such mechanisms in Y chromosome linked disorders.
Individuals with rare cytogenetic variants have contributed to our understanding of the genetics of sex development and its disorders. Here, we report on a child with a de novo 12;17 translocation, 46,XX,t(12;17)(q14.3;q24.3) chromosome complement, resulting in SRY-negative 46,XX testicular disorder of sex development (46,XX DSD without campomelic dysplasia). The chromosome 12 breakpoint was mapped via array comparative genomic hybridization (aCGH) of a hybrid somatic cell line to 64.2-64.6 Mb (from the p arm telomere). The chromosome 17 breakpoint was mapped to 66.4-67.1 Mb, that is, upstream of SOX9. The location of the chromosome 17 breakpoint was refined by fluorescence in situ hybridization (FISH) at > or =776 kb upstream of SOX9. Thus, the 12;17 translocation removed part of the SOX9 cis-regulatory region and replaced it with a regulatory element from pseudogene LOC204010 or the next gene, Deynar, of chromosome 12, potentially causing up-regulation of the testis-determining SOX9 gene during gonadal development and the phenotype of 46,XX testicular DSD.
To gain further insights on the genetic divergence and the species-specific characteristics of the follicle-stimulating hormone receptor (FSHR), we cloned 946 bp of the 5'-flanking region of the FSHR gene from the volcano mouse (Neotomodon alstoni alstoni), and compared its features with those from other mammalian species. The sequence of neotomodon FSHR (nFSHR) gene from the translation initiation site to -946 is 74, 71, 64, and 59% homologous to rat, mouse (129/J), human, and sheep, respectively. The nFSHR 5'-flanking region exhibits new interesting putative cis-regulatory elements including those for the SRY transcription factor, which had not been previously related to the FSHR gene. The transcriptional regulation properties of nFSHR gene were studied in mouse Sertoli (MSC-1) and non-Sertoli (H441) cell lines, and compared with those obtained with similar 129/J constructs. All constructs tested were more active in H441 than in MSC-1 cells. The low transcription levels detected in MSC-1 cells probably reflect the recruitment of Sertoli cells-specific nuclear factors that repress transcription of the FSHR gene. In H441 cells, 129/J constructs were more active than their neotomodon counterparts, indicating important species-specific differences in their transcription pattern. Functional analysis of a series of progressive 5'-deletion mutants identified regions involved in positive and negative transcriptional regulation as well as the strongest minimal promoter spanning 260 bp upstream the translation initiation site. The identification of inhibitory nuclear transcription factors, which are apparently expressed in MSC-1 cells, may contribute to a better understanding of the transcriptional regulation of the FSHR gene.
Sox10, a member of the Sry-related HMG-Box gene family, is a critical transcription factor for several important cell lineages, most notably the neural crest stem cells and the derivative peripheral glial cells and melanocytes. Thus far, only a handful of direct target genes are known for this transcription factor limiting our understanding of the biological network it governs.
We describe identification of multiple direct regulatory target genes of Sox10 through a procedure based on function and conservation. By combining RNA interference technique and DNA microarray technology, we have identified a set of genes that show significant down-regulation upon introduction of Sox10 specific siRNA into Schwannoma cells. Subsequent comparative genomics analyses led to potential binding sites for Sox10 protein conserved across several mammalian species within the genomic region proximal to these genes. Multiple sites belonging to 4 different genes (proteolipid protein, Sox10, extracellular superoxide dismutase, and pleiotrophin) were shown to directly interact with Sox10 by chromatin immunoprecipitation assay. We further confirmed the direct regulation through the identified cis-element for one of the genes, extracellular superoxide dismutase, using electrophoretic mobility shift assay and reporter assay.
In sum, the process of combining differential expression profiling and comparative genomics successfully led to further defining the role of Sox10, a critical transcription factor for the development of peripheral glia. Our strategy utilizing relatively accessible techniques and tools should be applicable to studying the function of other transcription factors.
The Sry-related high-mobility-group box transcription factor Sox9 recruits the redundant L-Sox5 and Sox6 proteins to effect chondrogenesis, but the mode of action of the trio remains unclear. We identify here a highly conserved 359-bp sequence 10 kb upstream of the Agc1 gene for aggrecan, a most essential cartilage proteoglycan and key marker of chondrocyte differentiation. This sequence directs expression of a minimal promoter in both embryonic and adult cartilage in transgenic mice, in a manner that matches Agc1 expression. The chondrogenic trio is required and sufficient to mediate the activity of this enhancer. It acts directly, Sox9 binding to a critical cis-acting element and L-Sox5/Sox6 binding to three additional elements, which are cooperatively needed. Upon binding to their specific sites, L-Sox5/Sox6 increases the efficiency of Sox9 binding to its own recognition site and thereby robustly potentiates the ability of Sox9 to activate the enhancer. L-Sox5/Sox6 similarly secures Sox9 binding to Col2a1 (encoding collagen-2) and other cartilage-specific enhancers. This study thus uncovers critical cis-acting elements and transcription factors driving Agc1 expression in cartilage and increases understanding of the mode of action of the chondrogenic Sox trio.
Plasma high-density lipoprotein (HDL)-cholesterol level is a clinically important quantitative phenotype that widely varies among inbred mouse strains. Several genes or loci associated with plasma HDL-cholesterol levels have been identified on autosomes and the X chromosome. In contrast, genes or loci on the Y chromosome have not attracted significant attention hitherto. Therefore, we investigated the effects of the Y chromosome on plasma HDL-cholesterol levels in Y- chromosome-consomic (Y-consomic) mouse strains.
Plasma HDL-cholesterol level data from 16 Y-consomic strains demonstrated that the Y chromosome substitutions significantly altered plasma HDL-cholesterol levels, i.e., variations in the plasma HDL-cholesterol level could be partially explained by Y chromosome genes. We obtained the following results from the genotype data on 30 single nucleotide polymorphisms (SNPs), including nonsynonymous and synonymous SNPs and 9 polymorphisms in Sry: (1) Variation in rs46947134 of Uty was significantly associated with plasma HDL-cholesterol levels. (2) A CAG repeat number polymorphism in Sry was significantly associated with plasma HDL-cholesterol levels. (3) Strains with a certain haplotype of the Mus musculus domesticus-type Y chromosome had significantly lower plasma HDL-cholesterol levels than strains with a certain haplotype of the M. m. musculus-type Y chromosome.
The effect of the Y chromosome on plasma HDL-cholesterol levels was confirmed in the Y-consomic strains. We identified several variants associated with plasma HDL-cholesterol levels. Because the physiological significance of various Y-linked genes remains unclear, the results of this study will provide further insights into the functions of Y-linked genes in lipid metabolism.
Excess cardiovascular risk in men compared with women has been suggested to be partly explained by effects of the Y chromosome. However, inconsistent results have been reported on the Y chromosome's genetic influence on blood pressure and lipid levels. The purpose of the present study was to settle the question whether genetic variants of the Y chromosome influence cardiovascular risk factors using a large epidemiological cohort, the Suita study. Possible influences of the Y chromosome polymorphisms (Y chromosome Alu insertion polymorphism [YAP], M175 and SRY+465) on cardiovascular risk factors were assessed in 974 Japanese men. The frequency of the YAP(+) allele in our study sample was 0.31. The prevalence of hypertension tended to be higher in YAP(+) than in YAP(-) men, and this tendency was found to be stronger among men aged 65 years or older. Men with the YAP(+) genotype had higher levels of high density lipoprotein (HDL) cholesterol compared with those with the YAP(-) genotype, even after adjustment for age, body mass index, and daily ethanol and cigarette consumption (57.0+/-14.6 mg/dL vs. 54.2+/-14.2 mg/dL, nominal p=0.011, adjusted p=0.0062). However, these observed nominal associations disappeared after adjusting for multiple testing (Bonferroni). No association was detected between the YAP genotype and myocardial infarction. Similarly, none of the associations with M175 and SRY+465 attained significance when multiple testing was taken into account. In conclusion, Y chromosome polymorphisms (YAP, M175 and SRY+465) do not appear to be associated with cardiovascular risk factors in Japanese men. Studies using much larger sample sizes and/or additional independent samples will be required for definitive conclusions.
The effects of apolipoprotein (Apo) AI mimetic peptide synthesized from D- and L-amino acids on atherosclerotic lesion formation were investigated in low-density lipoprotein (LDL) receptor-deficient mice on a Western diet and in apoE null mice. In addition, their effects on the inflammatory changes induced in LDL-receptor mice fed a Western diet following influenza A infection were studied. When apolipoprotein AI mimetic peptides synthesized from either D- or L-amino acids were administered to LDL-receptor null mice, only peptides synthesized from D-amino acids were stable in the circulation and enhanced the ability of high-density lipoprotein (HDL) to protect LDL against oxidation. Administration of the peptide D-4F to LDL-receptor null mice and apoE null mice decreased lesion size. Additionally, in LDL receptor null mice after influenza infection, D-4F treatment increased plasma HDL levels and paraoxonase activity, and inhibited increased in LDL-cholesterol and peak levels of interleukin-6 post-infection. Injection of female mice with male macrophages, and subsequent measurement of the male 'sry' gene, revealed a marked increase in macrophage traffic into the aortic arch after infection that was prevented by administration of D-4F. This indicates that: (i) oral D-4F has powerful anti-atherosclerotic properties, and (ii) the loss of the anti-inflammatory properties of HDL after influenza infection in mice is associated with increased arterial macrophage traffic that can be prevented by administration of D-4F.
We reported that HDL loses its antiinflammatory properties during acute influenza A infection in mice, and we hypothesized that these changes might be associated with increased trafficking of macrophages into the artery wall. The present study tested this hypothesis.
D-4F, an apolipoprotein A-I mimetic peptide, or vehicle in which it was dissolved (PBS) was administered daily to LDL receptor-null mice after a Western diet and after influenza infection. D-4F treatment increased plasma HDL cholesterol and paraoxonase activity compared with PBS and inhibited increases in LDL cholesterol and peak levels of interleukin-6 after infection. Lung viral titers were reduced by 50% in mice receiving D-4F. Injection of female mice with male macrophages, which were detected with real-time polymerase chain reaction to measure the male Sry gene, revealed a marked increase in macrophage traffic into the aortic arch and innominate arteries after infection that was prevented by administration of D-4F.
We conclude that loss of antiinflammatory properties of HDL after influenza infection in mice is associated with increased arterial macrophage traffic that can be prevented by administration of D-4F.
Endothelial progenitor cells (EPCs) provide paracrine support to the vascular endothelium and may also replace damaged or senescent endothelial cells. Low numbers of endothelial progenitor colony-forming units (CFU-ECs) in culture are a predictive biomarker of vascular disease. We hypothesized that the number of CFU-ECs derived from maternal blood are decreased in women with preeclampsia compared to normal pregnancy.
Primigravid women with singleton normal (n = 12) or preeclamptic (n = 12) pregnancies were studied during the third trimester. The culture assay was performed using a pre-plating step to eliminate mature endothelial cells and nonprogenitor cells; colonies per well were counted and further characterized.
Colony numbers were fourfold lower on average in preeclampsia compared to control samples (P < 0.005). A majority of the cells comprising individual colonies were positive for both endothelial (Ulex europaeus lectin staining and acetylated low-density lipoprotein (LDL) uptake) and monocyte/macrophage (CD45, CD14, CD115) characteristics. The SRY gene was detected in CFU-ECs derived from umbilical cord blood samples from male fetuses but not in CFU-ECs from peripheral blood of mothers with male fetuses. Maternal plasma concentrations of the antiangiogenic factor, soluble fms-like tyrosine kinase-1 (sFlt-1) were elevated (P < 0.0001) whereas placental growth factor (PlGF) was reduced (P < 0.01) in women with preeclampsia, but these factors did not correlate with CFU-EC counts.
CFU-ECs derived from culture of peripheral blood mononuclear cells, a correlate of cardiovascular risk in nonpregnancy populations, are rarified in women with preeclampsia compared to normal pregnancy. PCR analysis is consistent with a maternal origin of these cells.
The phenotype in Turner syndrome (TS) is variable, even in patients with a supposedly nonmosaic karyotype. Previous work suggested that there were X-linked parent-of-origin effects on the phenotype.
The TS phenotype is influenced by the parental origin of the missed X chromosome.
This was a multicenter prospective study of TS patients and both their parents, determining parental origin of the X-chromosome, and characterizing the clinical phenotype.
Eighty-three TS patients and their parents were studied. Inclusion criteria were TS with karyotype 45,X or 46Xi(Xq). Four highly polymorphic microsatellite markers on the X-chromosome DMD49, DYSII, DXS1283, and the androgen receptor gene and three Y chromosome markers, SRY, DYZ1, and DYZ3.
The study determined the correlation between the parental origin of the X chromosome and the unique phenotypic traits of TS including congenital malformations, anthropometry and growth pattern, skeletal defects, endocrine traits, education, and vocation.
Eighty-three percent of 45,X retained their maternal X (X(m)), whereas 64% 46Xi(Xq) retained their paternal X (X(p), P < 0.001). Kidney malformations were exclusively found in X(m) patients (P = 0.030). The X(m) group had lower total and low-density lipoprotein cholesterol (P < 0.003), and higher body mass index sd score (P = 0.030) that was not maintained after GH treatment. Response to GH therapy was comparable. Ocular abnormalities were more common in the paternal X group (P = 0.017), who also had higher academic achievement.
The parental origin of the missing short arm of the X chromosome has an impact on overweight, kidney, eye, and lipids, which suggests a potential effect of an as-yet-undetermined X chromosome gene imprinting.
The critical role of monocyte recruitment in atherogenesis has been appreciated for some time. However, until recently, there have been no sufficiently sensitive methods for measuring rates of monocyte recruitment to the arterial wall in vivo. We have developed a novel highly sensitive method, based on the polymerase chain reaction, for quantitatively tracking DNA-marked monocytes and have adapted it for use in mice. We use the uniquely male gene, SRY:, on the Y chromosome as a gene marker. We transfuse monocytes from a male donor into a congenic female mouse, euthanize the mouse after 24 to 48 hours, and then quantify the arterial uptake of monocytes by quantitative polymerase chain reaction. This study describes the techniques used and their sensitivity and reproducibility and demonstrates the approach by assessing the effects of cytokines. In control low density lipoprotein receptor-negative mice, monocyte recruitment decreased slightly but significantly as lesions progressed. Intraperitoneal injection of a combination of tumor necrosis factor-alpha and interleukin-1 beta more than doubled the rate of monocyte recruitment into developing lesions. However, the response to the cytokines was much greater in younger mice with less advanced lesions than in older animals with more advanced lesions.
One type of anticancer vaccine relies on the administration of DNA constructs encoding one or multiple tumor-associated antigens (TAAs). The ultimate objective of these preparations, which can be naked or vectored by non-pathogenic viruses, bacteria or yeast cells, is to drive the synthesis of TAAs in the context of an immunostimulatory milieu, resulting in the (re-)elicitation of a tumor-targeting immune response. In spite of encouraging preclinical results, the clinical efficacy of DNA-based vaccines employed as standalone immunotherapeutic interventions in cancer patients appears to be limited. Thus, efforts are currently being devoted to the development of combinatorial regimens that allow DNA-based anticancer vaccines to elicit clinically relevant immune responses. Here, we discuss recent advances in the preclinical and clinical development of this therapeutic paradigm.
Intrauterine exposure to 5-AZA-2'-deoxycytidine (5-AZA-CdR) alters gene expression causing malformations, abnormal post-natal growth and altered reproductive capacity. To elucidate whether the phenomenon observed in 5-AZA-CdR in utero exposed male mice was a behavioral alteration, at gestation day (GD) 10, CD-1 pregnant mice were administered 1mg/kg i.p. of 5-AZA-CdR or saline solution. After parturition, the number and sex of pups were recorded. While litter size was not affected, the ratio of male to female offspring was altered in treated mice. To determine whether the phenotypic observation of male gender corresponded to the appropriate genotype, presence of Sry gene in 5-AZA-CdR F1 males was determined. At 3 months of age, the male sexual behavior test outlined by Chubb was conducted. Presence of vaginal plug and pregnancy were determined in the natural breeding phase. Mount latency and number of mounts per mouse were assessed in the behavioral test phase. In utero exposed male mice resulted in diminished mating behavior (as measured by vaginal plug presence, mount latency and number of mounts) and reduced sexual interest while exposed to a receptive female. While normal presence of Sry gene was observed, mating behavior was altered in exposed males suggesting that the reproductive alteration could be attributed to a behavioral phenomenon.
Fetal cells enter maternal circulation during pregnancy and persist in the woman's body for decades, achieving a form of physiological microchimerism. These cells were also evidenced in tumors. We investigated the frequency and concentration of fetal microchimerism in the local breast cancer environment. From 19 patients with confirmed breast neoplasia, after breast surgical resection, we collected three fresh specimens from the tumor core, breast tissue at tumor periphery, and adjacent normal breast tissue. The presence of male DNA was analyzed with a quantitative PCR assay for the sex determining region gene (SRY) gene. In the group of women who had given birth to at least one son, we detected fetal microchimerism in 100% of samples from tumors and their periphery and in 64% (9 of 14) of those from normal breast tissue. The tissues from the tumor and its periphery carry a significantly increased number of SRY copies compared to its neighboring common breast tissue (p = 0.005). The median of the normalized SRY-signal was about 77 (range, 3.2-21467) and 14-fold (range, 1.3-2690) greater in the tumor and respectively in the periphery than in the normal breast tissue. In addition, the relative expression of the SRY gene had a median 5.5 times larger in the tumor than in its periphery (range, 1.1-389.4). We found a heterogeneous distribution of fetal microchimerism in breast cancer environment. In women with sons, breast neoplasia harbors male cells at significantly higher levels than in peripheral and normal breast tissue.
Are Y-chromosome microdeletions associated with SHOX haploinsufficiency, thus representing a risk of skeletal anomalies for the carriers and their male descendents?
The present study shows that SHOX haploinsufficiency is unlikely to be associated with Y-chromosome microdeletions.
Y-chromosome microdeletions are not commonly known as a major molecular genetic cause of any pathological condition except spermatogenic failure. However, it has been recently proposed that they are associated not only with infertility but also with anomalies in the pseudoautosomal regions (PAR), among which SHOX haploinsufficiency stands out with a frequency of 5.4% in microdeletion carriers bearing a normal karyotype. This finding implies that sons fathered by men with Y-chromosome defects will not only exhibit fertility problems, but might also suffer from SHOX-related conditions.
Five European laboratories (Florence, Münster, Barcelona, Padova and Ancona), routinely performing Y-chromosome microdeletion screening, were enrolled in a multicenter study.
PAR-linked and SHOX copy number variations (CNVs) were analyzed in 224 patients carrying Y-chromosome microdeletions and 112 controls with an intact Y chromosome, using customized X-chromosome-specific array-CGH platforms and/or qPCR assays for SHOX and SRY genes.
Our data show that 220 out of 224 (98.2%) microdeletion carriers had a normal SHOX copy number, as did all the controls. No SHOX deletions were found in any of the examined subjects (patients as well as controls), thus excluding an association with SHOX haploinsufficiency. SHOX duplications were detected in 1.78% of patients (n = 4), of whom two had an abnormal and two a normal karyotype. This might suggest that Y-chromosome microdeletions have a higher incidence for SHOX duplications, irrespective of the patient's karyotype. However, the only clinical condition observed in our four SHOX-duplicated patients was infertility.
The number of controls analyzed is rather low to assess whether the SHOX duplications found in the two men with Y-chromosome microdeletions and a normal karyotype represent a neutral polymorphism or are actually associated with the presence of the microdeletion.
Men suffering from infertility due to the presence of Y-chromosome microdeletions can resort to artificial reproductive technology (ART) to father their biological children. However, infertile couples must be aware of the risks implied and this makes genetic counseling a crucial step in the patient's management. This study does not confirm previous alarming data that showed an association between Y-chromosome microdeletions and SHOX haploinsufficiency. Our results imply that deletion carriers have no augmented risk of SHOX-related pathologies (short stature and skeletal anomalies) and indicate that there is no need for radical changes in genetic counseling of Yq microdeletion carriers attempting ART, since the only risk established so far for their male offspring remains impaired spermatogenesis.
This work was supported by the Italian Ministry of University (grant PRIN 2010-2012 to C.K.), Tuscan Regional Health Research Program ('Progetto Salute 2009') to G.F., the Spanish Ministry of Health (grant FIS-11/02254) and the European Union 'Reprotrain' Marie Curie Network (project number: 289880 to C.K.). The authors declare that no conflicting interests exist.
Adult mice of the BALB/cLac, PT, CBA/Lac, DD/He, A/He, SWR, NZB, GR, DBA/2J, CC57Br, C57 B1/6J, A/Sn, and YT inbred strains were tested for the count, motility, and morphology of sperms from the caudal region of the epididymis. The protein-coding regions of the cytochrome P450 aromatase (CYP19a1), estrogen receptor 2 (ESR2), steroidogenic factor 1 (Nr5a1), and sex-determining (Sry) gene were sequenced. A substantial genetic heterogeneity for the genes was observed, as well as a phenotypic variation in spermatogenetic parameters, but the variation was rather discordant. The specifics of the interstrain variation in spermatogenetic parameters indicated that a physiological compensatory mechanism increases certain spermatogenetic parameters when other ones are low to maintain male fertility at a level sufficient for successful reproduction. For instance, a high sperm production compensated for a low sperm motility in DD/He males. In the issue of the protein-coding regions sequencing of the analyzed genes, 16 various mutations were observed. The decreases in proportion of motile sperms and in their velocity were attributed to mutations (I63T and W133L) of the Sry gene in the DD/He strain.
Clinical indications for fetal sex determination include risk of X-linked disorders, a family history of conditions associated with ambiguous development of the external genitalia, and some fetal ultrasound findings. It is usually performed in the first trimester from fetal material obtained through CVS and is associated with an approximately 1% risk of miscarriage. Ultrasound fetal sex determination is often performed after 11 weeks of gestation. This study aims to validate a reliable method for non-invasive prenatal diagnosis of fetal gender using maternal plasma cell-free fetal DNA (cffDNA) for fetal sex assessment in the first trimester of pregnancy and test its clinical utility in the diagnosis of potentially affected pregnancies in carriers of X-linked disorders.
In the validation study, blood samples from 100 pregnant women at 6-11 weeks of gestation were analysed. In the clinical study, 17 pregnancies at risk of having an affected fetus were tested. 7 ml of maternal blood in EDTA were obtained and cffDNA was extracted using a commercially available kit. DNA was enzymatically digested using a methylation sensitive endonuclease (AciI) to remove maternal unmethylated sequences of the RASSF1A gene. A multiplex PCR was performed for the simultaneous amplification of target sequences of SRY and DYS14 from chromosome Y, along with RASSF1A and ACTB sequences. Amplification of these loci indicates fetal gender, confirms the presence of cffDNA and allows assessment of digestion efficiency.
After establishing the appropriate experimental conditions, validation studies were successful in all 100 cases tested with no false negative or false positive results. Y chromosome-specific sequences were detected in 68 samples, and 32 cases were diagnosed as female based on the amplification of RASFF1A sequences only, in the absence of ACTB. In the clinical studies, fetal sex was correctly diagnosed in 16 pregnancies, and one case was reported as inconclusive.
Fetal sex assessment by detecting Y chromosome sequences in maternal blood can be routinely used from the 6th week of gestation. Reliable fetal sex determination from maternal blood in the 1st trimester of gestation can avoid conventional invasive methods of prenatal diagnosis.
To investigate the influence of partial deletions in the AZFc region of the Y chromosome on spermatogenesis.
We selected 9 sequence tagged sites (sY1258, sY1291, sY254, sY255, sY1201, sY1206, sY1161, sY1197 and sY1191) in the AZFc region of the Y chromosome, with ZFX/ZFY and SRY (sY14) as the interior control. We amplified by multiplex PCR the DNA of 160 patients with azoospermia or severe oligozoospermia that showed no microdeletion of the Y chromosome (the case group) and another 76 males with normal fertility (the control group). For the individuals suspected of DAZ gene deletion, we detected the single nucleotide polymorphism sites (SNPs) in the four copies of the DAZ gene by single nucleotide variation (SNV) analysis to determine the types of DAZ copy deletion.
In the case group, there were 10 cases of gr/gr (sY1291) deletion (6.3%), 14 b2/b3 (sY1191) deletion (8.8%), 1 sY1291,sY1197 deletion (0.6%), 1 b1/b2 deletion (0.6%) and 1 b1/b3 deletion (0.6%), while in the control group, there were 4 cases of gr/gr deletion (5.3%) and 4 b2/b3 deletion (5.3%). SNV analysis showed DAZ1/DAZ2 deletion in all those with gr/gr and those with b1/b3 deletion, DAZ3/DAZ4 deletion in those with b2/b3 deletion, and DAZ-SNV sY587 deletion in 1 case of sY1291, sY1197 deletion, but no DAZ deletion was found in 1 case of b1/b2 deletion.
B2/b3 (sY1191) and gr/gr (sY1291) deletions are genomic polymorphisms and quite common in the normal Chinese population; while b1/b2, b1/b3, and sY1291, sY1197 deletions may be high risk factors of dyszoospermia.
The most common genetic causes of spermatogenic failure are sex chromosomal abnormalities (most frequently Klinefelter's syndrome) and deletions of the azoospermia factor (AZF) regions (AZFa, AZFb, and AZFc) of the Y chromosome. Several studies have proposed that partial AZFc deletions/duplications may be a risk factor for spermatogenic impairment. We describe a multiplex quantitative fluorescent-polymerase chain reaction (QF-PCR) method that allows simultaneous detection of these genetic causes and risk factors of male infertility. The 11-plex QF-PCR permitted the amplification of the amelogenin gene, four polymorphic X-specific short tandem repeat (STR) markers (XHPRT, DXS6803, DXS981, and exon 1 of the androgen receptor gene), nonpolymorphic Y-specific marker (SRY gene), polymorphic Y-specific STR marker (DYS448), and coamplification of DAZ/DAZL, MYPT2Y/MYPT2, and two CDY2/CDY1 fragments that allow for determination of the DAZ, MYPT2Y, and CDY gene copy number. A total of 357 DNA samples from infertile/subfertile men (n = 205) and fertile controls (n = 152) was studied. We detected 14 infertile males with sex chromosome aneuploidy (10 with Klinefelter's syndrome, 2 XX, and 2 XYY males). All previously detected AZF deletions, that is, AZFc (n8), AZFb (n1), AZFb + c (n1), gr/gr (n11), gr/gr with b2/b4 duplication (n3), and b2/b3 (n5), gave a specific pattern with the 11-plex QF-PCR. In addition, 32 DNA samples showed a pattern consistent with presence of gr/gr or b2/b4 and 4 with b2/b3 duplication. We conclude that multiplex QF-PCR is a rapid, simple, reliable, and inexpensive method that can be used as a first-step genetic analysis in infertile/subfertile patients.
The Y chromosome evolves from an autochromosome and accumulates male-related genes including sex-determining region of Y-chromosome (SRY) and several spermatogenesis-related genes. The human Y chromosome (60 Mb long) is largely composed of repetitive sequences that give it a heterochromatic appearance, and it consists of pseudoautosomal, euchromatic, and heterochromatic regions. Located on the two extremities of the Y chromosome, pseudoautosomal regions 1 and 2 (PAR1 and PAR2, 2.6 Mb and 320 bp long, respectively) are homologs with the termini of the X chromosome. The euchromatic region and some of the repeat-rich heterochromatic parts of the Y chromosome are called "male-specific Y" (MSY), which occupy more than 95% of the whole Y chromosome. After evolution, the Y chromosome becomes the smallest in size with the least number of genes but with the most number of copies of genes that are mostly spermatogenesis-related. The Y chromosome is characterized by highly repetitive sequences (including direct repeats, inverted repeats, and palindromes) and high polymorphism. Several gene rearrangements on the Y chromosome occur during evolution owing to its specific gene structure. The consequences of such rearrangements are not only loss but also gain of specific genes. One hundred and fifty three haplotypes have been discovered in the human Y chromosome. The structure of the Y chromosome in the GenBank belongs to haplotype R1. There are 220 genes (104 coding genes, 111 pseudogenes, and 5 other uncategorized genes) according to the most recent count. The 104 coding genes encode a total of about 48 proteins/protein families (including putative proteins/protein families). Among them, 16 gene products have been discovered in the azoospermia factor region (AZF) and are related to spermatogenesis. It has been discovered that one subset of gene rearrangements on the Y chromosome, "micro-deletions", is a major cause of male infertility in some populations. However, controversies exist about different Y chromosome haplotypes. Six AZFs of the Y chromosome have been discovered including AZFa, AZFb, AZFc, and their combinations AZFbc, AZFabc, and partial AZFc called AZFc/gr/gr. Different deletions in AZF lead to different content spermatogenesis loss from teratozoospermia to infertility in different populations depending on their Y haplotypes. This article describes the structure of the human Y chromosome and investigates the causes of micro-deletions and their relationship with male infertility from the view of chromosome evolution. After analysis of the relationship between AZFc and male infertility, we concluded that spermatogenesis is controlled by a network of genes, which may locate on the Y chromosome, the autochromosomes, or even on the X chromosome. Further investigation of the molecular mechanisms underlying male fertility/infertility will facilitate our knowledge of functional genomics.
Chromosomal sex determination is a widely distributed strategy in nature. In the most classic scenario, one sex is characterized by a homologue pair of sex chromosomes, while the other includes two morphologically and functionally distinct gonosomes. In mammalian diploid cells, the female is characterized by the presence of two identical X chromosomes, while the male features an XY pair, with the Y bearing the major genetic determinant of sex, i.e. the SRY gene. In other species, such as the fruitfly, sex is determined by the ratio of autosomes to X chromosomes. Regardless of the exact mechanism, however, all these animals would exhibit a sex-specific gene expression inequality, due to the different number of X chromosomes, a phenomenon inhibited by a series of genetic and epigenetic regulatory events described as "dosage compensation". Since adequate available data is currently restricted to worms, flies and mammals, while for other groups of animals, such as reptiles, fish and birds it is very limited, it is not yet clear whether this is an evolutionary conserved mechanism. However certain striking similarities have already been observed among evolutionary distant species, such as Drosophila melanogaster and Mus musculus. These mainly refer to a) the need for a counting mechanism, to determine the chromosomal content of the cell, i.e. the ratio of autosomes to gonosomes (a process well understood in flies, but still hypothesized in mammals), b) the implication of non-translated, sex-specific, regulatory RNAs (roX and Xist, respectively) as key elements in this process and the location of similar mediators in the Z chromosome of chicken c) the inclusion of a chromatin modification epigenetic final step, which ensures that gene expression remains stably regulated throughout the affected area of the gonosome. This review summarizes these points and proposes a possible role for comparative genetics, as they seem to constitute proof of maintained cell economy (by using the same basic regulatory elements in various different scenarios) throughout numerous centuries of evolutionary history.
The regulation of normal sexual maturation and reproductive function is dependent on a precise hormonal regulation at hypothalamic, pituitary, and gonadal levels. The aim of this study was to investigate the neuroendocrine integrity of the pituitary-gonadal axis in patients with primary testicular failure due to supernumerary X chromosomes.
Cross-sectional study.
In this study, 7 untreated patients with primary gonadal insufficiency due to SRY-positive 46,XX (n=4) and 46,XXY karyotypes (n=3) aged 18.8 years and 25 age-matched healthy controls participated. Reproductive hormones, testicular size, and overnight LH and FSH serum profiles and overnight urine LH and FSH excretion were determined.
Basal LH and FSH secretion was elevated 6.3- and 25.4-fold respectively in the patients and the amount of LH and FSH secreted per burst were 2.0- and 6.6-fold elevated. We found significantly more LH but not FSH peaks per 24 h, as estimated by the Weibull lambda analysis. There was no difference between approximate entropy ratios or Weibull gamma analyses indicating comparable orderliness and regularity of LH and FSH secretion. Overnight urinary LH and FSH excretion was significantly elevated in patients compared with controls and correlated significantly with calculated total overnight LH and FSH secretion respectively, thus validating deconvolution.
In this group of patients with severe hypergonadotropic hypogonadism due to a supernumerary X chromosome, higher basal, pulsatile, and total LH and FSH secretion were associated with significantly more LH peaks per 24 h in comparison with healthy controls. Thus, our data indicate that in patients with Klinefelter syndrome and XX male karyotypes the entire hypothalamic-pituitary-gonadal axis has undergone functional changes.
Most true hermaphrodite patients--characterized by the presence of both ovarian and testicular tissue--demonstrate ambiguous genitalia and are diagnosed at birth, most commonly bearing a 46,XX karyotype.
We report on a 13-year-old boy presenting with left scrotal hemorrhage. He had a left inguinal hernia, a palpable testis in the right, normal male external genitalia and significant gynecomastia. During operation, the left gonad and adjacent tissue were removed for histological examination, which revealed the presence of a normal ovary, rich in follicles and a ruptured corpus luteum, suggestive of spontaneous ovulation, with a normal ipsilateral adnexa and semi-uterus. Biopsy of the right gonad revealed a dysgenetic testicle. Endocrinological assessment postoperatively depicted high FSH, pubertal testosterone and low estradiol levels. Cytogenetic analysis in peripheral blood lymphocytes and FISH of the right gonad revealed a 46,XX (70-60%)/47,XXY (30-40%) karyotype, respectively, while molecular analysis verified the presence of SRY and azoospermia factor genes.
The importance of full histological, cytogenetic and molecular investigation and of interdisciplinary approach in every single patient with sex differentiation disorders is highlighted by this rare case of spontaneous ovulation in a true hermaphrodite with normal male external genitalia and Klinefelter mosaicism.
Determining sexual fate is an integral part of reproduction, used as a means to enrich the genome. A variety of such regulatory mechanisms have been described so far and some of the more extensively studied ones are being discussed. For the insect order of Hymenoptera, the choice lies between uniparental haploid males and biparental diploid females, originating from unfertilized and fertilized eggs accordingly. This mechanism is also known as single-locus complementary sex determination (slCSD). On the other hand, for Dipterans and Drosophila melanogaster, sex is determined by the ratio of X chromosomes to autosomes and the sex switching gene, sxl. Another model organism whose sex depends on the X:A ratio, Caenorhabditis elegans, has furthermore to provide for the brief period of spermatogenesis in hermaphrodites (XX) without the benefit of the "male" genes of the sex determination pathway. Many reptiles have no discernible sex determining genes. Their sexual fate is determined by the temperature of the environment during the thermosensitive period (TSP) of incubation, which regulates aromatase activity. Variable patterns of sex determination apply in fish and amphibians. In birds, while sex chromosomes do exist, females are the heterogametic (ZW) and males the homogametic sex (ZZ). However, we have yet to decipher which of the two (Z or W) is responsible for the choice between males and females. In mammals, sex determination is based on the presence of two identical (XX) or distinct (XY) gonosomes. This is believed to be the result of a lengthy evolutionary process, emerging from a common ancestral autosomal pair. Indeed, X and Y present different levels of homology in various mammals, supporting the argument of a gradual structural differentiation starting around the SRY region. The latter initiates a gene cascade that results in the formation of a male. Regulation of sex steroid production is also a major result of these genetic interactions. Similar observations have been described not only in mammals, but also in other vertebrates, emphasizing the need for further study of both normal hormonal regulators of sexual phenotype and patterns of epigenetic/environmental disruption.
Sexual dimorphism, i.e. the distinct recognition of only two sexes per species, is the phenotypic expression of a multi-stage procedure at chromosomal, gonadal, hormonal and behavioral level. Chromosomal--genetic sexual dimorphism refers to the presence of two identical (XX) or two different (XY) gonosomes in females and males, respectively. This is due to the distinct content of the X and Y-chromosomes in both genes and regulatory sequences, SRY being the key regulator Hormones (AMH, testosterone, Insl3) secreted by the foetal testis (gonadal sexual dimorphism), impede Müller duct development, masculinize Wolff duct derivatives and are involved in testicular descent (hormonal sexual dimorphism). Steroid hormone receptors detected in the nervous system, link androgens with behavioral sexual dimorphism. Furthermore, sex chromosome genes directly affect brain sexual dimorphism and this may precede gonadal differentiation.
Intervertebral disc degeneration is the leading cause of chronic back pain. Recent studies show that raised level of SDC4, a cell-surface heparan sulfate (HS) proteoglycan, plays a role in pathogenesis of disc degeneration. However, in nucleus pulposus (NP) cells of the healthy intervertebral disc, the mechanisms that control expression of SDC4 and its physiological function are unknown. Hypoxia induced SDC4 mRNA and protein expression by ~2.4- and 4.4-fold (P<0.05), respectively, in NP cells. While the activity of the SDC4 promoter containing hypoxia response element (HRE) was induced 2-fold (P<0.05), the HRE mutation decreased the activity by 40% in hypoxia. Transfections with plasmids coding prolyl-4-hydroxylase domain protein 2 (PHD2) and ShPHD2 show that hypoxic expression of SDC4 mRNA and protein is regulated by PHD2 through controlling hypoxia-inducible factor 1α (HIF-1α) levels. Although overexpression of HIF-1α significantly increased SDC4 protein levels, stable suppression of HIF-1α and HIF-1β decreased SDC4 expression by 50% in human NP cells. Finally, suppression of SDC4 expression, as well as HS function, resulted in an ~2-fold increase in sex-determining region Y (SRY)-box 9 (Sox9) mRNA, and protein (P<0.05) and simultaneous increase in Sox9 transcriptional activity and target gene expression. Taken together, our findings suggest that in healthy discs, SDC4, through its HS side chains, contributes to maintenance of the hypoxic tissue niche by controlling baseline expression of Sox9.
We report isolation of novel splice variants of chicken Neuronal Per-Arnt-Sim domain protein 3 (cNPAS3) gene distinct from the previously predicted cNPAS3 at the 5' end. Newly identified cNPAS3 splice variants feature N-terminus coding sequences with high degrees of homology to human NPAS3 (hNAPS3). We also show that the alternative splicing pattern of NPAS3 is conserved between chicken and human. RNA in situ hybridization indicated that the expression of cNPAS3 in the developing central nervous system (CNS) is limited to the ventricular zone and only partially overlaps with that of chicken Reelin (cReelin), the only known regulatory target gene of NPAS3 in the adult brain. Overexpression of cNPAS3 by in ovo electroporation had little effect on the expression of Sox2, a marker for neural precursors, or of Isl1/2, a marker for early differentiating motor neurons. Taken together with the little effect of cNPAS3 overexpression on cReelin, it is noted that the function of NPAS3 in the developing CNS remains to be determined. Still, identification of proper cDNA sequences for cNPAS3 should represent a solid beginning of the understanding process.
Epidermal keratinocytes respond to extracellular influences by activating cytoplasmic signal transduction pathways that change gene expression. Using pathway-specific transcriptional profiling, we identified the genes regulated by two such pathways, p38 and ERK. These pathways are at the fulcrum of epidermal differentiation, proliferative and inflammatory skin diseases. We used SB203580 and PD98059 as specific inhibitors and Affymetrix Hu133Av2 microarrays, to identify the genes regulated after 1, 4, 24, and 48 h and compared them to genes regulated by JNK. Unexpectedly, inhibition of MAPK pathways is compensated by activation of the NFkappaB pathway and suppression of the DUSP enzymes. Both pathways promote epidermal differentiation; however, there is a surprising disconnect between the expression of steroid synthesis enzymes and differentiation markers. The p38 pathway induces the expression of extracellular matrix and proliferation-associated genes, while suppressing microtubule-associated genes. The ERK pathway induces nuclear envelope and mRNA splicing proteins, while suppressing steroid synthesis and mitochondrial energy production enzymes. Transcription factors SRY, c-FOS, and N-Myc are the principal targets of the p38 pathway, Elk-1 SAP1 and HLH2 of ERK, while FREAC-4, ARNT and USF are shared. The results suggest a list of targets potentially useful in therapeutic interventions in cutaneous diseases and wound healing.
Fine-tuning of the Wnt/TCF pathway is crucial for multiple embryological processes, including liver development. Here we describe how the interaction between Hhex (hematopoietically expressed homeobox) and SOX13 (SRY-related high mobility group box transcription factor 13), modulates Wnt/TCF pathway activity. Hhex is a homeodomain factor expressed in multiple endoderm-derived tissues, like the liver, where it is essential for proper development. The pleiotropic expression of Hhex during embryonic development and its dual role as a transcriptional repressor and activator suggest the presence of different tissue-specific partners capable of modulating its activity and function. While searching for developmentally regulated Hhex partners, we set up a yeast two-hybrid screening using an E9.5-10.5 mouse embryo library and the N-terminal domain of Hhex as bait. Among the putative protein interactors, we selected SOX13 for further characterization. We found that SOX13 interacts directly with full-length Hhex, and we delineated the interaction domains within the two proteins. SOX13 is known to repress Wnt/TCF signaling by interacting with TCF1. We show that Hhex is able to block the SOX13-dependent repression of Wnt/TCF activity by displacing SOX13 from the SOX13 x TCF1 complex. Moreover, Hhex de-repressed the Wnt/TCF pathway in the ventral foregut endoderm of cultured mouse embryos electroporated with a SOX13-expressing plasmid. We conclude that the interaction between Hhex and SOX13 may contribute to control Wnt/TCF signaling in the early embryo.
The amnion is the inner of two membranes surrounding the fetus. That it arises from embryonic epiblast cells prior to gastrulation suggests that it may retain a reservoir of stem cells throughout pregnancy. We found that human amniotic epithelial cells (hAECs) harvested from term-delivered fetal membranes express mRNA and proteins present in human embryonic stem cells (hESCs), including POU domain, class 5, transcription factor 1; Nanog homeobox; SRY-box 2; and stage-specific embryonic antigen-4. In keeping with possible stem cell-like activity, hAECs were also clonogenic, and primary hAEC cultures could be induced to differentiate into cardiomyocytic, myocytic, osteocytic, adipocytic (mesodermal), pancreatic, hepatic (endodermal), neural, and astrocytic (neuroectodermal) cells in vitro, as defined by phenotypic, mRNA expression, immunocytochemical, and/or ultrastructural characteristics. However, unlike hESCs, hAECs did not form teratomas upon transplantation into severe combined immunodeficiency mice testes. Last, using flow cytometry we have shown that only a very small proportion of primary hAECs contain class IA and class II human leukocyte antigens (HLAs), consistent with a low risk of tissue rejection. However, following differentiation into hepatic and pancreatic lineages, significant proportions of cells contained class IA, but not class II, HLAs. These observations suggest that the term amnion, an abundant and easily accessible tissue, may be a useful source of multipotent stem cells that possess a degree of immune privilege.
NG2-expressing cells are a population of periportal vascular stem/progenitors (MLpvNG2(+) cells) that were isolated from healthy adult mouse liver by using a "Percoll-Plate-Wait" procedure. We demonstrated that isolated cells are able to restore liver function after transplantation into a cirrhotic liver, and co-localized with the pericyte marker (immunohistochemistry: PDGFR-β) and CK19. Cells were positive for: stem cell (Sca-1, CD133, Dlk) and liver stem cell markers (EpCAM, CD14, CD24, CD49f); and negative for: hematopoietic (CD34, CD45) and endothelial markers (CD31, vWf, von Willebrand factor). Cells were transplanted (1 × 10(6) cells) in mice with diethylnitrosamine-induced cirrhosis at week 6. Cells showed increased hepatic associated gene expression of alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), Albumin (Alb), Glucose-6-phosphatase (G6Pc), SRY (sex determining region Y)-box 9 (Sox9), hepatic nuclear factors (HNF1a, HNF1β, HNF3β, HNF4α, HNF6, Epithelial cell adhesion molecule (EpCAM), Leucine-rich repeated-containing G-protein coupled receptor 5-positive (Lgr5) and Tyrosine aminotransferase (TAT). Cells showed decreased fibrogenesis, hepatic stellate cell infiltration, Kupffer cells and inflammatory cytokines. Liver function markers improved. In a cirrhotic liver environment, cells could differentiate into hepatic lineages. In addition, grafted MLpvNG2(+) cells could mobilize endogenous stem/progenitors to participate in liver repair. These results suggest that MLpvNG2(+) cells may be novel adult liver progenitors that participate in liver regeneration.
The autoantigen SOX-13 of the SRY-related high mobility group box is a low-frequency reactant in sera from patients with Type 1 diabetes. We further investigated the potential diagnostic role of anti-SOX-13, and in particular its ability to distinguish Type 1 from Type 2 diabetes, in two large, well-characterized cohorts.
SOX-13 autoantibody status was ascertained using a radioimmunoprecipitation assay in (i) a random sample of 546 participants in an Australian community-based study (the Fremantle Diabetes Study; FDS) of whom 119 had Type 1 and 427 Type 2 diabetes, and (ii) a sample of 333 subjects with Type 2 diabetes from the United Kingdom Prospective Diabetes Study (UKPDS) stratified by age, anti-glutamic acid decarboxylase (GAD) and islet cell antibody (ICA) status, and requirement for insulin therapy within 6 years of diagnosis.
The frequencies of anti-SOX-13 in the FDS subjects were 16.0% and 14.8% for Type 1 and Type 2 patients, respectively, and levels were similar. In the UKPDS subjects, the frequency was 4.5%. In a logistic regression model involving demographic, anthropometric and metabolic variables, only diabetes duration was significantly associated with anti-SOX-13 positivity, especially for duration > 5 years (P < 0.002). When the coexistence of autoantibodies was assessed in the two study samples, there were no significant associations between anti-SOX-13 and ICA, anti-GAD or ICA512/IA-2.
Whilst the frequency of anti-SOX-13 may be increased in some populations of diabetic patients, this reactivity does not usefully distinguish Type 1 from Type 2 diabetes. However, the association with diabetes duration suggests that anti-SOX-13 may be a non-specific marker of tissue damage associated with chronic hyperglycaemia.
SOX17 is a SRY-related high-mobility group (HMG) box transcription factor that is necessary for endoderm formation in multiple species. Despite its essential function during endoderm formation and differentiation, few direct targets of SOX17 are known. To identify targets of SOX17, we isolated SOX17 binding sites with a chromatin immunoprecipitation (ChIP)-cloning screen. SOX17-ChIP identified zinc finger protein 202 (Zfp202) as a direct target of SOX17 during endoderm differentiation of F9 embryonal carcinoma cells. A sequence in the first intron of Zfp202 activated transcription in differentiated F9 cells, and overexpression of Sox17 increased the transcriptional activity of this sequence. SOX17 binds to a site within this sequence in electrophoretic mobility shift assays, and mutation of this site decreases the transcriptional activation. Zfp202 is induced concomitantly with Sox17 during endoderm differentiation of F9 cells. We also show that ZFP202 represses Hnf4a, which has been reported for the human ortholog ZNF202. Identifying targets of SOX17 will help to elucidate the molecular basis of endoderm differentiation and may provide a better understanding of the role of endoderm in patterning the other germ layers.
Estrogen (17beta-estradiol, E2)-deficient aromatase knockout (ArKO) mice develop Sertoli and Leydig cells at puberty. We hypothesized that estrogen, directly or indirectly, regulates genes responsible for somatic cell differentiation and steroidogenesis. ArKO ovaries expressed estrogen receptors alpha and beta, and LH receptor, indices of estrogen responsiveness in the ovary. Wild-type (Wt) and ArKO mice received either E2 or placebo for 3 wk, from 7-10 wk of age. E2 decreased serum FSH and LH and increased uterine weights of 10-wk-old ArKO mice. We measured mRNA expression of Sertoli cell, Sry-like HMG box protein 9 (Sox9); three upstream transcription factors, liver receptor homolog-1 (Lrh-1), steroidogenic factor 1, and dosage-sensitive sex reversal adrenal hypoplasia congenital critical region on the X chromosome gene 1; and one downstream factor, Müllerian-inhibiting substance. Placebo-treated ArKO ovaries have increased Sox9 (15-fold; P < 0.001), Müllerian-inhibiting substance (2.9-fold), Lrh-1 (7.7-fold), and dosage-sensitive sex reversal adrenal hypoplasia congenital critical region on the X chromosome gene 1 (12-fold) expression compared with Wt at 10 wk. Steroidogenic factor 1 was similar to Wt. Consistent with increased serum T levels and Leydig cells in their ovaries, placebo-treated ArKO ovaries had increased 17alpha-hydroxylase, 17beta-hydroxysteroid dehydrogenase type-3, and 17beta-hydroxysteroid dehydrogenase type-1 expression compared with Wt at 10 wk. E2 treatment for 3 wk improved the ovarian phenotype, decreased development of Sertoli cells, decreased the expression of Sox9, Lrh-1, and the steroidogenic enzymes in ArKO ovaries, and induced ovulation in some cases. In conclusion, the expression of the genes regulating somatic cell differentiation is directly or indirectly responsive to estrogen.
We aimed to identify the genetic cause in a cohort of 11 unrelated cases and two sisters with 46,XX SRY-negative (ovo)testicular disorders of sex development (DSD).
Whole-exome sequencing (n = 9), targeted resequencing (n = 4), and haplotyping were performed. Immunohistochemistry of sex-specific markers was performed on patients' gonads. The consequences of mutation were investigated using luciferase assays, localization studies, and RNA-seq.
We identified a novel heterozygous NR5A1 mutation, c.274C>T p.(Arg92Trp), in three unrelated patients. The Arg92 residue is highly conserved and located in the Ftz-F1 region, probably involved in DNA-binding specificity and stability. There were no consistent changes in transcriptional activation or subcellular localization. Transcriptomics in patient-derived lymphocytes showed upregulation of MAMLD1, a direct NR5A1 target previously associated with 46,XY DSD. In gonads of affected individuals, ovarian FOXL2 and testicular SRY-independent SOX9 expression observed.
We propose NR5A1, previously associated with 46,XY DSD and 46,XX primary ovarian insufficiency, as a novel gene for 46,XX (ovo)testicular DSD. We hypothesize that p.(Arg92Trp) results in decreased inhibition of the male developmental pathway through downregulation of female antitestis genes, thereby tipping the balance toward testicular differentiation in 46,XX individuals. In conclusion, our study supports a role for NR5A1 in testis differentiation in the XX gonad.Genet Med advance online publication 04 August 2016Genetics in Medicine (2016); doi:10.1038/gim.2016.118.
ff1d is a novel zebrafish FTZ-F1 gene with sequence characteristics indicating similar basic regulatory mechanisms as the previously characterized ff1 based on the presence of an FTZ-F1 box in the DNA binding domain and an interactive domain (I-Box) and an AF-2 in the ligand binding domain. The highest sequence similarity was found between ff1d and ff1b (NR5A4), a gene previously shown to be a functional homolog to the steroidogenic factor 1 (SF-1). The expression pattern of ff1d was comparable to ff1b both in brain and gonads in adults and in the pituitary and interrenal cells in embryos. SF-1 is crucial in mammalian steroidogenesis and in sex determination by regulating the anti-Mullerian hormone (AMH). In fish, AMH has not been described previously. In this study, we cloned a partial zebrafish AMH. AMH was detected in growing oocytes, the ovarian follicular layer and testicular Sertoli cells, similar to the mammalian pattern, suggesting a conserved role between zebrafish and mammalian AMH. Teleosts lack a gene homolog to SRY, which constitute the universal testis-determining factor in mammalian sex determination. Comparison of sequences and expression patterns indicate that ff1d is a new candidate for sex determination and differentiation in a way similar to SF-1, possibly involving AMH.
The study of naturally occurring mutations in humans and induced mutations in mice that cause sex reversal has been instrumental in the cloning and functional analysis of genes involved in gonadal differentiation. Several genes required for this complex developmental process have now been identified. The genes LIM1, WT1 and FTZ-F1 have been demonstrated to be involved in the formation of the gonads prior to their differentiation as testes or ovaries. Subsequent sex-specific gonadal differentiation appears to be mediated by the SRY and SOX9 genes in the testis, and the DAX-1 gene in the ovary.
The sexual phenotype is established in three steps: (1) the sex chromosome constitution; (2) the differentiation of the gonads; and (3) the response of the internal and external genitalia to the hormones produced by the differentiated gonads. Errors that occur at any of these stages can result in defective sexual differentiation. Therefore the investigation of patients with abnormalities of testis development will help elucidate the mechanisms of sex determination and gonadal differentiation. It was in this way that SRY. the primary testis determining gene was identified. De novo mutations in SRY, result in gonadal dysgenesis by disrupting the DNA-binding activity of the SRY protein. However, only 20% of cases of gonadal dysgenesis, are explained by mutations in SRY or its flanking sequences. Therefore, there are several pieces to this puzzle yet to be discovered and it is hoped that mutation analysis of other genes implicated in gonadal development and differentiation may shed some light on aetiology of gonadal dysgenesis in the remaining 80% of cases.
Mammals have two genes (SRY and DMT1) for testis formation-androgenesis, an anti-testis gene, DAX1, an anti-Müllerian duct hormone, and steroid sex hormones. Drosophila uses the sex-lethal, transformer, and doublesex genes for sexual differentation and is supposed to lack sex hormones. However, the statement that insects do not have sex hormones loses much of its credibility if one considers (1) the classical endocrinological work on sexual differentiation in the firefly Lampyris and in the hevea tussock moth Orgyia; (2) the recent identification of an androgenic hormone and its role in sex determination in the isopod Armadillidium; (3) the similarity between steroidogenic factor 1 (SF-1) of mammals and fushi tarazu factor 1 (FTZ-F1) of Drosophila; and (4) the steroidogenic effect of gonadotropins secreted by the brain of female locusts and mosquitoes and of male gypsy moth. In our model, based on data from the literature, ecdysone, when present in high concentrations, might function as an androgenic sex steroid. It is also the precursor of 20-OH-ecdysone, which is the moulting hormone of insects, and in vitellogenic females of many species, the counterpart of estrogens as well. Other gender-specific hormones are likely to exist in the brain-gonad axis.
In mammals, the presence of SRY, the sex-determining gene located on the Y chromosome is required to induce the gonadal anlage to differentiate as a testis, whereas its absence leads to the development of an ovary. We report here the characterization by 5' and 3' RACE analysis of several SRY transcripts which are expressed in the ovine male developing gonads. These transcripts were not detected in any other fetal tissues and were expressed only in the genital portion of the urogenital ridge. The temporal profile of SRY expression analyzed by RT-PCR suggests that in the sheep fetus the role of SRY is not limited to initiating Sertoli cell differentiation as in mice. Indeed, SRY transcripts persist after the full differentiation of the testis. In addition to SRY, other genes are known to be involved in mammalian sex determination: Wilms' tumor gene WT-1, steroidogenic factor gene Ftz-F1 (SF-1) and anti-Müllerian hormone (AMH). We investigated the expression patterns of these genes by RT-PCR during fetal development in sheep gonads. Concerning WT-1 and SF-1, our results are consistent with those described in mice where the earliest expression was detected before the sexual differentiation in both sexes. In male, the ontogenesis of AMH transcription corresponds to the seminiferous cords formation (30 dpc). In female, we have observed the presence of SF-1 transcripts from the undifferentiated stage until birth. In addition, P450 aromatase expression is detected from 30 dpc and is correlated with the presence of 17-beta estradiol in sheep ovary. These data reveal significant differences between rodent and ruminant models concerning the sex-determining pathway.
During embryogenesis, most organ rudiments differentiate into only one type of organ and functional mutations are normally lethal for the embryo. However, the indifferent gonad has two options, to form either a testis or an ovary, and mutations of this tissue usually produce sex reversal or sterility which is not lethal for the individual. Therefore, gonadal development serves as an excellent model system for investigating questions of cell fate and organogenesis. The studies of human patients showing different types of sex reversal, in combination with the use of transgenic mice and/or gene targeting disruption, have led to the isolation of several genes important for sex development. These include SRY/Sry, encoding the testis-determining factor, Ftz-F1 encoding steroidogenic factor 1 (SF-1) and Wilms' tumor gene (WT-1). However, the mammalian sex differentiation pathway requires the function of a number of additional genes which we are now trying to identify with the help of mRNA differential display technique.
Three genes, SRY, ANT3, and CSF2RA, were mapped to the bovine Y chromosome (BTAY) by fluorescence in situ hybridization (FISH) and/or radiation hybrid (RH) mapping. FISH analysis indicated that the bovine SRY gene maps to the distal region of BTAYq, while ANT3 and CSF2RA are located in the pseudoautosomal region (PAR) of BTAYp and BTAXq. RH mapping with a 7000-rad cattle hamster whole-genome radiation hybrid panel further defined the ANT3 and CSF2RA position in relationship to previously mapped 12 PAR markers, and resulted in a relatively high resolution RH map for the PAR of BTAY.
The male-specific region of chromosome-Y (MSY) contributes to phenotypes outside of testis development and has a high rate of evolution between mammalian species. With a lack of genomic crossover, MSY is one of the few genomic areas under similar variation and evolutionary selection in inbred and outbred animal populations, allowing for an assessment of evolutionary mechanisms to translate between the populations.
Using next-generation sequencing, MSY consomic strains, molecular characterization, and large-scale phenotyping, we present here regions of MSY that contribute to inbred strain phenotypes.
We have shown that (1) MSY of rat has nine autosomal gene transposition events with strain-specific selection; (2) sequence variants in MSY occur with a 1.98-fold higher number of variants than other chromosomes in seven sequenced rat strains; (3) Sry, the most studied MSY gene, has undergone extensive gene duplications, driving ubiquitous expression not seen in human or mouse; (4) the expression profile of Sry in the rat is driven by the insertion of the Sry2 copy into an intron of the ubiquitously expressed Kdm5d gene in antisense orientation, but due to several loss of function mutations in the Sry2 protein, nuclear localization and transcriptional control are decreased; (5) expression of Sry copies other than Sry2 in the rat overlaps with the expression profile for human SRY; (6) gene duplications and sequence variants (P76T) of Sry can be selected for phenotypes such as high blood pressure and androgen receptor signaling within inbred mating; and most importantly, (7) per chromosome size, MSY contributes to higher strain-specific phenotypic variation relative to all other chromosomes, with 53 phenotypes showing both a male to female and consomic cross significance.
The data presented supports a high probability of MSY genetic variation altering a broad range of inbred rat phenotypes.
Cord blood (CB) and amniotic fluid (AF) could represent new and attractive mesenchymal stromal cell (MSC) sources, but their potential therapeutic applications are still limited by lack of standardized protocols for isolation and differentiation. In particular, chondrogenic differentiation has never been deeply investigated.
MSCs were obtained from CB and AF samples collected during cesarean sections at term and compared for their biological and differentiation properties, with particular interest in cartilage differentiation, in which quantitative real-time polymerase chain reaction and immunohistochemical analyses were performed to evaluate the expression of type 2 collagen, type 10 collagen, SRY-box9 and aggrecan.
We were able to isolate MSCs from 12 of 30 (40%) and 5 of 20 (25%) CB and AF units, respectively. Fluorescence in situ hybridization analysis indicated the fetal origin of isolated MSC strains. Both populations expressed mesenchymal but not endothelial and hematopoietic markers, even though we observed a lower expression of human leukocyte antigen (HLA) I in CB-MSCs. No differences in proliferation rate and cell cycle analysis could be detected. After osteogenic induction, both populations showed matrix mineralization and typical marker expression. Under chondrogenic conditions, pellets derived from CB-MSCs, in contrast with AF-MSCs pellets, were significantly larger, showed cartilage-like morphology and resulted positive for chondrocyte-associated markers, such as type 2 collagen, type 10 collagen, SRY-box9 and aggrecan.
Our results show that CB-MSCs and AF-MSCs collected at term differ from each other in their biological and differentiation properties. In particular, only CB-MSCs showed a clear chondrogenic potential and thus could represent an ideal candidate for cartilage-tissue engineering.
Adipose tissue-derived stem cells (ADSCs) have shown potential for the treatment of nerve injuries. Most previous efforts have aimed at stimulating regeneration by using neural-differentiation protocols, but the potential of undifferentiated ADSCs to enhance axonal growth as well as their ability to transdifferentiate in situ have been poorly investigated. In this study, using a rat sciatic nerve model we show that ADSCs, transplanted in an artificial nerve conduit, stimulate axonal outgrowth from the proximal nerve stump and evoke greater Schwann cell (SC) proliferation/intrusion in the distal stump. To track the fate of the transplanted cells, we used green fluorescent protein (GFP)-labelling and polymerase chain reaction (PCR) for the detection of the sex determining region Y (SRY) gene in the donor male cells. Both methods indicated a lack of significant quantities of viable cells 14 days after transplantation. These results suggest that any regenerative effect of transplanted ADSCs is more likely to be mediated by an initial boost of released growth factors and/or by an indirect effect on endogenous SCs activity. Future studies need to address long-term cell survival in tissue-engineered nerve conduits to improve the neuroregenerative potential of ADSCs.
Cytoplasmic degradation of c-fos protein is extremely rapid. Under certain conditions, it is a multi-step process initiated by calcium-dependent and ATP-independent proteases called calpains. PEST motifs are peptide regions rich in proline, glutamic acid/aspartic acid and serine/threonine residues, commonly assumed to constitute built-in signals for rapid recognition by intracellular proteases and particularly by calpains. Using a cell-free degradation assay and site-directed mutagenesis, we report here that the three PEST motifs of c-fos are not required for rapid cleavage by calpains. Testing the susceptibility of PEST motif-bearing and non-bearing transcription factors including GATA1, GATA3, Myo D, c-erbA, Tal-1 and Sry, demonstrates that PEST sequences are neither necessary nor sufficient for specifying degradation of other proteins by calpains. This conclusion is strengthened by the observation that certain proteins, reportedly known to be cleavable by calpains, are devoid of PEST motifs.
(O)estrogen receptor-alpha (ERalpha), a hormone-dependent transcription factor belonging to the steroid/thyroid-hormone-receptor superfamily, plays an essential role in the development and maintenance of the skeleton. Here we report the analysis of an unexplored sequence inside the bone-specific distal promoter F (PF) with respect to the regulation of ERalpha gene expression in bone. This sequence, 785 bp in size, is localized upstream of the assigned transcription start site of exon F, at -117140 bp from the originally described transcription start site +1. It contains a TA reach box, a conventional CAAT box and potential regulatory elements for many transcription factors, including Cbfa1 [OSE2 (osteoblast-specific element) core binding factor], GATA-1 [(A/T)GATA(A/G) binding protein], Sox5 [sex-determining region Y (SRY)-type HMG bOX protein, belonging to a subfamily of DNA-binding proteins with an HMG domain], Sry, AP1 (activator protein 1) and CP2 (activator of gamma-globin). It is able to strongly activate the luciferase reporter gene in MG-63 osteoblastic-like cells, but not in MCF7 breast-cancer cells. This is in agreement with different transcripts that we found in the two cell types. The footprinting and electrophoretic mobility-shift assays (EMSAs) showed that, inside the region analysed, there were some sequences that specifically reacted to nuclear proteins isolated from MG-63 cells. In particular, we identified two regions, named PF a and PF b, that do not present binding sites for known transcription factors and that are involved in a strong DNA-protein interaction in MG-63, but not in MCF7, cells. The analysis of three transcription factors (GATA-1, Sry and Sox) that might bind the identified footprinted areas suggested a possible indirect role of these proteins in the regulation of ERalpha gene expression in bone. These data provide evidence for different promoter usage of the ERalpha gene through the recruitment of tissue-specific transcription activators and co-regulators.
Spermatogenesis is a complicated process dependent upon several factors. Formation of a testis requires the interaction of gene-products and hormones (androgens) on pluripotent tissue. In birds, the female is the heterogametic (ZW) sex, but W chromosomal genes do not influence gonadal development in a way similar to the SRY gene on the mammalian Y chromosome. However, autosomal genes such as SRY-like HMG box gene 9 (SOX9) may influence gonadal development. Hormones affect development; male gonads subjected to estrogen form an ovotestis, whereas ovaries exposed to aromatase inhibitors form an atypical testis. Sertoli cell numbers are set early in spermiogenesis, possibly under the influence of follicle-stimulating hormone and thyroid hormone, and this may determine the number of gonial cells that can be supported. Sertoli cells make a number of substances that affect testicular development and function, particularly anti-Müllerian hormone, which inhibits female oviduct formation from the Müllerian anlage, inhibits aromatase activity to stop estrogen production, and possibly stimulates androgen production by Leydig cells. Undifferentiated primordial germ cells (PGC) migrate to the testis and are converted to spermatogonia by factors from gonadal ridge tissue and androgens. The PGC of males in the ovary form oocytes of Z genotype, whereas the female PGC in males form mostly Z sperm (with a few of W genotype). Transmission electron microscopy micrographs of turkey testis are presented, and control of spermatogenesis by hormones and cytokines is discussed. This discussion includes follicle-stimulating hormone, luteinizing hormone, inhibin, activin, follistatin, tumor necrosis factor-alpha, growth factors such as transforming growth factor-beta, interleukins, and interferon. Although information concerning paracrine and autocrine regulation of the avian testis by these substances is sparse, much can be learned from mammalian studies, in which putative roles of each of these substances have been established. How Sertoli cells cause directed apoptosis of spermatogonia using the Fas-ligand, Fas-receptor pathway is reviewed, as well as ways to circumvent this process. A possible role for ubiquitin concerning prevention of heat-induced damage to the testis is presented.
Sex differentiation in organisms is correlated to sex steroid production and receptor signaling pathways involving androgens and estrogens. Timing of expression is critical, and characterization of sensitive windows is needed to determine how environmental stressors may perturb sex differentiation. The objectives of this study were to determine whether genes related to steroid biosynthesis, steroid receptor signaling, and those related to sex differentiation were expressed in pre-differentiated fathead minnow (FHM) embryos, an ecotoxicological model. Transcripts were measured over two weeks (1 day post fertilization (dpf) to 14 days), prior to sex differentiation. The first three time points investigated (1, 3, and 5 dpf) corresponded to the neurula stage, dorsal swim bladder pigmentation, and pre-hatch. The fourth time point (6 dpf) was collected immediately post-hatch and the fifth time point investigated was after 8 days of larval growth (14 dpf). The majority of transcripts investigated, for example estrogen, androgen, and thyroid receptors as well as steroid biosynthesis transcripts, were expressed within the first 72 hours of development; exceptions were star (steroidogenic acute regulatory protein) and cyp19a, which did not have detectable expression until 5 dpf (pre-hatch). Transcripts that increased in relative mRNA abundance over the first two weeks of development included ar, dax1, hsd11b2, hsd17b, cyp19a and thra. This study demonstrates that there is early expression of transcripts related to steroid biosynthesis, steroid receptor signaling, and sex differentiation in pre-hatch FHM embryos. Additional studies are required to determine their relative roles in male and female differentiation during these early developmental periods.
This article describes a reliable and rapid method for simultaneous detection of a transgene and sex determination in the newborn mouse pups by PCR using three sets of primers in a single reaction. One set of sense/antisense primers is used to amplify the experimental transgene (androgen receptor gene in this case), the second set for the mouse Y-chromosome-specific SRY gene, and the third set for the beta subunit of the thyroid stimulating hormone (TSH beta), an internal control. This procedure allowed us to promptly analyze pups born from transgenic founders carrying the androgen receptor transgene and, at the same time, establish the sex of the animals. The method is simple, rapid and highly reproducible.
Dax-1 [dosage-sensitive sex reversal-adrenal hypoplasia congenita critical region on the X chromosome, gene 1 (NR0B1)] is an orphan nuclear receptor acting as a suppressor of Ad4 binding protein/steroidogenic factor 1 [Ad4BP/SF-1 (NR5A1)] and as an anti-Sry factor in the process of gonadal sex differentiation. The roles of these nuclear receptors in the differentiation of the gonads and the adrenal cortex have been established through studies of the mutant phenotype in both mice and humans. However, the mechanisms underlying transcriptional regulation of these genes remain largely unknown. Here, we examined the relationship between Dax-1 gene transcription and the Wnt4 pathway. Reporter gene analysis revealed that Dax-1 gene transcription was activated by beta-catenin, a key signal-transducing protein in the Wnt pathway, acting in synergy with Ad4BP/SF-1. Interaction between beta-catenin and Ad4BP/SF-1 was observed using yeast two-hybrid and in vitro pull-down assays. The region of Ad4BP/SF-1 essential for this interaction consists of an acidic amino acid cluster, which resides in the first helix of the ligand-binding domain. Mutation of the amino acid cluster impaired transcriptional activation of Dax-1 as well as interaction of Ad4BP/SF-1 with beta-catenin. These results were supported by in vivo observations using Wnt4 gene-disrupted mice, in which Dax-1 gene expression was decreased significantly in sexually differentiating female gonads. We thus conclude that Wnt4 signaling mediates the increased expression of Dax-1 as the ovary becomes sexually differentiated.
The mechanisms linking sleep disordered breathing with impairment of sleep and bone metabolism/architecture are poorly understood. Here, we explored the role of the neuropeptide orexin, a respiratory homeostasis modulator, in growth retardation induced in an upper airway obstructed (AO) rat model.
The tracheae of 22-day-old rats were narrowed; AO and sham-control animals were monitored for 5 to 7 w. Growth parameters, food intake, sleep/wake activity, and serum hormones were measured. After euthanasia, growth plate (GP) histology, morphometry, orexin receptors (OXR), and related mediators were analyzed. The effect of dual orexin receptor antagonist (almorexant 300 mg/kg) on sleep and GP histology were also investigated.
The AO group slept 32% less; the time spent in slow wave and paradoxical sleep during light period and slow wave activity was reduced. The AO group gained 46% less body weight compared to the control group, despite elevated food intake; plasma ghrelin increased by 275% and leptin level decreased by 44%. The impediment of bone elongation and bone mass was followed by a 200% increase in OX1R and 38% reduction of local GP ghrelin proteins and growth hormone secretagogue receptor 1a. Sry-related transcription factor nine (Sox9), a molecule mediating cartilage ossification, was downregulated and the level of transcription factor peroxisome proliferator-activated receptor gamma was upregulated, explaining the bone architecture abnormalities. Administration of almorexant restored sleep and improved GP width in AO animals.
In AO animals, enhanced expression of orexin and OX1R plays a role in respiratory induced sleep and growth abnormalities.
Wnt signaling pathway activation plays a critical role in biological processes of tumor progression. SOX9 belongs to the sry-related high-mobility group box (SOX) family and is a key transcription factor in the development and differentiation of multiple cell lineages. The purpose of this study was to investigate whether suppression of Wnt signaling pathway by PPARγ gene affects target SOX9 gene expression. The pEGFP-N1-PPARγ overexpression recombinant plasmid was structured by molecular biology technology. The overexpression plasmid and empty vector pEGFP-N1 were transfected into three types of human gastric cancer cell lines, with different levels of differentiation, MKN-28, SGC-7901 and BGC-823. The PPARγ, β-catenin and SOX9 mRNA levels and proteins were examined by real-time PCR and Western blot analysis. The pEGFP-N1-PPARγ recombinant plasmid was constructed and transfected into MKN-28, SGC-7901 and BGC-823 successfully. High expression of PPARγ (p < 0.05) for transfection recombinant plasmid group induced obviously decreased expression of β-catenin (p < 0.05), whereas SOX9 expression decreased significantly (p < 0.05) compared with the transfection empty vector group and normal comparison group. PPARγ can suppress β-catenin expression in Wnt signaling pathway and its downstream effector SOX9 expression in gastric cancer cells.
Brain tumour stem cells (BTSCs) are a small population of cancer cells that exhibit self-renewal, multi-drug resistance, and recurrence properties. We have shown earlier that peroxisome proliferator-activated receptor gamma (PPARγ) agonists inhibit the expansion of BTSCs in T98G and U87MG glioma. In this study, we analysed the influence of PPARγ agonists on the expression of stemness and differentiation genes in BTSCs.
The BTSCs were isolated from T98G and DB29 glioma cells, and cultured in neurobasal medium with epidermal growth factor+basic fibroblast growth factor. Proliferation was measured by WST-1 (4-[3-(4-iodophenyl)-2-(4-nitrophenyl)-2 H-5-tetrazolio]-1,3-benzene disulphonate) and 3H thymidine uptake assays, and gene expression was analysed by quantitative reverse--transcription PCR and Taqman array. The expression of CD133, SRY box 2, and nanog homeobox (Nanog) was also evaluated by western blotting, immunostaining, and flow cytometry.
We found that PPARγ agonists, ciglitazone and 15-deoxy-Δ(12,14)-ProstaglandinJ(2), inhibited cell viability and proliferation of T98G- and DB29-BTSCs. The PPARγ agonists reduced the expansion of CD133(+) BTSCs and altered the expression of stemness and differentiation genes. They also inhibited Sox2 while enhancing Nanog expression in BTSCs.
These findings highlight that PPARγ agonists inhibit BTSC proliferation in association with altered expression of Sox2, Nanog, and other stemness genes. Therefore, targeting stemness genes in BTSCs could be a novel strategy in the treatment of glioblastoma.
PBP (peroxisome-proliferator-activated receptor-binding protein) [Med1 (mediator 1)/TRAP220 (thyroid-hormone-receptor-associated protein 220)] is essential for mammary gland development. We established a mammary epithelial cell line with a genotype of PBPLoxP/LoxP by expressing an active form of Notch4. Null mutation of PBP caused severe growth inhibition of the Notch4-immortalized mammary cells. We found that truncated PBP without the two LXXLL motifs could reverse the growth inhibition due to the deficiency of endogenous PBP, indicating that signalling through nuclear receptors is unlikely to be responsible for the growth inhibition as the result of PBP deficiency. Loss of PBP expression was shown to completely ablate the expression of SOX10 [Sry-related HMG (high-mobility group) box gene 10]. The re-expression of SOX10 was capable of reversing the growth inhibition due to PBP deficiency, whereas suppressed expression of SOX10 inhibited the growth of Notch4-immortalized mammary cells. Further studies revealed PBP is directly recruited to the enhancer of the SOX10 gene, indicating that SOX10 is a direct target gene of PBP. We conclude that PBP is essential for the growth of Notch4-immortalized mammary cells by activating SOX10 expression, providing a potential molecular mechanism through which PBP regulates the growth of mammary stem/progenitor cells.
MicroRNA-124 contributes to neurogenesis through regulating its targets, but its expression both in the brain of Huntington's disease mouse models and patients is decreased. However, the effects of microRNA-124 on the progression of Huntington's disease have not been reported. Results from this study showed that microRNA-124 increased the latency to fall for each R6/2 Huntington's disease transgenic mouse in the rotarod test. 5-Bromo-2'-deoxyuridine (BrdU) staining of the striatum shows an increase in neurogenesis. In addition, brain-derived neurotrophic factor and peroxisome proliferator-activated receptor gamma coactivator 1-alpha protein levels in the striatum were increased and SRY-related HMG box transcription factor 9 protein level was decreased. These findings suggest that microRNA-124 slows down the progression of Huntington's disease possibly through its important role in neuronal differentiation and survival.
The peroxisome proliferator-activated receptor gamma coactivator-1 alpha protein, encoded by the PPARGC1A gene, plays an important role in energy homeostasis. The genetic variations within the PPARGC1A gene promoter region were scanned in 808 Chinese native bovines belonging to three cattle breeds and yaks. A total of 6 SNPs and one 4 bp insertion variation in the promoter region of the bovine PPARGC1A gene were identified: SNP -259 T>A, -301_-298insCTTT, -915 A>G, -1175 T>G, -1590 C>T, -1665 C>T and -1690 G>A, which are in the binding sites of some important transcription factors: sex-determining region Y (SRY), myeloid-specific zinc finger-1 (MZF-1) and octamer factor 1(Oct-1). It is expected that these polymorphisms may regulate PPARGC1A gene transcription and might have consequences at a regulatory level.
Chondrogenesis is a multistep pathway in which multipotential mesenchymal stem cells (MSC) differentiate into chondrocytes. The transcription factor Sox9 (SRY-related high mobility group-Box gene 9) regulates chondrocyte differentiation and cartilage-specific expression of genes, such as Col2a1 (collagen type II alpha1). However, Sox9 expression is detected not only in chondrogenic tissue but also in nonchondrogenic tissues, suggesting the existence of a molecular partner(s) required for Sox9 to control chondrogenesis and chondrogenic gene expression. Here, we report identification of peroxisome proliferator-activated receptor gamma co-activator 1alpha (PGC-1alpha) as a coactivator for Sox9 during chondrogenesis. Expression of PGC-1alpha is induced at chondrogenesis sites during mouse embryonic limb development and during chondrogenesis in human MSC cultures. PGC-1alpha directly interacts with Sox9 and promotes Sox9-dependent transcriptional activity, suggesting that PGC-1alpha acts as a transcriptional coactivator for Sox9. Consistent with this finding, PGC-1alpha disruption in MSC by small interfering RNA inhibits Col2a1 expression during chondrogenesis. Furthermore, overexpression of both PGC-1alpha and Sox9 induced expression of chondrogenic genes, including Col2a1, followed by chondrogenesis in the MSC and developing chick limb. Together, our results suggest a transcriptional mechanism for chondrogenesis that is coordinated by PGC-1alpha.
A recent paper demonstrated that decellularized extracellular matrix (DECM) deposited by synovium-derived stem cells (SDSCs), especially from fetal donors, could rejuvenate human adult SDSCs in both proliferation and chondrogenic potential, in which expanded cells and corresponding culture substrate (such as DECM) were found to share a mutual reaction in both elasticity and protein profiles (see ref. (1) ). It seems that young DECM may assist in the development of culture strategies that optimize proliferation and maintain "stemness" of mesenchymal stem cells (MSCs), helping to overcome one of the primary difficulties in MSC-based regenerative therapies. In this paper, the effects of age on the proliferative capacity and differentiation potential of MSCs are reviewed, along with the ability of DECM from young cells to rejuvenate old cells. In an effort to highlight some of the potential molecular mechanisms responsible for this phenomenon, we discuss age-related changes to extracellular matrix (ECM)'s physical properties and chemical composition.
We recently used three XO male mouse models with varying Y short-arm (Yp) gene complements, analysed at 30 days post partum, to demonstrate a Yp gene requirement for the apoptotic elimination of spermatocytes with a univalent X chromosome at the first meiotic metaphase. The three mouse models were i) XSxr(a)O in which the Yp-derived Tp(Y)1Ct(Sxr-a) sex reversal factor provides an almost complete Yp gene complement, ii) XSxr(b)O,Eif2s3y males in which Tp(Y)1Ct(Sxr-b) has a deletion completely or partially removing eight Yp genes - the Yp gene Eif2s3y has been added as a transgene to support spermatogonial proliferation, and iii) XOSry,Eif2s3y males in which the Sry transgene directs gonad development along the male pathway. In this study, we have used the same mouse models analysed at 6 weeks of age to investigate potential Yp gene involvement in spermiogenesis. We found that all three mouse models produce haploid and diploid spermatids and that the diploid spermatids showed frequent duplication of the developing acrosomal cap during the early stages. However, only in XSxr(a)O males did spermiogenesis continue to completion. Most strikingly, in XOSry,Eif2s3y males, spermatid development arrested at round spermatid step 7 so that no sperm head restructuring or tail development was observed. In contrast, in XSxr(b)O,Eif2s3y males, spermatids with substantial sperm head and tail morphogenesis could be easily found, although this was delayed compared with XSxr(a)O. We conclude that Sxr(a) (and therefore Yp) includes genetic information essential for sperm morphogenesis and that this is partially retained in Sxr(b).
Gonads are the only organs with 2 possible developmental pathways, testis or ovary. A consequence of this unique feature is that mutations in genes controlling gonad development give rise not only to gonadal malformation or dysfunction but also to frequent cases of sex reversal, including XY females, XX males and intersexes. Most of our current knowledge on mammalian sex determination, the genetic process by which the gonadal primordia are committed to differentiate as either testes or ovaries, has derived mainly from the study of sex-reversed mice obtained by direct genetic manipulation. However, there are also numerous cases of natural exceptions to normal gonad development which have been described in a variety of mammals, including both domestic and wild species. Here, we review the most relevant cases of: (1) natural, non-induced sex reversal and intersexuality described in laboratory rodents, including Sxr and B6-Y(DOM) mice; (2) sex reversal in domestic animals, including freemartinism in bovids and pigs, XX sex reversal in pigs, goats and dogs, XY sex reversal in the horse, and sex chromosome chimerism and sex reversal in the cat, and (3) sex reversal in wild mammals, including the generalised true hermaphroditism described in talpid moles, XY sex reversal in Akodon, Microtus and Dicrostonyx species, males lacking a Y chromosome and SRY in Ellobius lutescens, the X* chromosome of Myopus schisticolor, and sex chromosome mosaicism and X0 females in Microtus oregoni. These studies are necessary to elucidate particular aspects of mammalian gonad development in some instances and to understand how the genetic mechanisms controlling gonad development have evolved.
During male but not female mammalian meiosis, there is efficient apoptotic elimination of cells with unpaired (univalent) chromosomes at the first meiotic metaphase (MI) [1]. Apoptotic elimination of MI spermatocytes is seen in response to the univalent X chromosome of XSxr(a)O male mice [2], in which the X chromosome carries Sxr(a) [3, 4], the Y-chromosome-derived sex-reversal factor that includes the testis determinant Sry. Sxr(b) is an Sxr(a)-derived variant in which a deletion has removed six Y short-arm genes and created a Zfy2/Zfy1 fusion gene spanning the deletion breakpoint [4, 5]. XSxr(b)O males have spermatogonial arrest that can be overcome by the re-addition of Eif2s3y from the deletion as a transgene; however, XSxr(b)OEif2s3y transgenic males do not show the expected elimination of MI spermatocytes in response to the univalent [6]. Here we show that these XSxr(b)OEif2s3y males have an impaired apoptotic response with completion of the first meiotic division, but there is no second meiotic division. We then show that Zfy2 (but not the closely related Zfy1) is sufficient to reinstate the apoptotic response to the X univalent. These findings provide further insight into the basis for the much lower transmission of chromosomal errors originating at the first meiotic division in men than in women [7].
Investigations in mice suggest that the Y-chromosomal genes affect certain behaviors. Here, we studied whether a part of the Y chromosome, the Sxr locus, has an effect on induction of motivation for parental care (pup retrieval) or of parental aggression towards pups (infanticide). XX females, XX males with the Sxr locus on the X chromosome, and XY males of the C57BL/6J strain were tested. The induced pup retrieval or infanticide behaviors were genotype-dependent. XX mice always retrieved pups and never were infanticidal. On the first test, significantly more XY males (38%) than XX males (17%) were infanticidal. When the same animals were tested for a second time, all except one of the XX males retrieved pups. Overall, motivation for parental care was highest in XX females, followed by XX males, and lowest in XY mice. On the other hand, the incidence of infanticide was highest in XY males, lower in XX males, and absent in XX females. We conclude that the Sxr locus of the Y chromosome, when operating in a XX background, partially erases but does not fully defeminize motivation for pup retrieval. Further, it induces infanticide to a level higher than that of XX females but significantly lower than that of normal males (XY). Hence, we suggest that genes outside the sex-determining region of the Y chromosome and/or genes on autosomes are necessary for manifestation of full male-type parental behavior.
The sex-reversed mutation Sxr results in XX males. In the absence of any other mutations, testis differentiation in XXSxr fetuses is essentially normal and only one report of an XXSxr fetus with ovotestes is in the literature. We report that 84% (21/25) of 13 days postcoitum XXSxr fetuses on the B6 inbred genomic background have ovotestes. Ovotestes were found in fetuses from both Sxra and Sxrb variants. Examination of fetuses older than 13 dpc suggests that the presence of ovotestes is transient in most fetuses. However, one overt hermaphrodite was identified after birth. The development of ovotestes is associated with the inbred background and is exacerbated by the dominant spotting oncogene allele KitW-42J. We propose that spreading of X-inactivation into the Sxr region resulting in loss of Sry expression is more extensive in B6-Sxr strains.
We earlier described three lines of sex-reversed XY female mice deleted for sequences believed close to the testes-determining gene (Sry) on the Y chromosome short arm (Yp). The original sex-reversed females appeared among the offspring of XY males that carried the Yp duplication Sxr on their X chromosome. Earlier cytogenetic observations had suggested that the deletions resulted from asymmetrical meiotic recombination between the Y and the homologous Sxr region, but no direct evidence for this hypothesis was available. We have now analyzed the offspring of XSxr/Y males carrying an evolutionarily divergent Mus musculus domesticus Y chromosome, which permits detection and characterization of such recombination events. This analysis has enabled the derivation of a recombination map of Yp and Sxr, also demonstrating the orientation of Yp with respect to the Y centromere. The mapping data have established that Rbm, the murine homologue of a gene family cloned from the human Y chromosome, lies between Sry and the centromere. Analysis of two additional XY female lines shows that asymmetrical Yp-Sxr recombination leading to XY female sex reversal results in deletion of Rbm sequences. The deletions bring Sry closer to Y centromere, consistent with the hypothesis that position-effect inactivation of Sry is the basis for the sex reversal.
XYSxr (Sex reversal) mice carry a Y chromosome in which the chromatin (including Sry, the gene for testis determination) that normally resides on the short arm is duplicated and the second copy is relocated to the distal end of the long arm. Multicolor in situ hybridization to mitotic chromosomes of XYSxr males using probes for the telomere repeat sequence (TTAGGG)n and Sry shows that the rearranged chromatin is located distal to the telomeric signal. This suggests that the rearrangement arose from a recombination event involving the distal Y telomere sequences, i.e., within the telomere, a structure historically assumed to be incapable of participating in chromosome rearrangements.
The Sxr (sex-reversed) region, a fragment of the Y chromosome short arm, can cause chromosomally female XXSxr or XSxrO mice to develop as sterile males. The original Sxr region, termed Sxra, encodes: Tdy, the primary sex-determining gene; Hya, the controlling or structural locus for the minor transplantation antigen H-Y; gene(s) controlling the expression of the serologically detected male antigen (SDMA); Spy, a gene(s) required for the survival and proliferation of A spermatogonia during spermatogenesis; Zfy-1/Zfy-2, zinc-finger-containing genes of unknown function; and Sry, which is probably identical to Tdy. A deletion variant of Sxra, termed Sxrb, which lacks Hya, SDMA expression, Spy and some Zfy-2 sequences, makes positional cloning of these genes possible. We report here the isolation of a new testis-specific gene, Sby, mapping to the DNA deleted from the Sxrb region (the delta Sxrb interval). Sby has extensive homology to the X-linked human ubiquitin-activating enzyme E1. The critical role of this enzyme in nuclear DNA replication together with the testis-specific expression of Sby suggests Sby as a candidate for the spermatogenic gene Spy.
Turner Syndrome (TS) is an unfavorable genetic condition with a prevalence of 1:2500 in newborn girls. Prompt and effective diagnosis is very important to appropriately monitor the comorbidities. The aim of the present study was to propose a feasible and practical molecular diagnostic tool for newborn screening by quantifying the gene dosage of the SHOX, VAMP7, XIST, UBA1, and SRY genes by quantitative polymerase chain reaction (qPCR) in individuals with a diagnosis of complete X monosomy, as well as those with TS variants, and then compare the results to controls without chromosomal abnormalities. According to our results, the most useful markers for these chromosomal variants were the genes found in the pseudoautosomic regions 1 and 2 (PAR1 and PAR2), because differences in gene dosage (relative quantification) between groups were more evident in SHOX and VAMP7 gene expression. Therefore, we conclude that these markers are useful for early detection in aneuploidies involving sex chromosomes.
Loss of Abcc6 gene expression was identified to be responsible for dystrophic calcification of the heart (DCC) or vessels after acute injury in several strains of laboratory mice. This calcification shares features with osteogenesis and may involve osteogenic factors. Tissue expression of osteopontin (Opn) and 11 osteogenic transcription factors were studied in vivo in mouse models for DCC and in vitro using luciferase reporter gene assays. Compared with DCC-resistant C57BL/6 mice, a significant increase in Opn transcription was demonstrated in necrotic lesions of both DCC-susceptible C3H/He and B6.C3H(Dyscalc1) congenic mice at day 3 after injury. Significant increases in gene expression were also demonstrated for the transcription factors runt domain-containing transcription factor 2 (Runx2), vitamin D receptor (Vdr), SRY (sex-determining region Y)-box 9 protein, and Nfkb1 in C3H/He mice versus C57BL/6 controls. However, only Runx2 remained significantly increased in the B6.C3H(Dyscalc1) congenic mice, which carry only the Dyscalc1 locus with functional Abcc6 deletion on a C57BL/6 genetic background. Luciferase assay use increased Opn promoter activity, which was demonstrated after overexpression of Runx2. A poly-T stretch insertion was identified to stabilize the binding of Runx2, thus significantly enhancing Opn promoter activity. This Runx2-mediated activation was further enhanced by cotransfection with Vdr. Our data suggest a key role of Runx2 in the regulation of Opn in a model of cardiovascular calcification and demonstrate a synergistic cooperation of Runx2 and Vdr.
The hypothesis that the conservation of sex-chromosome-linked genes among placental mammals could be extended to the horse genome was tested using the UCDavis horse-mouse somatic cell hybrid (SCH) panel. By exploiting the fluorescence in-situ hybridization (FISH) technique to localize an anchor locus, X-inactivation-specific transcript (XIST) on the horse X chromosome, together with the fragmentation and translocation of the X- and Y-chromosome fragments in a somatic cell hybrid panel, we regionally assigned 13 type I and 13 type II (microsatellite) markers to the horse X- and Y-chromosomes. The synteny groups that correspond to horse X- and Y-chromosomes were identified by synteny mapping of sex-specific loci zinc finger protein X-linked (ZFX), zinc finger protein Y-linked (ZFY) and sex-determining region Y (SRY) on the SCH panel. A non-pseudoautosomal gene in the human steroid sulfatase (STS) was identified in both X- and Y-chromosome-containing clones. The regional order of the X-linked type I markers examined in this study, from Xp- to Xq-distal, was [STS-X, the voltage-gated chloride channel 4 (CLCN4)], [ZFX, delta-aminolevulinate synthase 2 (ALAS2)], XIST, coagulation factor IX (F9) and [biglycan (BGN), equine F18, glucose-6-phosphate dehydrogenase (G6PD)] (precise marker order could not be determined for genes within the same brackets). The order of the Y-linked type I markers was STS-Y, SRY and ZFY These orders are the same arrangements as reported for the human X- and Y-chromosomes, supporting the conservation of genomic organization between the human and the horse sex chromosomes. Regional ordering of X-linked type I and microsatellite markers provides the first integration of type I and type II markers in the horse X chromosome.
Rainbow darter (Etheostoma caeruleum) is a small benthic fish species found in North America that are abundant and distributed throughout the Grand River watershed, ON, Canada. Rainbow darter exhibit intersex in males at sites adjacent to municipal wastewater effluents (MWWE). In October 2010, female and male rainbow darter were collected at 3 sites (1 upstream reference and 2 downstream exposed sites) in the Grand River near the cities of Kitchener and Waterloo. The primary objectives of this research were (1) to characterize the responses of whole organism endpoints (i.e. condition factor (K), liversomatic (LSI) and gonadosomatic index (GSI), histopathology) to MWWEs and (2) to identify transcripts showing altered steady state abundance with exposure to MWWE in fish inhabiting municipal wastewater effluent-exposed areas. Genes measured in this study included vitellogenin, Sry-box containing protein 9 (sox9), forkhead box L2 (foxl2), doublesex and mab-3 related transcription factor 1 (dmrt1), cytochrome P450, family 11, subfamily A, polypeptide 1 (cyp11a) as well as estrogen (esr1, esrb) and androgen (ar) receptors. There were no changes in condition factor; however, there was a significant increase in LSI and a decrease in GSI in fish inhabiting downstream environments when compared with fish collected from the reference site. Males had a high incidence (∼ 70%) of intersex in downstream sites; characterized by the presence of oocytes within the testis. In the gonad, there were sex specific differences for genes related to sexual differentiation; dmrt1 was only expressed in males whereas foxl2 and sox9 were highly expressed in females compared to males. Expression levels of ar and esr1 were higher in females than males. Conversely, esrb was not differentially expressed between sexes or among sites. There were no differences detected for the genes investigated within sex among sites. This study is the first to report on gene expression changes in the rainbow darter, with emphasis on the differences in transcript abundance between sexes and how these changes relate to exposures to MWWEs. Molecular approaches are being investigated for their potential application to field ecotoxicology, and molecular bioassays for relevant, sentinel species in environmental monitoring programs are required to better understand the impact of anthropogenic impacts on species at risk in river systems.
The increasing relevance of the cancer stem cell (CSC) hypothesis and the impact of CSC-associated markers in the carcinogenesis of solid tumours may provide potential prognostic implications in lung cancer. We propose that a collective genetic analysis of established CSC-related markers will generate data to better define the role of putative CSCs in lung adenocarcinoma (LAC).
Sixty-four paired tumour and non-tumour biopsies from LAC patients were included in this study. Using the quantitative reverse transcriptase-polymerase chain reaction, we assessed the expression profiles of established CSC-related biomarkers: octamer-binding transcription factor 4 (OCT4A), CD133, aldehyde dehydrogenase (ALDH), BMI-1, ATP-binding cassette subfamily G, member 2 (ABCG2), SRY (sex-determining region Y)-box 2 (SOX2) and uPAR, and evaluated their relation to clinicopathological parameters and disease prognosis.
All of the above-mentioned CSC-related markers were detectable in both tumour and corresponding normal tissues. Importantly, expression levels of OCT4A, CD133, BMI-1, SOX2 and uPAR were significantly higher (OCT4A, P = 0.0003; CD133, P = 0.002; BMI-1, P = 0.04; SOX2, P = 0.0003; uPAR, P = 0.03) in the tumour compared with those in the non-tumour tissues. By contrast, the quantities of ACBG2 and ALDH were markedly reduced (ACBG2, P = 0.0006; ALDH, P = 0.007) in the tumour relative to those in the normal biopsies. Using multivariate analysis, elevated ALDH and CD133 revealed significant associations in tumour stage (ALDH, P = 0.03; CD133, P = 0.007) and differentiation (ALDH, P = 0.03; CD133, P = 0.018). We observed that ALDH and OCT4A were associated with nodal status (ALDH, P = 0.05; OCT4A, P = 0.03) having lower mRNA levels in tumours with lymph node metastasis, N+, compared with that in N0. High OCT4A levels were significantly correlated with tumour size of <3 cm, decrease in tumours >3 cm (P = 0.03). Kaplan-Meier correlation analyses, showed that OCT4A and CD133 were correlated to short disease-free intervals (OCT4A, P = 0.047; CD133, P = 0.033) over a period of 29 months.
Our study reveals that CSC-associated markers: OCT4A, CD133 and ALDH are involved in the initial phase of carcinogenesis of LAC, and can be used as predictors of early stage LAC and poor disease-free intervals. In addition, this work validates the relevance of the CSC hypothesis in LAC.
The Indonesian island of Sulawesi harbors a highly endemic and diverse fauna sparking fascination since long before Wallace's contemplation of biogeographical patterns in the region. Allopatric diversification driven by geological or climatic processes has been identified as the main mechanism shaping present faunal distribution on the island. There is both consensus and conflict among range patterns of terrestrial species pointing to the different effects of vicariant events on once co-distributed taxa. Tarsiers, small nocturnal primates with possible evidence of an Eocene fossil record on the Asian mainland, are at present exclusively found in insular Southeast Asia. Sulawesi is hotspot of tarsier diversity, whereby island colonization and subsequent radiation of this old endemic primate lineage remained largely enigmatic. To resolve the phylogeographic history of Sulawesi tarsiers we analyzed an island-wide sample for a set of five approved autosomal phylogenetic markers (ABCA1, ADORA3, AXIN1, RAG1, and TTR) and the paternally inherited SRY gene. We constructed ML and Bayesian phylogenetic trees and estimated divergence times between tarsier populations. We found that their arrival at the Proto-Sulawesi archipelago coincided with initial Miocene tectonic uplift and hypothesize that tarsiers dispersed over the region in distinct waves. Intra-island diversification was spurred by land emergence and a rapid succession of glacial cycles during the Plio-Pleistocene. Some tarsier range boundaries concur with spatial limits in other taxa backing the notion of centers of faunal endemism on Sulawesi. This congruence, however, has partially been superimposed by taxon-specific dispersal patterns.
The characterisation of the pleiotropic effects of coat colour-associated mutations in mammals illustrates that sensory organs and nerves are particularly affected by disorders because of the shared origin of melanocytes and neurocytes in the neural crest; e.g. the eye-colour is a valuable indicator of disorders in pigment production and eye dysfunctions. Disorders related to coat colour-associated alleles also occur in the skin (melanoma), reproductive tract and immune system. Additionally, the coat colour phenotype of an individual influences its general behaviour and fitness. Mutations in the same genes often produce similar coat colours and pleiotropic effects in different species (e.g., KIT [reproductive disorders, lethality], EDNRB [megacolon] and LYST [CHS]). Whereas similar disorders and similar-looking coat colour phenotypes sometimes have a different genetic background (e.g., deafness [EDN3/EDNRB, MITF, PAX and SNAI2] and visual diseases [OCA2, RAB38, SLC24A5, SLC45A2, TRPM1 and TYR]). The human predilection for fancy phenotypes that ignore disorders and genetic defects is a major driving force for the increase of pleiotropic effects in domestic species and laboratory subjects since domestication has commenced approximately 18,000 years ago.
We hypothesized that bone marrow derived Sca-1+ stem cells (BM Sca-1+) transduced with multiple therapeutic cytokines with diverse effects will induce faster angiomyogenic differentiation in the infarcted myocardium.
BM Sca-1+ were purified from transgenic male mice expressing GFP. Plasmids encoding for select quartet of growth factors, i.e., human IGF-1, VEGF, SDF-1α and HGF were prepared and used for genetic modification of Sca-1+ cells (GFSca-1+). Scramble transfected cells (ScSca-1+) were used as a control. RT-PCR and western blotting showed significantly higher expression of the growth factors in GFSca-1+. Besides the quartet of the therapeutic growth factors, PCR based growth factor array showed upregulation of multiple angiogenic and prosurvival factors such as Ang-1, Ang-2, MMP9, Cx43, BMP2, BMP5, FGF2, and NGF in GFSca-1+ (p<0.01 vs ScSca-1+). LDH and TUNEL assays showed enhanced survival of GFSca-1+ under lethal anoxia (p<0.01 vs ScSca-1+). MTS assay showed significant increased cell proliferation in GFSca-1+ (p<0.05 vs ScSca-1+). For in vivo study, female mice were grouped to receive the intramyocardial injection of 15 μl DMEM without cells (group-1) or containing 2.5 × 10(5) ScSca-1+ (group-2) or GFSca-1+ (group-3) immediately after coronary artery ligation. As indicated by Sry gene, a higher survival of GFSca-1+ in group-3 on day 4 (2.3 fold higher vs group-2) was observed with massive mobilization of stem and progenitor cells (cKit+, Mdr1+, Cxcr4+ cells). Heart tissue sections immunostained for actinin and Cx43 at 4 weeks post engraftment showed extensive myofiber formation and expression of gap junctions. Immunostaining for vWF showed increased blood vessel density in both peri-infarct and infarct regions in group-3. Infarct size was attenuated and the global heart function was improved in group-3 as compared to group-2.
Administration of BM Sca-1+ transduced with multiple genes is a novel approach to treat infarcted heart for its regeneration.
Oral squamous cell carcinoma (OSCC) is a common worldwide malignancy. However, it is unclear what, if any, genomic alterations occur as the disease progresses to invasive and metastatic OSCC. This study used genomewide array-CGH in microdissected specimens to map genetic alterations found in primary OSCC and neck lymph node metastases. We used array-based comparative genomic hybridization (array-CGH) to screen genomewide alterations in eight pairs of microdissected tissue samples from primary and metastatic OSCC. In addition, 25 primary and metastatic OSCC tissue pairs were examined with immunohistochemistry for protein expression of the most frequently altered genes. The highest frequencies of gains were detected in LMYC, REL, TERC, PIK3CA, MYB, MDR1, HRAS, GARP, CCND2, FES, HER2, SIS, and SRY. The highest frequencies of losses were detected in p44S10, TIF1, LPL, MTAP, BMI1, EGR2, and MAP2K5. Genomic alterations in TGFbeta2, cellular retinoid-binding protein 1 gene (CRBP1), PIK3CA, HTR1B, HRAS, ERBB3, and STK6 differed significantly between primary OSCC and their metastatic counterparts. Genomic alterations in PRKCZ, ABL1, and FGF4 were significantly different in patients who died compared with those who survived. Immunohistochemistry confirmed high PIK3CA immunoreactivity in primary and metastatic OSCC. Higher FGF4 immunoreactivity in primary OSCC is associated with a worse prognosis. Loss of CRBP1 immunoreactivity is evident in primary and metastatic OSCC. Our study suggests that precise genomic profiling can be useful in determining gene number changes in OSCC. As our understanding of these changes grow, this profiling may become a practical tool for clinical evaluation.
To investigate the value of real-time fluorescence quantitative PCR in the diagnosis of chromosome anepuploidy.
ABCC4 gene on chromosome 13, TYMS gene on chromosome 18, DSCR3 gene on chromosome 21, HPRT2 gene on chromosome X, and SRY gene on Y chromosome were used as the target genes, with GAPDH gene on chromosome 12 as the control gene. Using double-standard curve fluorescent relative quantitative PCR method with SYBR Green as the fluorescent dye, the gene expression levels were detected and the results were compared with those of karyotype analysis.
The ratio of the target gene on chromosome 13 to the control gene showed a significant difference between the normal karyotype group (0.90 - or + 0.31) and trisome group (1.39 - or + 0.12, P=0.003), and the genes on chromosome 18 (1.07 - or + 0.44 vs 1.66 - or + 0.12, P=0.000) and chromosome 21 (0.84 - or + 0.27 vs 1.73 - or + 0.54, P=0.000) showed similar results. The expression of the genes on the X chromosome showed no significant difference between 45, X group and 46,XY group (0.62 - or + 0.12 vs 0.63 - or + 0.25, P=0.965), nor between 46, XX group and 47,XXY group (1.32 - or + 0.37 vs 1.20 - or + 0.35, P=0.326), while a significant difference was noted between the single copy X (including 45,X and 46,XY) and two copies X (46,XX and 47,XXY) (0.63 - or + 0.23 vs 1.26 - or + 0.36, P=0.000). The expression of the target gene on the Y chromosome was not detected in normal females (46,XX), and a significant difference in the expression was found between normal male group (46,XY) and 47,XYY group (1.57 - or + 0.54 vs 3.08 - or + 0.15, P=0.003).
SYBR Green I real-time fluorescence quantitative PCR can be used for the purpose of rapid diagnosis of chromosome aneuploidy.
Fetoprotein transcription factor (FTF) is an orphan nuclear receptor that activates the alpha(1)-fetoprotein gene during early liver developmental growth. Here we sought to define better the position of FTF in transcriptional cascades leading to hepatic differentiation. The mouse FTF gene was isolated and assigned to chromosome 1 band E4 (one mFTF pseudogene was also found). Exon/intron mapping shows an mFTF gene structure similar to that of its close homologue SF1, with two more N-terminal exons in the mFTF gene; exon mapping also delimits several FTF mRNA 5'- and 3'-splice variants. The mFTF transcription initiation site was located in adult liver at 238 nucleotides from the first translation initiator codon, with six canonical GATA, E box, and Nkx motifs clustered between -50/-140 base pairs (bp) from the cap site; DNA/protein binding assays also pinpointed an HNF4-binding element at +36 bp and an FTF-binding element at -257 bp. Transfection assays and point mutations showed that the mFTF promoter is activated by GATA, HNF4alpha, FTF, Nkx, and basic helix-loop-helix factors, with marked cooperativity between GATA and HNF4alpha. A tandem GATA/E box activatory motif in the proximal mFTF promoter is strikingly similar to a composite motif coactivated by differentiation inducers in the hematopoietic lineage; a tandem GATA-Nkx motif in the distal mFTF promoter is also similar to a composite motif transducing differentiation signals from transforming growth factor-beta-like receptors in the cardiogenic lineage. Three genes encoding transcription factors critical to early hepatic differentiation, Hnf3beta, Hnf4alpha, and Hnf1alpha, each contain dual FTF-binding elements in their proximal promoters, and all three promoters are activated by FTF in transfection assays. Direct DNA binding action and cooperativity was demonstrated between FTF and HNF3beta on the Hnf3beta promoter and between FTF and HNF4alpha on the Hnf1alpha promoter. These combined results suggest that FTF is an early intermediary between endodermal specification signals and downstream genes that establish and amplify the hepatic phenotype.
Forkhead box protein A2 (FOXA2) plays an important in development, cellular metabolism and tumorigenesis. The Cancer Genome Atlas (TCGA) identified a modest frequency of FOXA2 mutations in endometrioid endometrial cancers (EEC). The current study sought to determine the relationship between FOXA2 mutation and clinicopathologic features in EEC and FOXA2 expression.
Polymerase chain reaction (PCR) amplification and sequencing were used to identify mutations in 542 EEC. Western blot, quantitative reverse transcriptase PCR (qRT-PCR) and immunohistochemistry (IHC) were used to assess expression. Methylation analysis was performed using combined bisulfite restriction analysis (COBRA) and sequencing. Chi-squared, Fisher's exact, Student's t- and log-rank tests were performed.
Fifty-one mutations were identified in 49 tumors (9.4% mutation rate). The majority of mutations were novel, loss of function (LOF) (78.4%) mutations, and most disrupted the DNA-binding domain (58.8%). Six recurrent mutations were identified. Only two tumors had two mutations and there was no evidence for FOXA2 allelic loss. Mutation status was associated with tumor grade and not associated with survival outcomes. Methylation of the FOXA2 promoter region was highly variable. Most tumors expressed FOXA2 at both the mRNA and protein level. In those tumors with mutations, the majority of cases expressed both alleles.
FOXA2 is frequently mutated in EEC. The pattern of FOXA2 mutations and expression in tumors suggests complex regulation and a haploinsufficient or dominant-negative tumor suppressor function. In vitro studies may shed light on how mutations in FOXA2 affect FOXA2 pioneer and/or transcription factor functions in EEC.
Apolipoprotein A-I (ApoA-I) is a key component of High Density Lipoproteins which possess anti-atherosclerotic and anti-inflammatory properties. Insulin is a crucial mediator of the glucose and lipid metabolism that has been implicated in atherosclerotic and inflammatory processes. Important mediators of insulin signaling such as Liver X Receptors (LXRs) and Forkhead Box A2 (FOXA2) are known to regulate apoA-I expression in liver. Forkhead Box O1 (FOXO1) is a well-known target of insulin signaling and a key mediator of oxidative stress response. Low doses of insulin were shown to activate apoA-I expression in human hepatoma HepG2 cells. However, the detailed mechanisms for these processes are still unknown. We studied the possible involvement of FOXO1, FOXA2, LXRα and LXRβ transcription factors in the insulin-mediated regulation of apoA-I expression. Treatment of HepG2 cells with high doses of insulin (48 hours, 100 nM) suppresses apoA-I gene expression. siRNAs against FOXO1, FOXA2, LXRβ or LXRα abrogated this effect. FOXO1 forms a complex with LXRβ and insulin treatment impairs FOXO1/LXRβ complex binding to hepatic enhancer and triggers its nuclear export. Insulin as well as LXR ligand TO901317 enhance the interaction between FOXA2, LXRα and hepatic enhancer. These data suggest that high doses of insulin downregulate apoA-I gene expression in HepG2 cells through redistribution of FOXO1/LXRβ complex, FOXA2 and LXRα on hepatic enhancer of apoA-I gene. This article is protected by copyright. All rights reserved.
Despite being one of the most common neurological diseases, it is unknown whether there may be a genetic basis to temporal lobe epilepsy (TLE). Whole genome analyses were performed to test the hypothesis that temporal cortical gene expression differs between TLE patients with high vs. low baseline seizure frequency.
Baseline seizure frequency was used as a clinical measure of epileptogenicity. Twenty-four patients in high or low seizure frequency groups (median seizures/month) underwent anterior temporal lobectomy with amygdalohippocampectomy for intractable TLE. RNA was isolated from the lateral temporal cortex and submitted for expression analysis. Genes significantly associated with baseline seizure frequency on likelihood ratio test were identified based on >0.90 area under the ROC curve, P value of <0.05.
Expression levels of forty genes were significantly associated with baseline seizure frequency. Of the seven most significant, four have been linked to other neurologic diseases. Expression levels associated with high seizure frequency included low expression of Homeobox A10, Forkhead box A2, Lymphoblastic leukemia derived sequence 1, HGF activator, Kelch repeat and BTB (POZ) domain containing 11, Thanatos-associated protein domain containing 8 and Heparin sulfate (glucosamine) 3-O-sulfotransferase 3A1.
This study describes novel associations between forty known genes and a clinical marker of epileptogenicity, baseline seizure frequency. Four of the seven discussed have been previously related to other neurologic diseases. Future investigation of these genes could establish new biomarkers for predicting epileptogenicity, and could have significant implications for diagnosis and management of temporal lobe epilepsy, as well as epilepsy pathogenesis.
Pancreatic cancer is the fourth leading cause of cancer death in the United States. Better understanding of pancreatic cancer biology may help identify new oncotargets towards more effective therapies. This study investigated the mechanistic actions of microRNA-1291 (miR-1291) in the suppression of pancreatic tumorigenesis. Our data showed that miR-1291 was downregulated in a set of clinical pancreatic carcinoma specimens and human pancreatic cancer cell lines. Restoration of miR-1291 expression inhibited pancreatic cancer cell proliferation, which was associated with cell cycle arrest and enhanced apoptosis. Furthermore, miR-1291 sharply suppressed the tumorigenicity of PANC-1 cells in mouse models. A proteomic profiling study revealed 32 proteins altered over 2-fold in miR-1291-expressing PANC-1 cells that could be assembled into multiple critical pathways for cancer. Among them anterior gradient 2 (AGR2) was reduced to the greatest degree. Through computational and experimental studies we further identified that forkhead box protein A2 (FOXA2), a transcription factor governing AGR2 expression, was a direct target of miR-1291. These results connect miR-1291 to the FOXA2-AGR2 regulatory pathway in the suppression of pancreatic cancer cell proliferation and tumorigenesis, providing new insight into the development of miRNA-based therapy to combat pancreatic cancer.
Lysosomal acid lipase (LAL) hydrolyses cholesteryl esters and triacylglycerols (TG) within lysosomes to mobilise NEFA and cholesterol. Since LAL-deficient (Lal (-/-) ) mice suffer from progressive loss of adipose tissue and severe accumulation of lipids in hepatic lysosomes, we hypothesised that LAL deficiency triggers alternative energy pathway(s).
We studied metabolic adaptations in Lal (-/-) mice.
Despite loss of adipose tissue, Lal (-/-) mice show enhanced glucose clearance during insulin and glucose tolerance tests and have increased uptake of [(3)H]2-deoxy-D-glucose into skeletal muscle compared with wild-type mice. In agreement, fasted Lal (-/-) mice exhibit reduced glucose and glycogen levels in skeletal muscle. We observed 84% decreased plasma leptin levels and significantly reduced hepatic ATP, glucose, glycogen and glutamine concentrations in fed Lal (-/-) mice. Markedly reduced hepatic acyl-CoA concentrations decrease the expression of peroxisome proliferator-activated receptor α (PPARα) target genes. However, treatment of Lal (-/-) mice with the PPARα agonist fenofibrate further decreased plasma TG (and hepatic glucose and glycogen) concentrations in Lal (-/-) mice. Depletion of hepatic nuclear factor 4α and forkhead box protein a2 in fasted Lal (-/-) mice might be responsible for reduced expression of microsomal TG transfer protein, defective VLDL synthesis and drastically reduced plasma TG levels.
Our findings indicate that neither activation nor inactivation of PPARα per se but rather the availability of hepatic acyl-CoA concentrations regulates VLDL synthesis and subsequent metabolic adaptations in Lal (-/-) mice. We conclude that decreased plasma VLDL production enhances glucose uptake into skeletal muscle to compensate for the lack of energy supply.
Genome-wide association studies (GWAS) of type 2 diabetes (T2D) have discovered a number of loci that contribute to susceptibility to the disease. Future challenges include elucidation of functional mechanisms through which these GWAS-identified loci modulate T2D disease risk. The aim of the present study was to comprehensively characterize T2D associated single nucleotide polymorphisms (SNPs) and genes through computational approaches.
Computational biology approaches used in the present study included comparative genomic analyses and functional annotation using GWAS3D and RegulomeDB, investigation of the effects of T2D-associated SNPs on miRNA binding and protein phosphorylation, and gene ontology, pathway enrichment, protein-protein interaction (PPI) networks and functional module analysis of T2D-associated genes from previously published GWAS.
Computational analysis identified a number of T2D GWAS-associated SNPs that were located at protein binding sites, including CCCTC-binding factor (CTCF), E1A binding protein p300 (EP300), hepatocyte nuclear factor 4alpha (HNF4A), transcription factor 7 like 2 (TCF7L2), forkhead box A1 (FOXA1) and A2 (FOXA2), and potentially affected the binding of miRNAs and protein phosphorylation. Pathway enrichment analysis confirmed two well-known maturity onset diabetes of the young and T2D pathways, whereas PPI network analysis identified highly interconnected "hub" genes, such as TCF7L2, melatonin receptor 1B (MTNR1B), and solute carrier family 30 (zinc transporter), member 8 (SLC30A8), that created two tight subnetworks.
The results provide objectives and clues for future experimental studies and further insights into the molecular pathogenesis of T2D.
Mutations in hepatocyte nuclear factor 1 transcription factors (HNF1α/β) are associated with diabetes. These factors are well studied in the liver, pancreas and kidney, where they direct tissue-specific gene regulation. However, they also have an important role in the biology of many other tissues, including the intestine. We investigated the transcriptional network governed by HNF1 in an intestinal epithelial cell line (Caco2). We used chromatin immunoprecipitation followed by direct sequencing (ChIP-seq) to identify HNF1 binding sites genome-wide. Direct targets of HNF1 were validated using conventional ChIP assays and confirmed by siRNA-mediated depletion of HNF1, followed by RT-qPCR. Gene ontology process enrichment analysis of the HNF1 targets identified multiple processes with a role in intestinal epithelial cell function, including properties of the cell membrane, cellular response to hormones, and regulation of biosynthetic processes. Approximately 50% of HNF1 binding sites were also occupied by other members of the intestinal transcriptional network, including hepatocyte nuclear factor 4A (HNF4A), caudal type homeobox 2 (CDX2), and forkhead box A2 (FOXA2). Depletion of HNF1 in Caco2 cells increases FOXA2 abundance and decreases levels of CDX2, illustrating the coordinated activities of the network. These data suggest that HNF1 plays an important role in regulating intestinal epithelial cell function, both directly and through interactions with other intestinal transcription factors.
The transcription factor forkhead box protein A2 (FOXA2, also known as hepatocyte nuclear factor 3β or transcription factor 3β), has been found to play pivotal roles in multiple phases of mammalian life, from the early development to the organofaction, and subsequently in homeostasis and metabolism in the adult. In the embryonic development period, FOXA2 is require d for the formation of the primitive node and notochord, and its absence results in embryonic lethality. Moreover, FOXA2 plays an important role not only in lung development, but also in T helper type 2 (Th2)-mediated pulmonary inflammation and goblet cell hyperplasia. In this article, the role of FOXA2 in lung development and Th2-mediated pulmonary inflammation, as well as in goblet cell hyperplasia, is reviewed. FOXA2 deletion in airway epithelium results into Th2-mediated pulmonary inflammation and goblet cell hyperplasia in developing lung. Leukotriene pathway and signal transducers and activators of transcription 6 pathway may mediate this inflammation through recruitment and activation of denditric cell during lung developments. FOXA2 is a potential treatment target for lung diseases with Th2 inflammation and goblet cell hyperplasia, such as asthma and chronic obstructive pulmonary disease.
Group IVA phospholipase A2 [cytosolic phospholipase A2α (cPLA2α)] is a key mediator of inflammation and tumorigenesis. In this study, by using a combination of chemical inhibition and genetic approaches in zebrafish and murine cells, we identify a mechanism by which cPLA2α promotes cell proliferation. We identified 2 cpla2α genes in zebrafish, cpla2αa and cpla2αb, with conserved phospholipase activity. In zebrafish, loss of cpla2α expression or inhibition of cpla2α activity diminished G1 progression through the cell cycle. This phenotype was also seen in both mouse embryonic fibroblasts and mesangial cells. G1 progression was rescued by the addition of arachidonic acid or prostaglandin E2 (PGE2), indicating a phospholipase-dependent mechanism. We further show that PGE2, through PI3K/AKT activation, promoted Forkhead box protein O1 (FOXO1) phosphorylation and FOXO1 nuclear export. This led to up-regulation of cyclin D1 and down-regulation of p27(Kip1), thus promoting G1 progression. Finally, using pharmacologic inhibitors, we show that cPLA2α, rapidly accelerated fibrosarcoma (RAF)/MEK/ERK, and PI3K/AKT signaling pathways cooperatively regulate G1 progression in response to platelet-derived growth factor stimulation. In summary, these data indicate that cPLA2α, through its phospholipase activity, is a critical effector of G1 phase progression through the cell cycle and suggest that pharmacological targeting of this enzyme may have important therapeutic benefits in disease mechanisms that involve excessive cell proliferation, in particular, cancer and proliferative glomerulopathies.
Growth factor-mediated hepatocyte proliferation is crucial in liver regeneration and the recovery of liver function after injury. The nuclear receptor, pregnane X receptor (PXR), is a key transcription factor for the xenobiotic-induced expression of genes associated with various liver functions. Recently, we reported that PXR activation stimulates xenobiotic-induced hepatocyte proliferation. In the present study, we investigated whether PXR activation also stimulates growth factor-mediated hepatocyte proliferation. In G0 phase-synchronized, immortalized mouse hepatocytes, serum or epidermal growth factor treatment increased cell growth and this growth was augmented by the expression of mouse PXR and co-treatment with pregnenolone 16α-carbonitrile (PCN), a PXR ligand. In a liver regeneration model using carbon tetrachloride, PCN treatment enhanced the injury-induced increase in the number of Ki-67-positive nuclei as well as Ccna2 and Ccnb1 mRNA levels in wild-type (WT) but not Pxr-null mice. Chronological analysis of this model demonstrated that PCN treatment shifted the maximum cell proliferation to an earlier time point and increased the number of M-phase cells at those time points. In WT but not Pxr-null mice, PCN treatment reduced hepatic mRNA levels of genes involved in the suppression of G0/G1- and G1/S-phase transition, e.g. Rbl2, Cdkn1a and Cdkn1b. Analysis of the Rbl2 promoter revealed that PXR activation inhibited its Forkhead box O3 (FOXO3)-mediated transcription. Finally, the PXR-mediated enhancement of hepatocyte proliferation was inhibited by the expression of dominant active FOXO3 in vitro. The results of the present study suggest that PXR activation stimulates growth factor-mediated hepatocyte proliferation in mice, at least in part, through inhibiting FOXO3 from accelerating cell-cycle progression.
'Glucotoxicity' is a term used to convey the negative effect of hyperglycaemia on beta cell function; however, the underlying molecular mechanisms that impair insulin secretion and gene expression are poorly defined. Our objective was to define the role of transcription factor v-ets avian erythroblastosis virus E26 oncogene homologue 1 (Ets-1) in beta cell glucotoxicity.
Primary islets and Min6 cells were exposed to high glucose and Ets-1 expression was measured. Recombinant adenovirus and transgenic mice were used to upregulate Ets-1 expression in beta cells in vitro and in vivo, and insulin secretion was assessed. The binding activity of H3/H4 histone on the Ets-1 promoter, and that of forkhead box (FOX)A2, FOXO1 and Ets-1 on the Pdx-1 promoter was measured by chromatin immunoprecipitation and quantitative real-time PCR assay.
High glucose induced upregulation of Ets-1 expression and hyperacetylation of histone H3 and H4 at the Ets-1 gene promoter in beta cells. Ets-1 overexpression dramatically suppressed insulin secretion and biosynthesis both in vivo and in vitro. Besides, Ets-1 overexpression increased the activity of FOXO1 but decreased that of FOXA2 binding to the pancreatic and duodenal homeobox 1 (PDX-1) homology region 2 (PH2), resulting in inhibition of Pdx-1 promoter activity and downregulation of PDX-1 expression and activity. In addition, high glucose promoted the interaction of Ets-1 and FOXO1, and the activity of Ets-1 binding to the Pdx-1 promoter. Importantly, PDX-1 overexpression reversed the defect in pancreatic beta cells induced by Ets-1 excess, while knockdown of Ets-1 prevented hyperglycaemia-induced dysfunction of pancreatic beta cells.
Our observations suggest that Ets-1 links glucotoxicity to pancreatic beta cell dysfunction through inhibiting PDX-1 expression in type 2 diabetes.
Cellular metabolism is increasingly recognized as a controller of immune cell fate and function. MicroRNA-33 (miR-33) regulates cellular lipid metabolism and represses genes involved in cholesterol efflux, HDL biogenesis, and fatty acid oxidation. Here, we determined that miR-33-mediated disruption of the balance of aerobic glycolysis and mitochondrial oxidative phosphorylation instructs macrophage inflammatory polarization and shapes innate and adaptive immune responses. Macrophage-specific Mir33 deletion increased oxidative respiration, enhanced spare respiratory capacity, and induced an M2 macrophage polarization-associated gene profile. Furthermore, miR-33-mediated M2 polarization required miR-33 targeting of the energy sensor AMP-activated protein kinase (AMPK), but not cholesterol efflux. Notably, miR-33 inhibition increased macrophage expression of the retinoic acid-producing enzyme aldehyde dehydrogenase family 1, subfamily A2 (ALDH1A2) and retinal dehydrogenase activity both in vitro and in a mouse model. Consistent with the ability of retinoic acid to foster inducible Tregs, miR-33-depleted macrophages had an enhanced capacity to induce forkhead box P3 (FOXP3) expression in naive CD4(+) T cells. Finally, treatment of hypercholesterolemic mice with miR-33 inhibitors for 8 weeks resulted in accumulation of inflammation-suppressing M2 macrophages and FOXP3(+) Tregs in plaques and reduced atherosclerosis progression. Collectively, these results reveal that miR-33 regulates macrophage inflammation and demonstrate that miR-33 antagonism is atheroprotective, in part, by reducing plaque inflammation by promoting M2 macrophage polarization and Treg induction.
Mucus hypersecretion and goblet cell hyperplasia are common features that characterize asthma. IL-13 increases mucin (MUC) 5AC, the major component of airway mucus, in airway epithelial cells. According to the literature, IL-13 receptor activation leads to STAT6 activation and consequent induction of chloride channel accessory 1 (CLCA1) gene expression, associated with the induction of MUC5AC. Heme oxygenase-1 (HO-1) is an enzyme that catalyzes oxidation of heme to biliverdin, and has anti-inflammatory and anti-oxidant properties. We examined the effects of HO-1 on mucin production and goblet cell hyperplasia induced by IL-13. Moreover, we assessed the cell signaling intermediates that appear to be responsible for mucin production. Normal human bronchial epithelial (NHBE) cells were grown at air liquid interface (ALI) in the presence or absence of IL-13 and hemin, a HO-1 inducer, for 14 days. Protein concentration was analyzed using ELISA, and mRNA expression was examined by real-time PCR. Histochemical analysis was performed using HE staining, andWestern blotting was performed to evaluate signaling transduction pathway. Hemin (4 μM) significantly increased HO-1 protein expression (p b 0.01) and HO-1 mRNA expression (p b 0.001). IL-13 significantly increased goblet cells, MUC5AC protein secretion (p b 0.01) and MUC5AC mRNA (p b 0.001), and these were decreased by hemin by way of HO-1. Tin protoporphyrin (SnPP)-IX, a HO-1 inhibitor, blocked the effect of hemin restoring MUC5AC protein secretion (p b 0.05) and goblet cell hyperplasia. Hemin decreased the expression of CLCA1 mRNA (p b 0.05) and it was reversed by SnPP-IX, but could not suppress IL-13-induced phosphorylation of STAT6 or SAM pointed domain-containing ETS transcription factor (SPDEF) and Forkhead box A2 (FOXA2) mRNA expression. In summary, HO-1 overexpression suppressed IL-13-induced goblet cell hyperplasia and MUC5AC production, and involvement of CLCA1 in the mechanism was suggested.
To show the efficient generation of hepatocyte-like cells (HLCs) differentiated from the induced pluripotent stem cells (iPSCs) of rats.
Hepatic differentiation was achieved using a three-step protocol with several growth factors. First, rat iPSCs were differentiated into definitive endoderm cells using Activin A and Wnt3a treatment. Then fibroblast growth factor 4 and bone morphogenetic protein 2 were added to the culture medium and used to induce hepatic differentiation. Finally, hepatocyte growth factor, Oncostatin M and dexamethasone were used for hepatic maturation. The liver-related markers and functions of HLCs were assessed at the gene and protein levels.
After endodermal induction, the differentiated cells expressed endodermal markers forkhead box protein A2 and SRY-box containing gene 17 at the mRNA and protein levels. After 20 d of culture, the iPSCs were differentiated into HLCs. These differentiated cells expressed hepatic markers including α-fetoprotein, albumin CK8, CK18, CK19, and transcription factor HNF-4α. In addition, the cells expressed functional proteins such as α1-antitrypsin, cytochrome P450 1A2 and CYP 3A4. They acted like healthy hepatic cells, storing glycogen and taking up indocyanine green and low-density lipoproteins. Also, the rates of urea synthesis (20 d 1.202 ± 0.080 mg/dL vs 0 d 0.317 ± 0.021 mg/dL, P < 0.01) and albumin secretion (20 d 1.601 ± 0.102 mg/dL vs 0 d 0.313 ± 0.015 mg/dL, P < 0.01) increased significantly as differentiation progressed.
Rat iPSCs can differentiate into HLCs rapidly and efficiently. These differentiated cells may be an attractive resource for treatment of end-stage liver disease.
Hepatocyte-like cells differentiated from human pluripotent stem cells (such as human embryonic stem (ES) cells and induced pluripotent stem (iPS) cells) are expected to be utilized in drug screening. However, the hepatocyte differentiation efficiency and hepatic functions of hepatocyte-like cells were not sufficient to perform ES/iPS cell-based drug discovery. Therefore, we decided to improve the method of hepatocyte differentiation from human ES/iPS cells. To enhance this hepatocyte differentiation efficiency, hepatocyte-related transcription factors, such as forkhead box protein A2 (FOXA2) and hepatocyte nuclear factor 1 alpha (HNF1α), were overexpressed during the hepatocyte differentiation process. In addition, to enhance the functions of hepatocyte-like cells, these cells were cultured in three dimensional (3D) conditions using a Nanopillar plate. By FOXA2 and HNF1α overexpression, human ES/iPS cells could efficiently (more than 80%) differentiate into albumin-positive hepatocyte-like cells. Various hepatic functions, including albumin secretion and drug metabolism capacities, of the hepatocyte-like cells were significantly enhanced by performing 3D cell culture. These results suggest that the method of hepatocyte differentiation could be improved by using gene transfer and 3D cell culture technologies. We believe that these new hepatocyte-like cells would be useful tools in drug development.
The enterohormone glucagon-like peptide-1 (GLP-1) is required to amplify glucose-induced insulin secretion that facilitates peripheral glucose utilisation. Alteration in GLP-1 secretion during obesity has been reported but is still controversial. Due to the high adaptability of intestinal cells to environmental changes, we hypothesised that the density of GLP-1-producing cells could be modified by nutritional factors to prevent the deterioration of metabolic condition in obesity. We quantified L-cell density in jejunum samples collected during Roux-en-Y gastric bypass in forty-nine severely obese subjects analysed according to their fat consumption. In mice, we deciphered the mechanisms by which a high-fat diet (HFD) makes an impact on enteroendocrine cell density and function. L-cell density in the jejunum was higher in obese subjects consuming >30 % fat compared with low fat eaters. Mice fed a HFD for 8 weeks displayed an increase in GLP-1-positive cells in the jejunum and colon accordingly to GLP-1 secretion. The regulation by the HFD appears specific to GLP-1-producing cells, as the number of PYY (peptide YY)-positive cells remained unchanged. Moreover, genetically obese ob/ob mice did not show alteration of GLP-1-positive cell density in the jejunum or colon, suggesting that obesity per se is not sufficient to trigger the mechanism. The higher L-cell density in HFD-fed mice involved a rise in L-cell terminal differentiation as witnessed by the increased expression of transcription factors downstream of neurogenin3 (Ngn3). We suggest that the observed increase in GLP-1-positive cell density triggered by high fat consumption in humans and mice might favour insulin secretion and therefore constitute an adaptive response of the intestine to balance diet-induced insulin resistance.
Rhabdomyosarcoma (RMS) is the most common soft-tissue sarcoma in childhood. Here we studied 60 RMSs using whole-exome/-transcriptome sequencing, copy number (CN) and DNA methylome analyses to unravel the genetic/epigenetic basis of RMS. On the basis of methylation patterns, RMS is clustered into four distinct subtypes, which exhibits remarkable correlation with mutation/CN profiles, histological phenotypes and clinical behaviours. A1 and A2 subtypes, especially A1, largely correspond to alveolar histology with frequent PAX3/7 fusions and alterations in cell cycle regulators. In contrast, mostly showing embryonal histology, both E1 and E2 subtypes are characterized by high frequency of CN alterations and/or allelic imbalances, FGFR4/RAS/AKT pathway mutations and PTEN mutations/methylation and in E2, also by p53 inactivation. Despite the better prognosis of embryonal RMS, patients in the E2 are likely to have a poor prognosis. Our results highlight the close relationships of the methylation status and gene mutations with the biological behaviour in RMS.
It has been shown that acetylcholine is both a neurotransmitter and acts as a local mediator, produced by airway cells including epithelial cells. In vivo studies have demonstrated an indirect role for acetylcholine in epithelial cell differentiation. Here, we aimed to investigate direct effects of endogenous non-neuronal acetylcholine on epithelial cell differentiation.
Human airway epithelial cells from healthy donors were cultured at an air-liquid interface (ALI). Cells were exposed to the muscarinic antagonist tiotropium (10 nM), interleukin (IL)-13 (1, 2 and 5 ng/mL), or a combination of IL-13 and tiotropium, during or after differentiation at the ALI.
Human airway epithelial cells expressed all components of the non-neuronal cholinergic system, suggesting acetylcholine production. Tiotropium had no effects on epithelial cell differentiation after air exposure. Differentiation into goblet cells was barely induced after air exposure. Therefore, IL-13 (1 ng/mL) was used to induce goblet cell metaplasia. IL-13 induced MUC5AC-positive cells (5-fold) and goblet cells (14-fold), as assessed by histochemistry, and MUC5AC gene expression (105-fold). These effects were partly prevented by tiotropium (47-92%). Goblet cell metaplasia was induced by IL-13 in a dose-dependent manner, which was inhibited by tiotropium. In addition, tiotropium reversed goblet cell metaplasia induced by 2 weeks of IL-13 exposure. IL-13 decreased forkhead box protein A2 (FoxA2) expression (1.6-fold) and increased FoxA3 (3.6-fold) and SAM-pointed domain-containing ETS transcription factor (SPDEF) (5.2-fold) expression. Tiotropium prevented the effects on FoxA2 and FoxA3, but not on SPDEF.
We demonstrate that tiotropium has no effects on epithelial cell differentiation after air exposure, but inhibits and reverses IL-13-induced goblet cell metaplasia, possibly via FoxA2 and FoxA3. This indicates that non-neuronal acetylcholine contributes to goblet cell differentiation by a direct effect on epithelial cells.
The forkhead box A (FOXA) family of pioneer transcription factors is critical for the development of many endoderm-derived tissues. Their importance in regulating biological processes in the lung and liver is extensively characterized, though much less is known about their role in intestine. Here we investigate the contribution of FOXA2 to coordinating intestinal epithelial cell function using postconfluent Caco2 cells, differentiated into an enterocyte-like model. FOXA2 binding sites genome-wide were determined by ChIP-seq and direct targets of the factor were validated by ChIP-qPCR and siRNA-mediated depletion of FOXA1/2 followed by RT-qPCR. Peaks of FOXA2 occupancy were frequent at loci contributing to gene ontology pathways of regulation of cell migration, cell motion, and plasma membrane function. Depletion of both FOXA1 and FOXA2 led to a significant reduction in the expression of multiple transmembrane proteins including ion channels and transporters, which form a network that is essential for maintaining normal ion and solute transport. One of the targets was the adenosine A2B receptor, and reduced receptor mRNA levels were associated with a functional decrease in intracellular cyclic AMP. We also observed that 30% of FOXA2 binding sites contained a GATA motif and that FOXA1/A2 depletion reduced GATA-4, but not GATA-6 protein levels. These data show that FOXA2 plays a pivotal role in regulating intestinal epithelial cell function. Moreover, that the FOXA and GATA families of transcription factors may work cooperatively to regulate gene expression genome-wide in the intestinal epithelium.
Apolipoprotein M (ApoM) is a novel apolipoprotein that was discovered in 1999 and is bound primarily to high-density lipoproteins (HDLs) in the plasma. Multiple factors may influence its expression at both the post-transcriptional and the transcriptional levels both in vivo and ex vivo as follows: hepatocyte nuclear factor-1α, 4α (HNF-1α, 4α), liver receptor homolog-1 (LRH-1), forkhead box A2 (Foxa2) and platelet activating factor (PAF) upregulate its expression; liver X receptor (LXR), retinoid X receptor (RXR), farnesoid X receptor (FXR), small heterodimer partner (SHP) and the majority of cytokines downregulate its expression. However, mechanisms underlying these processes remain unknown. Structurally, there exists a characterized hydrophobic binding pocket within the apoM protein, which enables it to bind functional lipids such as Sphingosine-1-Phosphate (S1P). Functionally, it facilitates the formation of preβ-HDL and enhances an avalanche of atheroprotective effects exerted by HDL. Moreover, in patients with diabetes, the levels of plasma apoM may decrease, whereas the augmentation of apoM decreases plasma glucose levels and magnifies the secretion of insulin. This article offers a panorama of the progress made in the research regarding the characteristics of apoM, particularly the regulation of its expression and its functions.
We show characteristic morphological changes corresponding to epithelial-mesenchymal transition (EMT) program fulfillment in PANC1 cell line stimulated with TGFβ1. Our results support downregulation of E-cadherin protein. We show 5- and 28-fold increase in SNAI1 and SNAI2 expression levels and 25- and 15-fold decrease in CDH1 and KRT8 expression levels, respectively, which confirms the EMT-program fulfillment. We demonstrate downregulation of expression of pancreatic master genes SOX9, FOXA2, and GATA4 (2-, 5-, and 4-fold, respectively) and absence of significant changes in HES1, NR5A2, and GATA6 expression levels in the cells stimulated with TGFβ1. Our results indicate the absence of induction of expression of PTF1A, PDX1, HNF1b, NEUROG3, RPBJL, NKX6.1, and ONECUT1 genes, which are inactive in PANC1 cell line after the EMT stimulated by TGFβ1.
Barrett's oesophagus (BO), an intestinal-type metaplasia (IM), typically arising in conjunction with gastro-oesophageal reflux disease, is a prominent risk factor for the development of oesophageal adenocarcinoma (OAC). The molecular similarities between IM and normal intestinal tissues are ill-defined. Consequently, the contribution of intestine-enriched factors expressed within BO to oncogenesis is unclear. Herein, using transcriptomics we define the intestine-enriched genes expressed in meta-profiles of BO and OAC. Interestingly, 77% of the genes differentially expressed in a meta-profile of BO were similarly expressed in intestinal tissues. Furthermore, 85% of this intestine-like signature was maintained upon transition to OAC. Gene networking analysis of transcription factors within this signature revealed a network centred upon NR5A2, GATA6 and FOXA2, whose over-expression was determined in a cohort of BO and OAC patients. Simulated acid reflux was observed to induce the expression of both NR5A2 and GATA6. Using siRNA-mediated silencing and an NR5A2 antagonist we demonstrate that NR5A2-mediated cancer cell survival is facilitated through augmentation of GATA6 and anti-apoptotic factor BCL-XL levels. Abrogation of NR5A2-GATA6 expression in conjunction with BCL-XL co-silencing resulted in synergistically increased sensitivity to chemotherapeutics and photo-dynamic therapeutics. These findings characterize the intestine-like signature associated with IM which may have important consequences to adenocarcinogenesis.
Cell fate specification depends on transcriptional activation driven by lineage-specific transcription factors as well as changes in chromatin organization. To date, the interplay between transcription factors and chromatin modifiers during development is not well understood. We focus here on the initiation of the pancreatic program from multipotent endodermal progenitors. Transcription factors that play key roles in regulating pancreatic progenitor state have been identified, but the chromatin regulators that help establishing and maintaining pancreatic fate are less well known. Using a comparative approach, we identify a critical role for the histone methyltransferase Setd7 in establishing pancreatic cell identity. We show that Setd7 is expressed in the prospective pancreatic endoderm of Xenopus and mouse embryos prior to Pdx1 induction. Importantly, we demonstrate that setd7 is sufficient and required for pancreatic cell fate specification in Xenopus Functional and biochemical approaches in Xenopus and mouse endoderm support that Setd7 modulates methylation marks at pancreatic regulatory regions, possibly through interaction with the transcription factor Foxa2. Together, these results demonstrate that Setd7 acts as a central component of the transcription complex initiating the pancreatic program.
Recently, the US FDA has approved "vagal blocking therapy or vBLoc® therapy" as a new treatment for obesity. The aim of the present study was to study the mechanism-of-action of "VBLOC" in rat models.
Rats were implanted with VBLOC, an intra-abdominal electrical device with leads placed around gastric vagal trunks through an abdominal incision and controlled by wireless device. Body weight, food intake, hunger/satiety, and metabolic parameters were monitored by a comprehensive laboratory animal monitoring system. Brain-gut responses were analyzed physiologically.
VBLOC reduced body weight and food intake, which was associated with increased satiety but not with decreased hunger. Brain activities in response to VBLOC included increased gene expression of leptin and CCKb receptors, interleukin-1β, tumor necrosis factor, and transforming growth factor β1 in the brainstem; increased CCK, somatostatin, and tyrosine hydroxylase in the hippocampus; increased NPY, AgRP, and Foxa2 in the hypothalamus; and reduced CCKb receptor, melanocortin 4 receptor, and insulin receptor in the hypothalamus. Plasma concentrations of CCK, gastrin, glucagon, GLP-1, and PYY and gastric acid secretion were unchanged in response to VBLOC.
Based on the present study, we may suggest that VBLOC induces satiety through vagal signaling, leading to reduced food intake and loss of body weight.
Parkinson's disease is characterized by the death of dopaminergic neurons in the substantia nigra. To understand the molecular mechanisms of the disease, an in vitro model is important. In the 1990s, we used the SV40 large T antigen to immortalize dopaminergic neurons derived from Embryonic Day 14 rat mesencephalon. We selected a clone for its high expression of dopaminergic neuron markers such as tyrosine hydroxylase (TH), and we named it 1RB3AN27 (N27). Because the original N27 cell line has been passaged many times, the line has become a mixture of cell types with highly variable expression of TH. In the current study, we have performed multiple rounds of clonal cultures and have identified a dopaminergic cell clone expressing high levels of TH and the dopamine transporter (DAT). We have named this new clone N27-A. Nearly 100% of N27-A cells express TH, DAT and Tuj1. Western blots have confirmed that N27-A cells have three to four times the levels of TH and DAT compared to the previous mixed population in N27. Further analysis has shown that the new clone expresses the dopamine neuron transcription factors Nurr1, En1, FoxA2 and Pitx3. The N27-A cells express the vesicular monoamine transporter (VMAT2), but do not express dopamine-beta-hydroxylase (DβH), the enzyme responsible for converting dopamine to norepinephrine. Functional analysis has shown that N27-A cells are more sensitive than N27 cells to neurotoxins taken up by the dopamine transporter such as 6-hydroxydopamine and 1-methyl-4-phenylpyridine (MPP+). The DAT inhibitor nomifensine can block MPP+ induced toxicity. The non-selective toxic effects of hydrogen peroxide were similar in both cell lines. The N27-A cells show dopamine release under basal and depolarization conditions. We conclude that the new N27-A clone of the immortalized rat dopaminergic cell line N27 should provide an improved in vitro model for Parkinson's disease research.
Hepatocytes from human bone marrow-derived mesenchymal stem cells (hBM-MSCs) are expected to be a useful source for cell transplantation. However, relatively low efficiency and repeatability of hepatic differentiation of human BM-MSCs remains an obstacle for clinical translation. Hepatocyte nuclear factor 4 alpha (HNF4α), a critical transcription factor, plays an essential role in the entire process of liver development. In this study, immortalized hBM-MSCs, UE7T-13 cells were transduced with a lentiviral vector containing HNF4α. The typical fibroblast-like morphology of the MSCs changed, and polygonal, epithelioid cells grew out after HNF4α transduction. In hepatocyte culture medium, HNF4α-transduced MSCs (E7-hHNF4α cells) strongly expressed the albumin (ALB), CYP2B6, alpha-1 antitrypsin (AAT), and FOXA2 mRNA and exhibited morphology markedly similar to that of mature hepatocytes. The E7-hHNF4α cells showed hepatic functions such as Indocyanine green (ICG) uptake and release, glycogen storage, urea production and ALB secretion. Approximately 28% of E7-hHNF4α cells expressed both ALB and AAT. Furthermore, these E7-hHNF4α cells via superior mesenteric vein (SMV) injection expressed human ALB in mouse chronic injured liver. In conclusion, this study represents a novel strategy by directly inducing hepatocyte-like cells from MSCs.
This study examines a pretreatment strategy to strengthen the hepatic lineage divergence of mesenchymal stem cells (MSCs).
BMSCs were expanded in the presence or absence of nanofiber (NF) and treated with growth factors (GF) prior to transplantation. Thioacetamide (TA) was used for liver fibrosis induction and transplantation of NF-expanded BMSCs was compared biochemically and histologically to the cells expanded without NF scaffold.
The ultraweb NF caused better proliferation and characterization of MSCs. MSCs transplantation significantly improved liver functions, increased hepatic HGF and Bcl-2 levels, whereas decreased serum fibronectin, hepatic TNF-α and TGF-β1 levels. Hepatic HNF4α, FOXa2, CYP7a1 genes expression were enhanced while β-5-Tub and AFP genes expression were depressed. Histological study documented these results. Differentiated NF-MSCs showed pronounced enhancement of the aforementioned parameters as compared to differentiated MSCs in the absence of NF.
pretreatment with growth factors in the presence of NF augment homing, repopulation and hepatic differentiation abilities of MSCs and proves to be a promising approach for the treatment of liver fibrosis.
ELOVL family member 6, elongation of very long chain fatty acids (Elovl6) is a microsomal enzyme, which regulates the elongation of C12-16 saturated and monounsaturated fatty acids. Elovl6 has been shown to be associated with various pathophysiologies including insulin resistance, atherosclerosis, and non-alcoholic steatohepatitis. To investigate a potential role of Elovl6 during bone development, we here examined a skeletal phenotype of Elovl6 knockout (Elovl6-/-) mice. The Elovl6-/- skeleton was smaller than that of controls, but exhibited no obvious patterning defects. Histological analysis revealed a reduced length of proliferating and an elongated length of hypertrophic chondrocyte layer, and decreased trabecular bone in Elovl6-/- mice compared with controls. These results were presumably due to a modest decrease in chondrocyte proliferation and accelerated differentiation of cells of the chondrocyte lineage. Consistent with the increased length of the hypertrophic chondrocyte layer in Elovl6-/- mice, Collagen10α1 was identified as one of the most affected genes by ablation of Elovl6 in chondrocytes. Furthermore, this elevated expression of Collagen10α1 of Elovl6-null chondrocytes was likely associated with increased levels of Foxa2/a3 and Mef2c mRNA expression. Relative increases in protein levels of nuclear Foxa2 and cytoplasmic histone deacethylase 4/5/7 were also observed in Elovl6 knockdown cells of the chondrocyte lineage. Collectively, our data suggest that Elovl6 plays a critical role for proper development of embryonic growth plate.
The ZIC2 transcription factor is one of the genes most commonly mutated in Holoprosencephaly (HPE) probands. Studies in cultured cell lines and mice have shown a loss of ZIC2 function is the pathogenic mechanism but the molecular details of this ZIC2 requirement remain elusive. HPE arises when signals that direct morphological and fate changes in the developing brain and facial primordia are not sent or received. One critical signal is sent from the prechordal plate (PrCP) which develops beneath the ventral forebrain. An intact NODAL signal transduction pathway and functional ZIC2 are both required for PrCP establishment. We now show that ZIC2 acts downstream of the NODAL signal during PrCP development. ZIC2 physically interacts with SMAD2 and SMAD3, the receptor activated proteins that control transcription in a NODAL dependent manner. Together SMAD3 and ZIC2 regulate FOXA2 transcription in cultured cells and Zic2 also controls the foxA2 expression during Xenopus development. Variant forms of the ZIC2 protein, associated with HPE in man or mouse, are deficient in their ability to influence SMAD-dependent transcription. These findings reveal a new mechanism of NODAL signal transduction in the mammalian node and provide the first molecular explanation of how ZIC2 loss-of-function precipitates HPE.
Currently, there are emerging multiple studies on human epididymis protein 4 (HE4) in ovarian cancer. HE4 possesses higher sensitivity and specificity than CA125 in the confirmative early diagnosis for ovarian cancer. Although much attention has been given to explore its clinical application, research of the basic mechanisms of HE4 in ovarian cancer are still unclear. In the present study, we provide fundamental data to identify full-scale differentially expressed genes (DEGs) in response to HE4 by use of human whole-genome microarrays in human epithelial ovarian cancer cell line ES-2 following overexpression and silencing of HE4. We found that a total of 717 genes were upregulated and 898 genes were downregulated in the HE4-overexpressing cells vs. the HE4-Mock cells, and 166 genes were upregulated and 285 were downregulated in the HE4-silenced cells vs. the HE4-Mock cells. An overlap of 16 genes consistently upregulated and 8 genes downregulated in response to HE4 were noted. These DEGs were involved in MAPK, steroid biosynthesis, cell cycle, the p53 hypoxia pathway, and focal adhesion pathways. Interaction network analysis predicted that the genes participated in the regulatory connection. Highly differential expression of the FOXA2, SERPIND1, BDKRD1 and IL1A genes was verified by quantitative real-time PCR in 4 cell line samples. Finally, SERPIND1 (HCII) was validated at the protein level by immunohistochemistry in 107 paraffin-embedded ovarian tissues. We found that SERPIND1 may act as a potential oncogene in the development of ovarian cancer. The present study displayed the most fundamental and full-scale data to show DEGs in response to HE4. These identified genes may provide a theoretical basis for investigations of the underlying molecular mechanism of HE4 in ovarian cancer.
Human embryonic stem cell (hESC)-derived endodermal cells are of interest for the development of cellular therapies to treat disorders such as liver failure. The soluble form of activin A (Act) has been widely used as an in vitro inducer of definitive endoderm (DE). In this study, we have developed a nanofibrous poly (ɛ-caprolactone) substrate, biofunctionalized with Act, for directed differentiation of hESCs into DE. Bioconjugation of Act on nanofibrous meshes was confirmed by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) and immunostaining. In order to investigate the bioactivity of immobilized Act (iAct), hESCs were cultivated on the Act-conjugated nanofibers for five days. The nanofibers with covalent iAct significantly increased expression levels of the endodermal markers SOX17, FOXA2, and CXCR4, compared with physically adsorbed Act (aAct) or without Act (noAct). In addition, iAct retained its bioactivity after storage for five days in the absence of cell seeding. The capability of cultivated cells to generate the DE-derived lineage was evaluated through further differentiation of seeded cells into hepatocyte-like cells (HLCs). Interestingly, the iAct sample showed a higher level of hepatic markers compared to the aAct sample. We also demonstrated that iAct in the presence of soluble Act (sAct) could improve the conventional protocol to generate HLCs from hESCs. © 2016 Wiley Periodicals, Inc. J Biomed Mater Res Part A, 2016.
Hypothyroidism is a very common hormonal deficiency and the stem cell technology which developed in the recent years may offer a therapeutic strategy for treating this disorder. Hypoxia has been demonstrated to play an important role in embryonic formation and development and to modulate stem cell differentiation. However, the influence of oxygen tension on thyroid differentiation has not been studied. In this study, we used murine induced pluripotent stem (iPS) cells for thyroid cell differentiation under normoxic and hypoxic conditions and compared differentiation efficiency in morphology, function, gene and protein expression under both conditions. We found that hypoxia promoted adhesion and outgrowth of embryoid bodies (EBs) derived from murine iPS cells. Expression of endodermal markers (Foxa2 and Gata4) and thyroid transcription factors (Pax8 and Nkx2.1) was increased by hypoxia at both gene and protein levels during early-mid differentiation stages (p<0.05). And so were the thyroid specific markers NIS and TSHR at the end of the experiment (p<0.05). In addition, functional iodide uptake by differentiated cells was also increased after hypoxia. Thyroid differentiation from iPS cells is enhanced under hypoxia and this may involve hypoxia inducible factors (HIFs) and their downstream gene FGF2. Our data offer a foundation for understanding thyroid development and provide a potentially more efficient way to use cell therapy for treating thyroid deficiency.
: The progressive death of dopamine producing neurons in the substantia nigra pars compacta is the principal cause of symptoms of Parkinson's disease (PD). Stem cells have potential therapeutic use in replacing these cells and restoring function. To facilitate development of this approach, we sought to establish a preclinical model based on a large nonhuman primate for testing the efficacy and safety of stem cell-based transplantation. To this end, we differentiated baboon fibroblast-derived induced pluripotent stem cells (biPSCs) into dopaminergic neurons with the application of specific morphogens and growth factors. We confirmed that biPSC-derived dopaminergic neurons resemble those found in the human midbrain based on cell type-specific expression of dopamine markers TH and GIRK2. Using the reverse transcriptase quantitative polymerase chain reaction, we also showed that biPSC-derived dopaminergic neurons express PAX6, FOXA2, LMX1A, NURR1, and TH genes characteristic of this cell type in vivo. We used perforated patch-clamp electrophysiology to demonstrate that biPSC-derived dopaminergic neurons fired spontaneous rhythmic action potentials and high-frequency action potentials with spike frequency adaption upon injection of depolarizing current. Finally, we showed that biPSC-derived neurons released catecholamines in response to electrical stimulation. These results demonstrate the utility of the baboon model for testing and optimizing the efficacy and safety of stem cell-based therapeutic approaches for the treatment of PD.
Functional dopamine neurons were produced from baboon induced pluripotent stem cells, and their properties were compared to baboon midbrain cells in vivo. The baboon has advantages as a clinically relevant model in which to optimize the efficacy and safety of stem cell-based therapies for neurodegenerative diseases, such as Parkinson's disease. Baboons possess crucial neuroanatomical and immunological similarities to humans, and baboon pluripotent stem cells can be differentiated into functional neurons that mimic those in the human brain, thus laying the foundation for the utility of the baboon model for evaluating stem cell therapies.
As known from model organisms, such as frog, fish, mouse, and chicken, the anterior-posterior patterning of the definitive endoderm (DE) into distinct domains is controlled by a variety of signaling interactions between the DE and its surrounding mesoderm. This includes Wnt/FGFs and BMPs in the posterior half and all-trans-retinoic acid, TGF-β-ligands, Wnt-, and BMP-inhibitors in the anterior half of the DE sheet. However, it is currently unclear how these embryonic tissue interactions can be translated into a defined differentiation protocol for human embryonic stem cells. Activin A has been proposed to direct DE into a SOX2-positive foregut-like cell type. Due to the pleiotropic nature of SOX2 in pluripotency and developing cells of the foregut, we purified DE-cells by magnetic cell sorting and tested the effects of anteriorizing and posteriorizing factors on pure endoderm. We show in contrast to previous studies that the generation of the foregut marked by SOX2/FOXA2 double-positive cells does not depend on activin A/TGF-β-signaling but is mediated by the inhibition of Wnt- and BMP-signaling. Retinoic acid can posteriorize and at the same time dorsalize the foregut toward a PDX1-positive pancreatic duodenal cell type whereas active Wnt/beta-catenin signaling synergistically with FGF-2, BMP-4, and RA induces the formation of CDX2-positive posterior endoderm. Thus, these results provide new insights into the mechanisms behind cell specification of human DE derived from pluripotent stem cells. Stem Cells 2016.
Type II germ cell cancers (GCC) are divided into seminomas, which are highly similar to primordial germ cells and embryonal carcinomas (EC), often described as malignant counterparts to embryonic stem cells.Previously, we demonstrated that the development of GCCs is a highly plastic process and strongly influenced by the microenvironment. While orthotopic transplantation into the testis promotes seminomatous growth of the seminoma-like cell line TCam-2, ectopic xenotransplantation into the flank initiates reprogramming into an EC-like fate.During this reprogramming, BMP signaling is inhibited, leading to induction of NODAL signaling, upregulation of pluripotency factors and downregulation of seminoma markers, like SOX17. The pluripotency factor and EC-marker SOX2 is strongly induced.Here, we adressed the molecular role of SOX2 in this reprogramming. Using CRISPR/Cas9-mediated genome-editing, we established SOX2-deficient TCam-2 cells. Xenografting of SOX2-deficient cells into the flank of nude mice resulted in maintenance of a seminoma-like fate, indicated by the histology and expression of OCT3/4, SOX17, TFAP2C, PRDM1 and PRAME. In SOX2-deficient cells, BMP signaling is inhibited, but NODAL signaling is not activated. Thus, SOX2 appears to be downstream of BMP signaling but upstream of NODAL activation. So, SOX2 is an essential factor in acquiring an EC-like cell fate from seminomas.A small population of differentiated cells was identified resembling a mixed non-seminoma. Analyses of these cells revealed downregulation of the pluripotency and seminoma markers OCT3/4, SOX17, PRDM1 and TFAP2C. In contrast, the pioneer factor FOXA2 and its target genes were upregulated, suggesting that FOXA2 might play an important role in induction of non-seminomatous differentiation.
The lipophilic statin lovastatin decreases cholesterol synthesis and is a safe and effective treatment for the prevention of cardiovascular diseases. Growing evidence points at antitumor potential of lovastatin. Therefore, understanding the molecular mechanism of lovastatin function in different cell types is critical to effective therapy design. In this study, we investigated the effects of lovastatin on the differentiation potential of human embryonic stem (hES) cells (H9 cell line). Multiparameter flow cytometric assay was used to detect changes in the expression of transcription factors characteristic of hES cells. We found that lovastatin treatment delayed NANOG downregulation during ectodermal and endodermal differentiation. Likewise, expression of ectodermal (SOX1 and OTX2) and endodermal (GATA4 and FOXA2) markers was higher in treated cells. Exposure of hES cells to lovastatin led to a minor decrease in the expression of SSEA-3 and a significant reduction in CD133 expression. Treated cells also formed fewer embryoid bodies than control cells. By analyzing hES with and without CD133, we discovered that CD133 expression is required for proper formation of embryoid bodies. In conclusion, lovastatin reduced the heterogeneity of hES cells and impaired their differentiation potential.
Mammalian anterior gradient 2 (AGR2), an endoplasmic reticulum (ER) protein disulfide-isomerase (PDI), is involved in cancer cell growth and metastasis, asthma and inflammatory bowel disease (IBD). Mice lacking Agr2 exhibit decreased Muc2 protein in intestinal goblet cells, abnormal Paneth cell development, ileitis and colitis. Despite its importance in cancer biology and inflammatory diseases, the mechanisms regulating agr2 expression in the gastrointestinal tract remain unclear. In the present study, we investigated the mechanisms that control agr2 expression in the pharynx and intestine of zebrafish by transient/stable transgenesis, coupled with motif mutation, morpholino knockdown, mRNA rescue and ChIP. A 350 bp DNA sequence with a hypoxia-inducible response element (HRE) and forkhead-response element (FHRE) within a region -4.5 to -4.2 kbp upstream of agr2 directed EGFP expression specifically in the pharynx and intestine. No EGFP expression was detected in the intestinal goblet cells of Tg(HREM:EGFP) or Tg(FHREM:EGFP) embryos with mutated HRE or FHRE, whereas EGFP was expressed in the pharynx of Tg(HREM:EGFP), but not Tg(FHREM:EGFP), embryos. Morpholino knockdown of foxa1 (forkhead box A1) reduced agr2 levels in the pharynx, whereas knockdown of foxa2 or hif1ab decreased intestinal agr2 expression and affected the differentiation and maturation of intestinal goblet cells. These results demonstrate that Foxa1 regulates agr2 expression in the pharynx, whereas both Foxa2 and Hif1ab control agr2 expression in intestinal goblet cells to regulate maturation of these cells.
We have previously shown that exposure to phenyl ethyl alcohol (PEA) causes an increase in the expression of the transcription factor otx2 in the olfactory epithelium (OE) of juvenile zebrafish, and this change is correlated with the formation of an odor memory of PEA. Here, we show that the changes in otx2 expression are specific to βPEA: exposure to αPEA did not affect otx2 expression. We identified 34 olfactory receptors (ORs) representing 16 families on 4 different chromosomes as candidates for direct regulation of OR expression via Otx2. Subsequent in silico analysis uncovered Hnf3b binding sites closely associated with Otx2 binding sites in the regions flanking the ORs. Analysis by quantitative polymerase chain reaction and RNA-seq of OR expression in developing zebrafish exposed to different isoforms of PEA showed that a subset of ORs containing both Otx2/Hnf3b binding sites were downregulated only in βPEA-exposed juveniles and this change persisted through adult life. Localization of OR expression by in situ hybridization indicates the downregulation occurs at the level of RNA and not the number of cells expressing a given receptor. Finally, analysis of immediate early gene expression in the OE did not reveal changes in c-fos expression in response to either αPEA or βPEA.
Tracheo-oesophageal malformations result from disturbed foregut separation during early development. The notochord, a specialised embryonic structure, forms immediately adjacent to the dividing foregut. In the Adriamycin mouse model of oesophageal atresia, foregut and notochord abnormalities co-exist, and the site and severity of foregut malformations closely correlate to the position and extent of the notochord defects. Notochord and foregut abnormalities also co-exist in the Noggin Knockout mouse as well in a small number of human cases. The notochord is a source of powerful molecular signals during early embryogenesis, being particularly important for neural crest development. The influence of notochord signaling on the adjacent foregut is not known. The purpose of this study was to examine the impact of notochord manipulation on foregut separation using a robust 3D explant method for culturing isolated foregut which permits oeosphageal and tracheal formation in vitro.
Foregut was micro-dissected from embryonic day 9 mice (License B100/4447 Irish Medicines Board), embedded in collagen and cultured for 48 h with native notochord intact (n = 6), notochord removed (n = 10) or additional notochord transplanted from stage matched controls (n = 8). Specimens were analysed for foregut morphology and molecular patterning using immunohistochemistry for Hnf3b (an endoderm marker) and Sox2 (a notochord and oesophageal marker) on cryosections.
Foregut separation into distinct oesophagus and trachea was observed in isolated foregut specimens with or without their native notochord. In specimens with additional notochord transplants, foregut morphology and molecular patterning were comparable to controls whether or not the native notochord was maintained. In particular foregut separation was not disrupted by the transplantation of additional notochord at the dorsal foregut endoderm.
The relationship between the embryonic foregut and notochord is complex and ill-defined; however, the notochord does not contribute essentially to oesophagus and trachea formation beyond E9 in the mouse, and the transplantation of additional notochord does not disrupt foregut separation in 3D explant culture.
Severe shortage of liver donors and hepatocytes highlights urgent requirement of extra-liver and stem cell source of hepatocytes for treating liver-related diseases. Here we hypothesized that spermatogonial stem cells (SSCs) can directly transdifferentiate to hepatic stem-like cells capable of differentiating into mature hepatocyte-like cells in vitro without an intervening pluripotent state.
SSCs first changed into hepatic stem-like cells since they resembled hepatic oval cells in morphology and expressed Ck8, Ck18, Ck7, Ck19, OV6, and albumin. Importantly, they co-expressed CK8 and CK19 but not ES cell markers. Hepatic stem-like cells derived from SSCs could differentiate into small hepatocytes based upon their morphological features and expression of numerous hepatic cell markers but lacking of bile epithelial cell hallmarks. Small hepatocytes were further coaxed to differentiate into mature hepatocyte-like cells, as identified by their morphological traits and strong expression of Ck8, Ck18, Cyp7a1, Hnf3b, Alb, Tat, Ttr, albumin, and CYP1A2 but not Ck7 or CK19. Notably, these differentiated cells acquired functional attributes of hepatocyte-like cells because they secreted albumin, synthesized urea, and uptake and released indocyanine green. Moreover, phosphorylation of ERK1/2 and Smad2/3 rather than Akt was activated in hepatic stem cells and mature hepatocytes. Additionally, cyclin A, cyclin B and cyclin E transcripts and proteins but not cyclin D1 or CDK1 and CDK2 transcripts or proteins were reduced in mature hepatocyte-like cells or hepatic stem-like cells derived from SSCs compared to SSCs.
SSCs can transdifferentiate to hepatic stem-like cells capable of differentiating into cells with morphological, phenotypic and functional characteristics of mature hepatocytes via the activation of ERK1/2 and Smad2/3 signaling pathways and the inactivation of cyclin A, cyclin B and cyclin E. This study thus provides an invaluable source of mature hepatocytes for treating liver-related diseases and drug toxicity screening and offers novel insights into mechanisms of liver development and cell reprogramming.
Death-associated protein kinase (DAPK), a mediator of apoptotic systems, is silenced by promoter hypermethylation in lung and breast tumors. This gene has a CpG island extending 2500 bp from the translational start site; however, studies characterizing its transcriptional regulation have not been conducted. Two transcripts for DAPK were identified that code for a single protein, while being regulated by two promoters. The previously identified DAPK transcript designated as exon 1 transcript was expressed at levels 3-fold greater than the alternate exon 1b transcript. Deletion constructs of promoter 1 identified a 332 bp region containing a functional CP2-binding site important for expression of the exon 1 transcript. While moderate reporter activity was seen in promoter 2, the region comprising intron 1 and containing a HNF3B-binding site sustained expression of the alternate transcript. Sequencing the DAPK CpG island in tumor cell lines revealed dense, but heterogenous methylation of CpGs that blocked access of the CP2 and HNF3B proteins that in turn, was associated with loss of transcription that was restored by treatment with 5-aza-2'-deoxycytidine. Prevalences were similar for methylation of promoter 1 and 2 and intron 1 in lung tumors, but significantly greater in promoter 2 and intron 1 in breast tumors, indicative of tissue-specific differences in silencing these two transcripts. These studies show for the first time dual promoter regulation of DAPK, a tumor suppressor gene silenced in many cancers, and substantiate the importance of screening for silencing of both transcripts in tumors.
Growing evidence indicates that microRNAs have a significant role in tumor development and may constitute robust biomarkers for cancer diagnosis and prognosis. In this study, we evaluated the clinical and functional relevance of microRNA-122 (miR-122) expression in human hepatocellular carcinoma (HCC). We report that miR-122 is specifically repressed in a subset of primary tumors that are characterized by poor prognosis. We further show that the loss of miR-122 expression in tumor cells segregates with specific gene expression profiles linked to cancer progression, namely the suppression of hepatic phenotype and the acquisition of invasive properties. We identify liver-enriched transcription factors as central regulatory molecules in the gene networks associated with loss of miR-122, and provide evidence suggesting that miR-122 is under the transcriptional control of HNF1A, HNF3A and HNF3B. We further show that loss of miR-122 results in an increase of cell migration and invasion and that restoration of miR-122 reverses this phenotype. In conclusion, miR-122 is a marker of hepatocyte-specific differentiation and an important determinant in the control of cell migration and invasion. From a clinical point of view, our study emphasizes miR-122 as a diagnostic and prognostic marker for HCC progression.
One known genetic mechanism for transient neonatal diabetes is loss of methylation at 6q24. The etiology of prune belly sequence is unknown but a genetic defect, affecting the mesoderm from which the triad abdominal muscle hypoplasia, urinary tract abnormalities, and cryptorchidism develop, has been suggested. We investigated a family, including one twin, with transient neonatal diabetes and prune belly sequence. Autoantibody tests excluded type 1 diabetes. Microsatellite marker analysis confirmed the twins being monozygotic. We identified no mutations in ZFP57, KCNJ11, ABCC8, GCK, HNF1A, HNF1B, HNF3B, IPF1, PAX4, or ZIC3. The proband had loss of methylation at the 6q24 locus TNDM and also at the loci IGF2R, DIRAS3, and PEG1, while the other family members, including the healthy monozygotic twin, had normal findings. The loss of methylation on chromosome 6q24 and elsewhere may indicate a generalized maternal hypomethylation syndrome, which accounts for both transient neonatal diabetes and prune belly sequence.
Mammalian tissue- and/or time-specific transcription is primarily regulated in a combinatorial fashion through interactions between a specific set of transcriptional regulatory factors (TRFs) and their cognate cis-regulatory elements located in the regulatory regions. In exploring the DNA regions and TRFs involved in combinatorial transcriptional regulation, we noted that individual knockdown of a set of human liver-enriched TRFs such as HNF1A, HNF3A, HNF3B, HNF3G and HNF4A resulted in perturbation of the expression of several single TRF genes, such as HNF1A, HNF3G and CEBPA genes. We thus searched the potential binding sites for these five TRFs in the highly conserved genomic regions around these three TRF genes and found several putative combinatorial regulatory regions. Chromatin immunoprecipitation analysis revealed that almost all of the putative regulatory DNA regions were bound by the TRFs as well as two coactivators (CBP and p300). The strong transcription-enhancing activity of the putative combinatorial regulatory region located downstream of the CEBPA gene was confirmed. EMSA demonstrated specific bindings of these HNFs to the target DNA region. Finally, co-transfection reporter assays with various combinations of expression vectors for these HNF genes demonstrated the transcriptional activation of the CEBPA gene in a combinatorial manner by these TRFs.
Enhancer II (ENII) is one of the critical cis-elements in the Hepatitis B Virus (HBV) genome for the hepatic viral gene transcription and DNA replication. The liver-specific activity of ENII is regulated by multiple liver-enriched transcription factors, including LRH-1/hB1F, HNF1, HNF3b, HNF4 and C/EBP. Knowledge on the interplay of these important factors is still limited. In this study, we demonstrate a functional synergism between the orphan nuclear receptor LRH-1/hB1F and the homeoprotein HNF1 in up-regulating the liver-specific activity of ENII. This synergism is sufficient for initiating the viral gene transcription and DNA replication in non-hepatic cells. We have defined the activation domains in hB1F and HNF1 that contribute to the synergism. We further show that hB1F and HNF1 can interact directly in vitro and have mapped the domains required for this interaction.
Angiotensin II has been shown to exert complex effects on proximal tubular cell function and growth. To assess some of the direct effects on proximal tubular cells, changes in gene expression of selected cellular pathways were determined after exposure to angiotensin II. We used DNA microarrays to analyze multiple gene expression responses to increasing angiotensin II concentrations. Human proximal tubular cells were grown in flasks, and the presence of angiotensin type 1 receptor was confirmed by Western blot analysis. At passages 4-6, these cells were exposed to angiotensin II and harvested 4 h later and mRNA of the cells was extracted; 2 microg of mRNA was fluorescently conjugated for cDNA microarray hybridization. A custom-made DNA microarray was designed by selecting 300 human genes from 10 different functional systems and amplifying clones using polymerase chain reaction. Cells were subjected to 10 and 100 nM angiotensin II with paired untreated cells as controls. RNA was isolated, reverse transcribed, labeled and hybridized to the arrays and the ratios calculated. Ratios of > or =2.0 and < or =0.5 were considered significant. Coordinated changes were observed in genes of the hepatocyte nuclear factor 3 family (NHF3; HNF3A, HNF3B and HNF3G), in the E2F genes (E2F1, E2F3) and the interferon regulatory factors IRF1 and IRF5. Induction of the expression of transcription factors points towards complex regulation of gene expression upon angiotensin II exposure. Three genes involved in the dampening of oxidative stress were enhanced. Taken together, brief exposure of human tubular epithelial cells to angiotensin II elicited a marked induction of nuclear factors, antioxidant genes and hormones and hormone receptor genes. The quick activation of transcription factors by angiotensin II indicates that angiotensin II can directly initiate a cascade of expressional events in proximal tubular cells.
We have discovered two single-nucleotide polymorphisms in the 5' flanking region of the HFE gene. These mutations are -970 T-->G and -467 C-->G, numbering from the ATG start codon. When a T was present at -970, a C was always found at -467. The C allele was the less common at nt -467 with a gene frequency of 0.31 in white subjects with wild-type HFE. Slightly lower gene frequencies were observed in a small number of Hispanic and African-American subjects and a slightly higher frequency in a few Asian subjects. The less common -467 mutation was found in almost 12 chromosomes that bore the 845G-->A (C282Y) mutation and was significantly more prevalent in chromosomes containing the 187C-->G (H63D) mutation. Although this mutation is near an HNF3B/HFH2 site, its presence did not seem to affect iron metabolism as judged by the serum ferritin or transferrin saturation levels. The tighter association of the -467 polymorphism with the C282Y mutation is consistent with other data that suggest that the C282Y mutation has occurred relatively recently and that the H63D mutation is considerably older.
We cloned and characterized the mouse gene for microtubule-associated protein (MAP) 1A, an important protein for neuronal morphology and mitotic spindle formation. We also investigated the 5' untranslated region of the gene to characterize the promoter units. Two alternative transcripts different in the 5' region were identified by 5' RACE. Both transcripts were principally observed in the brain. Genomic cloning revealed that exons 1, 2, and 4 generate the 5' part of a long transcript, whereas exons 3 and 4 generate a short transcript. Putative 5' and intronic promoters flanking exons 1 and 3, respectively, are GC-rich and lack a canonical TATA box. DNase I footprinting from mouse cells revealed that several potential cis-elements were occupied by nuclear proteins. A reporter assay system in conjunction with a number of deletion and mutation constructs was used to test the two putative promoters. Both putative promoters showed transactivity and their function was dependent upon Sp1 sites. In addition, an NF-1 site, an HNF3B site, and an AP-1/ATF site were necessary for basal promoter activity of the intronic promoter. Our data provide insight into the regulatory mechanisms that govern the expression of the MAP1A gene.
Mutations in genes encoding hepatocyte nuclear factor (HNF) are responsible for three of the five subtypes of maturity-onset diabetes of the young (MODY). This observation and molecular studies indicate that the HNF network is required for normal function of pancreatic beta-cells. This suggests that transcription factors involved in this complex network are candidates for genetic defects in MODY. Because the HNF-3beta gene is implicated in this network, we screened it for mutations in 21 probands of French ancestry with clinical diagnosis of MODY and early-onset type 2 diabetes. All of the five known MODY genes, HNF-4alpha, glucokinase, HNF-1alpha, HNF-1beta, and IPF1, were previously excluded as being the cause of diabetes in these families. By direct sequencing, we identified two transitions, an A-to-G at position -213 and a C-to-T at position -63 in the promoter and exon 1, respectively, of the HNF-3beta gene. A G-to-C transversion at position +32 in the intron 1 and three transitions, C-to-T at position 291, A-to-G at position 837, and G-to-A at position 1188 in the exon 3, resulting in noncoding mutations Ala97Ala, Gly279Gly, and Gln396Gln, respectively, were also identified. The allele frequencies were not significantly different between a control group and MODY probands. Familial segregation studies and linkage analysis showed that genetic variation in the HNF-3beta gene is unlikely to be the cause of early-onset type 2 diabetes in these Caucasian families.
Mutations in the transcription factors hepatocyte nuclear factor (HNF)-4alpha and -1alpha, insulin promoter factor-1, and HNF-1beta are the causes of four forms of maturity-onset diabetes of the young (MODY1 and 3-5, respectively). The winged-helix transcription factor HNF-3beta has been implicated in the regulation of expression of each of these MODY genes, suggesting that mutations in the HNF-3beta gene (HNF3B) may also cause MODY. We have tested this hypothesis by screening a panel of 57 unrelated Japanese subjects with a clinical diagnosis of MODY for mutations in HNF3B. This analysis revealed four frequent polymorphisms that were not associated with MODY, including one in the promoter region (-213A/G), two silent mutations in the codons for Ala 97 (291C/T) and Gly 279 (837A/G), and one in the 3'-untranslated region (1424C/T). Two rare substitutions in the 5'-untranslated region, -156C/T and -67A/C, were found in a heterozygous state in two subjects, and two subjects were heterozygous for putative missense mutations, S109N (326G > A) and A328V (983C>T). The two missense mutations were not found in 106 normal chromosomes from nondiabetic subjects. It was not possible to test for co-segregation of these mutations with diabetes and thus, it is unclear whether or not these mutations can cause MODY. The results of our study suggest that mutations in HNF3B are not a common cause of MODY in Japanese subjects.
Small heterodimer partner (SHP; NR0B2) is an atypical orphan nuclear receptor and acts as a coregulator of various nuclear receptors. Herein, we examined a novel cross talk between SHP and a forkhead transcription factor HNF3 (hepatocyte nuclear factor 3/Foxa. Transient transfection assay demonstrated that SHP inhibited the transcriptional activity of all three isoforms of HNF3, HNF3alpha, beta, and gamma. In vivo and in vitro protein interaction studies showed that SHP physically interacted with HNF3. Adenovirus-mediated overexpression of SHP significantly decreased the mRNA levels of glucose-6-phosphase (G6Pase), cholesterol 7-alpha-hydroxylase (CYP7A1), and phosphoenolpyruvate carboxykinase (PEPCK) in HepG2 cells and rat primary hepatocytes. Moreover, the mRNA level of G6Pase was notably increased by down-regulation of SHP with small interfering RNA. Interestingly, HNF3 transactivity was still repressed by SHPDelta128-139 that fails to repress nuclear receptors. Mapping of interaction domain revealed that SHP interacted with forkhead DNA binding domain of HNF3alpha. Gel mobility shift and chromatin immunoprecipitation assays demonstrated that SHP inhibits DNA binding of HNF3. These results suggest that SHP is involved in the regulation of G6Pase, CYP7A1, and PEPCK gene expression via novel mechanism of inhibition of HNF3 activity and expand the role of SHP as a coregulator of other family of transcription factors in addition to nuclear receptors.
In vitro production of human hepatocytes is of primary importance in basic research, pharmacotoxicology and biotherapy of liver diseases. We have developed a protocol of differentiation of human embryonic stem cells (ES) towards hepatocyte-like cells (ES-Hep). Using a set of human adult markers including CAAT/enhancer binding protein (C/EBPalpha), hepatocyte nuclear factor 4/7 ratio (HNF4alpha1/HNF4alpha7), cytochrome P450 7A1 (CYP7A1), CYP3A4 and constitutive androstane receptor (CAR), and fetal markers including alpha-fetoprotein, CYP3A7 and glutathione S-transferase P1, we analyzed the expression of a panel of 41 genes in ES-Hep comparatively with human adult primary hepatocytes, adult and fetal liver. The data revealed that after 21 days of differentiation, ES-Hep are representative of fetal hepatocytes at less than 20 weeks of gestation. The glucocorticoid receptor pathway was functional in ES-Hep. Extending protocols of differentiation to 4 weeks did not improve cell maturation. When compared with hepatocyte-like cells derived from adult liver non parenchymal epithelial (NPE) cells (NPE-Hep), ES-Hep expressed several adult and fetal liver makers at much greater levels (at least one order of magnitude), consistent with greater expression of liver-enriched transcription factors Forkhead box A2, C/EBPalpha, HNF4alpha and HNF6. It therefore seems that ES-Hep reach a better level of differentiation than NPE-Hep and that these cells use different lineage pathways towards the hepatic phenotype. Finally we showed that lentivirus-mediated expression of xenoreceptor CAR in ES-Hep induced the expression of several detoxification genes including CYP2B6, CYP2C9, CYP3A4, UDP-glycosyltransferase 1A1, solute carriers 21A6, as well as biotransformation of midazolam, a CYP3A4-specific substrate.
On the basis of their self-renewal capacity and their ability to differentiate into derivatives of all three germ layers, germ line-derived multipotent adult stem cells (maGSCs) from mouse testis might serve as one of preferable sources for pluripotent stem cells in regenerative medicine. In our study, we aimed for an efficient hepatic differentiation protocol that is applicable for both maGSCs and embryonic stem cells (ESCs). We attempted to accomplish this goal by using a new established co-culture system with OP9 stroma cells for direct differentiation of maGSCs and ESCs into hepatic cells. We found that the hepatic differentiation of maGSCs was induced by the OP9 co-culture system in comparison to the gelatin culture. Furthermore, we showed that the combination of OP9 co-culture with activin A resulted in the increased expression of endodermal and early hepatic markers Gata4, Sox17, Foxa2, Hnf4, Afp, and Ttr compared to differentiated cells on gelatin or on OP9 alone. Moreover, the hepatic progenitors were capable of differentiating further into mature hepatic cells, demonstrated by the expression of liver-specific markers Aat, Alb, Tdo2, Krt18, Krt8, Krt19, Cps1, Sek, Cyp7a1, Otc, and Pah. A high percentage of maGSC-derived hepatic progenitors (51% AFP- and 61% DLK1-positive) and mature hepatic-like cells (26% ALB-positive) were achieved using this OP9 co-culture system. These generated hepatic cells successfully demonstrated in vitro functions associated with mature hepatocytes, including albumin and urea secretion, glycogen storage, and uptake of low-density lipoprotein. The established co-culture system for maGSCs into functional hepatic cells might serve as a suitable model to delineate the differentiation process for the generation of high numbers of mature hepatocytes in humans without genetic manipulations and make germ line-derived stem cells a potential autologous and alternative cell source for hepatic transplants in metabolic liver disorders.
When differentiated in the presence of activin A in serum-free conditions, mouse embryonic stem cells efficiently generate an endoderm progenitor population defined by the coexpression of either Brachyury, Foxa2 and c-Kit, or c-Kit and Cxcr4. Specification of these progenitors with bone morphogenetic protein-4 in combination with basic fibroblast growth factor and activin A results in the development of hepatic populations highly enriched (45-70%) for cells that express the alpha-fetoprotein and albumin proteins. These cells also express transcripts of Afp, Alb1, Tat, Cps1, Cyp7a1 and Cyp3a11; they secrete albumin, store glycogen, show ultrastructural characteristics of mature hepatocytes, and are able to integrate into and proliferate in injured livers in vivo and mature into hepatocytes expressing dipeptidyl peptidase IV or fumarylacetoacetate hydrolase. Together, these findings establish a developmental pathway in embryonic stem cell differentiation cultures that leads to efficient generation of cells with an immature hepatocytic phenotype.
Corneal epithelium is maintained by a population of stem cells (SCs) that have not been identified by specific molecular markers. The objective of this study was to find new putative markers for these SCs and to identify associated molecular pathways.
Real time PCR (rt-PCR) was performed in 24 human limbal and central corneal epithelial samples to evaluate the gene expression profile of known corneal epithelial SC-associated markers. A pool of those samples was further analyzed by a rt-PCR array (RT²-PCR-A) for 84 genes related to the identification, growth, maintenance, and differentiation of SCs.
Cells from the corneal epithelium SC niche showed significant expression of ATP-binding cassette sub-family G member 2 (ABCG2) and cytokeratin (KRT)15, KRT14, and KRT5 genes. RT²-PCR-A results indicated an increased or decreased expression in 21 and 24 genes, respectively, in cells from the corneal SC niche compared to cells from the central corneal epithelium. Functional analysis by proprietary software found 4 different associated pathways and a novel network with the highest upregulated genes in the corneal SC niche. This led to the identification of specific molecules, chemokine (C-X-C motif) ligand 12 (CXCL12), islet-1 transcription factor LIM/homeodomain (ISL1), collagen-type II alpha 1 (COL2A), neural cell adhesion molecule 1 (NCAM1), aggrecan (ACAN), forkhead box A2 (FOXA2), Gap junction protein beta 1/connexin 32 (GJB1/Cnx32), and Msh homeobox 1 (MSX1), that could be used to recognize putative corneal epithelial SCs grown in culture and intended for transplantation. Other molecules, NCAM1 and GJB1/Cnx32, potentially could be used to positively purify them, and Par-6 partitioning defective 6 homolog alpha (PARD6A) to negatively purify them.
Knowledge of these gene and molecular pathways has provided a better understanding of the signaling molecular pathways associated with progenitor-rich limbal epithelium. This knowledge potentially could give support to the design and development of innovative therapies with the potential to reverse corneal blindness arising from ocular surface failure.
FoxO1 binds to insulin response elements located in the promoters of insulin-like growth factor-binding protein 1 (IGFBP1) and glucose-6-phosphatase (G6Pase), activating their expression. Insulin-mediated phosphorylation of FoxO1 promotes cytoplasmic translocation, inhibiting FoxO1-mediated transactivation. We have previously demonstrated that FoxO1 opens and remodels chromatin assembled from the IGFBP1 promoter via a highly conserved winged helix motif. This finding, which established FoxO1 as a "pioneer" factor, suggested a model whereby FoxO1 chromatin remodeling at regulatory targets facilitates binding and recruitment of additional regulatory factors. However, the impact of FoxO1 phosphorylation on its ability to bind chromatin and the effect of FoxO1 loss on recruitment of neighboring transcription factors at its regulatory targets in liver chromatin is unknown. In this study, we demonstrate that an amino acid substitution that mimics insulin-mediated phosphorylation of a serine in the winged helix DNA binding motif curtails FoxO1 nucleosome binding. We also demonstrate that shRNA-mediated loss of FoxO1 binding to the IGFBP1 and G6Pase promoters in HepG2 cells significantly reduces binding of RNA polymerase II and the pioneer factors FoxA1/A2. Knockdown of FoxA1 similarly reduced binding of RNA polymerase II and FoxO1. Reduction in acetylation of histone H3 Lys-27 accompanies loss of FoxO1 and FoxA1/A2 binding. Interdependent binding of FoxO1 and FoxA1/A2 possibly entails cooperative binding because FoxO1 and FoxA1/A2 facilitate one another's binding to IGFPB1 promoter DNA. These results illustrate how transcription factors can nucleate transcriptional events in chromatin in response to signaling events and suggest a model for regulation of hepatic glucose metabolism through interdependent FoxO/FoxA binding.
The Sonic hedgehog (Shh) signaling pathway is crucial for pattern formation in early central nervous system development. By systematically analyzing high-throughput in situ hybridization data of E11.5 mouse brain, we found that Shh and its receptor Ptch1 define two adjacent mutually exclusive gene expression domains: Shh+Ptch1- and Shh-Ptch1+. These two domains are associated respectively with Foxa2 and Gata3, two transcription factors that play key roles in specifying them. Gata3 ChIP-seq experiments and RNA-seq assays on Gata3-knockdown cells revealed that Gata3 up-regulates the genes that are enriched in the Shh-Ptch1+ domain. Important Gata3 targets include Slit2 and Slit3, which are involved in the process of axon guidance, as well as Slc18a1, Th and Qdpr, which are associated with neurotransmitter synthesis and release. By contrast, Foxa2 both up-regulates the genes expressed in the Shh+Ptch1- domain and down-regulates the genes characteristic of the Shh-Ptch1+ domain. From these and other data, we were able to reconstruct a gene regulatory network governing both domains. Our work provides the first genome-wide characterization of the gene regulatory network involved in the Shh pathway that underlies pattern formation in the early mouse brain.
The aryl hydrocarbon receptor (AhR) is a ligand-activated transcription factor that mediates diverse dioxin toxicities. While the acute effects of activation of the AhR pathway by 2,3,7,8-tetrachlorodibenzo-p-dioxin (TCDD) have been a focus of past study, the role of this pathway in normal physiology and ageing is unclear. The purpose of this study was to identify the portion of the reproductive axis [ovary vs. hypothalamus and pituitary gland (H-H axis)] and the stages of the reproductive lifespan (foetal and early post-natal life vs. adolescence and adulthood) that are particularly sensitive to the effects of TCDD during female reproductive ageing. Adult pregnant Lewis rat dams were dosed with corn oil vehicle or TCDD (50 ng/kg-week by gavage) on days 14 and 21 of gestation and post-natal days 7 and 14 to provide in utero and lactational (IUL) exposure to pups. Female pups (n = 96) were weaned on post-natal day 21 and dosed with TCDD or vehicle weekly. Half of the pups were used as donors for ovary transplantation while the remainder were recipients. Following ovary transplantation, rats (n = 6-8 per group) received weekly TCDD or vehicle again until sacrifice at 8 months of age. Beginning at vaginal opening, reproductive cycles were monitored by vaginal cytology for 10 days each month. Blood samples were collected at 22.00 h on proestrus to measure concentration of 17beta-oestradiol in serum. Real-time PCR was used to determine differences in Cyp1a1, Cyp19a1, Cyp17a1, LH receptor (LHR), FoxA2 and FoxJ1 genes expression between control and remaining groups. IUL exposure of the H-H axis plus adult exposure of the whole body to TCDD significantly delayed puberty in females rats. Data analysis revealed an accelerated onset of acyclicity by 5 months in all groups involving IUL exposure of the developing ovary to TCDD. 17beta-oestradiol was significantly decreased in animals receiving TCDD during IUL exposure of the H-H axis. CYP1a1 expression was markedly greater in the liver than in ovarian tissue and correlated with ongoing TCDD exposure. Aromatase, 17alpha-hydroxylase and LHR gene expressions were largely unchanged (or occasionally elevated) by TCDD. FoxA2 and FoxJ1 mRNAs were similarly of limited value mechanistically, although FoxJ1 was much higher in TTT females (receiving TCDD as donor, recipient and adult). This study reveals a particular sensitivity of the developing ovary to TCDD leading to early loss of reproductive function with age.
Xenobiotic and drug metabolism and transport are managed by a large number of genes coordinately regulated by at least three nuclear receptors or xenosensors: aryl hydrocarbon receptor (AhR), constitutive androstane receptor (CAR, NR1I3), and pregnane X receptor (PXR, NR1I2). Initially characterized as xenosensors, it is now evident that CAR and PXR also trigger pleiotropic effects on liver function. Recent studies have shown the existence of crosstalk between xenosensors and other nuclear receptors or transcription factors controlling endogenous signaling pathways which regulate physiological functions. This review is focused on recent observations showing that activation of CAR and PXR alters lipid metabolism, glucose homeostasis, and inflammation by interfering with HNF4alpha, FoxO1, FoxA2, PGC1alpha, or NFkB p65. Such crosstalks explain clinical observations and provide molecular mechanisms allowing understanding how xenobiotics and drugs may affect physiological functions and provoke endocrine disruptions.
Cytochrome P450 2A2 (CYP2A2) is an adult male-specific rat liver steroid hydroxylase whose sex-dependent expression is regulated at the transcriptional level by sexually dimorphic pituitary growth hormone (GH) secretory patterns. In contrast to CYP2C11 and other male-specific, plasma GH pulse-inducible liver genes, CYP2A2 is highly expressed in hypophysectomized rat liver, despite the absence of GH stimulation. CYP2A2 promoter fragments 0.9-6.2 kb long exhibited unusually high basal promoter activity when transfected into the liver cell line HepG2. A further approximately 2.5-fold increase in activity was obtained by cotransfection of hepatocyte nuclear factor (HNF) 3gamma or HNF4alpha. CYP2A2 promoter activity was inhibited approximately 85% by transfection of HNF3beta or HNF6, both of which are more highly expressed in female than male liver and can strongly trans-activate the female-specific CYP2C12 promoter. The male GH pulse-activated transcription factor STAT5b had no effect on CYP2A2 promoter activity, either alone or in combination with HNF3gamma and HNF4alpha, consistent with the GH pulse-independence of CYP2A2 expression. By contrast, STAT5b synergistically enhanced the transcriptional activity of HNF4alpha toward two other male-specific liver target genes, Cyp2d9 and CYP8B1. Furthermore, STAT5b in combination with the HNF4alpha coactivator peroxisome proliferator-activated receptor gamma coactivator-1alpha strongly enhanced the transcriptional activity of HNF4alpha toward CYP8B1 but not toward CYP2A2. These findings support the hypothesis that sex-dependent HNFs contribute to the sexually dimorphic expression of CYP2A2 and other liver CYPs and highlight the ability of STAT5b to act in concert with HNF4alpha to regulate select male-specific liver CYP genes.
Withdrawal of promising drug candidates is often due to the detection of liver toxicity. In particular the parenchymal liver cells or hepatocytes are targeted since they are the major sites of drug transport and of metabolite formation and thus also the place where not only detoxification, but also activation of new chemical (NCE) and biological (NBE) entities may occur. Therefore, primary hepatocyte- based cultures are currently the preferred in vitro model to screen for liver toxicity. However, within a few days, they undergo dedifferentiation with loss of liver-specific functionality, including xenobiotic biotransformation capacity, making them only suitable for short-term applications. A plausible alternative to primary hepatocyte cultures that can be maintained for longer periods of time could be the use of liver-derived epithelial cell lines and their optimized derivatives. Therefore, in the present study, we evaluated the stability and the hepatic differentiation potential of a neonatal liver-derived rat epithelial cell line from biliary origin (rLEC). Undifferentiated rLEC stably express the hepatic progenitor markers CEBPA, FOXA2, GJA1, ONECUT1, KRT18 and KRT19 for at least 15 consecutive passages after cryopreservation. Upon sequential exposure to hepatogenic growth factors and cytokines, rLEC generate functional hepatic progeny, expressing mature hepatic markers including Alb, Ahr, Car, C/ebpα, Cx32, Foxa2, Hnf1α, Hnf1β and Onecut1. Furthermore, an active polarization is observed for the hepatic drug transporters Oatp4 and Ntcp. rLEC-derived hepatic cells also acquire the ability to store glycogen, express genes encoding for key hepatic enzymes as shown by Affymetrix microarray data, and display stable CYP1A1/2- and CYP2B1/2-dependent activities for several weeks at levels comparable to those observed in cultured primary rat hepatocytes. The acquisition of such a stable and active biotransformation capacity is key for the applicability of liver-based in vitro models for long-term toxicity testing.
Oval cells appear and expand in the liver when hepatocyte proliferation is compromised. Many different markers have been attributed to these cells, but their nature still remains obscure. This study is a detailed gene expression analysis aimed at revealing their identity and repopulating in vivo capacity. Oval cells were activated in 2-acetylaminofluorene-treated rats subjected to partial hepatectomy or in D-galactosamine-treated rats. Two surface markers [epithelial cell adhesion molecule (EpCAM) and thymus cell antigen 1 (Thy-1)] were used for purification of freshly isolated cells. Their gene expression analysis was studied with Affymetrix Rat Expression Array 230 2.0, reverse-transcriptase polymerase chain reaction, and immunofluorescent microscopy. We found that EpCAM(+) and Thy-1(+) cells represent two different populations of cells in the oval cell niche. EpCAM(+) cells express the classical oval cell markers (alpha-fetoprotein, cytokeratin-19, OV-1 antigen, a6 integrin, and connexin 43), cell surface markers recently identified by us (CD44, CD24, EpCAM, aquaporin 5, claudin-4, secretin receptor, claudin-7, V-ros sarcoma virus oncogene homolog 1, cadherin 22, mucin-1, and CD133), and liver-enriched transcription factors (forkhead box q, forkhead box a2, onecut 1, and transcription factor 2). Oval cells do not express previously reported hematopoietic stem cell markers Thy-1, c-kit, and CD34 or the neuroepithelial marker neural cell adhesion molecule 1. However, oval cells express a number of mesenchymal markers including vimentin, mesothelin, bone morphogenetic protein 7, and Tweak receptor (tumor necrosis factor receptor superfamily, member 12A). A group of novel differentially expressed oval cell genes is also presented. It is shown that Thy-1(+) cells are mesenchymal cells with characteristics of myofibroblasts/activated stellate cells. Transplantation experiments reveal that EpCAM(+) cells are true progenitors capable of repopulating injured rat liver.
We have shown that EpCAM(+) oval cells are bipotential adult hepatic epithelial progenitors. These cells display a mixed epithelial/mesenchymal phenotype that has not been recognized previously. They are valuable candidates for liver cell therapy.
The mechanisms that allow breast cancer (BCa) cells to metabolically sustain rapid growth are poorly understood. Here we report that BCa cells are dependent on a mechanism to supply precursors for intracellular lipid production derived from extracellular sources and that the endothelial lipase (LIPG) fulfils this function. LIPG expression allows the import of lipid precursors, thereby contributing to BCa proliferation. LIPG stands out as an essential component of the lipid metabolic adaptations that BCa cells, and not normal tissue, must undergo to support high proliferation rates. LIPG is ubiquitously and highly expressed under the control of FoxA1 or FoxA2 in all BCa subtypes. The downregulation of either LIPG or FoxA in transformed cells results in decreased proliferation and impaired synthesis of intracellular lipids.
Degeneration of midbrain dopaminergic (DA) neurons is a key pathological event of Parkinson's disease (PD). Limited adult dopaminergic neurogenesis has led to novel therapeutic strategies such as transplantation of dopaminergic precursors (DPs). However, this strategy is currently restrained by a lack of cell source, the tendency for the DPs to become a glial-restricted state, and the tumor formation after transplantation. Here, we demonstrate the direct conversion of mouse fibroblasts into induced DPs (iDPs) by ectopic expression of Brn2, Sox2 and Foxa2. Besides expression with neural progenitor markers and midbrain genes including Corin, Otx2 and Lmx1a, the iDPs were restricted to dopaminergic neuronal lineage upon differentiation. After transplantation into MPTP-lesioned mice, iDPs differentiated into DA neurons, functionally alleviated the motor deficits, and reduced the loss of striatal DA neuronal axonal termini. Importantly, no iDPs-derived astrocytes and neoplasia were detected in mouse brains after transplantation. We propose that the iDPs from direct reprogramming provides a safe and efficient cell source for PD treatment.
Farnesol is a non-cyclic sesquiterpene (isoprenoid) found in the essential oils of many plants. In cancer biology, farnesylation of mutated Ras oncoproteins allows the proteins to dock to the membrane and be functionalized. Therefore, farnesyltransferase is a target for drug development to inhibit Ras. Farnesol exhibits cytotoxic activity against tumor cells in vitro and in vivo, implying that novel treatment strategies may be devised independent of Ras farnesylation. Tumors frequently develop resistance towards standard chemotherapies, and thus novel agents are urgently required that bypass the cross-resistance evoked by established anticancer drugs. We investigated whether classical mechanisms of drug resistance such as ATP-binding cassette transporters (P-glycoprotein/MDR1, MRP1, BCRP), the tumor suppressor gene TP53, and the oncogene EGFR play a role in the response of tumor cells to farnesol. Remarkably, none of these genes conferred resistance to farnesol, indicating that this compound may be useful for the treatment of otherwise drug-resistant and refractory tumors expressing these mechanisms of resistance. Furthermore, we applied a pharmacogenomic approach to explore molecular determinants of sensitivity and resistance to farnesol. Among the candidates were genes involved in apoptosis (STAB2, NUMBL), regulation of transcription (CDYL, FOXA2) and diverse other functional groups (INE1, CTRL, MRS2, NEB, LMO7, C9orf3, EHBP1). The fact that these genes are not associated with resistance to traditional anticancer drugs suggests farnesol may possess a novel mechanism of action, and consequently might bypass drug resistance to established chemotherapeutics.
We targeted the reverse tetracycline controlled transactivator (rtTA) to the Foxa2 locus (Foxa2(ITA)) to generate a system for regulating Cre-recombinase activity within Foxa2 expression domains, including the endoderm, notochord, and floor plate of early mouse embryos. The use of an internal ribosomal entry site to obtain rtTA expression preserves Foxa2 function of the targeted allele. Cre activity with this system reflects the level of endogenous Foxa2 activity and is also tightly controlled by doxycycline. The location of Cre activity within the broader Foxa2 expression domain can be restricted by altering the timing of doxycycline administration. Isolated floor plate expression can be obtained in this manner. This system will provide a useful tool for manipulating gene expression in endoderm, notochord, and floor plate, all of which are tissues with important structural and patterning functions during embryogenesis.
Since the lung is repeatedly subjected to injury by pathogens and toxicants, maintenance of pulmonary homeostasis requires rapid repair of its epithelial surfaces. Ciliated bronchiolar epithelial cells, previously considered as terminally differentiated, underwent squamous cell metaplasia within hours after bronchiolar injury with naphthalene. Expression of transcription factors active in morphogenesis and differentiation of the embryonic lung, including beta-catenin, Foxa2, Foxj1, and Sox family members (Sox17 and Sox2), was dynamically regulated during repair and redifferentiation of the bronchiolar epithelium after naphthalene injury. Squamous cells derived from ciliated cells spread beneath injured Clara cells within 6-12 h after injury, maintaining the integrity of the epithelium. Dynamic changes in cell shape and gene expression, indicating cell plasticity, accompanied the transition from squamous to cuboidal to columnar cell types as differentiation-specific cell markers typical of the mature airway were restored. Similar dynamic changes in the expression of these transcription factors occurred in ciliated and Clara cells during regeneration of the lung after unilateral pneumonectomy. Taken together, these findings demonstrate that ciliated epithelial cells spread and transdifferentiate into distinct epithelial cell types to repair the airway epithelium.
Agonists for the nuclear receptor peroxisomal proliferator-activated receptor-gamma (PPARgamma) and its heterodimeric partner, retinoid X receptor (RXR), are effective agents for the treatment of type 2 diabetes. To gain insight into the antidiabetic action of these compounds, we treated female Zucker diabetic rats (ZFF) with AGN194204, which we show to be a homodimer-specific RXR agonist, or the PPARgamma agonist, troglitazone. Hyperinsulinemic-euglycemic clamps in ZFF showed that troglitazone and AGN194204 reduced basal endogenous glucose production (EGP) approximately 30% and doubled the insulin suppression of EGP. AGN194204 had no effect on peripheral glucose utilization, whereas troglitazone increased insulin-stimulated glucose utilization by 50%, glucose uptake into skeletal muscle by 85%, and de novo skeletal muscle glycogen synthesis by 300%. Troglitazone increased skeletal muscle Irs-1 and phospho-Akt levels following in vivo insulin treatment, whereas AGN194204 increased hepatic Irs-2 and insulin stimulated phospho-Akt in liver. Gene profiles of AGN194204-treated mouse liver analyzed by Ingenuity Pathway Analysis identified increases in fatty acid synthetic genes, including Srebp-1 and fatty acid synthase, a pathway previously shown to be induced by RXR agonists. A network of down-regulated genes containing Foxa2, Foxa3, and G-protein subunits was identified, and decreases in these mRNA levels were confirmed by quantitative reverse transcription-PCR. Treatment of HepG2 cells with AGN194204 resulted in inhibition of glucagon-stimulated cAMP accumulation suggesting the G-protein down-regulation may provide an additional mechanism for hepatic insulin sensitization by RXR. These studies demonstrate distinct molecular events lead to insulin sensitization by high affinity RXR and PPARgamma agonists.
The PDX-1 transcription factor plays a key role in pancreas development. Although expressed in all cells at the early stages, in the adult it is mainly restricted to the beta-cell. To characterize the regulatory elements and potential transcription factors necessary for human PDX-1 gene expression in beta-cells, we constructed a series of 5' and 3' deletion fragments of the 5'-flanking region of the gene, fused to the luciferase reporter gene. In this report, we identify by transient transfections in beta- and non-beta-cells a novel beta-cell-specific distal enhancer element located between -3.7 and -3.45 kilobases. DNase I footprinting analysis revealed two protected regions, one binding the transcription factors SP1 and SP3 and the other hepatocyte nuclear factor 3beta (HNF-3beta) and HNF-1alpha. Cotransfection experiments suggest that HNF-3beta, HNF-1alpha, and SP1 are positive regulators of the herein-described human PDX-1 enhancer element. Furthermore, mutations within each motif abolished the binding of the corresponding factor(s) and dramatically impaired the enhancer activity, therefore suggesting cooperativity between these factors.
Preneoplastic and neoplastic lesions in rodent liver show alterations in the expression of various enzymes which can be used for their identification. To address the question whether these enzymatic alterations result from specific changes in the levels of hepatocyte-enriched nuclear factors (HNF), we analysed the mRNA levels of six different HNFs (HNF-1alpha, beta, HNF-3alpha, beta, gamma, and HNF-4) by RNase protection assay in chemically induced liver tumours and corresponding normal liver tissue from mice of three different strains. When compared with the normal liver tissue, HNF-1beta, HNF-3alpha and HNF-3beta showed unchanged expression levels in the various liver tumours, which HNF-1alpha and HNF-4 mRNAs were lowered by 20-30%, and HNF-3gamma mRNA was increased by 50%. There were no significant differences in HNF-expression between tumours harbouring point mutations at codon 61 of the Ha-ras protooncogene and tumours without detectable Ha-ras mutations.
Inhaled xenobiotics such as tobacco-specific carcinogen 4-(methylnitrosamino)-1-(3-pyridyl)-1-butanone are mainly metabolized by phase I oxidase cytochrome P450, family 2, subfamily A, polypeptide 13 (CYP2A13), phase II conjugate UDP glucuronosyltransferase 2 family, polypeptide B17 (UGT2B17), and phase III transporter ATP-binding cassette, subfamily B (MDR/TAP), member 1 (ABCB1), with genetic polymorphisms implicated in lung cancer. Their genetic interaction and pulmonary expression regulation are largely unknown. We analyzed joint association for CYP2A13 and ABCB1 polymorphisms in 2 independent lung cancer case populations (669 and 566 patients) and 1 common control population (749 subjects), and characterized the trans-acting function of the lung development-related transcription factor forkhead box A2 (FOXA2). We undertook FOXA2 overexpression and down-regulation in lung epithelial cell lines, analyzed functional impact on the transactivation of CYP2A13, UGT2B17, and ABCB1, and measured correlation for their expressions in lung tissues. We found a substantial reduction in cancer risk (OR 0.39; 95% CI 0.25-0.61; Pinteraction = 0.029) associated with combined genotypes for CYP2A13 R257C and a functionary regulatory variant in the cis element of ABCB1 synergistically targeted by GATA binding protein 6 and FOXA2. Genetic manipulation of FOXA2 consistently influenced its binding to and transactivation of the promoters of CYP2A13, UGT2B17, and ABCB1, whose mRNA and protein expressions were all consistently correlated with those of FOXA2 in both tumorous and normal lung tissues. We therefore establish FOXA2 as a core transcriptional modulator for pulmonary xenobiotic metabolic pathways and uncover an etiologically relevant interaction between CYP2A13 and ABCB1, furthering our understanding of expression and function of the xenobiotic metabolism system.
Variability in hepatic CYP3A4 cannot be explained by common CYP3A4 coding variants. We previously identified polymorphisms in pregnane X receptor (PXR) and ATP-binding cassette subfamily B member 1 (ABCB1) associated with CYP3A4 mRNA levels in small cohorts of human livers. However, the relative contributions of these genetic variations or of polymorphisms in other CYP3A4 regulators to variable CYP3A4 expression were not known. We phenotyped livers from white donors (n = 128) by quantitative real-time polymerase chain reaction for expression of CYP3A4, CYP3A5, and CYP3A7 and nine transcriptional regulators, coactivators, and corepressors. We resequenced hepatic nuclear factor-3-beta (HNF3beta, FoxA2), HNF4alpha, HNF3gamma (FoxA3), nuclear receptor corepressor 2 (NCoR2), and regions of the CYP3A4 promoter and genotyped informative single-nucleotide polymorphisms in PXR and ABCB1 in the same livers. CYP3A4 mRNA was positively correlated with PXR and FoxA2 and negatively correlated with NCoR2 mRNA. A common silent polymorphism and a polymorphic trinucleotide (CCT) repeat in FoxA2 were associated with CYP3A4 expression. The transcriptional activity of the FoxA2 polymorphic CCT repeat alleles (wild-type, n = 14 and variant, n = 13, 15, and 19) when assayed by luciferase reporter transactivation assays was greatest for the wild-type repeat, with deviations from this number having decreased transcriptional activity. This corresponded with higher expression of FoxA2 mRNA and its targets PXR and CYP3A4 in human livers with (CCT) n = 14 genotypes. Multiple linear regression analysis was used to quantify the contributions of selected genetic polymorphisms to variable CYP3A4 expression. This approach identified sex and polymorphisms in FoxA2, HNF4alpha, FoxA3, PXR, ABCB1, and the CYP3A4 promoter that together explained as much as 24.6% of the variation in hepatic CYP3A4 expression.
Nuclear receptors constitutive active/androstane receptor (CAR) and pregnane X receptor (PXR) were originally characterized as transcription factors regulating the hepatic genes that encode drug metabolizing enzymes. Recent works have now revealed that these nuclear receptors also play the critical roles in modulating hepatic energy metabolism. While CAR and PXR directly bind to their response sequences phenobarbital-responsive enhancer module (PBREM) and xenobiotic responsive enhancer module (XREM) in the promoter of target genes to increase drug metabolism, the receptors also cross talk with various hormone responsive transcription factors such as forkhead box O1 (FoxO1), forkhead box A2 (FoxA2), cAMP-response element binding protein, and peroxisome proliferator activated receptor gamma coactivator 1alpha (PGC 1alpha) to decrease energy metabolism through down-regulating gluconeogenesis, fatty acid oxidation and ketogenesis and up-regulating lipogenesis. In addition, CAR modulates thyroid hormone activity by regulating type 1 deiodinase in the regenerating liver. Thus, CAR and PXR are now placed at the crossroad where both xenobiotics and endogenous stimuli co-regulate liver function.
Cytochrome P450 3A4 (CYP3A4) is the major cytochrome P450 present in adult human liver and is involved in the metabolism of over 50% of therapeutic compounds currently in use. Since expression levels of CYP3A4 are regulated by many of these compounds, this raises the potential for drug-drug interactions and subsequent altered efficacy or toxicity of the individual compounds at the dose prescribed. Hence, understanding the molecular mechanisms of CYP3A4 regulation is of key importance in predicting and understanding such interactions. To examine this we have used DNase I footprinting and bioinformatic analysis to identify putative transcription factor binding sites within the 250 base pairs of promoter proximal to the transcription start site. We identified several protected fragments within this region that corresponded to putative binding sites for Sp1, AP2, CCAAT/enhancer binding protein (C/EBPalpha), and hepatic nuclear factor-3 (HNF3), as well as confirming previously identified C/EBPalpha, pregnane X receptor (PXR), and HNF3 binding sites. Sequential site-directed mutagenesis of C/EBPalpha, Sp1, HNF3, and PXR binding sites was next used to examine the role of these sites in basal CYP3A4 expression. Disruption of the C/EBPalpha, HNF3, and PXR binding sites all affected basal expression. Finally, the role of these sites was examined in activation of CYP3A4 expression by rifampicin, metyrapone, clotrimazole, and phenobarbital. Disruption of any of these sites either led to an altered pattern of activation by the xenobiotic, as altered maximal activation, or altered the EC(50) value of activation. Such effects were xenobiotic-specific, with each disrupted site playing a role in the activation of some of the xenobiotics.
Chicken CYP2H1 promoter constructs express strongly in chick embryo hepatocytes at a level comparable with that of Rous sarcoma viral promoter. We have identified the transcription factors responsible for the active CYP2H1 promoter. Binding sites for transcription factors were located within the first 160 bp of promoter sequence using promoter deletion experiments and DNase I footprint analysis. Sequence analysis revealed characteristic sites for the liver-enriched transcription factors of the HNF-1, HNF-3, and C/EBP families and for the ubiquitous factor, USF. Protein binding to these sites was established by gel mobility shift assays. Mutagenesis and transient transfection experiments demonstrated that these sites, in combination, were responsible for the strong promoter activity with a substantial contribution from HNF-1 and HNF-3. The promoter was also active in mammalian HepG2 and COS-1 cell lines where expression was dependent on the identified transcription factor binding sites but promoter activity in the HeLa cells was low. Transactivation experiments revealed that promoter expression could be activated through the appropriate binding sites by exogenously expressed rat HNF-1alpha or HNF-1beta, rat HNF-3alpha or HNF-3beta and chicken C/EBP alpha. Transcriptional synergism between HNF-1 and C/EBP was observed in these transactivation experiments. A Barbie box-like sequence overlapped the USF element but was not functional. The results demonstrate that liver-enriched transcription factors and USF direct strong expression of the CYP2H1 promoter in transiently transfected cells. By comparison, in vivo expression of this gene in uninduced chick embryo hepatocytes is low but markedly increased by phenobarbital. Drug induction may therefore substantially reflect derepression of this inherently active promoter.
Bone morphogenetic proteins (BMPs) are implicated in cell-fate determination of embryonic stem (ES) cells and cancer cells. GREM1 (CKTSF1B1 or DAND2) and CER1 (Cerberus 1 or DAND4) are cysteine knot superfamily proteins, functioning as secreted-type BMP antagonists. BMP4 is preferentially expressed in diffuse-type gastric cancer cells. Here, vertebrate BMP4 orthologs were identified and characterized by using bioinformatics for comparative proteomics and comparative genomics analyses. Baboon BMP4 gene within AC153751.2 genome sequence encoded a 408-aa protein, showing A152V and S298P amino-acid substitutions compared with human BMP4. Cow Bmp4, bat Bmp4 and zebrafish bmp4 genes were located within AC149774.2, AC156788.2 and CR391996.2 genome sequences, respectively. Human BMP4 showed 99.5%, 98.0%, 97.8%, 97.1%, 96.3%, 83.3% and 71.1% total-amino-acid identity with baboon BMP4, cow Bmp4, bat Bmp4, mouse Bmp4, rat Bmp4, chicken bmp4 and zebrafish bmp4, respectively. Human BMP4 gene was found consisting of six exons, including novel exon 1C, and known exons 1 (1A or I), 1B (II), 2 (III), 3 (IV) and 4 (V). Forty human BMP4 ESTs started from exon 1, seven from intron 1 (5'-flanking region of exon 2), and two from exon 1C. Fourteen mouse Bmp4 ESTs started from exon 1, and one from intron 1. The 5'-flanking region of exon 1 and exon 1 itself, but not exons 1C and 1B, were well conserved between human BMP4 and rodent Bmp4 genes. The major promoter region of human BMP4 and rodent Bmp4 genes were located within the 5'-flanking region of exon 1. FOXA2, OLF1, and MYC-binding sites were conserved among the major promoter region of human, baboon, cow, bat, mouse and rat BMP4 orthologs.
Capicua (CIC) has been implicated in pathogenesis of spinocerebellar ataxia type 1 and cancer in mammals; however, the in vivo physiological functions of CIC remain largely unknown. Here we show that Cic hypomorphic (Cic-L(-/-)) mice have impaired bile acid (BA) homeostasis associated with induction of proinflammatory cytokines. We discovered that several drug metabolism and BA transporter genes were down-regulated in Cic-L(-/-) liver, and that BA was increased in the liver and serum whereas bile was decreased within the gallbladder of Cic-L(-/-) mice. We also found that levels of proinflammatory cytokine genes were up-regulated in Cic-L(-/-) liver. Consistent with this finding, levels of hepatic transcriptional regulators, such as hepatic nuclear factor 1 alpha (HNF1α), CCAAT/enhancer-binding protein beta (C/EBPβ), forkhead box protein A2 (FOXA2), and retinoid X receptor alpha (RXRα), were markedly decreased in Cic-L(-/-) mice. Moreover, induction of tumor necrosis factor alpha (Tnfα) expression and decrease in the levels of FOXA2, C/EBPβ, and RXRα were found in Cic-L(-/-) liver before BA was accumulated, suggesting that inflammation might be the cause for the cholestasis in Cic-L(-/-) mice. Our findings indicate that CIC is a critical regulator of BA homeostasis, and that its dysfunction might be associated with chronic liver disease and metabolic disorders.
ATP binding cassette transporter A1 (ABCA1) plays a key role in the biogenesis of HDL by promoting the efflux of cellular cholesterol and phospholipids to lipid free apoA-I. Mutations in the ABCA1 gene cause Tangier disease which is characterized by near or complete absence of circulating plasma HDL. In the present study we show that the winged helix/forkhead box containing transcription factor A2 (FOXA2) shown previously to play a role in glucose and bile acid homeostasis in the liver and in energy utilization in adipose tissue is a negative modulator of ABCA1 gene expression in hepatic cells. We show that the ABCA1 promoter contains three FOXA2 binding elements in the proximal region. Two of the sites are localized in a region of the ABCA1 promoter enriched in binding elements for transcriptional repressor proteins whereas the third site is the core of the TATA element of the ABCA1 promoter. Inhibition of FOXA2 binding to the ABCA1 promoter by site-directed mutagenesis or FOXA2 gene expression by siRNA was associated with increased ABCA1 promoter activity and protein levels. Overexpression of FOXA2 inhibited both the constitutive ABCA1 gene expression as well as ABCA1 gene induction by oxysterols and retinoids via nuclear receptors LXRα/RXRα. In summary, the present study identifies transcription factor FOXA2 as a negative modulator of ABCA1 gene expression in hepatic cells and reveals a novel mechanism of transcriptional repression by FOXA2 which involves the TATA element of the ABCA1 gene.
Cytokine signaling has been connected to regulation of metabolism and energy balance. Numerous cytokine gene expression changes are stimulated by accumulation of bile acids in livers of young Foxa2 liver-conditional null mice. We hypothesized that bile acid-induced inflammation in young Foxa2 mutants, once chronic, affects metabolic homeostasis. We found that loss of Foxa2 in the liver results in a premature aging phenotype, including significant weight gain, reduced food intake, and decreased energy expenditure. We show that Foxa2 antagonizes the mammalian target of rapamycin (mTOR) pathway, resulting in increased hepatic lipogenesis and adiposity. While much prior work has focused on adipose tissue in obesity, we discovered a novel age-onset obesity phenotype in a model where gene deletion occurs only in the liver, underscoring the importance of the role hepatic lipogenesis plays in the development of obesity.
Bile acids are powerful detergents produced by the liver to aid in the absorption of dietary lipids. We recently reported a novel role for Foxa2 in bile acid metabolism. The winged helix transcription factor Foxa2 is required to prevent intrahepatic cholestasis and liver injury in mice fed a cholic acid-enriched diet. Here, we use functional genomics to study how Foxa2 regulates its targets in a cholic acid-dependent manner. We found that multiple signaling pathways essential for the hepatic response to acute liver injury are impaired in livers of Foxa2-deficient mice, suggesting that the deletion of Foxa2 in the hepatocyte affects the liver on a large scale. We also discovered distinct feed-forward regulatory loops controlling Foxa2-dependent targets in a cholic acid-dependent or -independent manner. We show that Foxa2 interacts with different transcription factors to achieve gene expression responses appropriate for each physiologic state.
Homeostatic regulation of bile acid metabolism and biliary lipid secretion is critical to prevent enterohepatic diseases. Kaestner and coworkers (Bochkis et al., 2008) show that loss of forkhead box transcription factor Foxa2 in the liver leads to hepatic injury due to downregulation in the expression levels of bile acid transporters and detoxification enzymes.
Production of bile by the liver is crucial for the absorption of lipophilic nutrients. Dysregulation of bile acid homeostasis can lead to cholestatic liver disease and endoplasmic reticulum (ER) stress. We show by global location analysis ('ChIP-on-chip') and cell type-specific gene ablation that the winged helix transcription factor Foxa2 is required for normal bile acid homeostasis. As suggested by the location analysis, deletion of Foxa2 in hepatocytes in mice using the Cre-lox system leads to decreased transcription of genes encoding bile acid transporters on both the basolateral and canalicular membranes, resulting in intrahepatic cholestasis. Foxa2-deficient mice are strikingly sensitive to a diet containing cholic acid, which results in toxic accumulation of hepatic bile salts, ER stress and liver injury. In addition, we show that expression of FOXA2 is markedly decreased in liver samples from individuals with different cholestatic syndromes, suggesting that reduced FOXA2 abundance could exacerbate the injury.
Microsomal epoxide hydrolase (mEH) is a bifunctional protein that plays a central role in carcinogen metabolism and is also able to mediate the sodium-dependent uptake of bile acids into hepatocytes. Studies have identified a subject (S-1) with extremely elevated serum bile salt levels in the absence of observable hepatocellular injury, suggesting a defect in bile acid uptake. In this individual, mEH protein and mEH mRNA levels were reduced by approximately 95% and 85%, respectively, whereas the expression and amino acid sequence of another bile acid transport protein (NTCP) was unaffected. Sequence analysis of the mEH gene (EPHX1) revealed a point mutation at an upstream HNF-3 site (allele I) and in intron 1 (allele II), which resulted in a significant decrease in EPHX1 promoter activity in transient transfection assays. Gel shift assays using a radiolabeled oligonucleotide from each region resulted in specific transcription factor binding patterns, which were altered in the presence of the mutation. These studies demonstrate that the expression of mEH is greatly reduced in a patient with hypercholanemia, suggesting that mEH participates in sodium-dependent bile acid uptake in human liver where its absence may contribute to the etiology of this disease.
We previously generated a transgenic mouse line (T-77) in which increased hepatic expression of the hepatocyte nuclear factor-3beta (HNF-3beta) protein was used to assess its role in hepatocyte-specific gene transcription. The T-77 transgenic mice displayed elevated serum bile acid and bilirubin levels and a complete absence of hepatic glycogen storage. These postnatal liver defects were associated with diminished expression of hepatocyte genes involved in gluconeogenesis and bile acid transport as well as reduced levels of hepatocyte transcription factors. In this study, we show that mouse tail vein injections of adenovirus expressing the rat HNF-3beta (AdHNF3beta) cDNA efficiently increased its levels throughout the liver lobule and recapitulated the T-77 transgenic liver phenotype within several days postinfection. Likewise, the AdHNF3beta-infected liver phenotype was associated with reduced hepatic expression of genes involved in glucose homeostasis, bile acid transport, and bilirubin conjugation, which were not found with control adenovirus infections. These studies show that adenovirus-mediated gene transfer is an effective method for rapid hepatic increases in transcription factor levels to determine in vivo target genes. In contrast, AdHNF3alpha-infected liver displayed only a transient reduction in hepatic glycogen levels and was associated with less severe decreases in hepatic expression of gluconeogenic and bilirubin metabolism genes. Consistent with these findings, only T-77 transgenic and AdHNF3beta-infected liver exhibited diminished hepatic expression of the HNF-6 transcription factor, suggesting that reduced HNF-6 levels contribute to diminished HNF-3beta-specific transcriptional activity.
The winged helix transcription factor, hepatocyte nuclear factor-3beta (HNF-3beta), mediates the hepatocyte-specific transcription of numerous genes important for liver function. However, the in vivo role of HNF-3beta in regulating these genes remains unknown because homozygous null HNF3beta mouse embryos die in utero prior to liver formation. In order to examine the regulatory function of HNF-3beta, we created transgenic mice in which the -3-kb transthyretin promoter functions to increase hepatocyte expression of the rat HNF-3beta protein. Postnatal transgenic mice exhibit growth retardation, depletion of hepatocyte glycogen storage, and elevated levels of bile acids in serum. The retarded growth phenotype is likely due to a 20-fold increase in hepatic expression of insulin-like growth factor binding protein 1 (IGFBP-1), which results in elevated levels in serum of IGFBP-1 and limits the biological availability of IGFs required for postnatal growth. The defects in glycogen storage and serum bile acids coincide with diminished postnatal expression of hepatocyte genes involved in gluconeogenesis (phosphoenolpyruvate carboxykinase and glycogen synthase) and sinusoidal bile acid uptake (Ntcp), respectively. These changes in gene transcription may result from the disruptive effect of HNF-3beta on the hepatic expression of the endogenous mouse HNF-3alpha,-3beta, -3gamma, and -6 transcription factors. Furthermore, adult transgenic livers lack expression of the canalicular phospholipid transporter, mdr2, which is consistent with ultrastructure evidence of damage to transgenic hepatocytes and bile canaliculi. These transgenic studies represent the first in vivo demonstration that the HNF-3beta transcriptional network regulates expression of hepatocyte-specific genes required for bile acid and glucose homeostasis, as well as postnatal growth.
Transcription factors forkhead box (Fox)O1 and pancreatic and duodenal homeobox-1 (PDX-1) are involved in dexamethasone (DEX)-induced dysfunction in pancreatic β-cells. However, the molecular mechanism underlying the regulation of FoxO1 and PDX-1 expression in β-cells treated with DEX is not fully understood. In this study, we found that DEX markedly increased FoxO1 mRNA and protein expression, whereas it decreased PDX-1 mRNA and protein expression in a dose- and time-dependent manner. Further study showed that FoxA2 was involved in regulation of FoxO1 and PDX-1 expression in DEX-induced pancreatic β-cells dysfunction. Interestingly, we demonstrated for the first time that FoxA2 could bind to the FoxO1 gene promoter and positively regulate FoxO1 expression. Moreover, we found that DEX increased the activity of FoxA2 binding to the FoxO1 promoter but decreased the activity of FoxA2 binding to the PDX-1 promoter of RINm5F cells. Knockdown of FoxA2 by RNA interference inhibited FoxO1 expression and restored PDX-1 expression in pancreatic β-cells treated with DEX. However, DEX had no effect on the expression of FoxA2. Together, the results of the present study demonstrated that FoxA2 could dynamically regulate FoxO1 and PDX-1 expression in pancreatic β-cells treated with DEX, which provides new important information on the transcriptional regulation of FoxO1 and PDX-1 in DEX-induced pancreatic β-cells. Inhibition of FoxA2 can effectively protect β-cells against DEX-induced dysfunction.
Insulin can inhibit the stimulatory effect of glucocorticoid hormones on the transcription of genes coding for enzymes involved in glucose metabolism. We reported earlier that insulin inhibits the glucocorticoid-stimulated transcription of the gene coding for liver 6-phosphofructo-2-kinase (PFK-2). To elucidate the mechanism of these hormonal effects, we have studied the regulatory regions of the PFK-2 gene in transfection experiments. We found that both glucocorticoids and insulin act via the glucocorticoid response unit (GRU) located in the first intron. Footprinting experiments showed that the GRU binds not only the glucocorticoid receptor (GR), but also ubiquitous [nuclear factor I (NF-I)] and liver-enriched [hepatocyte nuclear factor (HNF)-3, HNF-6, CAAT/enhancer binding protein (C/EBP)] transcription factors. Site-directed mutational analysis of the GRU revealed that these factors modulate glucocorticoid action but that none of them seems to be individually involved in the inhibitory effect of insulin. We did not find an insulin response element in the GRU, but we showed that insulin targets the GR. Insulin-induced inhibition of the glucocorticoid stimulation required the ligand-binding domain of the GR. Finally, the insulin-signaling cascade involved was independent of the phosphatidylinositol-3-kinase and mitogen-activated protein kinase pathways. Together, these results suggest that insulin acts on the PFK-2 gene via another pathway and targets either the GR in its ligand-binding domain or a cofactor interacting with this domain.
The rate of transcription of the hepatic phosphoenolpyruvate carboxykinase (PEPCK) and insulin-like growth factor-binding protein 1 (IGFBP-1) genes is stimulated by glucocorticoids and inhibited by insulin. In both cases, the effect of insulin is dominant, since it suppresses both basal and glucocorticoid-stimulated PEPCK or IGFBP-1 gene transcription. Analyses of both promoters by transfection of PEPCK or IGFBP-1-chloramphenicol acetyltransferase fusion genes into rat hepatoma cells has led to the identification of insulin response sequences (IRSs) in both genes. The core IRS, T(G/A)TTTTG, is the same in both genes, but the PEPCK promoter has a single copy of this element whereas the IGFBP-1 promoter has two copies arranged as an inverted palindrome. The IGFBP-1 IRS and PEPCK IRS both bind the alpha and beta forms of hepatic nuclear factor 3 (HNF-3), although the latter does so with a sixfold-lower relative affinity. Both the PEPCK and the IGFBP-1 IRSs also function as accessory factor binding sites required for the full induction of gene transcription by glucocorticoids. A combination of transient transfection and DNA binding studies suggests that HNF-3 is the accessory factor that supports glucocorticoid-induced gene transcription. In both genes, the HNF-3 binding site overlaps the IRS core motif(s). A model in which insulin is postulated to mediate its negative effect on glucocorticoid-induced PEPCK and IGFBP-1 gene transcription indirectly by inhibiting HNF-3 action is proposed.
The forkhead box proteins A1 and A2 (Foxa1 and Foxa2) are transcription factors with critical roles in establishing the developmental competence of the foregut endoderm and in initiating liver specification. Using conditional gene ablation during a later phase of liver development, we show here that deletion of both Foxa1 and Foxa2 (Foxa1/2) in the embryonic liver caused hyperplasia of the biliary tree. Abnormal bile duct formation in Foxa1/2-deficient liver was due, at least in part, to activation of IL-6 expression, a proliferative signal for cholangiocytes. The glucocorticoid receptor is a negative regulator of IL-6 transcription; in the absence of Foxa1/2, the glucocorticoid receptor failed to bind to the IL-6 promoter, causing enhanced IL-6 expression. Thus, after liver specification, Foxa1/2 are required for normal bile duct development through prevention of excess cholangiocyte proliferation. Our data suggest that Foxa1/2 function as terminators of bile duct expansion in the adult liver through inhibition of IL-6 expression.
The G6Pase (glucose-6-phosphatase catalytic subunit) catalyses the final step in the gluconeogenic and glycogenolytic pathways, the hydrolysis of glucose-6-phosphate to glucose. We show here that, in HepG2 hepatoma cells, EGF (epidermal growth factor) inhibits basal mouse G6Pase fusion gene transcription. Several studies have shown that insulin represses basal mouse G6Pase fusion gene transcription through FOXO1 (forkhead box O1), but Stoffel and colleagues have recently suggested that insulin can also regulate gene transcription through FOXA2 (forkhead box A2) [Wolfrum, Asilmaz, Luca, Friedman and Stoffel (2003) Proc. Natl. Acad. Sci. 100, 11624-11629]. A combined GR (glucocorticoid receptor)-FOXA2 binding site is located between -185 and -174 in the mouse G6Pase promoter overlapping two FOXO1 binding sites located between (-188 and -182) and (-174 and -168). Selective mutation of the FOXO1 binding sites reduced the effect of insulin, whereas mutation of the GR/FOXA2 binding site had no effect on the insulin response. In contrast, selective mutation of the FOXO1 and GR/FOXA2 binding sites both reduced the effect of EGF. The effect of these mutations was additive, since the combined mutation of both FOXO1 and GR/FOXA2 binding sites reduced the effect of EGF to a greater extent than the individual mutations. These results suggest that, in HepG2 cells, GR and/or FOXA2 are required for the inhibition of basal G6Pase gene transcription by EGF but not insulin. EGF also inhibits hepatic G6Pase gene expression in vivo, but in cultured hepatocytes EGF has the opposite effect of stimulating expression, an observation that may be explained by a switch in ErbB receptor sub-type expression following hepatocyte isolation.
Respiration at birth depends on maturation changes in lung tissue architecture, cell differentiation, and gene expression. At the transcriptional level, maturation is controlled by the actions of a group of transcription factors mediating gene expression in the lung. A network of transcription factors regulates gene expression in the respiratory epithelium, which then influences cell maturation throughout the lung. Glucocorticoids (via the glucocorticoid receptor), acting primarily in the pulmonary mesenchyme, influence maturation in the respiratory epithelium. Elucidation of the intersecting pathways controlling perinatal lung function may provide opportunities to induce pulmonary maturation in preterm infants at risk for respiratory distress syndrome before birth, and will help identify genes and processes important for various aspects of lung function.
Survival during prolonged food deprivation depends on the activation of hepatic gluconeogenesis. Inappropriate regulation of this process is a hallmark of diabetes and other metabolic diseases. Activation of the genes encoding gluconeogenic enzymes is mediated by hormone-responsive transcription factors such as the cyclic AMP response element binding protein (CREB) and the glucocorticoid receptor (GR). Here we show using cell-type-specific gene ablation that the winged helix transcription factor Foxa2 is required for activation of the hepatic gluconeogenic program during fasting. Specifically, Foxa2 promotes gene activation both by cyclic AMP, the second messenger for glucagon, and glucocorticoids. Foxa2 mediates these effects by enabling recruitment of CREB and GR to their respective target sites in chromatin. We conclude that Foxa2 is required for execution of the hepatic gluconeogenic program by integrating the transcriptional response of the hepatocyte to hormonal stimulation.
3'-methyl-4-dimethylaminoazobenzene (3'-MeDAB) is a potent hepatocarcinogen in rats and a weak carcinogen in mice, whereas o-aminoazotoluene (OAT) is a potent hepatocarcinogen in mice but weak hepatocarcinogen in rats. They significantly suppress glucocorticoid induction of tyrosine aminotransferase (TAT) in the liver of sensitive animals and have minor effect on the induction of this enzyme in the liver of resistant animals (3'-MeDAB-treated mice and OAT-treated rats). The inhibitory effect of these carcinogens is realized at the level of gene transcription (decreased accumulation of TAT mRNA). This effect is mediated via reduction of DNA-binding activity of transcription factor HNF3 (without decrease of its content) without any involvement of the glucocorticoid receptor. It was shown that carcinogens influence DNA-binding activity of HNF3 via an unknown nuclear factor.
Hepatocyte nuclear factor-3 (HNF-3) belongs to a large family of forkhead transcription factors and is made up of three members (HNF-3alpha, -3beta and -3gamma). It has been shown that HNF-3 regulates a number of metabolically important genes. However, the mechanisms underlying this regulation of HNF-3 activity by hormones and nutrition have not yet been well elucidated. In attempting to explore the regulation of gene expression of HNF-3 members by physiological status, we analyzed the effects of insulin, dexamethasone and protein malnutrition on the hepatic mRNA level of each member. Male Wistar rats were fed on a 12% casein diet, 12% gluten diet (deficient in lysine and threonine) or a protein-free diet for 1 week. The protein-free diet and gluten diet caused a 3. 7-fold increase in HNF-3g mRNA in the liver and did not affect the mRNA level of either HNF-3alpha or HNF-3beta. Daily administration of dexamethasone caused the mRNA levels of HNF-3alpha and HNF-3beta to increase (2.3- and 1.4-fold, respectively), but had no effect on the HNF-3gamma mRNA level. In diabetic rats that had been injected with streptozotocin, an elevation of the hepatic mRNA levels of HNF-3beta and HNF-3gamma was observed (1.6-and 1.9-fold, respectively). Insulin replacement in the diabetic rats decreased both mRNA levels in a dose-dependent manner. HNF-3alpha mRNA was not affected by insulin status. These results show that the genes of the three members of the HNF-3 family respond differently to hormonal and nutritional factors suggesting that the activities of HNF-3 members are regulated, at least in part, by the levels of their gene expression.
Hypersensitivity to acetylcholinesterase inhibitors (anti-AChEs) causes severe nervous system symptoms under low dose exposure. In search of direct genetic origin(s) for this sensitivity, we studied six regions in the extended 22 kb promoter of the ACHE gene in individuals who presented adverse responses to anti-AChEs and in randomly chosen controls. Two contiguous mutations, a T-->A substitution, disrupting a putative glucocorticoid response element, and a 4-bp deletion, abolishing one of two adjacent HNF3 binding sites, were identified 17 kb upstream of the transcription start site. Allele frequencies for these mutations were 0.006 and 0.012, respectively, in 333 individuals of various ethnic origins, with a strong linkage between the deletion and the biochemically neutral H322N mutation in the coding region of ACHE. Heterozygous carriers of the deletion included a proband who presented with acute hypersensitivity to the anti-AChE pyridostigmine and another with unexplained excessive vomiting during a fourth pregnancy following three spontaneous abortions. Electromobility shift assays, transfection studies and measurements of AChE levels in immortalized lymphocytes as well as in peripheral blood from both carriers and non-carriers, revealed functional relevance for this mutation both in vitro and in vivo and showed it to increase AChE expression, probably by alleviating competition between the two hepatocyte nuclear factor 3 binding sites. Moreover, AChE-overexpressing transgenic mice, unlike normal FVB/N mice, displayed anti-AChE hypersensitivity and failed to transcriptionally induce AChE production following exposure to anti-AChEs. Our findings point to promoter polymorphism(s) in the ACHE gene as the dominant susceptibility factor(s) for adverse responses to exposure or to treatment with anti-AChEs.
Glucocorticoids stimulate gluconeogenesis by increasing the rate of transcription of genes that encode gluconeogenic enzymes such as phosphoenolpyruvate carboxykinase (PEPCK) and glucose-6-phosphatase. Previous studies have shown that hepatic nuclear factor 3 (HNF3) is required as an accessory factor for several glucocorticoid-stimulated genes, including PEPCK. Here, we show that adenovirus-mediated expression of an HNF3beta protein with a deleted C-terminal transactivation domain (HNF3betaDeltaC) reduces the glucocorticoid-induced expression of the PEPCK and glucose-6-phosphatase genes in H4IIE hepatoma cells. Furthermore, expression of this truncated HNF3 protein results in a proportionate reduction of glucocorticoid-stimulated glucose production from lactate and pyruvate in these cells. The expression of HNF3betaDeltaN, in which the N-terminal transactivation domain is deleted, does not exhibit any of these effects. These results provide direct evidence that members of the HNF3 family are required for proper regulation of hepatic gluconeogenesis. Modulation of the function of the HNF3 family of proteins might be used to reduce the excessive hepatic production of glucose that is an important pathophysiologic feature of diabetes mellitus.
Expression of the rat cytosolic aspartate aminotransferase gene is stimulated by glucocorticoids and repressed by insulin in the liver. The regulation by insulin and part of the glucocorticoid effect are mediated by a distal region in the promoter. A 142 bp fragment (-1844 to -1702) confers hormonal sensitivity to the heterologous thymidine kinase promoter in transient-transfection assays in H4IIEC3 hepatoma cells. Footprinting and gel-shift assays showed that several nuclear proteins bind to this region at conserved CCAAT-enhancer binding protein (C/EBP), activator protein (AP-1) and E-box sequences. Hepatocyte nuclear factor-3alpha (HNF-3)alpha and beta bind to sequences upstream of a glucocorticoid-responsive element (GRE) half-site as demonstrated by supershift experiments. Nuclear factor I (NFI)-like proteins bind downstream of the GRE half-site. These sites around the GRE motif overlap with five insulin responsive element (IRE) -like sequences (TG/ATTT). The effect of insulin was not prevented by any single mutation in the IRE-like sites. However, mutation of two IRE sites (namely IREc and d) prevented the insulin effect although only marginally affecting the glucocorticoid effect. The results suggest that the effect of insulin is due to a complex interplay of factors requiring the synergistic contribution of at least two sites and underline the contribution of HNF-3 and NFI-like proteins.
Complete induction of hepatic phosphoenolpyruvate carboxykinase (PEPCK) gene transcription by glucocorticoids requires a complex glucocorticoid response unit (GRU). The GRU is comprised of two glucocorticoid receptor (GR)-binding sites (GR1 and GR2) and four accessory factor-binding sites [AF1, AF2, AF3, and cAMP response element (CRE)] that bind distinct transcription factors. Hepatic nuclear factor 4 (HNF4) and chicken ovalbumin upstream promoter transcription factor (COUP-TF) bind to the AF1 element and account for AF1 activity. Members of the hepatic nuclear factor 3 (HNF3) family bind to the AF2 element and provide AF2 activity. In this report, we show that the functions of AF1 and AF2 are dependent on their positions in the promoter, since they cannot substitute for each other nor can they be exchanged without a reduction in the response to glucocorticoids. We also identified the domains of HNF4 and HNF3 beta that are required for the AF1 and AF2 activities, respectively. The carboxy-terminal transactivation domain of HNF4 (amino acids 128-374) confers most of the AF1 activity, while the carboxyterminal transactivation domain of HNF3 beta (amino acids 361-458) mediates AF2 activity. These domains of HNF4 and HNF3 beta appear to have distinct roles in the response to glucocorticoids, as there are unique structural requirements for each, as judged by the failure of most other classes of transactivation domains to serve as accessory factors. These results suggest that the regulation of the PEPCK gene by glucocorticoids requires specific interactions between GR, accessory factors, and coactivators, and that the transactivation domains of AF1 and AF2 are of fundamental importance in the assembly of this multiprotein complex.
A single far-upstream enhancer is sufficient to confer hepatocyte-specific, glucocorticoid- and cyclic AMP-inducible periportal expression to the carbamoylphosphate synthetase I (CPS) gene. To identify the mechanism of hormone-dependent activation, the composition and function of the enhancer have been analyzed. DNase I protection and gel mobility shift assays revealed the presence of a cyclic AMP response element, a glucocorticoid response element (GRE), and several sites for the liver-enriched transcription factor families HNF3 and C/EBP. The in vivo relevance of the transcription factors interacting with the enhancer in the regulation of CPS expression in the liver was assessed by the analysis of knockout mice. A strong reduction of CPS mRNA levels was observed in glucocorticoid receptor- and C/EBPalpha-deficient mice, whereas the CPS mRNA was normally expressed in C/EBPbeta knockout mice and in HNF3alpha and -gamma double-knockout mice. (The role of HNFbeta could not be assessed, because the corresponding knockout mice die at embryonic day 10). In hepatoma cells, most of the activity of the enhancer is contained within a 103-bp fragment, which depends for its activity on the simultaneous occupation of the GRE, HNF3, and C/EBP sites, thus meeting the requirement of a glucocorticoid response unit. In fibroblast-like CHO cells, on the other hand, the GRE in the CPS enhancer does not cooperate with the C/EBP and HNF3 elements in transactivation of the CPS promoter. In both hepatoma and CHO cells, stimulation of expression by cyclic AMP depends mainly on the integrity of the glucocorticoid pathway, demonstrating cross talk between this pathway and the cyclic AMP (protein kinase A) pathway.
The homeobox protein STF-1 appears to function as a master control switch for expression of the pancreatic program during development. Here we characterize a composite enhancer which directs STF-1 expression to pancreatic islet cells via two functional elements that recognize the nuclear factors HNF-3beta and BETA-2. In keeping with their inhibitory effects on islet cell maturation, glucocorticoids were found to repress STF-1 gene expression by interfering with HNF-3beta activity on the islet-specific enhancer. Overexpression of HNF-3beta suppressed glucocorticoid receptor-mediated inhibition of the STF-1 gene, and our results suggest that the expansion of pancreatic islet precursor cells during development may be restricted by hormonal cues which regulate STF-1 gene expression.
Transcription of the hepatic phosphoenolpyruvate carboxykinase gene is stimulated by glucocorticoids and inhibited by insulin. The glucocorticoid response is mediated by a complex glucocorticoid response unit that consists of two glucocorticoid receptor (GR)-binding sites (GR1 and GR2) and two accessory factor-binding sites (AF1 and AF2). The complete unit is required for the full glucocorticoid response. The dominant insulin effect is mediated in part through an insulin response sequence that is coincident with the AF2 element. Members of the hepatic nuclear factor 3 (HNF3) and CCAAT enhancer binding protein (C/EBP) families bind to the AF2 element; however, there is no correlation between binding of these factors and the ability of the AF2 element to mediate an insulin response. We show here that binding of HNF3 does correlate with the stimulation of the glucocorticoid response by the AF2 element and that C/EBP is apparently not involved in this effect. This requirement for HNF3 is quite specific since the substitution of elements known to enhance the action of the GR in other promoters fails to recapitulate AF2 accessory factor activity. By contrast, an HNF3-binding site from the transthyretin gene is able to substitute for the wild type AF2 sequence and elicit a maximal glucocorticoid response. Based on current and previous observations, the glucocorticoid response unit consists of four DNA elements that bind four different proteins. These are: AF1 (hepatic nuclear factor 4/chicken ovalbumin upstream promoter transcription factor), AF2 (HNF3), GR1 (GR), and GR2 (GR).
Hepatocyte nuclear factor 3 (HNF3) recognizes two apparently distinct classes of sequence. However, a detailed mutational analysis of a representative binding site of each class reveals that these sequences display common features. We propose a unified consensus sequence for HNF3-binding sites. The basis of the sequence specificity of the interaction of HNF3 with DNA is analyzed in light of the recently determined structure of an HNF3-DNA complex (Clark et al., Nature 364, 412-420, 1993). Particularly, our study reveals that the DNA site used for this structural analysis is too short to account for all HNF3-DNA interactions. The better knowledge of the sequence determinant recognized by HNF3 has allowed us to analyze its function in the glucocorticoid response of the rat tyrosine aminotransferase (TAT) gene. This response is mediated through a complex array of neighboring and overlapping transcription factor binding sites. Selective inactivation of the HNF3-binding sites in this glucocorticoid response unit (GRU) allows us to demonstrate unambiguously that they play a major role in the amplitude of the glucocorticoid response. Furthermore, HNF3 beta overexpression results in a stimulation of the glucocorticoid response that is dependent on the integrity of its binding sites. We also show that the relative level of HNF3 determines the extent of the contribution of one of the glucocorticoid receptor binding sites. Our results indicate that HNF3 accounts for most of the liver-specific activity of this GRU.
Glucocorticoids stimulate and insulin inhibits hepatic production of IGFBP-1 at the level of gene transcription. We previously identified contiguous insulin and glucocorticoid response sequences in the proximal rat IGFBP-1 promoter. This insulin response sequence (IRS) is palindromic (CAAAACAAACTTATTTTG) and each half resembles an IRS in the phosphoenolpyruvate carboxykinase (PEPCK) gene. We have reported that both the IGFBP-1 and PEPCK IRSs bind hepatocyte nuclear factor-3 (HNF-3) proteins [1]. We now report that IRSs from the IGFBP-1 and PEPCK, as well as an IRS which also binds HNF-3 in the rat tyrosine aminotransferase (TAT) gene, also interact with another DNA/protein complex in gel shift studies. Further, methylation interferences studies, gel shift and transient transfection studies with site-specific mutations identified a single base in the first half of the IRS that is critical both for interactions with proteins in this complex, and for maximal effects of insulin and glucocorticoids, on promoter function. Of note, a 250-fold excess of an oligo containing a C/EBP binding site (but not other AT-rich sequences) inhibits the formation of this complex in gel shift assays. Nevertheless, interactions with this C/EBP site are negligible at lower titers (< or = 100-fold excess), and antibodies against known C/EBP proteins do not react with this complex. Similarly, preincubation with CHOP, a truncated member of the C/EBP family which contains a beta-leucine zipper domain, does not prevent or alter the mobility of this novel DNA/protein complex, indicating that components of this complex do not form heterodimers with beta-ZIP proteins. We conclude that HNF-3 proteins and this novel C/EBP-related DNA/protein complex may play an important role in mediating interactions between glucocorticoids and insulin in the regulation of IGFBP-1 and perhaps multiple hepatic genes.
An insulin response element (IRE) has been identified approximately 100 base pairs (bp) 5' to the transcription start site of the human insulin-like growth factor binding protein-1 (hIGFBP-1) gene. This cis element appears crucial to the multihormonal regulation of hIGFBP-1 expression in liver, since (i) an intact IRE is required for maximal stimulation of hIGFBP-1 promoter activity by dexamethasone, and (ii) the IRE confers insulin inhibition of both basal and dexamethasone-stimulated hIGFBP-1 promoter activity. Further progress in understanding how the IRE confers insulin and glucocorticoid effects requires identification of transcription factors confering effects of these hormones. D-site binding protein (DBP), and members of the hepatic nuclear factor 3 (HNF 3) and high mobility group I/Y (HMG I/Y) protein families, each known to bind DNA elements similar in sequence to the IRE, were tested for IRE binding. DBP, HMGI and HNF 3 beta each protected the hIGFBP-1 IRE from DNAseI digestion. Additional studies are required to establish whether binding of any of these proteins to the IRE is important to the regulation of hIGFBP-1 expression by insulin and/or glucocorticoids.
IGF binding protein-1 is an important short-term modulator of IGF bioavailability. Hepatic transcription of IGFBP-1 is increased by glucocorticoids and suppressed by insulin. We previously identified adjacent glucocorticoid and insulin response sequences approximately 90 bp 5' to the RNA cap site in the IGFBP-1 promoter. This insulin response sequence contains a sequence highly related (10/12 bases) to a consensus HNF-3 binding sequence. Gel shift and supershift studies confirm that this sequence binds HNF-3 alpha, beta and gamma. Co-expression of HNF-3 beta enhances IGFBP-1 promoter activity in NIH-3T3 cells. Mutation of this HNF-3 binding sequence disrupts this effect as well as the ability of glucocorticoids to stimulate and of insulin to inhibit IGFBP-1 promoter activity in H4IIE and HepG2 hepatoma cells. HNF-3 binding at this site may play an important role in the multihormonal regulation of hepatic IGFBP-1 gene expression.
GLUT2 is a bidirectional glucose transporter present in liver, kidney and pancreas. Studies have shown over-expression of GLUT2 in diabetic conditions. Ferulic acid (FA) is an antidiabetic phenolic phytocompound which is reported to regulate GLUT4 in vitro. The objective of our study is to evaluate the role of FA in the regulation of hepatic GLUT2 expression and the underlying mechanism. Male Wistar rats were divided into 5 groups: control, diabetic (diabetes was induced by giving high fat diet and high fructose water for 60 days), diabetic rats treated with FA (50mg/kg body weight/day, orally for 30 days), diabetic rats treated with metformin (50mg/kg body weight/day, orally for 30 days) and control rats treated with FA (50mg/kg body weight/day orally for 30 days). After 30 days treatment, animals were perfused and liver was dissected out. Glucose uptake and oxidation, expression of GLUT2 and binding of transcription factors - SREBP1c, HNF1α and HNF3β with GLUT2 gene promoter were studied. Over-expression of GLUT2 in hepatic tissue was found in high fat and fructose- induced type-2 diabetic animals. FA treatment reduced the GLUT2 expression in diabetic animals by impairing the interaction between these transcription factors (SREBP1c, HNF1α and HNF3β) and GLUT2 gene promoter.
Foxa2 (Hnf3beta) is a winged-helix/forkhead transcription factor that regulates gene expression in the liver, pancreatic islets and adipocytes. It is required for the maintenance of glucose and lipid homeostasis. Hyperinsulinemia-mediated inactivation of Foxa2 by nuclear exclusion has recently been implicated in the development of liver steatosis and insulin resistance in three animal models of diabetes. These abnormalities were cured by adenovirus-mediated expression of a constitutively active form of Foxa2 containing a mutated T156 phosphorylation site, which increases fatty acid oxidation and reduces its biosynthesis. Accordingly, the prevention of phosphorylation of Foxa2 was suggested as a pharmacological target for the treatment of obesity and diabetes.
The human newborn infant is susceptible to gut inflammatory disorders. In particular, growth-restricted infants or infants born prematurely may develop a severe form of intestinal inflammation known as necrotizing enterocolitis (NEC), which has a high mortality. Milk provides a multitude of proteins with anti-inflammatory properties and in this review we gather together some recent significant advances regarding the isolation and proteomic identification of these minor constituents of both human and bovine milk. We introduce the process of inflammation, with a focus on the immature gut, and describe how a multitude of milk proteins act against the inflammatory process according to both in vitro and in vivo studies. We highlight the effects of milk proteins such as caseins, and of whey proteins such as alpha-lactalbumin, beta-lactoglobulin, lactoferrin, osteopontin, immunoglobulins, trefoil factors, lactoperoxidase, superoxide dismutase, platelet-activating factor acetylhydrolase, alkaline phosphatase, and growth factors (TGF-β, IGF-I and IGF-II, EGF, HB-EGF). The effects of milk fat globule proteins, such as TLR-2, TLR-4, sCD14 and MFG-E8/lactadherin, are also discussed. Finally, we indicate how milk proteins could be useful for the prophylaxis and therapy of intestinal inflammation in infants and children.
Nonalcoholic fatty liver disease (NAFLD) is a common liver disease whose prevalence has increased markedly. We reported previously that fatty acid synthesis was enhanced in NAFLD with the accumulation of fatty acids. To clarify the disorder, we evaluated the expression of genes regulating fatty acid synthesis by real-time PCR using samples from NAFLD (n=22) and normal liver (control; n=10). A major regulator of fatty acids synthesis is sterol regulatory element-binding protein-1c (SREBP-1c). Its expression was significantly higher in NAFLD, nearly 5-fold greater than the controls. SREBP-1c is positively regulated by insulin signaling pathways, including insulin receptor substrate (IRS)-1 and -2. In NAFLD, IRS-1 expression was enhanced and correlated positively with SREBP-1c expression. In contrast, IRS-2 expression decreased by 50% and was not correlated with SREBP-1c. Forkhead box protein A2 (Foxa2) is a positive regulator of fatty acid oxidation and is itself negatively regulated by IRSs. Foxa2 expression increased in NAFLD and showed a negative correlation with IRS-2, but not with IRS-1, expression. It is known that SREBP-1c is negatively regulated by AMP-activated protein kinase (AMPK) but expression levels of AMPK in NAFLD were almost equal to those of the controls. These data indicate that, in NAFLD, insulin signaling via IRS-1 causes the up-regulation of SREBP1-c, leading to the increased synthesis of fatty acids by the hepatocytes; negative feedback regulation via AMPK does not occur and the activation of Foxa2, following a decrease of IRS-2, up-regulates fatty acid oxidation.
The Forkhead box (Fox) transcription factor Foxa2 (HNF-3beta) and related family members Foxa1 (HNF-3alpha) and Foxa3 (HNF-3gamma) act in concert with other hepatocyte nuclear factors (HNF) to coordinately regulate liver-specific gene expression. To circumvent the hepatic functional redundancy of the Foxa proteins, we used the T-77 transgenic (TG) mouse line in which the -3-kb transthyretin (TTR) promoter functioned to increase hepatocyte expression of the Foxa2 cDNA. Adult TG mice exhibited reduced hepatic glycogen and progressive liver injury, but maintained normal serum levels of glucose, insulin, and glucagon. In this study, we further characterized the postnatal liver defect in TTR-FoxA2 TG mice. The postnatal TG mice displayed significant reduction in serum glucose levels and in hepatocyte glycogen storage without increased serum levels of ketone bodies and free fatty acid suggesting that they are not undergoing a starvation response. We show that TG liver developed a substantial transient steatosis, which reached a maximum at postnatal day 5 and is associated with increased expression of hepatic genes involved in fatty acid and triglyceride synthesis, lipid beta-oxidation, and amino acid biosynthesis. Furthermore, transmission electron microscopy analysis of postnatal TG liver revealed extensive mitochondrial membrane damage, which is likely due to reactive oxygen species generated from lipid beta-oxidation. In conclusion, our model proposes that in response to reduction in hepatocyte glycogen storage, the TTR-Foxa2 TG mice survive by maintaining sufficient serum levels of glucose through gluconeogenesis using deaminated amino acids with dicarboxylate products of peroxisomal lipid beta-oxidation shuttled through the tricarboxylic acid cycle.
We have previously shown that hepatitis C virus (HCV) infection modulates the expression of forkhead box transcription factors, including FoxO1 and FoxA2, which play key roles in gluconeogenesis and β-oxidation of fatty acid, respectively. The aim of the present study was to determine the role of forkhead box transcription factors in modulating lipid metabolism. HCV infection or core protein expression alone in transfected Huh7.5 cells increased expression of sterol regulatory element binding protein 1c (SREBP-1c) and its downstream target, fatty acid synthase (FASN), which are key proteins involved in lipid synthesis. Knockdown of FoxO1 by small interfering RNA in HCV-infected cells significantly decreased SREBP-1c and FASN expression. Further, HCV infection or core protein expression in Huh7.5 cells significantly decreased the expression of medium-chain acyl coenzyme A dehydrogenase (MCAD) and short-chain acyl coenzyme A dehydrogenase (SCAD), involved in the regulation of β-oxidation of fatty acids. Ectopic expression of FoxA2 in HCV-infected cells rescued the expression of MCAD and SCAD. Oil red O and neutral lipid staining indicated that HCV infection significantly increases lipid accumulation compared to that in the mock-infected control. This was further verified by the increased expression of perilipin-2 and decreased activity of hormone-sensitive lipase (HSL) in HCV-infected hepatocytes, implying increased accumulation of neutral lipids. Knockdown of FoxO1 and ectopic expression of FoxA2 significantly decreased HCV replication. Taken together, these results suggest that HCV modulates forkhead box transcription factors which together increase lipid accumulation and promote viral replication.
Hepatic steatosis is a frequent complication associated with chronic HCV infection. Its presence is a key prognostic indicator associated with the progression to hepatic fibrosis and hepatocellular carcinoma. Several mechanisms have been proposed to account for the development of steatosis and fatty liver during HCV infection. We observed that HCV infection increases expression of both SREBP-1c and FASN. Further investigation suggested that the expression of SREBP-1c and FASN is controlled by the transcription factor FoxO1 during HCV infection. In addition, HCV infection significantly decreased both MCAD and SCAD expression, which is controlled by FoxA2. HCV infection also increased lipid droplet accumulation, increased perilipin-2 expression, and decreased HSL activity. Thus, knockdown of FoxO1 (decreased lipogenesis) and overexpression of FoxA2 (increased β-oxidation) resulted in a significant disruption of the platform and, hence, a decrease in HCV genome replication. Thus, targeting of FoxO1 and FoxA2 might be useful in developing a therapeutic approach against HCV infection.
Dietary n-3 polyunsaturated fatty acid (n-3 PUFA) supplementation is postulated to have positive effects on fertility. The impact of dietary n-3 PUFA supplementation on physiological and biochemical processes involved in reproduction is likely to be associated with significant alterations in gene expression in key reproductive tissues which is in turn regulated by transcription factors. Beef heifers were supplemented with a rumen protected source of either a saturated fatty acid or high n-3 PUFA diet per animal per day for 45 days and uterine endometrial tissue was harvested post slaughter. A microarray analysis was conducted and bioinformatic tools were employed to evaluate the effect of n-3 PUFA supplementation on gene expression in the bovine endometrium. Clustering of microarray gene expression data was performed to identify co-expressed genes. Functional annotation of each cluster of genes was carried out using Ingenuity Pathway Analysis. Furthermore, oPOSSUM was employed to identify transcription factors involved in gene expression changes due to supplementary PUFA. Gene functions which showed a significant response to n-3 PUFA supplementation included tissue development, immune function and reproductive function. Numerous transcription factors such as FOXD1, FOXD3, NFKB1, ESR1, PGR, FOXA2, NKX3-1 and PPARα were identified as potential regulators of gene expression in the endometrium of cattle supplemented with n-3 PUFA. This study demonstrates the complex nature of the alterations in the transcriptional regulation process in the uterine endometrium of cattle following dietary supplementation which may positively influence the uterine environment.
The human liver fatty acid binding protein (hFABP1) participates in cellular long-chain fatty acid trafficking and regulation of lipid metabolism and changes in hFABP1 are associated with an increased risk for type 2 diabetes, cardiovascular disease (CVD), and metabolic syndromes. Gene regulation of hFABP1 is not fully understood. Therefore, in the present study, the full length hFABP1 promoter (nucleotides -2125 to +51) and a series of truncated promoter regions were cloned. A luciferase reporter assay revealed that nucleotides -255 to +50 in the promoter region contained full of maximum hFABP1 promoter activity compared with the full length promoter. Furthermore high activity was shown when the plasmid was transfected into liver-derived cells such as the human hepatoblastoma cell line HepG2 and the hepatoma cell line Huh7. TFSEARCH and TESS programs were used to predict potential transcription factor binding sites. Two putative binding sites for the liver-enriched transcription factors hepatocyte nuclear factor 3β (HNF3β) and CCAAT/enhancer binding protein α (C/EBPα) were identified in the -255 nt to -155 nt hFABP1 promoter region. Site-directed mutagenesis of these two sites reduced dramatically hFABP1 promoter activity. In addition, the electrophoretic mobility shift assay (EMSA) and chromatin immunoprecipitation assay (ChIP) revealed that these binding sites were recognized by HNF3β and C/EBPα respectively. Overexpression of HNF3β and C/EBPα enhanced the transcription of hFABP1 and consequently improved the protein level of hFABP1 in HepG2 cells, while knockdown of HNF3β and C/EBPα showed the inverse effects. Taken together, the hFABP1 gene is highly transcribed in liver-derived cells, and regulated predominantly by liver-enriched transcription factors HNF3β and C/EBPα.
Glucose disposal induces a signal that modulates the transcriptional regulation of genes involved in the glycolysis and lipogenesis pathways. To investigate the role of glucose metabolism on hepatic gene expression independently from insulin action, we overexpressed glucokinase, the limiting enzyme in the glycolysis pathway, in the liver of streptozotocin-induced type 1 diabetic rats. By microarray analysis, we observed that critical genes such as liver-type pyruvate kinase, malic enzyme, fatty acid synthase, and stearoyl-CoA desaturase 1 were enhanced multiple-fold, whereas genes involved in mitochondrial fatty acid oxidation and the Krebs cycle were downregulated. Despite the increase in expression of fatty acid synthesis genes and the presence of steatosis, no major alterations to the levels of genes involved in VLDL assembly and secretion, such as diacylglycerol acyltransferases 1 and 2 and microsomal triglyceride transfer protein, were observed. Overall, our data suggest that the gene expression pattern induced by glucose metabolism favors fatty acid storage in the liver rather than secretion into the circulation.
Epithelial cells lining the peripheral lung synthesize pulmonary surfactant that reduces surface tension at the air-liquid interface. Lack of surfactant lipids and proteins in the lungs causes respiratory distress syndrome, a common cause of morbidity and mortality in preterm infants. We show that C/EBPalpha plays a crucial role in the maturation of the respiratory epithelium in late gestation, being required for the production of surfactant lipids and proteins necessary for lung function. Deletion of the Cebpa gene in respiratory epithelial cells in fetal mice caused respiratory failure at birth. Structural and biochemical maturation of the lung was delayed. Normal synthesis of surfactant lipids and proteins, including SP-A, SP-B, SP-C, SP-D, ABCA3 (a lamellar body associated protein) and FAS (precursor of fatty acid synthesis) were dependent upon expression of the C/EBPalpha in respiratory epithelial cells. Deletion of the Cebpa gene caused increased expression of Tgfb2, a growth factor that inhibits lung epithelial cell proliferation and differentiation. Normal expression of C/EBPalpha required Titf1 and Foxa2, transcription factors that also play an important role in perinatal lung differentiation. C/EBPalpha participates in a transcriptional network that is required for the regulation of genes mediating perinatal lung maturation and surfactant homeostasis that is necessary for adaptation to air breathing at birth.
The regulation of fat and glucose metabolism in the liver is controlled primarily by insulin and glucagon. Changes in the circulating concentrations of these hormones signal fed or starvation states and elicit counter-regulatory responses that maintain normoglycaemia. Here we show that in normal mice, plasma insulin inhibits the forkhead transcription factor Foxa2 by nuclear exclusion and that in the fasted (low insulin) state Foxa2 activates transcriptional programmes of lipid metabolism and ketogenesis. In insulin-resistant or hyperinsulinaemic mice, Foxa2 is inactive and permanently located in the cytoplasm of hepatocytes. In these mice, adenoviral expression of Foxa2T156A, a nuclear, constitutively active Foxa2 that cannot be inhibited by insulin, decreases hepatic triglyceride content, increases hepatic insulin sensitivity, reduces glucose production, normalizes plasma glucose and significantly lowers plasma insulin. These changes are associated with increased expression of genes encoding enzymes of fatty acid oxidation, ketogenesis and glycolysis. Chronic hyperinsulinaemia in insulin-resistant syndromes results in the cytoplasmic localization and inactivation of Foxa2, thereby promoting lipid accumulation and insulin resistance in the liver. Pharmacological intervention to inhibit phosphorylation of Foxa2 may be an effective treatment for type 2 diabetes.
Liver fatty acid binding protein (L-FABP) is a small protein that is thought to play an important role in the intracellular binding and trafficking of long chain fatty acids in the liver. Expression of the gene encoding the zebrafish liver fatty acid binding protein is regulated by a 435-bp distal region (-1944 to -1510) of the L-FABP promoter. The 435-bp sequence is sufficient for gene activation in the liver primordia (or bud) and continues to be active in the adult liver when positioned adjacent to the SV40 basal promoter and linked directly to green fluorescent protein. The 435-bp sequence region has two distinct liver regulatory elements, A (-1944 to -1623) and B (-1622 to -1510), and contains multiple putative consensus binding sites. The element A sequence includes two consensus HFH and one HNF-1alpha site and the element B sequence includes one consensus HNF-3beta site. Deletion of an internal 435-bp fragment (-1944 to -1510) including the A and B elements totally ablated the liver-specific activity of the zebrafish L-FABP gene promoter. Deletion of either of the two elements reduces the liver activity. Mutation of the HNF-1alpha site or either of the two HFH sites in the A element or the HNF-3beta site in the B element significantly altered specificity in the liver primordia of transient expression embryos. The importance of the HNF-1alpha consensus binding site in the A element and the HNF-3beta consensus binding site in the B element within the 435-bp distal region of the L-FABP promoter region suggests that combinatorial interactions between multiple regulatory factors are responsible for the gene expression of L-FABP in the liver.
Nonalcoholic steatohepatitis (NASH) is one of the most frequent causes of abnormal liver dysfunction associated with synthesis and oxidation of fatty acids. Adiponectin receptors (AdipoR1/R2) and insulin receptor substrates (IRS-1/-2) are known as modulators of these fatty acid metabolisms in the liver; however, the regulatory roles of these receptors in the synthesis and oxidation of fatty acids are unclear in the liver of NASH. In this study, we examined the roles of hepatic AdipoR1/R2 and IRS-1/-2 in NASH using an animal model. After feeding a high-fat and high-cholesterol diet to obese fa/fa Zucker rats for 8 weeks, rats showed fatty liver spontaneously with inflammation and fibrosis that are characteristic of NASH. The expression levels of AdipoR1/R2 and IRS-2 were significantly decreased, whereas IRS-1 was significantly increased, in NASH. As a result of the decrease of AdipoR1/R2 expression, the messenger RNA expression levels of genes located downstream of AdipoR1/R2, adenosine monophosphate-activated protein kinase α1/α2, which inhibits fatty acid synthesis, and peroxisome proliferator-activated receptor α, which activates fatty acid oxidation, also decreased. Expression level of sterol regulatory element binding protein-1c was found to be elevated, suggesting the up-regulation of IRS-1, and resulted in increased fatty acid synthesis. Furthermore, increase of forkhead box protein A2 expression was observed, which might be associated with the down-regulation of IRS-2, facilitating fatty acid oxidation. Taken together, increased synthesis and oxidation of fatty acids by up- or down-regulation of AdipoR or IRS may contribute to the progression of NASH. Thus, AdipoR and IRS might be crucially important regulators for the synthesis and oxidation of fatty acids in the liver of NASH.
The prevalence of diabetes has exponentially increased in recent decades due to environmental factors such as nocturnal lifestyle and aging, both of which influence the amount of melatonin produced in the pineal gland. The present study investigated the effect of melatonin on signaling pathways of glucose transport in C2C12 mouse skeletal muscle cells. Intriguingly, treatment of C2C12 cells with melatonin (1 nm) stimulated glucose uptake twofold increase. Melatonin-stimulated glucose transport was inhibited with co-treatment with the melatonin receptor antagonist luzindole. Furthermore, treatment of stably over-expressed melatonin receptor type 2B containing C2C12 myotubes with melatonin amplified glucose transport c. 13-fold. Melatonin also increased the phosphorylation level of insulin receptor substrate-1 (IRS-1) and the activity of phosphoinositide 3-kinase (PI-3-kinase). However, 3',5'-cyclic adenosine monophosphate-activated protein kinase (AMPK), another important glucose transport stimulatory mediator via an insulin-independent pathway, was not influenced by melatonin treatment. Activity of p38 mitogen-activated protein kinase (MAPK), a downstream mediator of AMPK, was also not changed by melatonin. In addition, melatonin increased the expression level of forkhead box A2, which was recently discovered to regulate fatty acid oxidation and to be inhibited by insulin. In summary, melatonin stimulates glucose transport to skeletal muscle cells via IRS-1/PI-3-kinase pathway, which implies, at the molecular level, its role in glucose homeostasis and possibly in diabetes. Additionally, exposure to light at night and aging, both of which lower endogenous melatonin levels may contribute to the incidence and/or development of diabetes.
Apolipoprotein M (apoM), as a novel apolipoprotein which is mainly expressed in liver and kidney tissues, is associated with development and progression of atherosclerosis and diabetes. Our group have recently shown that Dihydrocapsaicin(DHC)can significantly decrease atherosclerotic plaque formation in apoE-/- mice. However, the effect and possible mechanism of DHC on apoM expression remain unclear.
HepG2 cells were treated with 0 μM, 25 μM, 50 μM and 100 μM DHC for 24 h or were treated with 100 μM DHC for 0, 6, 12, and 24 h, respectively. The mRNA levels and protein levels were measured by real-time quantitative PCR and western blot analysis, respectively.
We found that DHC markedly decreased expression of apoM at both mRNA and protein level in HepG2 cells in a dose-dependent and time-dependent manner. Expression of Foxa2 was decreased while expression of LXRα was increased by DHC treatment in HepG2 cells. In addittion, overexpression of Foxa2 markedly compensated the inhibition effect induced by DHC on apoM expression. LXRα small interfering RNA significantly abolished the inhibition effect which induced by DHC on apoM expression. The liver of C57BL/6 mice treated with DHC had significantly lower expression of apoM. Furthermore, the liver had lower expression of Foxa2 while had higher expression of LXRα.
DHC could down-regulate apoM expression through inhibiting Foxa2 expression and enhancing LXRα expression in HepG2 cells.
Mesenchymal stem cells (MSCs) are mesoderm-derived cells that are considered a good source of somatic cells for treatment of many degenerative diseases. Previous studies have reported the differentiation of mesodermal MSCs into endodermal and ectodermal cell types beyond their embryonic lineages, including hepatocytes and neurons. However, the molecular pathways responsible for the direct or indirect cell type conversion and the functional ability of the differentiated cells remain unclear and need further research. In the present study, we demonstrated that valproic acid (VPA), which is a histone deacetylase inhibitor, induced an increase in the expression of endodermal genes including CXCR4, SOX17, FOXA1, FOXA2, GSC, c-MET, EOMES, and HNF-1β in human umbilical cord derived MSCs (hUCMSCs). In addition, we found that VPA is able to increase these endodermal genes in hUCMSCs by activating signal transduction of AKT and ERK. VPA pretreatment increased hepatic differentiation at the expense of adipogenic differentiation. The effects of VPA on modulating hUCMSCs fate were diminished by blocking AKT and ERK activation using specific signaling inhibitors. Together, our results suggest that VPA contributes to the lineage conversion of hUCMSCs to hepatic cell fate by upregulating the expression of endodermal genes through AKT and ERK activation.
Foxa2 is a member of the Forkhead family of nuclear transcription factors that is highly expressed in respiratory epithelial cells of the developing and mature lung. Foxa2 is required for normal airway epithelial differentiation, and its deletion causes goblet-cell metaplasia and Th2-mediated pulmonary inflammation during postnatal development. Foxa2 expression is inhibited during aeroallergen sensitization and after stimulation with Th2 cytokines, when its loss is associated with goblet-cell metaplasia. Mechanisms by which Foxa2 controls airway epithelial differentiation and Th2 immunity are incompletely known. During the first 2 weeks after birth, the loss of Foxa2 increases the production of leukotrienes (LTs) and Th2 cytokines in the lungs of Foxa2 gene-targeted mice. Foxa2 expression inhibited 15-lipoxygenase (Alox15) and increased Alox5 transcription, each encoding key lipoxygenases associated with asthma. The inhibition of the cysteinyl LT (CysLT) signaling pathway by montelukast inhibited IL-4, IL-5, eotaxin-2, and regulated upon activation normal T cell expressed and presumably secreted expression in the developing lungs of Foxa2 gene-targeted mice. Montelukast inhibited the expression of genes regulating mucus metaplasia, including Spdef, Muc5ac, Foxa3, and Arg2. Foxa2 plays a cell-autonomous role in the respiratory epithelium, and is required for the suppression of Th2 immunity and mucus metaplasia in the developing lung in a process determined in part by its regulation of the CysLT pathway.
Circulating levels of insulin and glucagon reflect the nutritional state of animals and elicit regulatory responses in the liver that maintain glucose and lipid homeostasis. The transcription factor Foxa2 activates lipid metabolism and ketogenesis during fasting and is inhibited via insulin-PI3K-Akt signaling-mediated phosphorylation at Thr156 and nuclear exclusion. Here we show that, in addition, Foxa2 is acetylated at the conserved residue Lys259 following inhibition of histone deacetylases (HDACs) class I-III and the cofactors p300 and SirT1 are involved in Foxa2 acetylation and deacetylation, respectively. Physiologically, fasting states and glucagon stimulation are sufficient to induce Foxa2 acetylation. Introduction of the acetylation-mimicking (K259Q) or -deficient (K259R) mutations promotes or inhibits Foxa2 activity, respectively, and adenoviral expression of Foxa2-K259Q augments expression of genes involved in fatty acid oxidation and ketogenesis. Our study reveals a molecular mechanism by which glucagon signaling activates a fasting response through acetylation of Foxa2.
It has been reported that peroxisome proliferator-activated receptor (PPAR)-γ and their synthetic ligands have direct effects on pancreatic β-cells. We investigated whether PPAR-γ activation stimulates insulin secretion through the up-regulation of GPR40 in pancreatic β-cells.
Rat insulinoma INS-1 cells and primary rat islets were treated with rosiglitazone (RGZ) and/or adenoviral PPAR-γ overexpression. OLETF rats were treated with RGZ.
PPAR-γ activation with RGZ and/or adenoviral PPAR-γ overexpression increased free fatty acid (FFA) receptor GPR40 expression, and increased insulin secretion and intracellular calcium mobilization, and was blocked by the PLC inhibitors, GPR40 RNA interference, and GLUT2 RNA interference. As a downstream signaling pathway of intracellular calcium mobilization, the phosphorylated levels of CaMKII and CREB, and the downstream IRS-2 and phospho-Akt were significantly increased. Despite of insulin receptor RNA interference, the levels of IRS-2 and phospho-Akt was still maintained with PPAR-γ activation. In addition, the β-cell specific gene expression, including Pdx-1 and FoxA2, increased in a GPR40- and GLUT2-dependent manner. The levels of GPR40, phosphorylated CaMKII and CREB, and β-cell specific genes induced by RGZ were blocked by GW9662, a PPAR-γ antagonist. Finally, PPAR-γ activation up-regulated β-cell gene expressions through FoxO1 nuclear exclusion, independent of the insulin signaling pathway. Based on immunohistochemical staining, the GLUT2, IRS-2, Pdx-1, and GPR40 were more strongly expressed in islets from RGZ-treated OLETF rats compared to control islets.
These observations suggest that PPAR-γ activation with RGZ and/or adenoviral overexpression increased intracellular calcium mobilization, insulin secretion, and β-cell gene expression through GPR40 and GLUT2 gene up-regulation.
Triglyceride accumulation in nonalcoholic fatty liver (NAFL) results from unbalanced lipid metabolism which, in the liver, is controlled by several transcription factors. The Foxa subfamily of winged helix/forkhead box (Fox) transcription factors comprises three members which play important roles in controlling both metabolism and homeostasis through the regulation of multiple target genes in the liver, pancreas and adipose tissue. In the mouse liver, Foxa2 is repressed by insulin and mediates fasting responses. Unlike Foxa2 however, the role of Foxa1 in the liver has not yet been investigated in detail. In this study, we evaluate the role of Foxa1 in two human liver cell models, primary cultured hepatocytes and HepG2 cells, by adenoviral infection. Moreover, human and rat livers were analyzed to determine Foxa1 regulation in NAFL. Results demonstrate that Foxa1 is a potent inhibitor of hepatic triglyceride synthesis, accumulation and secretion by repressing the expression of multiple target genes of these pathways (e.g., GPAM, DGAT2, MTP, APOB). Moreover, Foxa1 represses the fatty acid transporter protein FATP2 and lowers fatty acid uptake. Foxa1 also increases the breakdown of fatty acids by inducing peroxisomal fatty acid β-oxidation and ketone body synthesis. Finally, Foxa1 is able to largely up-regulate UCP1, thereby dissipating energy and consistently decreasing the mitochondria membrane potential. We also report that human and rat NAFL have a reduced Foxa1 expression, possibly through a protein kinase C-dependent pathway. We conclude that Foxa1 is an antisteatotic factor that coordinately tunes several lipid metabolic pathways to block triglyceride accumulation in hepatocytes. However, Foxa1 is down-regulated in human and rat NAFL and, therefore, increasing Foxa1 levels could protect from steatosis. Altogether, we suggest that Foxa1 could be a novel therapeutic target for NAFL disease and insulin resistance.
A connection between diet, obesity and diabetes exists in multiple species and is the basis of an escalating human health problem. The factors responsible provoke both insulin resistance and pancreatic beta cell dysfunction but remain to be fully identified. We report a combination of molecular events in human and mouse pancreatic beta cells, induced by elevated levels of free fatty acids or by administration of a high-fat diet with associated obesity, that comprise a pathogenic pathway to diabetes. Elevated concentrations of free fatty acids caused nuclear exclusion and reduced expression of the transcription factors FOXA2 and HNF1A in beta cells. This resulted in a deficit of GnT-4a glycosyltransferase expression in beta cells that produced signs of metabolic disease, including hyperglycemia, impaired glucose tolerance, hyperinsulinemia, hepatic steatosis and diminished insulin action in muscle and adipose tissues. Protection from disease was conferred by enforced beta cell-specific GnT-4a protein glycosylation and involved the maintenance of glucose transporter expression and the preservation of glucose transport. We observed that this pathogenic process was active in human islet cells obtained from donors with type 2 diabetes; thus, illuminating a pathway to disease implicated in the diet- and obesity-associated component of type 2 diabetes mellitus.
Recent success in pancreatic islet transplantation has energized the field to discover an alternative source of stem cells with differentiation potential to beta cells. Generation of glucose-responsive, insulin-producing beta cells from self-renewing, pluripotent human ESCs (hESCs) has immense potential for diabetes treatment. We report here the development of a novel serum-free protocol to generate insulin-producing islet-like clusters (ILCs) from hESCs grown under feeder-free conditions. In this 36-day protocol, hESCs were treated with sodium butyrate and activin A to generate definitive endoderm coexpressing CXCR4 and Sox17, and CXCR4 and Foxa2. The endoderm population was then converted into cellular aggregates and further differentiated to Pdx1-expressing pancreatic endoderm in the presence of epidermal growth factor, basic fibroblast growth factor, and noggin. Soon thereafter, expression of Ptf1a and Ngn3 was detected, indicative of further pancreatic differentiation. The aggregates were finally matured in the presence of insulin-like growth factor II and nicotinamide. The temporal pattern of pancreas-specific gene expression in the hESC-derived ILCs showed considerable similarity to in vivo pancreas development, and the final population contained representatives of the ductal, exocrine, and endocrine pancreas. The hESC-derived ILCs contained 2%-8% human C-peptide-positive cells, as well as glucagon- and somatostatin-positive cells. Insulin content as high as 70 ng of insulin/mug of DNA was measured in the ILCs, representing levels higher than that of human fetal islets. In addition, the hESC-derived ILCs contained numerous secretory granules, as determined by electron microscopy, and secreted human C-peptide in a glucose-dependent manner. Disclosure of potential conflicts of interest is found at the end of this article.
VLDL levels are elevated in type II diabetes, where they contribute to the risk of coronary heart disease. A study by Wolfrum and Stoffel (2006) shows that the forkhead protein Foxa2 stimulates hepatic VLDL production in concert with the coactivator PGC-1beta and that insulin inhibits this process by inactivating Foxa2.
Forkhead transcription factor Foxa2 activates genes involved in hepatic lipid metabolism and is regulated by insulin. Activation of Foxa2 in the liver leads to increased oxidation and secretion of fatty acids in the form of triacylglycerols (TAGs), a process impaired in type 2 diabetes. Here, we demonstrate that Foxa2 is coactivated by PPARgamma coactivator beta (Pgc-1beta). Adenoviral expression of Foxa2 and Pgc-1beta in livers of ob/ob mice results in decreased hepatic TAG content and increased plasma TAG concentrations. In addition, the concerted action of Foxa2/Pgc-1beta activates genes in mitochondrial beta oxidation and enhances fatty acid metabolism. Furthermore, Foxa2/Pgc-1beta induce the expression of microsomal transfer protein, thereby increasing apoB-containing VLDL secretion. This process is inhibited by insulin through a Foxa2-dependent mechanism. These data demonstrate that Foxa2/Pgc-1beta regulate hepatic lipid homeostasis by affecting the clearance rate of fatty acids through oxidation and/or secretion of lipids in response to insulin.
The hypothesis was tested that sequence diversity in pregnane X receptor (PXR) cis-regulatory regions is a significant determinant of variation in inducible and constitutive CYP3A4 expression. A combination of comparative genomics and computational algorithms was used to select regions of the human PXR promoter and intron 1 that were resequenced in the polymorphism discovery resource 24 DNA subset. PXR single nucleotide polymorphisms (SNP) were then genotyped in donor human livers phenotyped for CYP3A4 and multidrug resistance protein 1 mRNA and primary human hepatocytes phenotyped for basal and rifampin-inducible CYP3A4 activity. The human PXR promoter [16.9 kilobase (kb)] was significantly larger than in rodents (2.9 kb). Eighty-nine SNPs were identified in the promoter and intron 1 of PXR. The SNPs most consistently associated with CYP3A4 phenotypic measures were a 44477T>C(-1359) promoter SNP (in linkage disequilibrium with SNP 463970, a 6-base pair deletion in intron 1a, and SNP 46551, a C nucleotide insertion in intron 1b); SNP 63396C>T in intron 1 (in linkage disequilibrium with SNP 63704A>G, a 63813(CAAA)(CA) variable repeat, and SNP 65104T>C); and SNP 56348C>A, SNP 69789A>G, and SNP 66034T>C. Donor livers with the variant PXR alleles had altered hepatic expression of PXR targets compared with livers with PXR wild-type alleles. These results identified PXR promoter and intron 1 SNPs associated with PXR target gene expression (CYP3A4) in donor livers and cultured hepatocytes and that a striking number of the linked intron 1 SNPs will affect putative binding sites for hepatic nuclear factor 3beta (FOXA2), a transcription factor linked with PXR expression.
Ovarian carcinoma is a highly lethal malignancy due to frequent relapse and drug resistance. Cancer stem cells (CSCs) are thought to contribute significantly to disease relapse and drug resistance. In this study, a subpopulation of CSCs of ovarian carcinoma was isolated and the genes differentially expressed in these cells were identified to characterize CSCs and to find candidate biomarkers. Ovarian carcinoma cells from patients were primarily cultured, and spheroid-forming cells (SFCs) were isolated. The characteristic genes of SFCs were identified through cDNA microarray and validation by quantitative real-time polymerase chain reaction and immunohistochemistry, and the association of their expression with clinicopathologic parameters was analyzed. GSC (4.26-fold), VAV3 (7.05-fold), FOXA2 (12.06-fold), LEF1 (17.26-fold), COMP (21.33-fold), GRIN2A (9.36-fold), CD86 (23.14-fold), PYY (4.18-fold), NKX3-2 (10.35-fold), and PDK4 (74.26-fold) were significantly upregulated in SFCs compared with parental cancer cells. With validation for human ovarian carcinomas, LEF1, PYY, NKX3-2, and WNT3A were significantly upregulated in chemoresistant cancers compared with chemosensitive cancers. Overexpression of LEF1, VAV3, and NKX3-2 was significantly associated with distant metastasis by immunohistochemistry. VAV3 overexpression was an independent poor survival indicator (hazard ratio=15.27, P<0.05) by multivariate Cox analysis. The further functional assay revealed that VAV3 knockdown regulated CSC activation and ovarian cancer cell proliferation and sensitized paclitaxel (PTX)-resistant cancer cells to PTX treatment. Taken together, we identified by high-throughput analysis of CSCs that VAV3 overexpression is a novel biomarker for poor prognosis and survival in ovarian carcinoma.
Hepatocyte-like cells differentiated from human embryonic stem cells (hESCs) and induced pluripotent stem cells (hiPSCs) can be utilized as a tool for screening for hepatotoxicity in the early phase of pharmaceutical development. We have recently reported that hepatic differentiation is promoted by sequential transduction of SOX17, HEX, and HNF4α into hESC- or hiPSC-derived cells, but further maturation of hepatocyte-like cells is required for widespread use of drug screening.
To screen for hepatic differentiation-promoting factors, we tested the seven candidate genes related to liver development.
The combination of two transcription factors, FOXA2 and HNF1α, promoted efficient hepatic differentiation from hESCs and hiPSCs. The expression profile of hepatocyte-related genes (such as genes encoding cytochrome P450 enzymes, conjugating enzymes, hepatic transporters, and hepatic nuclear receptors) achieved with FOXA2 and HNF1α transduction was comparable to that obtained in primary human hepatocytes. The hepatocyte-like cells generated by FOXA2 and HNF1α transduction exerted various hepatocyte functions including albumin and urea secretion, and the uptake of indocyanine green and low density lipoprotein. Moreover, these cells had the capacity to metabolize all nine tested drugs and were successfully employed to evaluate drug-induced cytotoxicity.
Our method employing the transduction of FOXA2 and HNF1α represents a useful tool for the efficient generation of metabolically functional hepatocytes from hESCs and hiPSCs, and the screening of drug-induced cytotoxicity.
P4 is a hormone with diverse functions that include roles in reproduction, growth, and development. The objectives of this study were to examine the effects of P4 on androgen production in the mature teleost testis and to identify molecular signaling cascades regulated by P4 to improve understanding of its role in male reproduction. Fathead minnow (FHM) testis explants were treated in vitro with two concentrations of P4 (10(-8) and 10(-6) M) for 6 and 12 h. P4 significantly increased testosterone (T) production in the FHM testis but did not affect 11-ketotestosterone. Gene network analysis revealed that insulin growth factor (Igf1) and tumor necrosis factor receptor (Tnfr) signaling was significantly depressed with P4 treatment after 12h. There was also a 20% increase in a gene network for follicle-stimulating hormone secretion and an 18% decrease in genes involved in vasopressin signaling. Genes in steroid metabolism (e.g. star, cyp19a, 11bhsd) were not significantly affected by P4 treatments in this study, and it is hypothesized that pre-existing molecular machinery may be more involved in the increased production of T rather than the de novo expression of steroid-related transcripts and receptors. There was a significant decrease in prostaglandin E synthase 3b (cytosolic) (ptges3b) after treatment with P4, suggesting that there is cross talk between P4 and prostaglandin pathways in the reproductive testis. P4 has a role in regulating steroid production in the male testis and may do so by modulating gene networks related to endocrine pathways, such as Igf1, Tnfr, and vasopressin.
Three distinct hepatocyte nuclear factor-3 (HNF-3) proteins (alpha, beta, and gamma) regulate the transcription of numerous liver-enriched genes. The HNF-3 proteins bind DNA via a homologous winged helix motif common to a number of proteins known to be critical for determination events in embryogenesis. We have demonstrated previously that two binding sites in the -184 HNF-3 beta promoter are recognized by widely distributed factors and that there is also a critical autoregulatory site, we identified a binding site for a cell-specific factor, LF-H3 beta, that may function in restricting HNF-3 beta gene expression to hepatocytes. Our present study demonstrates that members of the C/EBP and proline and acidic amino acid-rich subfamilies of basic region leucine zipper transcription factors bind the LF-H3 beta site, and cotransfection of HepG2 cells shows that these factors are able to activate an HNF-3 beta promoter reporter construct. The LF-H3 beta-C/EBP binding sequence also confers HNF-3 beta promoter stimulation in response to interleukin (IL)-1 and IL-6. Upstream of this HNF-3 beta proximal promoter region, an IFN-stimulated response element core sequence (-231 to -210) was found that mediates transcriptional induction by IFN-gamma but not IFN-alpha. Gel mobility supershift assay demonstrates that an IFN-gamma-induced protein-DNA complex is disrupted by an antibody specific for interferon regulatory factor-1/interferon-stimulated gene factor-2. Consistent with this finding, we observed that IFN-gamma induction requires ongoing protein synthesis. Surprisingly, the effect of the three cytokines (IL-1, IL-6, and IFN-gamma) in combination as assayed by the same model is not synergistic. HNF-3beta joins the C/EBP family on the list of liver-enriched transcription factors, the expression of which is modulated by cytokines.
Human Forkhead-box (FOX) gene family consists of at least 43 members, including FOXA1, FOXA2, FOXA3, FOXB1, FOXC1, FOXC2, FOXD1, FOXD2, FOXD3, FOXD4, FOXD5 (FOXD4L1), FOXD6 (FOXD4L3), FOXE1, FOXE2, FOXE3, FOXF1, FOXF2, FOXG1 (FOXG1B), FOXH1, FOXI1, FOXJ1, FOXJ2, FOXJ3, FOXK1, FOXK2, FOXL1, FOXL2, FOXM1, FOXN1, FOXN2 (HTLF), FOXN3 (CHES1), FOXN4, FOXN5 (FOXR1), FOXN6 (FOXR2), FOXO1 (FOXO1A), FOXO2 (FOXO6), FOXO3 (FOXO3A), FOXO4 (MLLT7), FOXP1, FOXP2, FOXP3, FOXP4, and FOXQ1. FOXE3-FOXD2 (1p33), FOXQ1-FOXF2-FOXC1 (6p25.3), and FOXF1-FOXC2-FOXL1 (16q24.1) loci are FOX gene clusters within the human genome. Members of FOX subfamilies A-G, I-L and Q were grouped into class 1 FOX proteins, while members of FOX subfamilies H and M-P were grouped into class 2 FOX proteins. C-terminal basic region within the FOX domain was the common feature of class 1 FOX proteins. FOXH1 and FOXO1 mRNAs are expressed in human embryonic stem (ES) cells. FOXC1, FOXC2, FOXE1, FOXE3, FOXL2, FOXN1, FOXP2 and FOXP3 genes are mutated in human congenital disorders. FOXA1 gene is amplified and over-expressed in esophageal and lung cancer. FOXM1 gene is up-regulated in pancreatic cancer and basal cell carcinoma due to the transcriptional regulation by Sonic Hedgehog (SHH) pathway. FOXO1 gene is fused to PAX3 or PAX7 genes in rhabdomyosarcoma. FOXO3 and FOXO4 genes are fused to MLL gene in hematological malignancies. Deregulation of FOX family genes leads to congenital disorders, diabetes mellitus, or carcinogenesis. Expression profiles, genetic alterations and epigenetic changes of FOX family genes as well as binding proteins and target genes of FOX family transcription factors should be comprehensively investigated to develop novel therapeutics and preventives for human diseases.
Embryonic heart development is a very complicated process regulated precisely by a network composed of many genes and signaling pathways in time and space. Forkhead box (Fox, FOX) proteins are a family of transcription factors characterized by the presence of an evolutionary conserved "forkhead"or "winged-helix" DNA-binding domain and able to organize temporal and spatial gene expression during development. They are involved in a wide variety of cellular processes, such as cell cycle progression, proliferation, differentiation, migration, metabolism and DNA damage response. An abundance of studies in model organisms and systems has established that Foxa2, Foxc1/c2, Foxh1 and Foxm1, Foxos and Foxps are important components of the signaling pathways that instruct cardiogenesis and embryonic heart development, playing paramount roles in heart development. The previous studies also have demonstrated that mutations in some of the forkhead box genes and the aberrant expression of forkhead box gene are heavily implicated in the congenital heart disease (CHD) of humans. This review primarily focuses on the current understanding of heart development regulated by forkhead box transcription factors and molecular genetic mechanisms by which forkhead box factors modulate heart development during embryogenesis and organogenesis. This review also summarizes human CHD related mutations in forkhead box genes as well as the abnormal expression of forkhead box gene, and discusses additional possible regulatory mechanisms of the forkhead box genes during embryonic heart development that warrant further investigation.
Gonadotropin-releasing hormone III (GnRH3) is considered to be a key neurohormone in fish reproduction control. In the present study, the cDNA and genomic sequences of GnRH3 were cloned and characterized from large yellow croaker Larimichthys crocea. The cDNA encoded a protein of 99 amino acids with four functional motifs. The full-length genome sequence was composed of 3797 nucleotides, including four exons and three introns. Higher identities of amino acid sequences and conserved exon-intron organizations were found between LcGnRH3 and other GnRH3 genes. In addition, some special features of the sequences were detected in partial species. For example, two specific residues (V and A) were found in the family Sciaenidae, and the unique 75-72 bp type of the open reading frame 2 and 3 existed in the family Cyprinidae. Analysis of the 2576 bp promoter fragment of LcGnRH3 showed a number of transcription factor binding sites, such as AP1, CREB, GATA-1, HSF, FOXA2, and FOXL1. Promoter functional analysis using an EGFP reporter fusion in zebrafish larvae presented positive signals in the brain, including the olfactory region, the terminal nerve ganglion, the telencephalon, and the hypothalamus. The expression pattern was generally consistent with the endogenous GnRH3 GFP-expressing transgenic zebrafish lines, but the details were different. These results indicate that the structure and function of LcGnRH3 are generally similar to the other teleost GnRH3 genes, but there exist some distinctions among them.
The aspartate-histidine-histidine-cysteine (DHHC) protein family shares a 50-amino acid cysteine-rich domain with a conserved DHHC signature motif. DHHC proteins play a critical role in several biological processes. Several DHHC family members have been implicated in neuronal differentiation and synaptic plasticity. And disruptions to their function can lead to disease in the nervous system. Here, we investigate the role of Zdhhc15b, a DHHC family member, in neuro development in zebrafish. Whole-mount in situ hybridization (WISH) revealed that zdhhc15b, an ortholog to human ZDHHC15, is abundant in zebrafish (Danio rerio) forebrain, especially in the diencephalon. Downregulation of zdhhc15b resulted in a smaller diencephalon and a reduction in mature dopaminergic neurons (DA neurons). In the meanshile, mutant zdhhc15b zebrafish was associated with poor learning behavior as detected by T-maze testing. The expression of zdhhc15b was upregulated during DA neuronal differentiation whereas knock-down of zdhhc15b diminished DA neuronal differentiation. Tyrosine hydroxylase (TH) immunofluorescence of cultured DA neurons in vitro also showed that DA neurons were immature following zdhhc15b knock-down. Consistent with the decreased number of DA neurons following knock-down of zdhhc15b, the expression of fate determination-related transcription factors such as nurr1, foxA2, and lmx1a were also reduced in morphant zebrafish. Our results reveal that zdhhc15b controls DA neuronal fate decisions by regulating differentiation but not progenitor cell proliferation or DA neuronal survival.
Diabetes mellitus (DM) is an incurable metabolic disease constituting a major threat to human health. Insulin-producing cells (IPCs) differentiated from mesenchymal stem cells (MSCs) hold great promise in the treatment of DM. The development of an efficient IPC induction system is a crucial step for the clinical application of IPCs for DM. Laminin 411 is a key component of the basement membrane and is involved in the regulation of cell differentiation; however, little is known about a role of laminin 411 in the regulation of IPC differentiation from human MSCs.
MSCs were isolated from human umbilical cord (UC-MSCs) and expanded in an in vitro culture system. UC-MSCs were then cultured in the IPC induction and differentiation medium in the presence of laminin 411. Flow cytometry, Quantitative realtime PCR, immunofluorescence staining, ELISA, Western blotting and other techniques were applied to determine IPC generation, insulin expression and related mechanisms. To evaluate potential therapeutic efficacy of IPCs induced from UC-MSCs, a type-1 diabetes (T1DM) rat model was generated using streptozotocin. Blood glucose, insulin levels, and survival of rats were monitored periodically following intravenous injection of the tested cells.
Laminin 411 markedly induced the expression of the genes Foxa2 and Sox17, markers for pancreatic precursor cells, efficiently induced IPC differentiation from MSCs, and up-regulated insulin expression at both mRNA and protein levels. Furthermore, the expression of the genes known to govern insulin expression including Pdx1 and Ngn3 was markedly induced by laminin 411, which suggests that Pdx1 and Ngn3 signaling pathways are involved in laminin 411 induced-insulin expression machinery. More importantly, administration of laminin 411-induced IPCs rapidly and significantly down-regulated fasting blood glucose levels, significantly reduced the HbA1c concentration and markedly improved the symptoms and survival of T1DM rats.
Our results demonstrate that laminin 411 acts as a potent differentiation inducer of IPCs from UC-MSCs via the Pdx1 and Ngn3 signaling pathways. Moreover, transfusion of laminin 411 induced-IPCs more efficiently improves symptoms and survival of T1DM rats. These novel finding highlights a potential clinical application of laminin 411 induced-IPCs in the treatment of T1DM, which calls for further studies.
The aim of the present study was to screen and identify the chromosomal aberrations that are correlated with clinicopathological characteristics of rectal cancer using array-based comparative genomic hybridization (array-CGH). Forty-eight fresh frozen tumor tissues of rectal carcinoma were analyzed by array-CGH. The results showed that most frequent gains included 8q24.3, 20q11.21-q13.32, 20q13.33 and losses in 8p23.3-p12, 17p13.1-p12 and 18q11.2-q23 were noted. Fourteen amplifications and seven homozygous deletions were identified in the rectal cancer samples. Losses of 4p16.1-p15.31, 8p21.1-p12 and gains of 7p12.3-p12.1 and 13q33.1-q34 were associated with positive lymph node status and advanced clinical stage (stages III and IV). The 17q24.2-25.3 gain was more frequent in patients with distant metastasis. Integrated analysis indicated that overexpression of PDP1, TRIB1, C13orf27, FOXA2, PMEPA1 and PHACTR3 was associated with gains, and underexpression of FHOD, SMAD4 and BCL2 was associated with losses. Pathway enrichment analysis showed that pathways of nitrogen metabolism, oxidative phosphorylation, cell cycle, maturity onset diabetes of young, cytokine-cytokine receptor interaction, MAPK signaling pathway and dentatorubropallidoluysian atrophy were influenced by copy number changes.
Dlx5 and Dlx6 are two closely associated homeobox genes which code for transcription factors involved in the control of steroidogenesis and reproduction. Inactivation of Dlx5/6 in the mouse results in a Leydig cell defect in the male and in ovarian insufficiency in the female. DLX5/6 are also strongly expressed by the human endometrium but their function in the uterus is unknown. The involvement of DLX5/6 in human uterine pathology is suggested by their strong downregulation in endometriotic lesions and upregulation in endometrioïd adenocarcinomas. We first show that Dlx5/6 expression begins in Müllerian ducts epithelia and persists then in the uterine luminal and glandular epithelia throughout post-natal maturation and in the adult. We then use a new mouse model in which Dlx5 and Dlx6 can be simultaneously inactivated in the endometrium using a Pgr(cre/+) allele. Post-natal inactivation of Dlx5/6 in the uterus results in sterility without any obvious ovarian involvement. The uteri of Pgr(cre/+); Dlx5/6(flox/flox) mice present very few uterine glands and numerous abnormally large and branched invaginations of the uterine lumen. In Dlx5/6 mutant uteri, the expression of genes involved in gland formation (Foxa2) and in epithelial remodelling during implantation (Msx1) is significantly reduced. Furthermore, we show that DLX5 is highly expressed in human endometrial glandular epithelium and that its expression is affected in endometriosis. We conclude that Dlx5 and Dlx6 expression determines uterine architecture and adenogenesis and is needed for implantation. Given their importance for female reproduction, DLX5 and DLX6 must be regarded as interesting targets for future clinical research.
The success of postnatal uterine morphogenesis dictates, in part, the embryotrophic potential and functional capacity of the adult uterus. The definitive role of Wnt7a in postnatal uterine development and adult function requires a conditional knockout, because global deletion disrupts müllerian duct patterning, specification, and cell fate in the fetus. The Wnt7a-null uterus appears to be posteriorized because of developmental defects in the embryo, as evidenced by the stratified luminal epithelium that is normally found in the vagina and the presence of short and uncoiled oviducts. To understand the biological role of WNT7A after birth and allow tissue-selective deletion of Wnt7a, we generated loxP-flanked exon 2 mice and conditionally deleted Wnt7a after birth in the uterus by crossing them with Pgr(Cre) mice. Morphological examination revealed no obvious differences in the vagina, cervix, oviduct, or ovary. The uteri of Wnt7a mutant mice contained no endometrial glands, whereas all other uterine cell types appeared to be normal. Postnatal differentiation of endometrial glands was observed in control mice, but not in mutant mice, between Postnatal Days 3 and 12. Expression of morphoregulatory genes, particularly Foxa2, Hoxa10, Hoxa11, Msx1, and Wnt16, was disrupted in the Wnt7a mutant uteri. Conditional Wnt7a mutant mice were not fertile. Although embryos were present in uteri of mutant mice on Day 3.5 of pregnancy, blastocyst implantation was not observed on Day 5.5. Furthermore, expression of several genes (Foxa2, Lif, Msx1, and Wnt16) was reduced or absent in adult Wnt7a-deleted uteri on Day 3.5 postmating. These results indicate that WNT7A plays a critical role in postnatal uterine gland morphogenesis and function, which are important for blastocyst implantation and fertility in the adult uterus.
During embryonic development, Foxa2 is required for the formation of the node and notochord, and ablation of this gene results in defects in gastrulation, neural tube patterning, and gut morphogenesis. Foxa2 has been shown to be expressed specifically in the glandular epithelium of the murine uterus. To study the uterine function of Foxa2, this gene was conditionally ablated in the mouse uterus by crossing mice with floxed Foxa2 alleles, Foxa2(loxP/loxP), with the Pgr(cre) mouse model. Pgr(cre/+) Foxa2(loxP/loxP) mice showed significantly reduced fertility. Analysis of the uterus on Day 5.5 of pregnancy showed disrupted blastocyst implantation. Pgr(cre/+) Foxa2(loxP/loxP) mice also showed a severe impairment of the uterus to respond to the artificial induction of the decidual response. Morphological examination of the uteri of these mice showed a severe reduction in the number of endometrial glands. The loss of endometrial glands resulted in the reduction of leukemia inhibitory factor (Lif) expression. The lack of a decidual response could be partially rescued by an intrauterine injection of LIF before the initiation of the decidual response. This analysis demonstrates that Foxa2 regulates endometrial gland development and that mice with a loss of endometrial glands cannot support implantation in part due to the loss of LIF, which is a requisite for fertility in the mouse.
The oval cells are thought to be the progeny of a liver stem cell compartment and strong evidence now exists indicating that these cells can participate in liver regeneration by differentiating into different hepatic lineages. To better understand the regulation of this process we have studied the expression of liver-enriched transcriptional factors (HNF1 alpha and HNF1 beta, HNF3 alpha, HNF3 beta, and HNF3 gamma, HNF4, C/EBP, C/EBP beta, and DBP) in an experimental model of oval cell proliferation and differentiation and compared the expression of these factors to that observed during late stages of hepatic ontogenesis. The steady-state mRNA levels of four (HNF1 alpha, HNF3 alpha, HNF4, and C/EBP beta) "liver-enriched" transcriptional factors gradually decrease during the late period of embryonic liver development while three factors (HNF1 beta, HNF3 beta, and DBP) increase. In the normal adult rat liver the expression of all the transcription factors are restricted to the hepatocytes. However, during early stages of oval cell proliferation both small and large bile ducts start to express HNF1 alpha and HNF1 beta, HNF3 gamma, C/EBP, and DBP but not HNF4. At the later stages all of these factors are also highly expressed in the proliferating oval cells. Expression of HNF4 is first observed when the oval cells differentiate morphologically and functionally into hepatocytes and form basophilic foci. At that time the expression of some of the other factors is also further increased. Based on these data we suggest that the upregulation of the "establishment" factors (HNF1 and -3) may be an important step in oval cell activation. The high levels of these factors in the oval cells and embryonic hepatoblasts further substantiates the similarity between the two cell compartments. Furthermore, the data suggest that HNF4 may be responsible for the final commitment of a small portion of the oval cells to differentiate into hepatocytes which form the basophilic foci and eventually regenerate the liver parenchyma.
Vitamin D deficiency is implicated in multiple disease conditions and accumulating evidence supports that the variation in serum vitamin D (25(OH)D) levels, including deficiency, is under strong genetic control. However, the underlying genetic mechanism associated with vitamin 25(OH)D concentrations is poorly understood. We earlier reported a very high prevalence of vitamin D deficiency associated with an increased risk for type 2 diabetes and obesity in a Punjabi Sikh diabetic cohort as part of the Asian Indian diabetic heart study (AIDHS). Here we have performed the first genome-wide association study (GWAS) of serum 25(OH)D on 3538 individuals from this Punjabi Sikh population. Our discovery GWAS comprised of 1387 subjects followed by validation of 24 putative SNPs (P<10(-4)) using an independent replication sample (n=2151) from the same population by direct genotyping. A novel locus at chromosome 20p11.21 represented by rs2207173 with minor allele frequency (MAF) 0.29, [β=-0.13, p=4.47×10(-9)] between FOXA2 and SSTR4 was identified to be associated with 25(OH)D levels. Another suggestive association signal at rs11586313 (MAF 0.54) [β=0.90; p=1.36×10(-6)] was found within the regulatory region of the IVL gene on chromosome 1q21.3. Additionally, our study replicated 3 of 5 known GWAS genes associated with 25(OH)D concentrations including GC (p=0.007) and CYP2R1 (p=0.019) reported in Europeans and the DAB1 (p=0.003), reported in Hispanics. Identification of novel association signals in biologically plausible regions with 25(OH)D metabolism will provide new molecular insights on genetic drivers of vitamin D status and its implications in health disparities.
Evidence suggests that the cytokine interferon (IFN)-γ released by natural killer and CD4(+) T cells contributes to the conjunctival goblet cell (GC) loss in dry eye. The purpose of this study was to investigate if topical neutralization of IFN-γ prevents or alleviates GC loss in an experimental desiccating stress (DS) model of dry eye. In this study, we found that topical IFN-γ neutralization significantly decreased DS-induced conjunctival GC loss. This was accompanied by decreased epithelial apoptosis, and increased IL-13 and decreased FoxA2 expression in the forniceal conjunctiva. To establish that IFN-γ produced by pathogenic CD4(+) T cells contributes to DS-induced GC loss, adoptive transfer of CD4(+) T cells isolated from DS exposed donors to naïve RAG-1(-/-) recipient mice was performed. Similar to the donor mice, topical IFN-γ neutralization decreased conjunctival GC loss, suppressed apoptosis and increased IL-13 expression in adoptive transfer recipients. In summary, this study demonstrated that topical neutralization of IFN-γ prevents GC loss via modulating apoptosis and maintaining IL-13 signaling.
Activation of sonic hedgehog (HH) signaling pathway has been implicated in aggressiveness and progression of gastrointestinal tumors. We planned this study to identify a subgroup of gastric cancer (GC) patients with HH activation and to assess the effect of a HH inhibitor in HH activated GC in vitro. We surveyed HH pathway activation among 512 GC specimens for protein expression of various target genes involved in HH pathway: Indian hedgehog (IHH), patched-1 (PTCH1), smoothened (SMO), GLI2, and FOXA2. We analyzed the correlations between the expression of these factors and clinicopathological features and prognosis. In vitro, ten gastric cancer cell lines were screened for anti-tumoractivity of an HH inhibitor, GDC-0449. Among the 512 specimens, 105 (20.0 %), 83 (16.3 %), 130 (25.5 %), 61 (12.0 %), and 206 (40.8 %) were positive for IHH, PTCH1, GLI2, SMO, and FOXA2 expression, respectively. PTCH1 expression was more frequently observed in well- or moderately differentiated tubular adenocarcinoma, intestinal type and low stage GC. GLI2 was correlated with lymphovascular invasion and intestinal type GC. A high-stage and negative PTCH1 staining were identified as unfavorable independent risk factors for overall survival in multivariate analysis (P < 0.001, 0.045, respectively). For IHH, SMO, and FOXA2, there was no statistical difference in clinicopathologic variables and survival outcome. An HH inhibitor had particularly potent effects on GC cell lines with SMO mRNA overexpression. This is the largest report to analyze the hedgehog pathway in GC. PTCH1 overexpression was an independent prognostic factor for survival and SMO overexpression which was found in 12.0 % of GC patients might be the potential predictive marker of HH inhibitor.
Intestinal cell kinase (ICK; GeneID 22858) is a conserved MAPK and CDK-like kinase that is widely expressed in human tissues. Data from the Cancer Genome Anatomy Project indicated ICK mRNA is increased in cancer, and that its expression correlated with expression of mRNA for an uncharacterized F-box protein, FBX9 (GeneID: 26268). ICK and FBX9 genes are arranged head-to-head on opposite strands, with start sites for transcription separated by approximately 3.3 kb. We hypothesized ICK and FBX9 are potentially important genes in cancer controlled by a bidirectional promoter.
We assessed promoter activity of the intergenic region in both orientations in cancer cell lines derived from breast (AU565, SKBR3), colon (HCT-15, KM12), and stomach (AGS) cancers, as well as in embryonic human kidney (HEK293T) cells. The intergenic segment was active in both orientations in all of these lines, and ICK promoter activity was greater than FBX9 promoter activity. Results from deletions and truncations defined a minimal promoter for ICK, and revealed that repressors and enhancers differentially regulate ICK versus FBX9 promoter activity. The ICK promoter contains consensus motifs for several FOX-family transcription factors that align when mouse and human are compared using EMBOSS. FOXA1 and FOXA2 increase luciferase activity of a minimal promoter 10-20 fold in HEK293T cells. Consensus sites for TCF7L2 (TCF4) (Gene Id: 6934) are also present in both mouse and human. The expression of beta-catenin increased activity of the minimal promoter approximately 10 fold. ICK reference mRNAs (NM_014920.3, NM_016513) are expressed in low copy number and increased in some breast cancers, using a ten base tag 5'-TCAACCTTAT-3' specific for both ICK transcripts.
ICK and FBX9 are divergently transcribed from a bidirectional promoter that is GC-rich and contains a CpG island. A minimal promoter for ICK contains functional sites for beta-catenin/TCF7L2 and FOXA. These data are consistent with functions that have been proposed for ICK in development and in proliferation or survival of some breast and colon cancers.
WNT5A is a cancer-associated gene involved in invasion and metastasis of melanoma, breast cancer, pancreatic cancer, and gastric cancer. WNT5A transduces signals through Frizzled, ROR1, ROR2 or RYK receptors to beta-catenin-TCF/LEF, DVL-RhoA-ROCK, DVL-RhoB-Rab4, DVL-Rac-JNK, DVL-aPKC, Calcineurin-NFAT, MAP3K7-NLK, MAP3K7-NF-kappaB, and DAG-PKC signaling cascades in a context-dependent manner. SNAI1 (Snail), CD44, G3BP2, and YAP1 are WNT5A target genes. We and other groups previously reported that IL6- or LIF-induced signaling through JAK-STAT3 signaling cascade is involved in WNT5A upregulation (STAT3-WNT5A signaling loop). Here, refined integrative genomic analyses of WNT5A were carried out to elucidate other mechanisms of WNT5A transcription. The WNT5A gene was found to encode two isoforms by using alternative first exons 1A and 1B. Quadruple Smad-binding elements (SBEs), single Sp1-binding site (GC-box), PPARgamma-binding site, C/EBP-binding site and bHLH-binding site within the promoter A region, 5'-adjacent to exon 1A, were conserved in human WNT5A, chimpanzee WNT5A, mouse Wnt5a, and rat Wnt5a. NF-kappaB-binding site, CUX1-binding site, double SBEs and double GC-boxes within the promoter B region, 5'-adjacent to exon 1B, were conserved in mammalian WNT5A orthologs. Quadruple FOX-binding sites and double SBEs within ultra-conserved intron 1 were also conserved in mammalian WNT5A orthologs. Conserved NF-kappaB-binding site within the WNT5A promoter B region elucidated the mechanisms that TNFalpha and toll-like receptor (TLR) signals upregulate WNT5A via MAP3K7. Quadruple FOX-binding sites rather than GLI-binding site revealed that Hedgehog signals induce WNT5A upregulation indirectly via FOX family members, such as FOXA2, FOXC2, FOXE1, FOXF1 and FOXL1. TGFbeta signals were found to upregulate WNT5A expression directly through the Smad complex, and also indirectly through Smad-induced CUX1 and MAP3K7-mediated NF-kappaB. Together these facts indicate that WNT5A is transcribed based on multiple mechanisms, such as NF-kappaB, Hedgehog, TGFbeta, and Notch signaling cascades.
The endostatin precursor collagen XVIII is expressed at high levels in human livers, the main source being hepatocytes. We have studied the regulatory elements in the promoter 2 of the Col18a1 gene that directs the transcription of the NC1-517 variant of collagen alpha1(XVIII), which is the main form expressed in the liver. The 5'-flanking region of Col18a1 gene was cloned, and a series of 5'-deletions from -3286 bp to +285 bp were linked to the luciferase reporter gene. Transfection experiments in HepG2 cells allowed to identify a silencer-like element containing putative HNF1 and HNF3 sites and activator elements containing stretches of GC-rich sequences. Another putative HNF3 site in close apposition to a NF1/CTF site was localized upstream of the silencer-like element. Cotransfection experiments showed that the Col18a1 promoter 2 was transactivated by Sp1 and HNF3alpha. Gel-shift analyses showed that HNF3, NF1/CTF, and Sp1-like sites specifically recognized nuclear factors. Super-shift experiments indicated that HNF3beta was the major form of HNF3 interacting with the HNF3/NF1 site. The well-differentiated hepatoma cell line mhATFS315 transfected with a truncated form of HNF3beta, which competitively blocks HNF3 transactivating activity, expressed the Col18a1gene at a very low level. Taken together, these data strongly suggest that Col18a1 is a liver-specific gene. Furthermore, gel-shift analyses performed with nuclear factors prepared from well-differentiated hepatocellular carcinomas showed increased HNF3/NF1 binding activity compared with normal livers. Consequently, the precursor of endostatin might be differently expressed according to the differentiated and/or transformed state of hepatocytes.
Long noncoding RNAs (lncRNAs) are thought to play important roles in regulating gene transcription, but few have well-defined expression patterns or known biological functions during mammalian development. Using a conservative pipeline to identify lncRNAs that have important biological functions, we identified 363 lncRNAs in the lung and foregut endoderm. Importantly, we show that these lncRNAs are spatially correlated with transcription factors across the genome. In-depth expression analyses of lncRNAs with genomic loci adjacent to the critical transcription factors Nkx2.1, Gata6, Foxa2 (forkhead box a2), and Foxf1 mimic the expression patterns of their protein-coding neighbor. Loss-of-function analysis demonstrates that two lncRNAs, LL18/NANCI (Nkx2.1-associated noncoding intergenic RNA) and LL34, play distinct roles in endoderm development by controlling expression of critical developmental transcription factors and pathways, including retinoic acid signaling. In particular, we show that LL18/NANCI acts upstream of Nkx2.1 and downstream from Wnt signaling to regulate lung endoderm gene expression. These studies reveal that lncRNAs play an important role in foregut and lung endoderm development by regulating multiple aspects of gene transcription, often through regulation of transcription factor expression.
Our goal is to decipher which DNA sequences are required for tissue-specific expression of epididymal genes. At least 6 epididymis-specific lipocalin genes are known. These are differently regulated and regionalized in the epididymis. Lipocalin 5 (Lcn5 or mE-RABP) and Lipocalin 8 (Lcn8 or mEP17) are homologous genes belonging to the epididymis-specific lipocalin gene cluster. Both the 5 kb promoter fragment of the Lcn5 gene and the 5.3 kb promoter fragment of the Lcn8 gene can direct transgene expression in the epididymis (Lcn5 to the distal caput and Lcn8 to the initial segment), indicating that these promoter fragments contain important cis-regulatory element(s) for epididymis-specific gene expression. To define further the fragments regulating gene expression, the Lcn5 promoter was examined in transgenic mice and immortalized epididymal cell lines. After serial deletion, the 1.8 kb promoter fragment of the Lcn5 gene was sufficient for tissue-specific and region-specific gene expression in transgenic mice. Transient transfection analysis revealed that a transcription factor forkhead box A2 (Foxa2) interacts with androgen receptor and binds to the 100 bp fragment of the Lcn5 promoter between 1.2 kb and 1.3 kb and that Foxa2 expression inhibits androgen-dependent induction of the Lcn5 promoter activity. Immunohistochemistry indicated a restricted expression of Foxa2 in the epididymis where endogenous Lcn5 gene expression is suppressed and that the Foxa2 inhibition of the Lcn5 promoter is consistent with the lack of expression of Lcn5 in the corpus and cauda. Our approach provides a basic strategy for further analysis of the epididymal lipocalin gene regulation and flexible control of epididymal function.
The relative lack of successful pancreatic differentiation of human embryonic stem cells (hESCs) may suggest that directed differentiation of hESCs into definitive endoderm and subsequent commitment towards a pancreatic fate are not readily achieved. The aim of this study was to investigate whether sequential exposure of hESCs to epigenetic signals that mimic in vivo pancreatic development can efficiently generate pancreatic endodermal cells, and whether these cells can be further matured and reverse hyperglycaemia upon transplantation.
The hESCs were sequentially treated with serum, activin and retinoic acid (RA) during embryoid body formation. The patterns of gene expression and protein production associated with embryonic germ layers and pancreatic endoderm were analysed by RT-PCR and immunostaining. The developmental competence and function of hESC-derived PDX1-positive cells were evaluated after in vivo transplantation.
Sequential treatment with serum, activin and RA highly upregulated the expression of the genes encoding forkhead box protein A2 (FOXA2), SRY-box containing gene 17 (SOX17), pancreatic and duodenal homeobox 1 (PDX1) and homeobox HB9 (HLXB9). The population of pancreatic endodermal cells that produced PDX1 was significantly increased at the expense of ectodermal differentiation, and a subset of the PDX1-positive cells also produced FOXA2, caudal-type homeobox transcription factor 2 (CDX2), and nestin (NES). After transplantation, the PDX1-positive cells further differentiated into mature cell types producing insulin and glucagon, resulting in amelioration of hyperglycaemia and weight loss in streptozotocin-treated diabetic mice.
Our strategy allows the progressive differentiation of hESCs into pancreatic endoderm capable of generating mature pancreatic cell types that function in vivo. These findings may establish the basis of further investigations for the purification of transplantable islet progenitors derived from hESCs.
Murine epididymal retinoic acid-binding protein [or lipocalin 5 (Lcn5)] is synthesized and secreted by the principal cells of the mouse middle/distal caput epididymidis. A 5-kb promoter fragment of the Lcn5 gene can dictate androgen-dependent and epididymis region-specific gene expression in transgenic mice. Here, we reported that the 1.8-kb Lcn5 promoter confers epididymis region-specific gene expression in transgenic mice. To decipher the mechanism that directs transcription, 14 chimeric constructs that sequentially removed 100 bp of 1.8-kb Lcn5 promoter were generated and transfected into epididymal cells and nonepididymal cells. Transient transfection analysis revealed that 1.3 kb promoter fragment gave the strongest response to androgens. Between the 1.2-kb to 1.3-kb region, two androgen receptor (AR) binding sites were identified. Adjacent to AR binding sites, a Foxa2 [Fox (Forkhead box) subclass A] binding site was confirmed by gel shift assay. Similar Foxa binding sites were also found on the promoters of human and rat Lcn5, indicating the Foxa binding site is conserved among species. We previously reported that among the three members of Foxa family, Foxa1 and Foxa3 were absent in the epididymis whereas Foxa2 was detected in epididymal principal cells. Here, we report that Foxa2 displays a region-specific expression pattern along the epididymis: no staining observed in initial segment, light staining in proximal caput, gradiently heavier staining in middle and distal caput, and strongest staining in corpus and cauda, regions with little or no expression of Lcn5. In transient transfection experiments, Foxa2 expression inhibits AR induction of the Lcn5 promoter, which is consistent with the lack of expression of Lcn5 in the corpus and cauda. We conclude that Foxa2 functions as a repressor that restricts AR regulation of Lcn5 to a segment-specific pattern in the epididymis.
Mammalian spermatozoa undergo several modification and finally acquire the ability to fertilize during epididymal transit. One of the distinct features of the epididymis is that it displays a highly regionalized pattern of gene expression. This tissue-, region-, and cell-specific pattern of gene expression is critical for the maintenance of a fully functional epididymis. One would hypothesize that disrupting this process provides an ideal approach to male contraception, since it would not interfere with testicular endocrine output or sperm production. To achieve this purpose, we studied a cluster of epididymis-specific lipocalin genes for understanding the specific mechanisms involved in the control of gene expression in the epididymis. We have identified six epididymis-specific lipocalin genes that are differently regulated and regionalized in the epididymis. Lipocalin 5 [Lcn5 or epididymal retinoic acid-binding protein (E-RABP)] is a member of this epididymis-specific lipocalin gene cluster, which binds hydrophobic molecules such as retinoic acid. We have previously shown that the 5kb promoter fragment of the Lcn5 gene confers both androgen-dependent regulation and epididymis-specific gene expression in transgenic mice whereas 0.6 kb promoter fragment does not. To further narrow down the important cis-regulatory elements that regulate gene expression in the epididymis, we studied the Lcn5 promoter in both transgenic mice and immortalized epididymal cells. We have found that 1.8kb promoter fragment of the Lcn5 gene was sufficient for tissue- and region-specific expression in transgenic mice, and that a transcription factor Forkhead box A2 (Foxa2) interacts with the androgen receptor and binds to the 100 bp fragment of the Lcn5 promoter between 1.2 and 1.3 kb. Our finding provides a framework for further analysis of the epididymal lipocalin gene regulation and modulated control of epididymis-specific expression.
Human embryonic stem cells (hESCs) retain the extraordinary capacity to differentiate into different cell types of an adult organism, including pancreatic β-cells. For this particular lineage, although a lot of effort has been made in the last ten years to achieve an efficient and reproducible differentiation protocol, it was not until recently that this aim was roughly accomplished. Besides, several studies evidenced the impact of resveratrol (RSV) on insulin secretion, even though the mechanism by which this polyphenol potentiates glucose-stimulated insulin secretion (GSIS) is still not clear. The aim of this study was to optimize an efficient differentiation protocol that mimics in vivo pancreatic organogenesis and to investigate whether RSV may improve the final maturation step to obtain functional insulin-secreting cells. Our results indicate that treatment of hESCs (HS-181) with activin-A induced definitive endoderm differentiation as detected by the expression of SOX17 and FOXA2. Addition of retinoic acid (RA), Noggin and Cyclopamine promoted pancreatic differentiation as indicated by the expression of the early pancreatic progenitor markers ISL1, NGN3 and PDX1. Moreover, during maturation in suspension culture, differentiating cells assembled in islet-like clusters, which expressed specific endocrine markers such as PDX1, SST, GCG and INS. Similar results were confirmed with the human induced Pluripotent Stem Cell (hiPSC) line MSUH-001. Finally, differentiation protocols incorporating RSV treatment yielded numerous insulin-positive cells, induced significantly higher PDX1 expression and were able to transiently normalize glycaemia when transplanted in streptozotocin (STZ) induced diabetic mice thus promoting its survival. In conclusion, our strategy allows the efficient differentiation of hESCs into pancreatic endoderm capable of generating β-cell-like cells and demonstrates that RSV improves the maturation process.
It was recently reported that human periapical cysts (hPCys), a commonly occurring odontogenic cystic lesion of inflammatory origin, contain mesenchymal stem cells (MSCs) with the capacity for self-renewal and multilineage differentiation. In this study, periapical inflammatory cysts were compared with dental pulp to determine whether this tissue may be an alternative accessible tissue source of MSCs that retain the potential for neurogenic differentiation. Flow cytometry and immunofluorescence analysis indicated that hPCy-MSCs and dental pulp stem cells spontaneously expressed the neuron-specific protein β-III tubulin and the neural stem-/astrocyte-specific protein glial fibrillary acidic protein (GFAP) in their basal state before differentiation occurs. Furthermore, undifferentiated hPCy-MSCs showed a higher expression of transcripts for neuronal markers (β-III tubulin, NF-M, MAP2) and neural-related transcription factors (MSX-1, Foxa2, En-1) as compared with dental pulp stem cells. After exposure to neurogenic differentiation conditions (neural media containing epidermal growth factor [EGF], basic fibroblast growth factor [bFGF], and retinoic acid), the hPCy-MSCs showed enhanced expression of β-III tubulin and GFAP proteins, as well as increased expression of neurofilaments medium, neurofilaments heavy, and neuron-specific enolase at the transcript level. In addition, neurally differentiated hPCy-MSCs showed upregulated expression of the neural transcription factors Pitx3, Foxa2, Nurr1, and the dopamine-related genes tyrosine hydroxylase and dopamine transporter. The present study demonstrated for the first time that hPCy-MSCs have a predisposition toward the neural phenotype that is increased when exposed to neural differentiation cues, based on upregulation of a comprehensive set of proteins and genes that define neuronal cells. In conclusion, these results provide evidence that hPCy-MSCs might be another optimal source of neural/glial cells for cell-based therapies to treat neurologic diseases.
We previously reported the in vitro differentiation of human embryonic stem cells (hESCs) into pancreatic endoderm. Here we demonstrate that islet-like three-dimensional (3D) aggregates can be derived from the pancreatic endoderm by optimizing our previous protocol. Sequential treatment with Wnt3a, activin A, and noggin induced a transient upregulation of T and MixL1, followed by increased expression of endodermal genes, including FOXA2, SOX17, and CXCR4. Subsequent treatment with retinoic acid highly upregulated PDX1 expression. We also show that inhibition of sonic hedgehog signaling by bFGF/activin βB and cotreatment with VEGF and FGF7 produced many 3D cellular clusters that express both SOX17 and PDX1. We found for the first time that proteoglycans and vimentin(+) mesenchymal cells were mainly localized in hESC-derived PDX1(+) clusters. Importantly, treatment with chlorate, an inhibitor of proteoglycan sulfation, together with inhibition of Notch signaling significantly increased the expression of Neurog3 and NeuroD1, promoting a transition from PDX1(+) progenitor cells toward mature pancreatic endocrine cells. Purified dithizone(+) 3D aggregates generated by our refined protocol produced pancreatic hormones and released insulin in response to both glucose and pharmacological drugs in vitro. Furthermore, the islet-like 3D aggregates decreased blood glucose levels and continued to exhibit pancreatic features after transplantation into diabetic mice. Generation of islet-like 3D cell aggregates from human pluripotent stem cells may overcome the shortage of cadaveric donor islets for future cases of clinical islet transplantation.
Retinoic acid (RA) has diverse biological effects. The liver stores vitamin A, generates RA, and expresses receptors for RA. The current study examines the hepatic binding profile of two RA receptor isoforms, RARA (RARα) and RARB (RARβ), in response to RA treatment in mouse livers. Our data uncovered 35,521, and 14,968 genomic bindings for RARA and RARB, respectively. Each expressed unique and common bindings, implying their redundant and specific roles. RARB has higher RA responsiveness than RARB. RA treatment generated 18,821 novel RARB bindings but only 14,798 of RARA bindings, compared with the control group. RAR frequently bound the consensus hormone response element [HRE; (A/G)G(G/T)TCA], which often contained the motifs assigned to SP1, GABPA, and FOXA2, suggesting potential interactions between those transcriptional factors. Functional annotation coupled with principle component analysis revealed that the function of RAR target genes were motif dependent. Taken together, the cistrome of RARA and RARB revealed their extensive biological roles in the mouse liver. RAR target genes are enriched in various biological processes. The hepatic RAR genome-wide binding data can help us understand the global molecular mechanisms underlying RAR and RA-mediated gene and pathway regulation.
The major molecular signals of pancreatic exocrine development are largely unknown. We examine the role of fibroblast growth factor 7 (FGF7) in the final induction of pancreatic amylase-containing exocrine cells from induced-pancreatic progenitor cells derived from human embryonic stem (hES) cells. Our protocol consisted in three steps: Step I, differentiation of definitive endoderm (DE) by activin A treatment of hES cell colonies; Step II, differentiation of pancreatic progenitor cells by re-plating of the cells of Step I onto 24-well plates at high density and stimulation with all-trans retinoic acid; Step III, differentiation of pancreatic exocrine cells with a combination of FGF7, glucagon-like peptide 1 and nicotinamide. The expression levels of pancreatic endodermal markers such as Foxa2, Sox17 and gut tube endoderm marker HNF1β were up-regulated in both Step I and II. Moreover, in Step III, the induced cells expressed pancreatic markers such as amylase, carboxypeptidase A and chymotrypsinogen B, which were similar to those in normal human pancreas. From day 8 in Step III, cells immunohistochemically positive for amylase and for carboxypeptidase A, a pancreatic exocrine cell product, were induced by FGF7. Pancreatic progenitor Pdx1-positive cells were localized in proximity to the amylase-positive cells. In the absence of FGF7, few amylase-positive cells were identified. Thus, our three-step culture protocol for human ES cells effectively induces the differentiation of amylase- and carboxypeptidase-A-containing pancreatic exocrine cells.
Induced pluripotent stem (iPS) cells are ideal sources of hepatocyte for transplantation into patients experiencing hepatic failure. Growth and transcription factors were analyzed to design a single-step protocol for the differentiation of iPS cells into hepatocytes. The expression of transcription factors was analyzed using reverse transcription-polymerase chain reaction (RT-PCR) and compared among iPS cells, as well as fetal and adult liver cells. iPS cells were cultured with growth factors and RT-PCR was performed to analyze the expression of transcription factors. iPS cells were introduced with transcription factors, cultured with growth factors and subjected to real-time quantitative PCR. Indocyanine green (ICG) was added to the medium as a hepatocyte marker. Sox17, GATA4, GATA6, FoxA2, HEX, HNF4α and C/EBPα were expressed in fetal and adult liver cells, but not in iPS cells. Sox17, GATA6 and HNF4α were expressed after exposure a combination of oncostatin M, epidermal growth factor, retinoic acid, dexamethasone and ITS (OERDITS). When iPS cells were introduced with FoxA2, GATA4, HEX and C/EBPα and cultured with OERDITS for 8 days, the cells expressed α-fetoprotein, δ-like (Dlk)-1 and γ-glutamyl transpeptidase (GTP), and ICG uptake was observed. Exposure to FoxA2, GATA4, HEX and C/EBPα and culturing with OERDITS supplementation potentially serves as a single-step inducer for the differentiation of iPS cells into hepatic progenitor-like cells within 8 days.
Pancreatic progenitor (PP) cells are tissue-committed cells, which can differentiate into all kinds of pancreatic cells. They are potential candidates for regeneration of pancreatic tissue. However, it is unfeasible to acquire PP cells from pancreatic tissues and expand them in vitro. Generation of PP cells from adipose tissue-derived mesenchymal stem cells (AD-MSCs) would provide an unlimited source of PP cells. Here we developed a 2-step stepwise protocol, which induced AD-MSCs to generate FOXA2- or SOX17-positive definitive endoderm (DE) (5 days) and pancreatic and duodenal homeobox gene 1 (PDX1)-positive PP cells (4-6 days). By mimicking the developmental progress in embryonic development, we optimized the timing and combination of cytokines to activate the key signaling pathways during pancreatic development. We found that activating the Nodal/Activin signal with Activin A could induce differentiation of AD-MSCs toward DE, which could be further promoted by the Wnt signaling pathway activator Wnt3a. Besides, transient T (BRACHYURY)(+) mesendodermal cells were observed during formation of DE from AD-MSCs. Subsequently, the Wnt signaling pathway inhibitor Dkk1 along with retinoic acid/FGF2 (60 ng/mL) further induced AD-MSC-derived DE cells to differentiate into PDX1-positive PP cells. The derived PP cells were capable to form pancreatic endocrine or exocrine cells. In conclusion, we established a stepwise protocol that could derive DE and PP cells from AD-MSCs. It might provide an unlimited source of autologous PP cells for pancreatic diseases.
